[]

[]

Copyright © 1988, 2002 by Edward S. Herman and Noam Chomsky

All rights reserved under International and Pan-American Copyright
Conventions. Published in the United States by Pantheon Books,
a division of Random House, Inc., New York, and simultaneously
in Canada by Random House of Canada Limited, Toronto.
Originally published in hardcover in slightly different form by
Pantheon Books, a division of Random House, Inc., in 1988.

Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data

Herman, Edward S.
Manufacturing consent : the political economy of the mass media /
Edward S. Herman and Noam Chomsky ;
with a new introduction by the authors.
p. cm.

eISBN: 978-0-307-80162-3

1. Mass media—Ownership. 2. Mass media and propaganda.
I. Chomsky, Noam. II. Title.

P96.E25.H47  2002  381′.4530223—dc21  2001050014

v3.1

[]
TO THE MEMORY OF ALEX CAREY
AND
HERBERT I. SCHILLER

[]

The Iran-contra scandals were blamed on the President’s easygoing
habits, though the people had every opportunity to know this was his way
of doing things or not doing before they put him in the White House, not
once but twice.

_James Reston_

They who have put out the people’s eyes, reproach them of their
blindness.

_John Milton_



CONTENTS



[]


_Cover_

_Title Page_

_Copyright_

_Dedication_

_Epigraph_

Tables

Introduction

Preface

1 A Propaganda Model

2 Worthy and Unworthy Victims

3 Legitimizing versus Meaningless Third World Elections: El Salvador,
Guatemala, and Nicaragua

4 The KGB-Bulgarian Plot to Kill the Pope: Free-Market Disinformation as
“News”

5 The Indochina Wars (I): Vietnam

6 The Indochina Wars (II): Laos and Cambodia

7 Conclusions

Appendix 1
The U.S. Official Observers in Guatemala, July 1-2, 1984

Appendix 2
Tagliabue’s Finale on the Bulgarian Connection:
A Case Study in Bias

Appendix 3
Braestrup’s _Big Story:_ Some “Freedom House Exclusives”

Notes

_About the Author_



TABLES


    Mainstream Media Usage of “Genocide” for Kosovo, East Timor, Turkey,
and Iraq this page

1-1 Financial Data for Twenty-four Large Media Corporations (or Their
Parent Firms), December 1986 this page

1-2 Wealth of the Control Groups of Twenty-four Large Media Corporations
(or Their Parent Companies), February 1986 this page

1-3 Affiliations of the Outside Directors of Ten Large Media Companies
(or Their Parents) in 1986 this page

1-4 Experts on Terrorism and Defense on the “McNeil-Lehrer News Hour,”
January 14, 1985, to January 27, 1986 this page

2-1 Mass-Media Coverage of Worthy and Unworthy Victims(1): A Murdered
Polish Priest versus One Hundred Murdered Religious in Latin America
this page

2-2 The Savageries Inflicted on Worthy and Unworthy Victims, as Depicted
in the _New York Times_ this page

2-3 Mass-Media Coverage of Worthy and Unworthy Victims (2): A Murdered
Polish Priest versus Two Murdered Officials of the Guatemalan Mutual
Support Group this page

3-1 Topics Included and Excluded in the _New York Times’_s Coverage of
the Salvadoran Election of March 25, 1984 this page

3-2 Topics Included and Excluded in the _New York Times’_s Coverage of
the Nicaraguan Election Planned for November 4, 1984 this page

3-3 Topics Included and Excluded in the _New York Times’s_ Coverage of
the Nicaraguan Election of November 4, 1984 this page



INTRODUCTION



[]


THIS BOOK CENTERS IN WHAT WE CALL A “PROPAGANDA model,” an analytical
framework that attempts to explain the performance of the U.S. media in
terms of the basic institutional structures and relationships within
which they operate. it is our view that, among their other functions,
the media serve, and propagandize on behalf of, the powerful societal
interests that control and finance them. The representatives of these
interests have important agendas and principles that they want to
advance, and they are well positioned to shape and constrain media
policy. This is normally not accomplished by crude intervention, but by
the selection of right-thinking personnel and by the editors’ and
working journalists’ internalization of priorities and definitions of
newsworthiness that conform to the institution’s policy.

Structural factors are those such as ownership and control, dependence
on other major funding sources (notably, advertisers), and mutual
interests and relationships between the media and those who make the
news and have the power to define it and explain what it means. The
propaganda model also incorporates other closely related factors such as
the ability to complain about the media’s treatment of news (that is,
produce “flak”), to provide “experts” to confirm the official slant on
the news, and to fix the basic principles and ideologies that are taken
for granted by media personnel and the elite, but are often resisted by
the general population.¹ In our view, the same underlying power sources
that own the media and fund them as advertisers, that serve as primary
definers of the news, and that produce flak and proper-thinking experts,
also play a key role in fixing basic principles and the dominant
ideologies. We believe that what journalists do, what they see as
newsworthy, and what they take for granted as premises of their work are
frequently well explained by the incentives, pressures, and constraints
incorporated into such a structural analysis.

These structural factors that dominate media operations are not
all-controlling and do not always produce simple and homogeneous
results. It is well recognized, and may even be said to constitute a
part of an institutional critique such as we present in this volume,
that the various parts of media organizations have some limited
autonomy, that individual and professional values influence media work,
that policy is imperfectly enforced, and that media policy itself may
allow some measure of dissent and reporting that calls into question the
accepted viewpoint. These considerations all work to assure some dissent
and coverage of inconvenient facts.² The beauty of the system, however,
is that such dissent and inconvenient information are kept within bounds
and at the margins, so that while their presence shows that the system
is not monolithic, they are not large enough to interfere unduly with
the domination of the official agenda.

It should also be noted that we are talking about media structure and
performance, not the effects of the media on the public. Certainly, the
media’s adherence to an official agenda with little dissent is likely to
influence public opinion in the desired direction, but this is a matter
of degree, and where the public’s interests diverge sharply from that of
the elite, and where they have their own independent sources of
information, the official line may be widely doubted. The point that we
want to stress here, however, is that the propaganda model describes
forces that shape what the media does; it does not imply that any
propaganda emanating from the media is always effective.

Although now more than a dozen years old, both the propaganda model and
the case studies presented with it in the first edition of this book
have held up remarkably well.³ The purpose of this new Introduction is
to update the model, add some materials to supplement the case studies
already in place (and left intact in the chapters that follow), and
finally, to point out the possible applicability of the model to a
number of issues under current or recent debate.


UPDATING THE PROPAGANDA MODEL

The propaganda model, spelled out in detail in chapter 1, explains the
broad sweep of the mainstream media’s behavior and performance by their
corporate character and integration into the political economy of the
dominant economic system. For this reason, we focused heavily on the
rise in scale of media enterprise, the media’s gradual centralization
and concentration, the growth of media conglomerates that control many
different kinds of media (motion picture studios, TV networks, cable
channels, magazines, and book publishing houses), and the spread of the
media across borders in a globalization process. We also noted the
gradual displacement of family control by professional managers serving
a wider array of owners and more closely subject to market discipline.

All of these trends, and greater competition for advertising across
media boundaries, have continued and strengthened over the past dozen
years, making for an intensified bottom-line orientation. Thus,
centralization of the media in a shrinking number of very large firms
has accelerated, virtually unopposed by Republican and Democratic
administrations and regulatory authority. Ben Bagdikian notes that when
the first edition of his _Media Monopoly_ was published in 1983, fifty
giant firms dominated almost every mass medium; but just seven years
later, in 1990, only twenty-three firms occupied the same commanding
position.⁴

Since 1990, a wave of massive deals and rapid globalization have left
the media industries further centralized in nine transnational
conglomerates—Disney, AOL Time Warner, Viacom (owner of CBS), News
Corporation, Bertelsmann, General Electric (owner of NBC), Sony,
AT&T-Liberty Media, and Vivendi Universal. These giants own all the
world’s major film studios, TV networks, and music companies, and a
sizable fraction of the most important cable channels, cable systems,
magazines, major-market TV stations, and book publishers. The largest,
the recently merged AOL Time Warner, has integrated the leading Internet
portal into the traditional media system. Another fifteen firms round
out the system, meaning that two dozen firms control nearly the entirety
of media experienced by most U.S. citizens. Bagdikian concludes that “it
is the overwhelming collective power of these firms, with their
corporate interlocks and unified cultural and political values, that
raises troubling questions about the individual’s role in the American
democracy.”⁵

Of the nine giants that now dominate the media universe, all but General
Electric have extensively conglomerated within the media, and are
important in both producing content and distributing it. Four of
them—Disney, AOL Time Warner, Viacom, and News Corporation—produce
movies, books, magazines, newspapers, TV programs, music, videos, toys,
and theme parks, among other things; and they have extensive
distribution facilities via broadcasting and cable ownership, retail
stores, and movie-theater chains. They also provide news and occasional
investigative reports and documentaries that address political issues,
but the leaders of these pop-cultural behemoths are mainly interested in
entertainment, which produces large audiences with shows like ABC TV’s
_Who Wants to Be a Millionaire_ and CBS-TV’s _Survivor_, or with movies
like Disney’s _Lion King_ that also make possible the cross-selling
“synergies” that are a focal point of their attention and resources.

Important branches of the media such as movies and books have had
substantial global markets for many years, but only in the past two
decades has a global media system come into being that is having major
effects on national media systems, culture, and politics.⁶ It has been
fueled by the globalization of business more generally, the associated
rapid growth of global advertising, and improved communications
technology that has facilitated cross-border operations and control. It
has also been helped along by government policy and the consolidation of
neoliberal ideology. The United States and other Western governments
have pressed the interests of their home-country firms eager to expand
abroad, and the International Monetary Fund (IMF) and World Bank have
done the same, striving with considerable success to enlarge
transnational corporate access to media markets across the globe.
Neoliberal ideology has provided the intellectual rationale for policies
that have opened up the ownership of broadcasting stations and cable and
satellite systems to private transnational investors.

The culture and ideology fostered in this globalization process relate
largely to “lifestyle” themes and goods and their acquisition; and they
tend to weaken any sense of community helpful to civic life. Robert
McChesney notes that “the hallmark of the global media system is its
relentless, ubiquitous commercialism.”⁷ Shopping channels,
“infomercials,” and product placement are booming in the global media
system. McChesney adds that “it should come as no surprise that account
after account in the late 1990s documents the fascination, even the
obsession, of the world’s middle class youth with consumer brands and
products.”⁸ The global media’s “news” attention in recent years, aside
from reporting on crusades such as “Operation Allied Force” (the NATO
war against Yugoslavia) and on national elections, has been inordinately
directed to sensationalism, as in their obsessive focus on the O. J.
Simpson trial, the Lewinsky scandal, and the deaths of two of the West’s
supercelebrities, Princess Diana and John F. Kennedy, Jr.

Globalization, along with deregulation and national budgetary pressures,
has also helped reduce the importance of noncommercial media in country
after country. This has been especially important in Europe and Asia,
where public broadcasting systems were dominant (in contrast with the
United States and Latin America). The financial pressures on public
broadcasters has forced them to shrink or emulate the commercial systems
in fund-raising and programming, and some have been fully commercialized
by policy change or privatization. The global balance of power has
shifted decisively toward commercial systems. James Ledbetter points out
that in the United States, under incessant right-wing political pressure
and financial stringency, “the 90s have seen a tidal wave of
commercialism overtake public broadcasting,” with public broadcasters
“rushing as fast as they can to merge their services with those offered
by commercial networks.”⁹ And in the process of what Ledbetter calls the
“mailing” of public broadcasting, its already modest differences from
the commercial networks have almost disappeared. Most important, in
their programming “they share either the avoidance or the defanging of
contemporary political controversy, the kind that would bring trouble
from powerful patrons.”¹⁰

Some argue that the Internet and the new communications technologies are
breaking the corporate stranglehold on journalism and opening an
unprecedented era of interactive democratic media. And it is true and
important that the Internet has increased the efficiency and scope of
individual and group networking. This has enabled people to escape the
mainstream media’s constraints in many and diverse cases. Japanese women
have been able to tap newly created Web sites devoted to their problems,
where they can talk and share experiences and information with their
peers and obtain expert advice on business, financial, and personal
matters.¹¹ Chiapas resisters against abuse by the Mexican army and
government were able to mobilize an international support base in 1995
to help them publicize their grievances and put pressure on the Mexican
government to change its policies in the region.¹² The enlarged ability
of Bolivian peasants protesting against World Bank privatization
programs and user fees for water in 2000, and Indonesian students taking
to the streets against the Suharto dictatorship in Indonesia in 1998, to
communicate through the Internet produced a level of publicity and
global attention that had important consequences: Bechtel Corporation,
owner of the newly privatized water system in Bolivia that had quickly
doubled water rates, backed off and the privatization sale was
rescinded; the protests and associated publicity, along with the 1998
financial crisis, helped drive Suharto from office.¹³

Broader protest movements have also benefited from Internet-based
communication. When the leading members of the World Trade Organization
(WTO) attempted in 1998 to push through in secret a Multilateral
Agreement on Investment that would have protected further the rights of
international investors as against the rights of democratic bodies
within states, the Internet was extremely valuable in alerting
opposition forces to the threat and helping mobilize an opposition that
prevented acceptance of this agreement.¹⁴ Similarly, in the protest
actions against the WTO meetings in Seattle in November 1999 and the IMF
and World Bank annual gatherings in Washington, D.C., in April 2000,
communication via the Internet played an important role both in
organizing the protests and in disseminating information on the events
themselves that countered the mainstream media’s hostile portrayal of
these protests.¹⁵

However, although the Internet has been a valuable addition to the
communications arsenal of dissidents and protesters, it has limitations
as a critical tool. For one thing, those whose information needs are
most acute are not well served by the Internet—many lack access, its
databases are not designed to meet their needs, and the use of databases
(and effective use of the Internet in general) presupposes knowledge and
organization. The Internet is not an instrument of mass communication
for those lacking brand names, an already existing large audience,
and/or large resources. Only sizable commercial organizations have been
able to make large numbers aware of the existence of their Internet
offerings. The privatization of the Internet’s hardware, the rapid
commercialization and concentration of Internet portals and servers and
their integration into non-Internet conglomerates—the AOL-Time Warner
merger was a giant step in that direction—and the private and
concentrated control of the new broadband technology, together threaten
to limit any future prospects of the Internet as a democratic media
vehicle.

The past few years have witnessed a rapid penetration of the Internet by
the leading newspapers and media conglomerates, all fearful of being
outflanked by small pioneer users of the new technology, and willing
(and able) to accept losses for years while testing out these new
waters. Anxious to reduce these losses, however, and with advertisers
leery of the value of spending in a medium characterized by excessive
audience control and rapid surfing, the large media entrants into the
Internet have gravitated to making familiar compromises—more attention
to selling goods, cutting back on news, and providing features
immediately attractive to audiences and advertisers. The _Boston Globe_
(a subsidiary of the _New York Times_) and the _Washington Post_ are
offering e-commerce goods and services; and Ledbetter notes that “it’s
troubling that none of the newspaper portals feels that quality
journalism is at the center of its strategy … because journalism doesn’t
help you sell things.”¹⁶ Former _New York Times_ editor Max Frankel says
that the more newspapers pursue Internet audiences, “the more will sex,
sports, violence, and comedy appear on their menus, slighting, if not
altogether ignoring, the news of foreign wars or welfare reform.”¹⁷

New technologies are mainly introduced to meet corporate needs, and
those of recent years have permitted media firms to shrink staff even as
they achieve greater outputs, and they have made possible global
distribution systems that reduce the number of media entities. The
audience “interaction” facilitated by advancing interactive capabilities
mainly help audience members to shop, but they also allow media firms to
collect detailed information on their audiences, and thus to fine-tune
program features and ads to individual characteristics as well as to
sell by a click during programs. Along with reducing privacy, this
should intensify commercialization.

In short, the changes in politics and communication over the past dozen
years have tended on balance to enhance the applicability of the
propaganda model. The increase in corporate power and global reach, the
mergers and further centralization of the media, and the decline of
public broadcasting, have made bottom-line considerations more
influential both in the United States and abroad. The competition for
advertising has become more intense and the boundaries between editorial
and advertising departments have weakened further. Newsrooms have been
more thoroughly incorporated into transnational corporate empires, with
budget cuts and a further diminution of management enthusiasm for
investigative journalism that would challenge the structures of power.

Over the past dozen years, sourcing and flak have also strengthened as
mechanisms of elite influence. Media centralization and the reduction in
the resources devoted to journalism have made the media more dependent
than ever on the primary definers who both make the news and subsidize
the media by providing accessible and cheap copy. They now have greater
leverage over the media, and the public relations firms working for
these and other powerful interests also bulk larger as media sources.
Alex Carey, Stuart Ewen, John Stauber, and Sheldon Rampton have helped
us see how the public relations industry has been able to utilize
journalistic conventions to serve its—and its corporate clients’—ends.¹⁸
Studies of news sources reveal that a significant proportion of news
originates in public relations releases. There are, by one count, 20,000
more public relations agents working to doctor the news today than there
are journalists writing it.¹⁹

The force of anti-communist ideology has possibly weakened with the
collapse of the Soviet Union and the virtual disappearance of socialist
movements across the globe, but this is easily offset by the greater
ideological force of the belief in the “miracle of the market” (Reagan).
The triumph of capitalism and the increasing power of those with an
interest in privatization and market rule have strengthened the grip of
market ideology, at least among the elite, so that regardless of
evidence, markets are assumed to be benevolent and even democratic
(“market populism” in Thomas Frank’s phrase) and nonmarket mechanisms
are suspect, although exceptions are allowed when private firms need
subsidies, bailouts, and government help in doing business abroad. When
the Soviet economy stagnated in the 1980s, it was attributed to the
absence of markets; when capitalist Russia disintegrated in the 1990s,
this was blamed not on the now ruling market but on politicians’ and
workers’ failure to let markets work their magic.²⁰ Journalism has
internalized this ideology. Adding it to the residual power of
anticommunism in a world in which the global power of market
institutions makes nonmarket options seem Utopian gives us an
ideological package of immense strength.

These changes, which have strengthened the applicability of the
propaganda model, have seriously weakened the “public sphere,” which
refers to the array of places and forums in which matters important to a
democratic community are debated and information relevant to intelligent
citizen participation is provided. The steady advance, and cultural
power, of marketing and advertising has caused “the displacement of a
political public sphere by a depoliticized consumer culture.”²¹ And it
has had the effect of creating a world of virtual communities built by
advertisers and based on demographics and taste differences of
consumers. These consumption- and style-based clusters are at odds with
physical communities that share a social life and common concerns and
which participate in a democratic order.²² These virtual communities are
organized to buy and sell goods, not to create or service a public
sphere.

Advertisers don’t like the public sphere, where audiences are relatively
small, upsetting controversy takes place, and the settings are not ideal
for selling goods. Their preference for entertainment underlies the
gradual erosion of the public sphere under systems of commercial media,
well exemplified in the history of broadcasting in the United States
over the past seventy-five years.²³ But entertainment has the merit not
only of being better suited to helping sell goods; it is an effective
vehicle for hidden ideological messages.²⁴ Furthermore, in a system of
high and growing inequality, entertainment is the contemporary
equivalent of the Roman “games of the circus” that diverts the public
from politics and generates a political apathy that is helpful to
preservation of the status quo.

It would be a mistake to conclude from the fact that the public buys and
watches the offerings of the increasingly commercialized media that the
gradual erosion of the public sphere reflects the preferences and free
choices of the public either as citizens or consumers. The citizenry was
never given the opportunity to approve or disapprove the wholesale
transfer of broadcasting rights to commercial interests back in 1934,²⁵
and the pledge made by those interests, and subsequently by the Federal
Communications Commission (FCC) itself, that public service offerings
would never be buried in favor of the entertainment preferred by
advertisers, was never fulfilled.²⁶ The public is not sovereign over the
media—the owners and managers, seeking ads, decide what is to be
offered, and the public must choose among these. People watch and read
in good part on the basis of what is readily available and intensively
promoted. Polls regularly show that the public would like more news,
documentaries, and other information, and less sex, violence, and other
entertainment, even as they do listen to and watch the latter. There is
little reason to believe that they would not like to understand why they
are working harder with stagnant or declining incomes, have inadequate
medical care at high costs, and what is being done in their name all
over the world. If they are not getting much information on these
topics, the propaganda model can explain why: the sovereigns who control
the media choose not to offer such material.


UPDATING THE CASE STUDIES

In the case studies presented in chapters 2 through 6, we examine the
differences in treatment of situations broadly similar in character,
except for the political and economic interests at stake. Our
expectation is that news as well as editorial opinion will be strongly
influenced by those interests and should display a predictable bias. We
would anticipate, for example, that an election held by a client-state
government favored by U.S. officials would be treated differently by the
media than an election held by a government that U.S. officials oppose.
It will be seen in chapter 3 that in the important elections analyzed
there this dichotomous treatment and bias was displayed to an
extraordinary degree.

Worthy and Unworthy Victims

In chapter 2, we compare the media’s treatment of victims of enemy
states and those of the United States and U.S. client states. Our
prediction is that the victims of enemy states will be found “worthy”
and will be subject to more intense and indignant coverage than those
victimized by the United States or its clients, who are implicitly
“unworthy.” It is shown in chapter 2 that a 1984 victim of the Polish
Communists, the priest Jerzy Popieluszko, not only received far more
coverage than Archbishop Oscar Romero, murdered in the U.S. client-state
El Salvador in 1980; he was given more coverage than the aggregate of
one hundred religious victims killed in U.S. client states, although
eight of those victims were U.S. citizens.

This bias is politically advantageous to U.S. policy-makers, for
focusing on victims of enemy states shows those states to be wicked and
deserving of U.S. hostility; while ignoring U.S. and client-state
victims allows ongoing U.S. policies to proceed more easily, unburdened
by the interference of concern over the politically inconvenient
victims. It is not a credible reply that difficulty in getting evidence
on “unworthy” victims can account for the application of such a gross
double standard, as an alternative press with meager resources has been
able to gather a great deal of material on their mistreatment from
highly credible sources, such as major human rights organizations and
church representatives.²⁷ Furthermore, only political factors can
explain the differences in _quality_ of treatment of worthy and unworthy
victims noted throughout this book, illustrated in chapter 2 by the more
antiseptic reporting of the abuse of unworthy victims (even U.S. women
raped and murdered in El Salvador) and the greater indignation and
search for responsibility at the top in the case of worthy victims.

That the same massive political bias displayed earlier in the coverage
of Popieluszko and the hundred religious victims in Latin America
continues today is suggested by the media’s usage of the word “genocide”
in the 1990s, as shown in the accompanying table. “Genocide” is an
invidious word that officials apply readily to cases of victimization in
enemy states, but rarely if ever to similar or worse cases of
victimization by the United States itself or allied regimes. Thus, with
Saddam Hussein and Iraq having been U.S. targets in the 1990s, whereas
Turkey has been an ally and client and the United States its major arms
supplier as it engaged in its severe ethnic cleansing of Kurds during
those years, we find former U.S. Ambassador Peter Galbraith stating that
“while Turkey represses its own Kurds, its cooperation is essential to
an American-led mission to protect Iraq’s Kurds from renewed genocide at
the hands of Saddam Hussein.”²⁸ Turkey’s treatment of its Kurds was in
no way less murderous than Iraq’s treatment of Iraqi Kurds, but for
Galbraith, Turkey only “represses,” while Iraq engages in “genocide.”

[]

The table shows that the five major print media surveyed engage in a
similar biased usage, frequently using “genocide” to describe
victimization in the enemy states, but applying the word far less
frequently to equally severe victimization carried out by the United
States or its allies and clients. We can even read who are U.S. friends
and enemies from the media’s use of the word. Thus, with the United
States and its NATO allies warring against Yugoslavia in 1999, allegedly
in response to that country’s mistreatment of the Kosovo Albanians,
official denunciations of that mistreatment flowed through the media,
along with the repeated designation of the abuses as “genocidal.” The
same pattern applies to the Iraqi regime’s abuse of its Kurdish
population—after it had ceased to be a U.S. ally²⁹—an enemy state,
official denunciations, harsh sanctions, and parallel media treatment.

On the other hand, Turkey and Indonesia have long been U.S. allies and
client states and recipients of military and economic aid. In
consequence, and just as the propaganda model would predict, the media
not only gave minimal attention to the severe abuse of the Kurds by
Turkey throughout the 1990s, and to the Clinton administration’s lavish
help to Turkey’s implementation of that ethnic-cleansing program, they
rarely applied the word “genocide” to these Turkish operations.

Similarly, the word was not often applied to the Indonesian mistreatment
of the East Timorese, who were subjected to another wave of terror as
Indonesia tried to prevent or defeat a U.N.-sponsored referendum on
independence in 1999. The United States, after helping Suharto take
power in 1965 in one of the great bloodbaths of the twentieth century,³⁰
and after supporting his dictatorship for thirty-two years, also gave
him crucial military and diplomatic aid when he invaded and occupied
East Timor from 1975.³¹ In 1999, as Indonesia attempted to prevent the
independence referendum in East Timor by violence, the United States
maintained its military aid programs and refused to intervene to stop
the killing, on the ground that what is happening “is the responsibility
of the government of Indonesia, and we don’t want to take that
responsibility away from them” (as stated by Defense Secretary William
Cohen in a press conference of September 8, 1999). This was long after
Indonesia had killed thousands and destroyed much of East Timor. Shortly
thereafter, under considerable international pressure, the United States
invited Indonesia to leave the devastated country.

We have shown elsewhere that in 1975 and later the U.S. media treated
the East Timorese as unworthy victims, saving their attention and
indignation for the almost simultaneous killings under Pol Pot in
Cambodia. The victims of Pol Pot, a Communist leader, were worthy,
although after he was ousted by the Vietnamese in 1978, Cambodians
ceased to be worthy, as U.S. policy shifted toward support of Pol Pot in
exile.³² The East Timorese remained unworthy in the 1990s, as the table
suggests.

As the leader of the faction insisting on harsh sanctions against Iraq
following the 1991 Persian Gulf War, the United States itself was
responsible for a very large number of Iraqi civilians deaths in the
1990s. John and Karl Mueller assert that these “sanctions of mass
destruction” have caused the deaths of “more people in Iraq than have
been slain by all so-called weapons of mass destruction [nuclear and
chemical] throughout all history.”³³ A large fraction of the million or
more killed by sanctions were young children; UNICEF Executive Director
Carol Bellamy pointed out that “if the substantial reduction in child
mortality throughout Iraq during the 1980s had continued through the
1990s, there would have been half a million fewer deaths of children
under five in the country as a whole during the eight year period 1991
to 1998.”³⁴ However, as these deaths resulted from U.S. policy, and
Secretary of State Madeleine Albright declared on national television
that these 500,000 child deaths were “worth it,”³⁵ we would expect the
U.S. media to find these victims unworthy, to give them little attention
and less indignation, and to find the word “genocide” inapplicable to
this case. The table shows that this expectation was realized in media
practice.

The case for severe media bias suggested by the usage of genocide shown
in the table is strengthened by the fact that, despite the great media
attention to and indignation over the abuse of the Kosovo Albanians by
the Serbs in 1998–1999, this mistreatment was almost certainly less
severe than that meted out to the Kurds in Turkey in the 1990s and to
the East Timorese by the Indonesian army and paramilitary forces in East
Timor in 1999. Deaths in Kosovo on all sides in the year before the NATO
bombing were estimated by U.S. and other Western sources to number no
more than 2,000, and the Serb assault and expulsions that followed and
accompanied the NATO bombing campaign also appear to have resulted in
deaths in the low thousands (an intensive postwar search for graves had
yielded some 3,000 bodies by August 2000, not all of them Albanian
civilians or necessarily victims of the Serbs).³⁶ Deaths in the Turkish
war on the Kurds in the 1990s were estimated to be 30,000 or more, a
large fraction Kurdish civilians, with refugee numbers running to 2 to 3
million. In East Timor, where the Indonesian military organized and
collaborated with a paramilitary opposition to a U.N.-sponsored
independence referendum held on August 30, 1999, an estimated 5,000 to
6,000 East Timorese civilians were slaughtered even before the
referendum vote that rejected Indonesian rule, which unleashed a furious
Indonesian army-paramilitary assault on East Timorese.³⁷

The double standard reflected in the politicized use of “genocide” is
applicable to the treatment of news events more broadly, with the media
regularly focusing on the abuse of worthy victims and playing down or
neglecting altogether the plight of unworthy victims. As an
illustration, we may consider the contrasting media treatment of the
alleged killing of some forty Albanians by the Serbs at Racak, Kosovo,
on January 15, 1999, and the Indonesian army-militia killing of “up to
200” East Timorese at Liquica in East Timor on April 6, 1999.³⁸ The
former was seen as useful by U.S. officials,³⁹ who were trying to ready
the U.S. and Western publics for an imminent NATO attack on Yugoslavia.
Although the facts in the Racak killings, which occurred in the course
of fighting between the Serbian military and Kosovo Liberation Army
insurgents within Yugoslavia, were and remain in dispute—and recent
evidence raises further doubts about the NATO-KLA account of events
there⁴⁰—the deaths were immediately denounced and featured by U.S. and
NATO officials as an intolerable “massacre.” The U.S. mainstream media
did the same and gave this reported massacre heavy and uncritical
attention.⁴¹ This helped create the moral basis for the NATO bombing of
Yugoslavia that began on March 24, 1999.

The Liquica killings of East Timorese seeking refuge in a Catholic
church by Indonesian-organized militia forces were indisputably a
“massacre,” apparently involved many more victims than at Racak, and it
took place in a territory illegally occupied by a foreign state
(Indonesia). It was also neither a unique event nor was it connected to
any warfare, as in Kosovo—it was a straightforward slaughter of
civilians. But U.S. officials did not denounce this massacre—in fact,
active U.S. support of the Indonesian military continued throughout this
period and up to a week after the referendum, by which time 85 percent
of the population had been driven from their homes and well over 6,000
civilians had been slaughtered. The U.S. mainstream media followed the
official lead. For a twelve-month period following the date of each
event, the mentions of Racak by the five media entities cited in the
table exceeded mentions of Liquica by 4.1 to 1, and mentions of
“massacre” at the two sites was in a ratio of 6.7 to 1. The greater
length of accounts of the Racak event elevates the ratio to 14 to 1 as
measured by word count. _Newsweek_, which mentioned Racak and its
“massacre” nine times, failed to mention Liquica once.

Thus, with the cooperation of the media, the Racak killings were
effectively used by U.S. officials to ready the public for war, not only
by their intensive coverage but also by their taking the official
allegations of massacre at face value. In the same time frame, the
media’s treatment of the indisputable massacre at Liquica was
insufficient in volume or indignation to mobilize the public, in accord
with the U.S. policy of leaving the management of events in East Timor
to the U.S. ally Indonesia.

Legitimating Versus Meaningless Third World Elections

In chapter 3 we show that the mainstream media have followed a
government agenda in treating elections in client and disfavored states.
In El Salvador in the 1980s, the U.S. government sponsored several
elections to demonstrate to the U.S. public that our intervention there
was approved by the local population; whereas when Nicaragua held an
election in 1984, the Reagan administration tried to discredit it to
prevent legitimation of a government the administration was trying to
overthrow. The mainstream media cooperated, finding the Salvadoran
election a “step toward democracy” and the Nicaraguan election a “sham,”
despite the fact that electoral conditions were far more compatible with
an honest election in Nicaragua than in El Salvador. We demonstrate that
the media applied a remarkable dual standard to the two elections in
accord with the government’s propaganda needs.

This same bias is apparent in the press treatment of more recent
elections in Cambodia, Yugoslavia, Kenya, Mexico, Russia, Turkey, and
Uruguay. Cambodia and Yugoslavia were the only two of these seven ruled
by a party strongly objectionable to U.S. policy-makers, and it is in
these cases that the _New York Times_ warned of serious problems: As
regards Cambodia, it asserted that “flawed elections are worse than
none,” and that “the international community must proceed cautiously,
lest a rigged election give Mr. Hun Sen a veneer of legitimacy.”⁴² In
reporting on the Yugoslavian election of September 2000, in which U.S.
officials intervened openly to prevent the reelection of Slobodan
Milosevic, the _Times_ and media in general repeatedly warned of the
possibility of fraud and a rigged election.⁴³ In the case of Kenya,
where U.S. policy toward the ruling government was ambivalent, here also
the _Times_ was skeptical of election quality, noting that “holding
elections is not enough to assure democratic government” and stressing
the need for “an independent electoral commission less bound to
political parties” and “independent broadcast media, allowing opposition
voices to be heard outside election periods.”⁴⁴

But in the other four elections, organized and won by governments
strongly favored by the U.S. State Department, there were no suggestions
that “flawed elections are worse than none” and no featuring of the
threat of fraud; the importance of an independent electoral commission
and broadcast media was not pressed, and in each case the election was
found to be a step toward democracy and hence legitimizing.

In the case of Mexico, long subject to one party (PRI) rule, but
supported by the U.S. government over the past several decades, the
_Times_ has regularly found the Mexican elections encouraging, in
contrast with past fraudulent ones which, at the time, the editors also
contrasted favorably with those in the more distant past! It has
featured expressions of benevolent intent and downplayed structural
defects and abuses. Thus, in its first editorial on the 1988 election
that brought Carlos Salinas de Gortari to power, the _Times_ noted that
prior elections were corrupt (the PRI “manipulated patronage, the news
media and the ballot box”), but it stressed that PRI candidate Salinas
“contends” that political reform is urgent and “calls for clean
elections.”⁴⁵ The editors questioned whether “his party” will “heed his
pleas,” a process of distancing the favored candidate from
responsibility for any abuses to come. In the editorials that followed,
the _Times_ did not suggest possible ongoing electoral fraud,
“manipulated patronage,” or media controls and bias, although this
election was famous for a convenient “computer breakdown” in the
election aftermath, which turned Carlos Salinas from an expected loser
into a winner. Just three years later, however, at the time of the 1991
election, the editors stated that “as long as anyone can remember,
Mexican elections have been massively fraudulent” as it prepared readers
for new promises of a cleanup.⁴⁶ But all through this period and later,
the _Times_ (and its media rivals) did not focus on fraud or call these
elections rigged; in both news stories and editorials they portrayed
these deeply flawed elections as steps toward democracy and
legitimizing.

In the 1983 Turkish election, held under military rule, with harsh
censorship and only three parties “led by politicians sympathetic to the
military government” allowed to run, the _Times_ found that “Turkey
Approaches Democracy.”⁴⁷ Similarly, in Uruguay’s 1984 election, under
another military regime that jailed the leading opposition candidate and
also refused to allow a second major candidate to run, but organized by
a government approved by the U.S. State Department, the _Times_ once
again found that “Uruguay is resuming its democratic vocation … the
generals are yielding to the infectious resurgence of democracy in much
of Latin America.”⁴⁸

The Russian election of 1996 was important to the United States and its
allies, as Boris Yeltsin, the ruler who was carrying out their favored
policies of privatization and the integration of Russia into the global
financial system, was seriously threatened with defeat. The Yeltsin
government had presided over a 50 percent fall in national output and
large income declines for 90 percent of the population, while the hugely
corrupt privatization process provided windfalls to a small minority,
including an important criminal class. The social welfare and health
care systems had disintegrated under Yeltsin’s rule, contributing to a
startling rise in infectious diseases and mortality rates. Just before
the 1996 election campaign, Yeltsin’s popularity rating was 8 percent
That he could win reelection in such circumstances suggests—and
reflects—a seriously flawed election.

However, with the Yeltsin regime strongly backed by the U.S. government
and its Western allies, the _New York Times_ once again found this
election “A Victory for Russian Democracy,” and so did the U.S.
mainstream media in general. For that paper of record, electoral flaws
were slighted or ignored, and its editors declared the very fact of
holding an “imperfect” election “a remarkable achievement.”⁴⁹ The same
bias was evident in reporting on the March 2000 Russian election, won by
Yeltsin’s anointed heir and former KGB operative Vladimir Putin. Putin
had built his popularity by conducting a brutal counterinsurgency war
against Chechnya, and his electoral success rested heavily on the fact
that the powerful state TV and radio stations campaigned furiously on
his behalf and denigrated and gave no broadcasting time to his
opponents. A September 2000 exposé of the Putin election campaign by the
expatriate _Moscow Times_, based on a six-month investigative effort,
uncovered compelling evidence of election fraud, including ballot
stuffing, ballot destruction, and the creation of 1.3 million “dead
souls” inflating the election rolls.⁵⁰ The U.S. mainstream media,
however, never found any evidence of fraud at the time of the election,
and they have been reluctant to report the findings of the _Moscow
Times_ study.⁵¹ Putin is another “reformer,” like Yeltsin, supported by
the West, so that it follows once again that for the mainstream media a
flawed election—hardly admitted to be flawed—remains better than none.⁵²

The KGB-Bulgarian Plot to Assassinate the Pope

During the Reagan era (1981–88), there was a concerted effort to
demonize the Soviet Union, in order to support a major arms buildup and
a new, more aggressive policy in the Third World and globally. The
Soviet Union was described as an “Evil Empire” and accused of sponsoring
international terrorism as well as abusing its own and client-nation
peoples.⁵³ When the would-be assassin Mehmet Ali Agca shot Pope John
Paul II in Rome in May 1981, this provided the basis for one of the most
successful propaganda campaigns of the Cold War era.

Although the pope’s assailant was a Turkish fascist and member of a
violently anti-left party in Turkey, after a seventeen-month stint in an
Italian prison Agca “confessed” that he had been hired by the KGB and
Bulgarians. This confession was convenient, fitting well the interests
of the dominant Italian parties anxious to discredit the powerful
Italian Communist party as well as the Reagan administration’s “Evil
Empire” campaign. It was extremely suspicious for other reasons, coming
so belatedly, and after numerous visits to Agca by Italian secret
service representatives, judges, and papal agents, all with a political
ax to grind, and with the secret service notorious for ideological
extremism and willingness to doctor evidence.⁵⁴

But the mainstream media accepted this story with astonishing
gullibility—the possibility of coaching and pressure on Agca to name the
KGB and Bulgarians, much discussed in the Italian media, was almost
never mentioned as even a theoretical possibility. And the weakness of
the alleged Soviet motive, the sheer stupidity of the enterprise if
Soviet-based, and the complete lack of confirmatory evidence was almost
entirely ignored by the media (as described in chapter 4). When the case
was lost in an Italian court in 1986, despite a substantial Italian
government investment and effort, for the U.S. mainstream media this
merely reflected the peculiarities of the Italian system of justice; the
continued absence of hard evidence led to no reassessment of the case or
reflections on their own role.

In the years that followed, two developments threw some light on the
case. One is that the Soviet and Bulgarian archives were opened up, and
Allen Weinstein of the Center for Democracy gained permission from
Bulgarian authorities in 1991 for members of his investigative
commission to look at the Bulgarian Interior Ministry’s secret service
files. After a stint in Bulgaria, Weinstein returned home having failed
to locate any confirmatory evidence of Bulgarian or KGB involvement. The
_Los Angeles Times, New York Times, Washington Post, Newsweek_, and
_Time_, each of which had reported Weinstein’s initiative and impending
trip to Bulgaria in 1991, all failed to inform their readers of his
negative findings.⁵⁵

Later in 1991, at Senate hearings on the confirmation of Robert Gates as
head of the CIA, former CIA officers Melvin Goodman and Harold Ford
testified that the CIA’s analysis of the Bulgarian Connection had been
seriously compromised and politicized in support of the Reagan era
anti-Soviet propaganda campaign. Goodman testified that not only had the
CIA found no evidence of Soviet or Bulgarian involvement in the
shooting, but that based on the CIA’s “very good penetration of the
Bulgarian secret services” its professionals had concluded that a
Bulgarian Connection did not exist.⁵⁶

This testimony, which was a brutal _coup de grâce_ to the claims of a
connection, put the media on the spot. It was now clear that in their
enthusiastic support of the plot they had seriously misled their readers
and performed badly as news purveyors and analysts, although serving
well the propaganda needs of their government. But as in 1986, after the
case against the Bulgarians was dismissed in an Italian court for
insufficient evidence, none of them felt any obligation to explain their
failures and apologize to their readers. They reported the CIA
revelations tersely, with some still claiming that while the connection
had not been proved it had not been disproved either (ignoring the
frequent impossibility of proving a negative).⁵⁷ But in general the
mainstream media moved quickly on without reassessing their performance
or the fact that they and their media colleagues had been agents of
propaganda.

The _New York Times_, which had been consistently supportive of the
connection in both news and editorials, not only failed to report
Weinstein’s negative findings from the search of the Bulgarian files, it
also excluded Goodman’s statement on the CIA’s penetration of the
Bulgarian secret services from their excerpts from his testimony. The
_Times_ had long maintained that the CIA and the Reagan administration
“recoiled from the devastating implication that Bulgaria’s agents were
bound to have acted only on a signal from Moscow.”⁵⁸ But Goodman’s and
Ford’s testimony showed that this was the reverse of the truth, and that
CIA heads William Casey and Robert Gates overrode the views of CIA
professionals and falsified evidence to support a Soviet linkage. The
_Times_ was not alone in following a misleading party line, but it is
notable that this paper of record has yet to acknowledge its exceptional
gullibility and propaganda service.


VIETNAM, LAOS, AND CAMBODIA

Vietnam: Was the United States a Victim or an Aggressor?

In chapters 5 through 7, we show that media coverage of the Indochina
wars fits the propaganda model very well. The United States first
intervened in Indochina immediately after World War II in support of
French recolonization, after which it carried out a twenty-one-year
effort (1954–75) to impose a government in the southern half of Vietnam
that U.S. officials and analysts consistently recognized as lacking any
substantial indigenous support, and in opposition to local
nationalist—though Communist—forces that were understood to have a mass
base. U.S. leaders operated on the belief that their overwhelming
military might would not only enable them, but entitled them, to force
submission to a minority government of U.S. choice.

By normal word usage this would make the U.S. effort in Vietnam a case
of “aggression.” The mainstream media, however, rarely if ever found
U.S. policy there to be other than highly moral and well intentioned,
even if based on miscalculation of its costs—to us (see chapter 5). The
media readily accepted that we were protecting “South Vietnam”—a U.S.
creation ruled by a dictator imported directly from the United
States—against somebody else’s aggression, vacillating in their
identification of the aggressor between North Vietnam, the Soviet Union,
China, or the resistance in South Vietnam engaging in “internal
aggression”! It is compelling evidence of the propaganda service of the
mainstream media that throughout the war they accepted this basic
propaganda assumption of the war managers, and from that era up to
today, we have never found a mainstream editorial or news report that
characterized the U.S. war against Vietnam, and then all of Indochina,
as a case of aggression.

After the United States terminated the military phase of the war in
1975, it maintained and enforced an eighteen-year boycott of the country
that it had virtually destroyed. According to Vietnamese estimates, the
war had cost them 3 million killed, 300,000 missing, 4.4 million
wounded, and 2 million harmed by toxic chemicals; and its land was left
ravaged by bombs and Rome plows as well as chemical weapons. With 58,000
killed, the U.S. death toll from the war was under one-tenth of 1
percent of its population; Vietnam’s death toll was 17 percent of its
population, and only Vietnam’s people were attacked by chemical warfare
and had their countryside devastated.

Nevertheless, U.S. officials and the mainstream media continued to view
the U.S. role in the war as creditable, the United States as the victim.
President George Bush stated in 1992 that “Hanoi knows today that we
seek only answers without the threat of retribution for the past.”⁵⁹
That is, the Vietnamese had done things to us that might justify
retribution on our part, but we only seek answers regarding our men
missing in action.⁶⁰ _New York Times_ foreign affairs commentator Leslie
Gelb justified classifying Vietnam an “outlaw” on the grounds that “they
had killed Americans.”⁶¹ This reflects the common establishment view,
implicit in Bush’s comment, that nobody has a right of self-defense
against this country, even if it intervenes across the ocean to impose
by force a government that the people of that country reject.

U.S. Chemical Warfare in Indochina

It is also of interest how the media have treated the massive use of
chemicals during the Vietnam War and the horrifying aftermath for the
victim country. In 1961 and 1962 the Kennedy administration authorized
the use of chemicals to destroy rice crops in South Vietnam—in violation
of a U.S. tradition as well as international law (Admiral William Leahy,
in response to a proposal to destroy Japanese rice crops in 1944, stated
that this would “violate every Christian ethic I have ever heard of and
all known laws of war”).⁶² Between 1961 and 1971, however, the U.S. Air
Force sprayed 20 million gallons of concentrated arsenic-based and
dioxin-laden herbicides (mainly Agent Orange) on 6 million acres of
crops and trees, besides using large quantities of the “super tear gas”
CS and vast amounts of napalm and phosphorus bombs.⁶³ An estimated 13
percent of South Vietnam’s land was subjected to chemical attacks. This
included 30 percent of its rubber plantations and 36 percent of its
mangrove forests, along with other large forest areas, destroyed by
toxic chemicals in programs that included multiple “large-scale
intentional effort[s] combining defoliation with incendiaries to produce
a forest fire in South Vietnam.”⁶⁴ A 1967 study prepared by the head of
the Agronomy Section of the Japanese Science Council concluded that U.S.
anticrop warfare had already ruined more than 3.8 million acres of
arable land in South Vietnam, killing almost 1,000 peasants and over
13,000 livestock.⁶⁵ This policy of attempting to force enemy
capitulation by destroying its food supply was not only contrary to the
rules of war,⁶⁶ it was notable in that it “first and overwhelmingly
affected small children.”⁶⁷

Laos was also subjected to chemical attacks in 1966 and 1969, directed
at both crops, and vegetation along communication routes. And in
Cambodia, some 173,000 acres of rubber plantations, crops and forests
were heavily sprayed with Agent Orange in the spring of 1969.⁶⁸ The
Cambodian government complained bitterly at the violation of its
neutrality by this inhumane and illegal action, but Cambodia was too
small and weak for its voice to be heard or for it to be able to
mobilize a legal or other defense. Although the U.N. General Assembly
did strongly condemn the use of chemical agents as contrary to
international law by an 83-to-3 vote in 1969,⁶⁹ it was powerless to act
against the United States, and there was no “international community”
mobilization to halt its use of chemical warfare in Cambodia or
elsewhere in Indochina.

During the Vietnam war, the use of chemicals was reported and criticized
in the U.S. media when first disclosed in 1966, but the subject was
quickly dropped. The illegality of chemical warfare and a policy of
starvation, and their effects on the victim population, were virtually
unreported. There were exceptions, such as Orville Schell, Jr.’s 1971
_Look_ magazine article “Silent Vietnam: How we invented ecocide and
killed a country,” but they were rare indeed. After the war, because of
the effects of Agent Orange on U.S. soldiers, there was some coverage of
this chemical warfare campaign; but the vastly greater impact on the
direct targets of this warfare in South Vietnam remained close to
invisible. Of 522 articles in the _New York Times_, the _Washington
Post_, the _Los Angeles Times, Newsweek_, and _Time_ during the 1990s
that mentioned Agent Orange and Vietnam together, the vast majority
focused on the harm done to U.S. service personnel; only nine articles
acknowledged the targeting of food crops (thiry-nine mentioned forest
cover alone as the target); only eleven discussed in any detail the
impact on Vietnamese and the Vietnamese environment; only three
characterized the use of Agent Orange as a “chemical weapon” or
“chemical warfare;” and in only two articles was it suggested that its
use might constitute a war crime.

The _Wall Street Journal_ did have a lead story on this topic in
February 1997, reporting that as many as 500,000 children may have been
born with dioxin-related deformities and that birth defects in the South
were four times those in the North.⁷⁰ The article did acknowledge U.S.
responsibility for this disaster but contended that “the United States,
emotionally spent after losing the war, paid no heed.” But the United
States did pay heed to the flight of the “boat people” and was not too
exhausted to enforce a vigorous boycott of the target of its aggression,
even if it took no responsibility whatever for the condition of its
victims.

The large-scale application of chemical weapons, and napalm, in Vietnam
was confined to the South. One reason for this was that North Vietnam
had a government with links to other countries, so that the use of these
barbarous and illegal weapons against it would have been widely
publicized. South Vietnam was occupied by the United States and its
client regime, so that the victimized people of the South were voiceless
and could be treated with unlimited savagery. This of course
contradicted the claim that we were protecting them against aggression,
but the media not only underplayed the savagery, they failed to call
attention to the contradiction and its significance. _New York Times_
journalist Barbara Crossette did report that the U.S. failure to get
involved in studying the effects of chemical warfare in Vietnam had been
unfortunate, because as this country had used it heavily in the South
but not in the North, this made Vietnam a controlled experiment in the
effects of dioxin on humans from which much could be learned of benefit
to ourselves.⁷¹ But neither Crossette nor any other mainstream reporter
had anything to say about the fact that the United States had used
dioxin only on the ones it was allegedly protecting against aggression,
nor did they suggest that this constituted a serious war crime, or that
this country might have an obligation to help those it had victimized.

During the 1980s, the Reagan administration mounted a major propaganda
campaign over alleged victims of “Yellow Rain” in Cambodia and Laos,
claiming that chemical warfare had been employed there by the Soviet
Union through its Vietnam proxy. This propaganda effort eventually
collapsed following the U.S. Army’s own inability to confirm this
warfare and, more important, the finding that the alleged Yellow Rain
was bee feces, not chemicals.⁷² Nevertheless, this campaign received
vastly more publicity than the real and large-scale chemical warfare
carried out by the United States in Indochina. The _Wall Street
Journal_, which had heavily featured Yellow Rain and expressed the
greatest indignation at this display of Communist evil, never mentioned
the U.S. employment of chemicals in that area during its Yellow Rain
campaign. The _Journal_’s publisher, Peter Kann, eventually wrote that
the Vietnam war record had clarified “who were the good guys and who
were the bad guys,” definitively shown by “the poisoned fields of Laos”
(his euphemism for Yellow Rain).⁷³ In short, Kann places the massive
real-world use of chemical warfare by the United States in Orwell’s
black hole and demonstrates Communist evil by putting forward the
discredited claim of Yellow Rain that his paper has still not admitted
to be fraudulent.

But the more important facts are these: that with the help of the media,
the Soviet Union was effectively linked to the use of this ugly weapon,
based on false evidence; while by treating the real and large-scale use
of chemical weapons in Indochina by the United States in very low key up
to this very day, the media have helped convey the impression that this
country is a moral force on this issue and opposes use of this terrible
weaponry. U.S. leaders have opposed the use of chemical warfare—by enemy
states—but it is a different matter when they choose to use such
weaponry themselves, or when a client state does the same.⁷⁴

Rewriting Vietnam War History

There have been thousands of books written on the Vietnam War,⁷⁵ and
that war has been a brooding omnipresence in the U.S. culture since its
end in 1975. For the dominant elite the war represents an era in which
resistance to national policy and the associated rise of formerly
apathetic sectors of society caused a “crisis of democracy.”⁷⁶ Those
unruly sectors and the dissidents are seen as having damaged the
cultural and political framework and imposed unreasonable impediments to
the use of force, the latter referred to as the “Vietnam syndrome.”
Within the unruly sectors and among the dissidents, of course, the
“Sixties” are viewed as an era of liberation, of cultural and moral
advance, and a temporary surge of democratization.

The propaganda model would lead us to expect mainstream media
retrospectives on the war to reflect elite perspectives, portraying the
1960s as a dark age and the U.S. role in the war as, at worst, a case of
good intentions gone awry. Focusing here on their treatment of the war
over the past decade, we see that the media have mainly repeated and
elaborated several apologetic themes already entrenched by the end of
the war.

One theme has been that the U.S. intervention was justified by the fact
of “communism on the march” (editorial, _Washington Post_, April 30,
2000). It was argued from the beginning that the Communist advance in
Vietnam was part of a global communist conspiracy, a position maintained
in the face of the split and hostility between China and the Soviet
Union, tension between China and North Vietnam, and the absence of any
evidence that North Vietnam was anybody’s tool. In his book _In
Retrospect_,⁷⁷ former Defense Secretary Robert McNamara admits that he
and his colleagues made a serious error on this point. But neither he
nor the other establishment figures who have used this argument have
ever questioned the U.S. right to intervene by force to stop the “march
of communism” in a country where the Communists had led a nationalist
revolution, were recognized by all official and nonofficial authorities
to command the support of a large majority of the population, and where
their defeat would require open aggression, mass killing, and the
virtual destruction of a distant society.

Closely related was the theme that we were protecting “South Vietnam”
and the “South Vietnamese,” who “let the Americans take over the
fighting” (editorial, _Washington Post_, April 30, 1995). A subtheme of
this line is that we “let down” the South Vietnamese. But as noted
earlier, South Vietnam as a political entity was a U.S. concoction and
the U.S. war managers recognized that most of the southern population
supported the side the United States was fighting. This explains why the
main thrust of U.S. violence was directed to the South, where napalm,
B-52 bombing raids, chemical warfare, the institutionalized killing of
civilians, and a scorched-earth policy were used to destroy the base of
the popular movement.⁷⁸ We also noted earlier that this ferocious U.S.
assault on the South—which contradicted the claim that we were
protecting South Vietnamese—remains invisible in the U.S. media.

Another important theme in the mainstream media for many years has been
the notion that the United States was the victim in the Vietnam war, the
Vietnamese the cruel villains. This remarkable inversion of reality has
been accomplished by two processes: first, by a massive suppression of
evidence on the consequences of the war for the Vietnamese; and second,
by demonizing the victims, based in large measure on “the national
beatification of POWs [prisoners of war] and the myth of POWs as martyrs
still being tortured by Vietnam.”⁷⁹

The only Vietnamese allowed modest attention in the media have been
those mobilized to fight the U.S. war and who were “let down”;⁸⁰ the
vast numbers killed or damaged by the U.S. assault have been treated as
“unworthy victims.” The overwhelming preoccupation of officials,
journalists, pundits, and intellectuals with media outreach has been on
U.S. victims and the effects of the war on this country. Robert
McNamara’s widely publicized book, supposedly a _mea culpa_ and moral
tract, is notable for the fact that his notion of the war’s “high
costs,” and the error and guilt he feels, extend only to U.S. lives and
the effects of the war on “the political unity of our society.”⁸¹ He
offers neither regrets, moral reflections, nor apologies for his country
having invaded, mercilessly bombed, ravaged the land, and killed and
wounded millions of innocent people in a small distant peasant society
in pursuit of its own political ends.

In a remarkable cultural process, also, the victims have been turned
into the villains. As we describe in chapter 5, in an attempt to prolong
the war President Richard Nixon seized on the question of the adequacy
of Vietnamese accounting for our military personnel who were captured
(POWs) and those missing in action (MIAs). He succeeded in keeping the
war going, and some 16,000 more U.S. soldiers and untold numbers of
Vietnamese died in the further fighting in the purported interest of
missing POWs. But although there has never been any credible evidence
that a single POW was hidden by the North Vietnamese, this claim became
an article of faith and cult that dominated U.S. policy toward Vietnam
for many years.⁸²

The myth also became the basis of popular culture accounts in movies
such as _The Deer Hunter, Uncommon Valor, P.O.W.: The Escape_, and
_Missing in Action_, in which Rambo-like heroes slaughter evil
Vietnamese as they save our betrayed and tormented POWs. These movies
turned history on its head. As Vietnam war historian H. Bruce Franklin
points out, “America’s vision of the war was being transformed. The
actual photographs and TV footage of massacred villagers, napalmed
children, Vietnamese prisoners being tortured and murdered, wounded GI’s
screaming in agony, and body bags being loaded by the dozen for shipment
back home were being replaced by simulated images of American POWs in
the savage hands of Asian communists.”⁸³ The powerful cultural myth of
abused POWs as the central feature of the Vietnam war not only allowed
the war to be extended; it helped justify the U.S. failure to aid its
victim in accord with end-of-war promises and it provided the basis for
an eighteen-year economic war against the victim country. It also
functioned as a potent agent of militarization and force weakening the
“Vietnam syndrome.”

In his recent book _Vietnam and Other American Fantasies_, H. Bruce
Franklin, who had previously exposed the fallacies and cult qualities of
the POW-MIA myth, addressed this issue once again, as well as other
fantasies (such as the claim that the antiwar activists often spit at
returning veterans).⁸⁴ Franklin’s book was reviewed in the _Los Angeles
Times_ but was otherwise only twice mentioned in passing in the U.S.
mainstream press. On the other hand, a book by Michael Lind, _Vietnam;
The Necessary War_,⁸⁵ which explains that the war was justifiable
because communism was on the march, U.S. “credibility” was at stake, and
the Vietnamese communists were cruel and ruthless—demonstrated in part
by their refusal to surrender and consequent responsibility for those
killed by U.S. bombs!—was treated differently. It received forty-four
reviews and was mentioned twenty-seven other times in the mainstream
media, and Lind was given Op-Ed space in both the _New York Times_ and
the _Washington Post_, among other opportunities.

In his review of Lind’s book, Vietnam War historian Lloyd Gardner noted
that any U.S. “credibility” problem that arose in connection with the
Vietnam war was a creation of the war managers themselves and flowed
from their own decisions; and Gardner also comments, after analyzing a
series of Lind arguments in defense of the war, that “the evidence
simply washes away his positions like a sand castle on the beach.”⁸⁶ But
Lind was saying what the elite wants said, and Franklin was not, so that
mainstream media treatment followed accordingly.

Laos

Laos’s Plain of Jars was subjected to some of the heaviest bombings of
civilian targets in history, especially after 1968, when Washington was
compelled under domestic pressure to enter negotiations with North
Vietnam and had to terminate its bombing there. It turned to Laos,
although that small peasant country was a marginal factor in the wars;
but Nixon and Kissinger could hardly leave U.S. bombers inactive.
Overall, some 2 million tons of bombs were dropped on Laos. These raids
wiped out 353 villages and killed thousands of civilians, and they
continue to kill now, as the Plain was saturated with hundreds of
millions of “bombies”—tiny antipersonnel weapons specifically designed
to kill and maim. With their 20-to-30 percent failure-to-explode rate,
they remained as potential killers, and their casualty rate is still
high, estimates running from hundreds to 20,000 or more per year, half
of them deaths and half of the victims children.⁸⁷

There have been efforts to deal with this humanitarian catastrophe. The
British-based Mines Advisory Group (MAG) has been trying to remove the
lethal objects, but the British press reports that the United States is
“conspicuously missing from the handful of western organizations that
have followed MAG,” though it has finally agreed to train some Laotian
civilians.⁸⁸ The British press also reports, with some annoyance, that
the United States has refused to provide MAG specialists with “render
harmless procedures,” still treated as a state secret for weapons three
decades old.⁸⁹ The U.S. mainstream media have treated in very low key
the continuing human toll suffered in Laos and have maintained almost
complete silence concerning the U.S. non-cooperativeness in attempts to
alleviate a crisis dating back to the “secret war” against Laos, which
again was “secret” only by tacit propaganda service of the mainstream
media (see chapter 6).

Cambodia

Important changes have occurred in Cambodia since 1988, including
Vietnam’s withdrawal from that country, elections held under UN
auspices, and the death of Pol Pot. We noted in chapter 7 that, after
the Vietnamese had ousted Pol Pot in December 1978, although the United
States and its allies had denounced Pol Pot as “another Hitler”
committing “genocide,” they quickly became his supporter, allowing him
to retain Cambodia’s U.N. seat and otherwise aiding and protecting him
in his Thailand refuge. Vietnam was severely punished—by harsh sanctions
and by U.S. support for a Chinese invasion to teach Vietnam a lesson—for
having terminated Pol Pot’s atrocities! President Carter’s National
Security Advisor Zbigniew Brzezinski stated in 1979 that “I encouraged
the Chinese to support Pol Pot. I encouraged the Thai to help D.K.
[Democratic Kampuchea, Pol Pot’s forces]. Pol Pot was an abomination. We
could never support him but China could.”⁹⁰ In the late 1980s and early
1990s, as the Vietnamese sought to end their isolation by exiting from
Cambodia, but insisted as a condition for withdrawal that Pol Pot and
his Khmer Rouge be excluded from returning to power, the United States
objected, and insisted, with eventual success, that the Khmer Rouge be
included as a contestant party in the post-occupation settlement.⁹¹

What dominated U.S. policy and led to its support of Pol Pot was the
classic rule that the enemy of my enemy (Vietnam) is my friend, and
perhaps also the new tilt toward China, also hostile toward Vietnam. The
support of Pol Pot was awkward, given the prior denunciations of his
policies, but the mainstream media handled it with aplomb, and the U.S.
public was almost surely completely unaware that the United States had
become his ally and supporter. (The explicit statement of support by
Brzezinski quoted above was never mentioned in the _New York Times_, the
_Washington Post_, or _Newsweek_; it was quoted once in both the _Los
Angeles Times_ and _Time_.)

However, in the late 1990s, after Vietnam had left Cambodia and U.S.
officials’ anti-Vietnam passions had subsided, and Pol Pot was no longer
a useful instrument of anti-Vietnam policy, U.S. officials and pundits
rediscovered Pol Pot’s and the Khmer Rouge’s villainy and candidacy for
war crimes trials. The media handled the previous “tilt” toward Pol Pot
mainly by evasion, essentially blacking out the years 1979–95, or
vaguely intimating that the U.S. had supported him for reasons of
“_realpolitik,”_ but avoiding both details on the nature and magnitude
of support as well as any reflections on the morality of backing
“another Hitler.” The _New York Times_’s summary of “Pol Pot’s Rise and
Fall” (April 17, 1998) lists for “1979–1990: Pol Pot and Khmer Rouge are
given refuge at Thai border where they fight back against the
Vietnamese.” “Given refuge” is misleading: they were given economic and
military aid and political support by the United States and its allies.
The _Times’_s main reporter on Cambodia in early 1998, Seth Mydans,
repeatedly blacked out mention of U.S. support, referring to “the
decade-long civil war that followed” Pol Pot’s ouster (April 13), and a
nineteen-year “guerilla insurgency in the jungles of western and
northern Cambodia” (April 17).

The _Boston Globe, New York Times, Washington Post_, and _Los Angeles
Times_, editorializing on the death of Pol Pot on April 17, 1998, were
uniformly indignant over his crimes and regretful at his escape from
justice, but all avoided mentioning the long U.S. support of the
criminal—as well as the U.S. contribution to the first phase of a
“Decade of Genocide.”⁹² The _Washington Post_ blacked out the
inconvenient fifteen-year period of support of Pol Pot with this
summary: “After the nightmare of Khmer Rouge rule and genocide, the
United States and its allies pumped millions of dollars into Cambodia to
help rebuild and to hold elections.”⁹³

It is enlightening to compare the media’s treatment of Pol Pot and
Indonesian leader Suharto, who was also in the news in 1998, as
Indonesia suffered a financial crisis that—along with popular resistance
to the dictatorship—eventually led to his ouster. Pol Pot was described
in the editorials and news columns of April 1998 as “crazed,” a
“killer,” “war criminal,” “mass murderer,” “blood-soaked,” and as having
engineered a “reign of terror” and “genocide.” But in 1998 and 1999, and
in earlier years as well, while Suharto was occasionally referred to as
a “dictator” and running an “authoritarian” regime, he was never a
“killer” or “mass murderer” or one responsible for “genocide.” The
terminological double standard is maintained reliably throughout the
mainstream media.⁹⁴

Less obvious but equally interesting is the difference in willingness to
identify the responsible parties for the killings of Pol Pot and
Suharto. In the case of Pol Pot, there is no uncertainty or complexity:
editorials and news articles uniformly make him and the Khmer Rouge
leadership clearly and unambiguously responsible for all deaths in
Cambodia during the period 1975–78. He was the “man who slaughtered two
million” (_USA Today_), “the executioner” (_Boston Globe_) who “presided
over the deaths” of his victims (_Washington Post_), “the man who drove
Cambodia to ruin” (_New York Times_).

But in Suharto’s case, we move to an ambiguous responsibility, which
means none at all: in the _New York Times_, for example, “a 1965 coup
led to the massacres of hundreds of thousands of supposed communists”
(editorial, Aug. 23, 1996), where we have no agent doing the killing; or
“a wave of violence that took up to 500,000 lives and led Suharto to
seize power from Sukarno in a military coup” (Seth Mydans, Aug. 7,
1996), where the massacre not only has no agent, but is falsely situated
before the takeover of power by Suharto. In a later piece, Mydans states
that “more than 500,000 Indonesians are estimated to have died in a
purge of leftists in 1965, the year Mr. Suharto came to power” (April 8,
1997). Note the passive voice, never used in connection with Pol Pot,
the word “purge” instead of “slaughter” or “massacre,” and the continued
failure to identify the agent.

In the case of East Timor, also, the _Times_ is uncertain about the
source of the killing: “This is one of the world’s sadder places, where
100,000 to 200,000 people died from 1974 in a brutal civil war and the
consequent invasion through combat, execution, disease and starvation.…”
(Steven Erlanger, Oct. 21, 1990). In addition to the lack of a clear
agent, this sentence seriously misrepresents the facts—the civil war was
short and left small numbers dead; and the invasion was not “consequent”
to a brutal civil war, except in Indonesian propaganda.

Another important difference in the treatment of the “worthy” victims of
Pol Pot and the “unworthy” victims of Suharto is in the willingness to
explain away the killings. With Pol Pot, as we describe in chapter 7,
the background of the first phase of the genocide was completely blacked
out in the mainstream account—there is no qualification to Pol Pot’s
responsibility as a killer because his forces had undergone terrible
damage and sought vengeance for the crimes they had suffered; nor are
any deaths in Pol Pot’s years of rule to be explained by the starvation
and disease already pervasive in April 1975. No, the only mentionable
background is his Paris training and Communist fanaticism.

But with Suharto we encounter a whole new world of contextualized
apologetics. For many years the main protective formula was that the
1965–66 killings were “a result of a failed coup,” which “touched off a
wave of violence,” or followed an “onslaught from the left.”⁹⁵ This
formula, invoked repeatedly, suggests that the mass killings were
provoked and thus maybe justified by a prior “onslaught.” The writers
never explain why a failed coup could possibly justify a large-scale
slaughter, but the hint is left hanging. In more recent years, usually
in connection with the explanation and rationalization of the
continuation of a dictatorship, the media regularly juxtaposed political
repression with “stability” and “growth”: “the signs of his success are
everywhere,” although Suharto has brought these gains “by maintaining a
tight grip on power and suppressing public criticism and political
opposition.”⁹⁶ These statements, from the _New York Times_, offer a kind
of context that the paper never gives to Castro, let alone a Pol Pot,
and it shows an apologetic that runs deep.

This apologetic extends to the Suharto invasion and occupation of East
Timor. For years, _New York Times_ reporters have claimed that Indonesia
invaded in the midst of a civil war,⁹⁷ when in fact that civil war was
over well before the invasion. The paper’s news coverage of East Timor
actually fell to zero as the Indonesian attacks and killings in East
Timor reached a deadly peak in 1977–78, a slaughter that elsewhere would
be called “genocidal.” And although Indonesia occupied East Timor in
violation of standing U.N. rulings till its induced exit in 1999, the
paper’s reporters repeatedly referred to East Timor as a “disputed
province” and East Timorese resistance as “separatist,” thereby
internalizing and explicitly legitimizing the aggression and
occupation.⁹⁸

The bias and gentle treatment of Suharto and the Indonesian government
in the media is once again correlated with U.S. policy support that
dates back to the military coup and slaughters of 1965. These were
greeted with enthusiasm by U.S. officials—then Secretary of Defense
Robert McNamara referred to the events as one of the “dividends” of U.S.
support for the Indonesian military—and the “boiling bloodbath” (_Time_)
and “staggering mass slaughter” (_New York Times_) were also seen in the
media as a “gleam of light” (James Reston in the _New York Times_).⁹⁹
U.S. military and economic aid and diplomatic protection continued
throughout the years of the Suharto dictatorship, and the media’s
finding him a good genocidist followed accordingly.

_New York Times_ reporter David Sanger differentiated Suharto and
post-1990 Saddam Hussein—before 1990 he was a U.S. ally—saying “Mr.
Suharto is not hoarding anthrax or threatening to invade Australia.”¹⁰⁰
That is, Suharto’s invasion, mass killing, and long illegal occupation
of East Timor is given zero weight, and his slaughter of somewhere
between 500,000 and 2 million people within Indonesia some years back is
also not mentioned. This tells us all we need to know about how good and
bad genocidists fare in the Western propaganda system.


FURTHER APPLICATIONS

In his book _Golden Rule_, political scientist Thomas Ferguson argues
that where the major investors in political parties and elections agree
on an issue, the parties will not compete on that issue, no matter how
strongly the public might want an alternative. He contends that for
ordinary voters to influence electoral choices they would have to have
“strong channels that directly facilitate mass deliberation and
expression.”¹⁰¹ These would include unions and other intermediate
organizations that might, through their collective power, cause the
interests of ordinary voters to be given greater weight in the political
system.

The propaganda model, and the institutional arrangements that it
reflects, suggests that the same forces that preclude competition among
the parties on issues on which the major investors agree, will also
dominate media choices and rule out “mass deliberation and expression”
on those issues. For example, polls regularly indicate that, except in
periods of war and intense war propaganda, the public wants a smaller
defense budget and favors a spending shift from defense to education and
other civil functions.¹⁰² But because the major investors agree that a
large defense budget is desirable, the two dominant parties compete only
on whether the one or the other is stinting on military expenditures,
with both promising to enlarge it (as both George W. Bush and Al Gore
did in the presidential election campaign of 2000). And the mainstream
media do the same, limiting debate to the terms defined by the two
parties and excluding deliberation and expression of the position that
large cuts are desirable. The alternative presidential candidate, Ralph
Nader, called for such cuts, but the media denied him a voice on the
issues, some of them explicitly defending his exclusion from the
presidential debates on the grounds that the options afforded by the two
parties sufficed.¹⁰³

The U.S. corporate community has favored an immense defense
budget—currently more than five times the size of that of a steadily
weakening Russia, the second biggest spender—because of the great
benefits its members derive from military spending. These include
weapons and other contracting business, direct and indirect subsidies in
research,¹⁰⁴ and the role played by military power in supporting the
global economic expansion in which many U.S. transnational corporations
are active participants and beneficiaries. Business also benefits from
the market-opening actions of trade agreements and from the supportive
operations of the WTO, the World Bank, and the IMF. But these trade
agreements and the activities of the international financial
institutions have generated controversy and political struggle, because
while their benefits to business are clear, their costs are borne
heavily by workers forced to compete in a global job market.
Furthermore, globalization and trade agreements strengthen the political
as well as the economic power of the corporate community, in part
because they shift decision-making authority from democratic polities to
bankers and technocrats who more reliably serve the transnational
corporate interest. Here also, as in the case of defense-versus
civilian-oriented budgets, polls show a sharp dichotomy between
corporate and public preferences, with the latter generally hostile to
the agreements and institutional arrangements favored by business.¹⁰⁵

The propaganda model fits well the media’s treatment of this range of
issues. Consider, for example, their coverage of the passage of the
North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) and the subsequent Mexican
financial crisis and meltdown of 1994–95. Polls taken before its
enactment consistently showed substantial majorities opposed to
NAFTA—and later to the bailout of investors in Mexican securities—but
the elite in favor. Media editorials, news coverage, and selection of
“experts” in opinion columns were heavily skewed toward the elite
preference; their judgment was that the benefits of NAFTA were obvious,
were agreed to by all qualified authorities, and that only demagogues
and “special interests” were opposed.¹⁰⁶ The “special interests” who
might be the “losers” included women, minorities, and a majority of the
workforce.¹⁰⁷ The media dealt with the awkward fact that polls showed
steady majority opposition to the agreement mainly by ignoring it, but
occasionally they suggested that the public was uninformed and didn’t
recognize its own true interests.¹⁰⁸ The effort of labor to influence
the outcome of the NAFTA debates was sharply attacked in both the _New
York Times_ and the _Washington Post_, with no comparable criticism of
corporate or governmental (U.S. and Mexican) lobbying and propaganda.
And while labor was attacked for its alleged position on these issues,
the press refused to allow the actual position to be expressed.¹⁰⁹

In December 1994, only eleven months after NAFTA went into effect,
Mexico suffered a major financial crisis, including a massive flight of
capital, a devaluation of the currency, and a subsequent bailout by the
IMF that required Mexico to carry out painful deflationary measures.
Despite the fact that the meltdown occurred within a year of the
introduction of NAFTA, which the media had portrayed as ushering in a
prospective golden age of economic advance, they were unanimous that
NAFTA was not to blame. And in virtual lock-step they supported the
Mexican (investor) bailout, despite poll reports of general public
opposition in the United States. Experts and media pundits and
editorialists repeatedly explained that one great merit of NAFTA was
that it had “locked Mexico in” so that it couldn’t alter its overall
policy direction or resort to controls to protect itself from severe
deflation and unemployment. They were oblivious to the profoundly
undemocratic nature of this lock-in, made more questionable by the fact
that it had been negotiated by a Mexican government that ruled as a
result of electoral fraud.¹¹⁰

More recently, when the growing global opposition to the policies of the
WTO, the IMF, and the World Bank led to mass protests at the WTO
conference in Seattle in November and December 1999, and then at the
annual meeting of the IMF and the World Bank in Washington, D.C., in
April 2000, media coverage of these events was derisive and hostile to
the protesters and almost uniformly failed to deal with the substantive
issues that drove the protests. The media portrayed the Seattle
protesters as “all-purpose agitators” (_U.S. News & World Report_),
“terminally aggrieved” (_Philadelphia Inquirer_), simply “against world
trade” (ABC News), and making “much ado about nothing” (CNN), but the
bases of the protesters’ grievances were almost entirely unexplored.¹¹¹
Similarly, in the case of the Washington, D.C., protests, the media
repeatedly reported on activists’ attire, looks, body odors, fadism, and
claimed a lack of “anything that can coherently be called a cause”
(Michael Kelly, journalist, _Washington Post_), and they continued their
refusal to address issues.¹¹² There were many informed protesters with
coherent agendas at Seattle and Washington—including reputable
economists, social theorists, and veteran organizers from around the
world¹¹³—but the media did not seek them out, preferring to stereotype
antiglobalization activists as ignorant troublemakers. On op-ed pages,
there was a major imbalance hostile to the protesters. TV bias was at
least as great, and often misleading on the facts. In his November 29,
1999, backgrounder on the WTO, Dan Rather explained that the
organization had ruled on many environmental issues, implying that those
rulings were protective of the environment when in fact they generally
privileged trade rights over environmental needs.

Another notable feature of media reporting on both the Seattle and
Washington, D.C., protests, and a throwback to their biased treatment of
the protests of the Vietnam War era (1965–75),¹¹⁴ was their exaggeration
of protester violence, their downplaying of police provocations and
violence, and their complaisance at illegal police tactics designed to
limit all protestor actions, peaceable or otherwise.¹¹⁵ Although the
Seattle police resorted to force and used chemical agents against many
nonviolent protesters well before a handful of individuals began
breaking windows, both then and later the media reversed this
chronology, stating that the police violence was a response to protester
violence. In fact, the vandals were largely ignored by the police, while
peaceful protesters were targeted for beatings, tear gas, torture with
pepper spray, and arrest.¹¹⁶ One _New York Times_ article went so far as
to claim that the Seattle protesters had thrown excrement, rocks, and
Molotov cocktails at delegates and police officers; the _Times_ later
issued a correction acknowledging that these claims were false.¹¹⁷ Dan
Rather, who had falsely alleged that the protesters had “brought on
today’s crackdown” at Seattle, later suggested that the Washington
protesters were possibly “hoping for a replay of last year’s violence in
Seattle,” setting this off against “those charged with keeping the
peace” who “have other ideas.”¹¹⁸

In their eighty-seven-page report, _Out of Control: Seattle’s Flawed
Response to Protests Against the World Trade Organization_, the American
Civil Liberties Union (ACLU) stated that “demonstrators [in Seattle]
were overwhelmingly peaceful. Not so the police.” The response of the
Seattle police to the protests was characterized by “draconian”
violations of civil liberties, including widespread use of “chemical
weapons, rubber bullets and clubs against peaceful protesters and
bystanders alike.” But NBC, ABC, CBS, CNN, and the _New York Times_ and
_Washington Post_ all ignored the release of the ACLU’s findings, which
ran counter to their own uniformly pro-police and anti-protester line.

The media’s reversal of chronology and inflation of the threat of
activist violence, and their low-keyed treatment of numerous illegal
police actions designed to instill fear in those wanting to protest
peaceably,¹¹⁹ provided the enabling ground for both police violence and
serious restrictions on free speech. These increased in scope and
sophistication between Seattle and Washington, and were then applied to
squelch protest at the Republican and Democratic conventions in
Philadelphia and Los Angeles in July and August 2000.¹²⁰ The corporate
media’s hostility to the goals of the protests, closely aligned with
that of the rest of the corporate establishment, caused their devotion
to the First Amendment to flag in a way it never has when their own
rights and privileges have been at stake.

As is suggested by the media’s treatment of NAFTA and of labor’s right
to participate in its debates, as well as the media coverage of
Watergate, COINTELPRO, and major events in the earlier history of
labor-management conflict (the Haymarket affair, the Homestead strike,
the post-World War I “red scare”),¹²¹ the propaganda model applies to
domestic as well as foreign policy issues. Labor has been under renewed
siege in the United States for the past several decades, its condition
adversely affected by the deflationary policies of the early 1980s,
corporate downsizing, globalization, a vigorous business campaign to
defeat unions, and government support of, or indifference to, the damage
being inflicted on unions and workers. There was a major drop in union
membership from the beginning of the Reagan era, with union density
falling from 25 percent in 1980 to 14.5 percent in 1996 (and only 10.2
percent in the private sector). This reflected weakened labor bargaining
power and was accompanied by significant concessions in wages and
benefits, more onerous working conditions, and greater worker
insecurity.

President Reagan’s firing of 11,000 striking air-controllers in 1981
“put the government seal of approval on strike-breaking and a new era of
industrial relations opened.”¹²² But you would hardly know this from
reading or listening to the mainstream media. An exceptional 1994
_Business Week_ article noted that “over the past dozen years … U.S.
industry has conducted one of the most successful union wars ever,”
helped by “illegally firing thousands of workers for exercising their
right to organize,” with unlawful firings occurring in “one-third of all
representation elections in the late ’80s.”¹²³ But this successful war
was carried out quietly, with media cooperation. The decertification of
unions, use of replacement workers, and long, debilitating strikes like
that involving Caterpillar were treated in a very low key manner. In a
notable illustration of the applicability of the propaganda model, the
nine-month-long Pittston miners’ strike that began in April 1989 was
accorded much less attention, and less friendly treatment, than the
Soviet miners’ strikes of the summer of that same year.¹²⁴

From 1977 through 1999, while the incomes of the top 1 percent of
households grew by 84.8 percent and the top 10 percent by 44.6 percent,
the bottom 60 percent lost ground and the income of the lowest 20
percent fell by 12.5 percent.¹²⁵ Real hourly earnings of production and
nonsupervisory employees (i.e., the 80 percent of the workforce that
holds working-class jobs) fell by 4.8 percent between 1973 and 1999.¹²⁶
This, along with the adverse trend of social indicators in the same
period,¹²⁷ suggests that the welfare of the majority declined in this
era of high employment, a “new economy,” and a spectacular upswing in
the stock market. In its euphoria phase, which ended abruptly with the
collapse of the dot.com market in 1999 and 2000, the mainstream media
hardly noticed that only a minority had been the beneficiaries;¹²⁸ they
briefly discovered this issue only under the impetus of Pat Buchanan’s
right-wing populist outcries during the 1996 presidential election
campaign. In the 2000 electoral campaign, once again the two major party
candidates said nothing about the failure of the majority to be lifted
in the supposed “rising tide” that would benefit everybody; only Ralph
Nader and other marginalized candidates did, and as noted, the dominant
media found that the agenda of the major parties was all that they could
ask for.

Another striking application of the propaganda model can be seen in the
media’s treatment of the chemical industry and its regulation. Because
of the industry’s power, as well as the media’s receptivity to the
demands of the business community, the media have normalized a system
described by Rachel Carson in _Silent Spring_ as “deliberately poisoning
us, then policing the results.”¹²⁹ Industry is permitted to produce and
sell chemicals (and during the 1990s, bioengineered foods) without
independent and prior proof of safety, and the “policing” by the
Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) has been badly compromised by
under-funding and political limits on both law enforcement and
testing.¹³⁰ A major National Research Council study of 1984 found that
there was no health hazard data available for 78 percent of the
chemicals in commerce, and an Environmental Defense Fund update found
little change had occurred a dozen years later. The federal government’s
National Toxicology Program tests about ten to twenty chemicals a year
for carcinogenicity (but not for the numerous other possible adverse
effects of chemicals); but meanwhile five hundred to a thousand new
chemicals enter commerce annually, so our knowledge base steadily
declines.¹³¹

This system works well for industry, however, as it wants to sell
without interference, and leaving virtually all of the research and
testing for safety in its hands, with its members to decide when the
results are worthy of transmission to the EPA, is a classic “fox
guarding the chickens” arrangement. The system has worked poorly for the
public, and its inadequacy has been reinforced by the industry’s power
to influence, sometimes even capture, the EPA.¹³² Nevertheless, the
industry often contends that the safety of chemicals is assured by EPA
(or FDA) regulation,¹³³ which industry does its best to keep weak and
which, as noted, has failed to deal in any way with the great majority
of chemicals in the market.

With the media’s help, the chemical industry has also gained wide
acceptance of its view that chemicals should be evaluated individually
on the basis of an analysis of their risks to individuals and individual
tolerances. But it is very hard to measure such risks and tolerances for
humans—controlled experiments are not possible, damage may show up only
after many years, the forms of damage are hard to know in advance,
chemicals may interact with others in the environment, they may be
bioaccumulative, and the breakdown products of chemicals may have their
own dangers. Furthermore, if thousands of chemicals enter the
environment, many long-lasting, bioaccumulative, and interacting with
other chemicals, a public policy that ignores their additive and
interactive effects on people and the environment is deeply flawed and
irresponsible.

Policy based on the “precautionary principle,” bitterly opposed by the
chemical industry, with the support of the U.S. government,¹³⁴ would not
allow chemicals to enter the environment without full testing, would
prohibit the use of chemicals that accumulate in human tissues and whose
breakdown products are threatening or unknown, and would compel the use
of nonthreatening alternatives for untested and known-to-be-risky
chemicals where such alternatives can be found or developed at
reasonable cost.¹³⁵

In successfully avoiding application of the precautionary principle,
industry spokespersons have argued that the existing system is based on
“sound science.” But science does not tell us that industry has any
right to put chemicals into the environment that have any risk at all,
let alone telling us what risks are acceptable—these are political
decisions. Furthermore, if the chemicals in the environment have not
been tested for all the variables that are relevant to social choices,
such as their long-term effects on immune systems and reproduction as
well as any cancer threat, and the effects of their breakdown products
on the environment—and none of them have been so tested—the political,
not scientific, basis of “sound science” is evident.

The chemical industry has produced, and long denied any harm from,
innumerable products—from tetraethyl lead in gasoline and PCBs in
batteries to asbestos, DDT, and Agent Orange—that are now well
established as seriously harmful, only withdrawing them (often only from
domestic use) under overwhelming legal and regulatory pressure. For the
products they have wanted to sell, they have always found scientists who
would testify to their harmlessness (or that claims of harm were not
scientifically proven). There has been a consistent sharp difference
between the results of industry-sponsored science and those of
independent researchers working the same terrain.¹³⁶ And there have been
numerous cases of fraud in industry testing, industry use of testing
labs that arranged the data to find industry products acceptable, and
political manipulation to weaken regulatory standards.¹³⁷

Despite these industry abuses of science, the media have largely
accepted the industry’s claim that it supports “sound science,” in
contrast with its critics’ use of “junk science.” From 1996 through
September 1998, 258 articles in mainstream newspapers used the phrase
“junk science”; but only 21, or 8 percent, used it to refer to corporate
abuses of science, whereas 160, or 62 percent, applied it to science
used by environmentalists, other corporate critics, or tort lawyers
suing corporations (77, or 30 percent, didn’t fit either of these
categories).¹³⁸ In short, the media have internalized industry’s
self-legitimizing usage, just as they have normalized a status quo of
caveat emptor (buyer beware) rather than of safety first.

The media have also regularly gotten on board in dismissing concerns
about chemical threats as unwarranted “scares,” such as the alleged
scares over dioxin and the danger of Alar on apples. But these and other
scares often turn out to be based on genuine health hazards.¹³⁹
Meanwhile, the media rarely report and examine in any depth the frequent
evidence of the inadequacy of regulation and testing and of the real
costs of chemicalization of the environment.¹⁴⁰ For example, the
International Joint Commission (IJC), a joint Canadian-U.S. venture
dating back to 1978, was given the formidable task of trying to halt the
flow of toxic chemicals into the Great Lakes. It reports each year that
it is failing, and since 1992 has called for the ending of the
manufacture of chlorine as essential to fulfilling its task. The
national media virtually ignore this appeal, and the IJC’s U.S.
cochairman Gordon Durnil has remarked that “we have a societal problem
about how to deal with this, but 90 percent of the population doesn’t
even know there is anything to worry about.”¹⁴¹ We believe that the
propaganda model helps understand this lack of knowledge.

In the health insurance controversy of 1992–93, the media’s refusal to
take the single-payer option seriously, despite apparent widespread
public support and the effectiveness of the system in Canada, served
well the interests of the insurance and medical service complex.¹⁴² The
uncritical media reporting and commentary on the alleged urgency of
fiscal restraint and a balanced budget in the years 1992–96 fit well the
business community’s desire to reduce the social budget and weaken
regulation.¹⁴³ The media’s gullibility in accepting the claim of a
Social Security system “crisis,” which would require policy action some
thirty-seven years ahead if certain conservative guesses were true and a
number of easy corrections were ruled out, served the interests of
conservative ideologues anxious to weaken a highly successful government
program and a security industry eager to benefit from the partial or
full privatization of Social Security.¹⁴⁴ The applicability of the
propaganda model in these and other cases, including the media’s
handling of the “drug wars,” seems clear.¹⁴⁵


CONCLUDING NOTE

The propaganda model remains a useful framework for analyzing and
understanding the workings of the mainstream media—perhaps even more so
than in 1988. As we noted above, the changes in structural conditions
that underlie the model, and that we believe strongly and often
decisively influence media behavior and performance, have tended to
increase the model’s salience. We noted in the Preface to the first
edition and in chapters 2 and 3, in reference to the media’s coverage of
the wars and elections in Central America in the 1980s, that the media’s
performance often surpassed expectations of media subservience to
government propaganda demands. This was at least equally true of their
performance in covering the 1991 war against Iraq and NATO’s war against
Yugoslavia in 1999, as we have described earlier and briefly in regard
to Yugoslavia and in detail elsewhere.¹⁴⁶

In our conclusion to the first edition, we emphasized that, as the
negative performance effects of the media result primarily from their
structure and objectives, real change in performance calls for
substantial changes in underlying media organization and goals. In the
years since 1988, structural changes have not been favorable to improved
performance, but it remains a central truth that democratic politics
requires a democratization of information sources and a more democratic
media. Along with trying to contain and reverse the growing
centralization of the mainstream media, grassroots movements and
intermediate groups that represent large numbers of ordinary citizens
should put much more energy and money into creating and supporting their
own media—as they did with the Independent Media Centers brought into
existence during the Seattle and Washington, D.C., protests of 1999 and
2000. These, and other nonprofit community-based broadcasting stations
and networks, and a better use of public-access channels, the Internet,
and independent print media, will be essential for the achievement of
major democratic social and political successes.

Notes to Introduction

1. On a number of issues, such as trade agreements, health care, and the
appropriate size of the military budget, there is a sharp division
between media personnel and the elite on the one hand and the general
population on the other hand, as we discuss below under “Further
Applications.”

2. This was even true in the Soviet Union, where the media’s disclosure
of inconvenient facts on the Afghan war caused the Soviet defense
minister to denounce the press as unpatriotic; see Bill Keller, “Soviet
Official Says Press Harms Army,” _New York Times_, January 21, 1988.

3. For an account of critiques, and the present writers’ replies, see
Noam Chomsky, _Necessary Illusions_ (Boston: South End Press, 1989),
appendix 1; Edward S. Herman, “The Propaganda Model Revisited,” in _The
Myth of the Liberal Media_ (New York: Peter Lang, 1999).

4. Ben Bagdikian, _The Media Monopoly_, 6th ed. (Boston: Beacon Press,
2000), p. xxi.

5. Ibid.

6. Edward S. Herman and Robert McChesney, _The Global Media_ (London:
Cassell, 1997).

7. Robert McChesney, _Rich Media, Poor Democracy_ (Urbana: University of
Illinois Press, 2000), p. 108.

8. Ibid., p. 109.

9. James Ledbetter, “Public Broadcasting Sells; (Out?),” _The Nation_,
December 1, 1997.

10. Ibid.

11. Stephanie Strom, “Japanese Sites for Women Aim for Empowerment,”
_New York Times_, December 25, 2000.

12. Mark Fineman, “Military Can’t Outflank Rebels in War of Words,” _Los
Angeles Times_, February 21, 1995; Leonard Doyle, “Rebels Try to Advance
via Internet,” _The Independent_, March 7, 1995.

13. Jim Shultz, “Bolivia’s Water War Victory,” _Earth Island Journal_,
September 22, 2000; “Bolivia—The Last Word,” April 13, 2000,
_JShultz@democracyctr.org_; “How the Internet Helped Activists,”
_Straits Times_ (Singapore), May 25, 1998; Marshall Clark, “Cleansing
the Earth,” _Inside Indonesia_ (October-December 1998).

14. Madelaine Drohan, “How the Net Killed the MAI,” _Globe and Mail_,
April 29, 1998.

15. Kayte Van Scoy, “How Green Was My Silicon Valley,” _PC/Computing_,
March 1, 2000; Keith Perine, “Power to the (Web-Enabled) People,”
_Industry Standard_, April 10, 2000. See also “Further Applications”
below.

16. James Ledbetter, “Some Pitfalls in Portals,” _Columbia Journalism
Review_ (November-December 1999).

17. Quoted in ibid.

18. Alex Carey, _Taking the Risk out of Democracy_ (Urbana: University
of Illinois Press, 1997); John Stauber and Sheldon Rampton, _Toxic
Sludge Is Good for You!_ (Monroe, Maine: Common Courage Press, 1995);
Stuart Ewen, _PR! A Social History of Spin_ (New York: Basic Books,
1996).

19. Mark Dowie, “Introduction,” Stauber and Rampton, _Toxic Sludge_.

20. See Stephen Cohen, _Failed Crusade: America and the Tragedy of
Post-Communist Russia_ (New York: Norton, 2000). See also Thomas Frank,
_One Market Under God_ (New York: Doubleday, 2000).

21. Kevin Robins and Frank Webster, _Times of the Technoculture_
(London: Routledge, 1999), p. 127.

22. Patricia Aufderheide, “Journalism and Public Life Seen Through the
‘Net,’ ” in Aufderheide, _The Daily Planet_ (Minneapolis: University of
Minnesota Press, 2000); Joseph Turow, _Breaking Up America_ (Chicago:
University of Chicago Press, 1997).

23. Herman and McChesney, _Global Media_, chapter 5.

24. On the ideological messages borne in commercials, see Erik Barnouw,
_The Sponsor_ (New York: Oxford University Press, 1978), part 2, chapter
1.

25. See Robert McChesney, _Telecommunications, Mass Media, and
Democracy_ (New York: Oxford, 1993).

26. See Herman, _Myth of the Liberal Media_, pp. 32–33.

27. For some dramatic evidence on the mainstream media’s neglect of
these credible sources, see below, pp. 76–79.

28. Peter Galbraith, “How the Turks Helped Their Enemies,” _New York
Times_, February 20, 1999.

29. During the 1980s, when Saddam Hussein was a U.S. ally and recipient
of U.S. aid, his use of chemical weapons against the Kurds in Iraq,
which killed thousands in 1988, did not interfere with support by the
Bush administration, which continued up to the moment of Iraq’s invasion
of Kuwait on August 30, 1990. See Mark Phythian, Arming Iraq: How the
U.S. and Britain Secretly Built Saddam’s War Machine (Boston:
Northeastern University Press, 1997); Miron Rezun, Saddam Hussein’s Gulf
Wars: Ambivalent Stakes in the Middle East (Westport Conn.: Praeger,
1992).

30. The CIA itself designated the 1965–66 slaughters in Indonesia as
“one of the worst mass murders of the 20th century” (quoted in Robert
Cribb, ed., _The Indonesian Killings of 1965–1966_ [Monash Papers on
Southeast Asia, no. 21, 1991]). The figure of 500,000 victims in this
slaughter, given by the head of Indonesian state security, must be taken
as an absolute minimal figure. For other estimates that run up to 2
million, see Noam Chomsky and Edward Herman, _The Washington Connection
and Third World Fascism_ (Boston: South End Press, 1979), pp. 208–9;
Benedict Anderson, “Petrus Dadi Ratu,” _New Left Review_ (May-June,
2000).

31. Former U.S. Ambassador to the United Nations Patrick Moynihan brags
in his autobiography of how back in 1975 he protected Indonesia from any
effective international action that might have interfered with its
aggression: “The Department of State desired that the United Nations
prove utterly ineffective in whatever measures it took [regarding the
Indonesian invasion of East Timor]. This task was given to me, and I
carried it forward with no inconsiderable success.” He added, without
the slightest expression of regret, that within a few weeks 60,000
people had been killed in this aggression that he was protecting. _A
Dangerous Place_ (New York: Little, Brown, 1978), p. 19.

32. For accounts of this shift, see John Pilger, _Hidden Agendas_
(London: Vintage, 1998), pp. 33–34; Chomsky, _Necessary Illusions_, pp.
109–10. For the earlier media treatment of Indonesia in East Timor, see
_Washington Connection_, pp. 129–204.

33. John and Karl Mueller, “Sanctions of Mass Destruction,” _Foreign
Affairs_ (May-June 1999), p.43.

34. UNICEF, “Iraq Surveys Show ‘Humanitarian Emergency,’ ” Press
Release, August 12, 1999.

35. Leslie Stahl interviewing Madeleine Albright, “60 Minutes,” CBS News
Transcript, May 12, 1996.

36. Many KLA and Serb fighters died in Kosovo, and civilians were killed
by NATO bombs and military actions not aiming to kill civilians. See
Jonathan Steele, “Figures Put on Serb Killings Too High,” _Guardian_
(August 18, 2000). For a fuller discussion, Noam Chomsky, _A New
Generation Draws the Line_ (London: Verso, 2000), chapter 3.

37. John Taylor, _East Timor: The Price of Freedom_ (London: Zed, 1999).
See also Arnold Kohen, “Beyond the Vote: The World Must Remain Vigilant
Over East Timor,” _Washington Post_, September 5, 1999.

38. The source is Western investigators on the scene, including U.S.
military personnel: Lindsay Murdoch, “Horror Lives on for Town of
Liquica,” _The Age_ (Australia), April 8, 1999; Barry Wain, “Will
Justice Be Served in East Timor?” _Wall Street Journal_ (Asia edition),
April 17, 2000.

39. On the importance of Racak as a basis for mobilizing U.S. allies and
the public for war, see Barton Gellman, “The Path to Crisis: How the
United States and Its Allies Went to War,” _Washington Post_, April 18,
1999; Madeleine Albright referred to Racak as a “galvanizing incident”
(quoted in Bo Adam, Roland Heine, and Claudius Technau, “I Felt that
Something Was Wrong,” _Berliner Zeitung_, April 5, 2000).

40. See Edward Herman and David Peterson, “CNN: Selling Nato’s War
Globally,” in Philip Hammond and Edward Herman, eds., _Degraded
Capability: The Media and the Kosovo Crisis_ (London: Pluto, 2000), pp.
117–19. More recently, three Finnish forensic experts, who were members
of a panel that examined the forty bodies found at Racak, disclosed that
their team found no support for the alleged mutilations by the Serbs,
and the data presented in the article casts further doubt on the claim
that all the victims were executed. (J. Raino et al., “Independent
Forensic Autopsies in Armed Conflict Investigation of Victims from
Racak, Kosovo,” _Forensic Science International_, vol. 16 (2001), pp.
171–85.) It is a notable fact that the OSCE has not yet seen fit to
release the original forensic report from which this article’s data is
drawn.

41. Herman and Peterson, “CNN: Selling Nato’s War Globally.”

42. Editorial, “Election Risks in Cambodia,” _New York Times_, November
28, 1997.

43. “Gathering Storm in Serbia?” editorial, _Washington Post_, September
11, 2000; “Repudiating Mr. Milosevic,” editorial, _New York Times_,
September 26, 2000.

44. Editorial, “Kenya’s Flawed Election,” _New York Times_, December 31,
1997.

45. Editorial, “Mexico’s Radical Insider,” _New York Times_, July 3,
1988.

46. Editorial, “The Missing Reform in Mexico,” _New York Times_, August
24, 1991.

47. Editorial, “Turkey Approaches Democracy,” _New York Times_, November
11, 1983.

48. Editorial, “Victories for Voters in Latin America: Uruguay’s Slow
Boat to Democracy,” _New York Times_, December 1, 1984.

49. Editorial, “A Victory for Russian Democracy,” _New York Times_, July
4, 1996.

50. “And the Winner Is?” _Moscow Times_, September 9, 2000. See also
Matt Taibbi, “OSCE—The Organization for Sanctioning Corrupt Elections,”
_The Exile_, Issue no. 18/99, September 14–28, 2000.

51. Of the major mainstream media, only the _Los Angeles Times_
addressed its findings, with the article “Russia Election Chief Rejects
Fraud Claims in Presidential Vote” (September 13, 2000); a title that
features the rejoinder of Russian officials, not the charges themselves.
For a discussion of this article see Taibbi, “OSCE”.

52. On the overall atrocious mainstream media reporting on the Russian
economic and social collapse, as well as on the elections, see Stephen
Cohen, _Failed Crusade_, chapter 1.

53. The Soviet Union did undoubtedly mistreat its own and client-state
peoples, although the treatment of Russians by the Western-backed
“reformers” since 1991 has hardly been an improvement. However the
charge of sponsorship of international terrorism was inflated and
hypocritical given the West’s support of its own very impressive terror
networks. See Edward Herman, _The Real Terror Network_ (Boston: South
End Press, 1982); Noam Chomsky; _Pirates and Emperors: International
Terrorism in the Real World_ (New York: Claremont Research, 1986).

54. See Edward S. Herman and Frank Brodhead, _The Rise and Fall of the
Bulgarian Connection_ (New York: Sheridan Square Press, 1986), chapter
5.

55. The only mainstream report on Weinstein’s return with “no startling
revelations” (i.e., nothing), was R. C. Longworth, “Probe into ’81 Pope
Attack Short of Funds,” _Chicago Tribune_, May 6, 1994.

56. See “The Gates Hearings: Excerpts from Senate Hearing of Nomination
of C.I.A. Chief,” _New York Times_, October 2, 1991.

57. See Edward S. Herman and Howard Friel, ‘ “Stacking the Deck’ on the
Bulgarian Connection,” _Lies of Our Times_ (November 1991); Michael
Ross, “Gates Corrupted CIA Intelligence, Ex-Officials Say,” _Los Angeles
Times_, October 2, 1991; Benjamin Weiser, “Papal-Shooting Analysis: Case
Study in Slanting?” _Washington Post_, October 1, 1991.

58. Editorial, “The Fingerprints on Agca’s Gun,” _New York Times_,
October 30, 1984.

59. Barbara Crossette, “Hanoi Said to Vow to Give M.I.A. Data,” _New
York Times_, October 24, 1992.

60. For many years U.S. officials used the claim that Vietnam had not
accounted for all U.S. prisoners of war and M.I.A.s to justify hostile
actions toward that country. This is discussed later in this
Introduction, under “Rewriting Vietnam War History,” and in the main
text, pp. 240–41.

61. Leslie Gelb, “When to Forgive and Forget: Engaging Hanoi and Other
Outlaws,” _New York Times_, April 15, 1993.

62. Quoted in William Buckingham, Jr., _Operation Ranch Hand: The Air
Force and Herbicides in Southeast Asia, 1961–1971_ (Washington: U.S. Air
Force, 1982), p. 82.

63. See Arthur Westing, ed., _Herbicides in War: The Long-Term
Ecological and Human Consequences_ (Stockholm: SIPRI, 1984), pp. 5ff.;
Hatfield Consultants Ltd., _Development of Impact Mitigation Strategies
Related to the Use of Agent Orange Herbicide in the Aluoi Valley, Viet
Nam_, vol. 1 (West Vancouver, B.C., April 2000).

64. Buckingham, _Operation Ranch Hand_, p. 127.

65. Cited in Seymour Hersh, _Chemical and Biological Warfare_
(Indianapolis: Bobbs-Merrill, 1968), p. 153. See also J. B. Neilands et
al., _Harvest of_ Death: Chemical Warfare in Vietnam and Cambodia (New
York: Free Press, 1972).

66. First use of chemicals is contrary to the Geneva Protocol of 1925,
and food crop destruction violates numerous international rules of war.
The latter was even illegal according to the rules laid out in the U.S.
Army’s own field manual in use during the Vietnam war. See Edward
Herman, _Atrocities in Vietnam_ (Philadelphia: Pilgrim Press, 1970), pp.
81–83.

67. Harvard University physician Jean Mayer, “Crop Destruction in
Vietnam,” _Science_ (April 15, 1966).

68. Alistair Hay, _The Chemical Scythe: Lessons of 2, 4, 5-T and Dioxin_
(New York: Plenum Publishing, 1982), pp. 187–94.

69. General Assembly Resolution 2603A (XXIV), December 16, 1969, “viewed
with horror” and strongly condemned the U.S. chemical war.

70. Peter Waldman, “Body Count: In Vietnam, the Agony of Birth Defects
Calls an Old War to Mind,” _Wall Street Journal_, December 12, 1997.

71. Barbara Crossette, “Study of Dioxin’s Effect in Vietnam Is Hampered
by Diplomatic Freeze,” _New York Times_, August 19, 1992.

72. Matthew Meselson, Julian Robinson and Jeanne Guillemin, “Yellow
Rain: The Story Collapses,” _Foreign Policy_ (Fall 1987), pp. 100–117;
Edward S. Herman, “The Wall Street Journal as a Propaganda Agency,” in
Herman, _Myth of the Liberal Media_, pp. 103–10.

73. Peter Kann, “Clinton Ignores History’s Lessons in Vietnam,” _Wall
Street Journal_, September 9, 1992.

74. When Saddam Hussein used chemical weapons against Iran and his
indigenous Kurds in the 1980s, the Reagan and Bush administrations made
no protests and continued to treat him as a valued ally. It was only
after he invaded Kuwait in 1990 that he became a menace and his
possession of “weapons of mass destruction” was deemed intolerable. See
citations in note 29 above.

75. In 1999, Lloyd Gardner found that the Barnes & Noble Web site
contained 1,920 titles on some aspect of the Vietnam war and over 8,000
out-of-print and used books on that topic. “Going Back to Vietnam for a
Usable Past,” _Newsday_, November 14, 1999 (a review of Michael Lind’s
_Necessary War_).

76. For this viewpoint, see Michael Crozier, Samuel Huntington, and Joji
Watanuki, _The Crisis of Democracy_ (New York: New York University
Press, 1975).

77. Robert McNamara, _In Retrospect: The Tragedy and Lessons of Vietnam_
(New York: Vintage Books, 1996).

78. For details and analysis of this onslaught on the people of South
Vietnam, see Eric Bergerud, _The Dynamics of Defeat_ (Boulder, Colo:
Westview, 1991); Chomsky and Herman, _Washington Connection_, chap. 5;
Bernard Fall, “2000 Years of War in Vietnam,” _Horizon_ (Spring 1967),
reprinted in Fall, _Last Reflections on a War_ (Garden City: Doubleday,
1967); Jeffrey Race, _War Comes to Long An_ (Berkeley: University of
California Press, 1971); Jonathan Schell, _The Military Half: An Account
of Destruction in Quang Ngai and Quang Tin_ (New York: Vintage, 1968).

79. H. Bruce Franklin, “Antiwar and Proud of It,” _The Nation_, December
11, 2000.

80. Both _Time_ and _Newsweek_, in their twenty-fifth-anniversary
retrospectives on the war, featured the exit at war’s end and the
“desperate South Vietnamese” seeking escape from “the invading North
Vietnamese.” Douglas Brinkley, “Of Ladders and Letters,” _Time_, April
24, 2000; also, Evan Thomas, “The Last Days of Saigon,” _Newsweek_, May
1, 2000. A 1995 _Washington Post_ editorial speaks of the Vietnam war as
a “defeat to the Vietnamese. They bled, died and finally fled in great
numbers from a Communist regime.…” (April 30, 1995), characteristically
not allowing the vast majority of people in South Vietnam to be “South
Vietnamese.”

81. McNamara, _In Retrospect_, p. 319.

82. Full analyses of this history, and the lack of evidence, are
provided in H. Bruce Franklin, _M.I.A., or, Mythmaking in America_
(Brooklyn, N.Y: Lawrence Hill Books, 1992), and _Vietnam and Other
American Fantasies_ (Amherst: University of Massachusetts Press, 2000).

83. Franklin, _Vietnam and Other American Fantasies_, p. 183.

84. For a discussion, which stresses the underreported dissident
movement within the armed forces, see ibid., pp. 61–62.

85. Michael Lind, _The Necessary War_ (New York: Free Press, 1999).

86. Gardner, “Going Back to Vietnam for a Usable Past.”

87. Barry Wain, “The Deadly Legacy of War in Laos,” _Asian Wall Street
Journal_, January 24, 1997; Ronald Podlaski, Veng Saysana, and James
Forsyth, _Accidental Massacre: American Air-Dropped Bomblets Have
Continued to Maim and Slaughter Thousands of Innocent Victims, Mainly
Children, for the Last 23 Years in Indochina_ (Humanitarian Liaison
Services, Warren, Vt. 1997). These three authors, who have worked in
Laos, believe the official figure of 20,000 annual casualties is too
low.

88. Daniel Pruzin, “U.S. Clears Laos of the Unexploded,” _Christian
Science Monitor_, September 9, 1996.

89. Keith Graves, “U.S. Secrecy Puts Bomb Disposal Team in Danger,”
_Sunday Telegraph_, January 4, 1998.

90. Quoted in Strobe Talbott, “Defanging the Beast,” _Time_, February 6,
1989.

91. See Ben Kiernan, “The Inclusion of the Khmer Rouge in the Cambodian
Peace Process: Causes and Consequences,” in Kiernan, ed., _Genocide and
Democracy in Cambodia_ (New Haven: Yale Council on Southeast Asia
Studies, 1993), pp. 199–272.

92. A study sponsored by the Finnish government was titled _Kampuchea:
Decade of the Genocide_ (London: Zed, 1984). It included the years
1970–74, when the United States was heavily bombing the Cambodian
countryside, as part of the decade of genocide. This study was ignored
in the U.S. mainstream media.

93. “Cambodia’s Dictator,” editorial, _Washington Post_, February 10,
1998.

94. See Edward Herman, _Myth of the Liberal Media_, chapter 16,
“Suharto: The Fall of a Good Genocidist”; Edward Herman and David
Peterson, “How the _New York Times_ Protects Indonesian Terror in East
Timor,” _Z Magazine_ (July-August 1999). On the massive scale of the
Suharto killings, see note 30 above.

95. For these and other citations, see Herman, _Myth of the Liberal
Media_, chapter 16.

96. Seth Mydans, “Indonesia’s Rising Prosperity Feeds a Party for
Democracy,” _New York Times_, June 21, 1996.

97. Herman and Peterson, “How the _New York Times_ Protects Indonesian
Terror.”

98. Ibid.

99. James Reston, “A Gleam of Light,” _New York Times_, June 19, 1966.

100. David Sanger, “Indonesia Faceoff: Drawing Blood Without Bombs,”
_New York Times_, March 8, 1998.

101. Thomas Ferguson, _Golden Rule_ (Chicago: University of Chicago
Press, 1995). pp. 28–29.

102. For a major study, see Steven Kull, “Americans on Defense Spending:
A Study of U.S. Public Attitudes, “_Report of Findings_, Center for
Study of Public Attitudes, January 19, 1996. On public opposition to
excessive defense spending even during the Reagan era, see Thomas
Ferguson and Joel Rogers, _Right Turn_ (New York: Hill & Wang, 1986),
pp. 19–24.

103. The two major parties offer voters “a clear-cut choice,” so there
is “no driving logic for a third-party candidacy this year,” according
to the editors of the _New York Times:_ “Mr. Nader’s Misguided Crusade,”
June 10, 2000.

104. Especially after World War II, the military budget, and therefore
the taxpayer, financed a very large fraction of the basic science that
underpinned advances in the aircraft, computer, and electronics
industries, the Internet economy, most of the biotech industry, and many
others.

105. On the public opposition to the NAFTA agreement, see Herman, _Myth
of the Liberal Media_, pp. 185–86. A _Business_ Week/Harris poll in
early 2000 revealed that only 10 percent of those polled called
themselves “free traders”; 51 percent called themselves “fair traders”
and 37 percent “protectionists.” “Harris Poll: Globalization: What
Americans Are Worried About,” _Business Week_, April 24, 2000.

106. For more extended accounts, see Herman, _Myth of the Liberal
Media_, chapter 14; Thea Lee, “False Prophets: The Selling of NAFTA,”
Briefing Paper, Economic Policy Institute, 1995; John McArthur, _The
Selling of “Free Trade_ ”(New York: Hill & Wang, 2000).

107. Thomas Lueck, “The Free Trade Accord: The New York Region,” _New
York Times_, November 18, 1993.

108. Editorial, “NAFTA’s True Importance,” _New York Times_, November
14, 1993.

109. On the refusal of the administration to allow any labor inputs in
arriving at the NAFTA agreement, contrary to law, and the media’s
disinterest in this as well as any other undemocratic features of the
creation of this and other trade agreements, see Noam Chomsky, _World
Orders Old and New_ (New York: Columbia University Press, 1994), pp.
164–78.

110. See Herman, _Myth of the Liberal Media_, pp. 183–85.

111. Citations from Seth Ackerman, “Prattle in Seattle: WTO coverage
Misrepresented Issues, Protests,” _EXTRA!_ (January-February 2000), pp.
13–17.

112. Rachel Coen, “For Press, Magenta Hair and Nose Rings Defined
Protests,” _EXTRA!_ (July-August 2000). An exception at the time of the
Washington meetings and protests was Eric Pooley’s “IMF: Dr. Death?”
_Time_, April 24, 2000.

113. See Waiden Bello, “Why Reform of the WTO Is the Wrong Agenda”
(Global Exchange; 2000).

114. Edward P. Morgan, “From Virtual Community to Virtual History: Mass
Media and the American Antiwar Movement in the 1960s,” _Radical History
Review_ (Fall 2000); Todd Gitlin, _The Whole World Is Watching_
(Berkeley: University of California Press, 1980).

115. Rachel Coen, “Whitewash in Washington: Media Provide Cover as
Police Militarizes D.C.,” _EXTRA!_ (July-August 2000); Ackerman,
“Prattle in Seattle”; Neil deMause, “Pepper Spray Gets in Their Eyes:
Media Missed Militarization of Police Work in Seattle,” _EXTRA!_
(March-April 2000).

116. Coen, Ackerman, and deMause items cited in note 115.

117. Nichole Christian, “Police Brace for Protests in Windsor and
Detroit,” _New York Times_, June 3, 2000.

118. _CBS Evening News_ Report, April 6, 2000.

119. Zachary Wolfe, National Lawyers Guild legal observer coordinator,
concluded that “police sought to create an atmosphere of palpable fear,”
and that anyone even trying to hear dissident views ran a risk of police
violence “just for being in the area where speech was taking place.”
Quoted in Coen, “Whitewash in Washington.”

120. See Rachel Coen, “Free Speech Since Seattle: Law Enforcement’s
Attacks on Activists—and Journalists—Increasing.” _EXTRA!_
November–December 2000.

121. See Frank Donner, _Protectors of Privilege: Red Squads and Police
Repression in Urban America_ (Berkeley: University of California Press,
1990); Elizabeth Fones-Wolf, _Selling Free Enterprise: The Business
Assault on Labor and Liberalism_, 1945–60 (Urbana: University of
Illinois Press, 1994); William Puette, _Through Jaundiced Eyes: How the
Media View Organized Labor_ (Ithaca: Cornell University Press, 1992).

122. Kim Moody, _Workers in a Lean World_ (London: Verso, 1997), p. 24.

123. Aaron Bernstein, “The Workplace: Why America Needs Unions, But Not
the Kind It Has Now,” _Business Week_, May 23, 1994.

124. See Jonathan Tasini, _Lost in the Margins: Labor and the Media_
(New York: FAIR, 1990), pp. 7–9.

125. Jared Bernstein, Lawrence Mishel, and Chauna Brocht, “Any Way You
Cut It: Income Inequality on the Rise Regardless of How It’s Measured,”
Briefing Paper, Economic Policy Institute, 2000.

126. Lawrence Mishel, Jared Bernstein, and John Schmitt, _The State of
Working America, 2000–2001_ (Ithaca: Cornell University Press, 2001), p.
120.

127. Marc Miringoff and Marque-Luisa Miringoff, _The Social Health of
the Nation: How America Is Really Doing_ (New York: Oxford University
Press, 1999). This study shows that an index of social health indicators
moves with GDP until the mid-1970s, after which GDP continues to grow
but a “social recession” ensues, with only a slight interruption in the
early 1990s.

128. See, among others, Gerald Baker, “Is This Great, Or What?”
_Financial Times_, March 31, 1998; Richard Stevenson, “The Wisdom to Let
the Good Times Roll,” _New York Times_, December 25, 2000. There were,
however, occasional cautionary notes, as in Anne Adams Lang, “Behind the
Prosperity, Working People in Trouble,” _New York Times_, November 20,
2000.

129. Rachel Carson, _Silent Spring_ (Greenwich, Conn.: Fawcett, 1962),
p. 183.

130. See Dan Fagin and Marianne Lavelle, _Toxic Deception: How the
Chemical Industry Manipulates Science, Bends the Law, and Endangers Your
Health_ (Secaucus, N.J.: Birch Lane Press, 1996), chapters 4, 5.

131. Joe Thornton, _Pandora’s Poison: Chlorine, Health, and a New
Environmental Strategy_ (Cambridge: MIT Press, 2000), p. 100.

132. Fagin and Lavelle, _Toxic Deception_, chapters 4, 5; Edward Herman,
“Corporate Junk Science in the Media,” chapter 17 in Herman, _Myth of
the Liberal Media_, pp. 240–44.

133. The publicity director of Monsanto, Phil Angell, stated that “our
interest is in selling as much of it [a bio-engineered product] as
possible. Assuring its safety is the F.D.A.’s job.” Quoted in Michael
Pollan, “Playing God in the Garden,” _New York Times Magazine_, October
25, 1998.

134. At the January 2000 meeting on the biosafety protocol, the U.S.
government’s insistence on WTO “good science,” while the European Union
was urging application of the precautionary principle, almost broke up
the meeting. Andrew Pollack, “130 Nations Agree on Safety Rules for
Biotech Food,” _New York Times_, January 30, 2000; Pollack, “Talks on
Biotech Food Turn on a Safety Principle,” _New York Times_, January 28,
2000.

135. For a good discussion of the case for application of the
precautionary principle, see Thornton, _Pandora’s Poison_, chapters
9–11.

136. Fagin-Lavelle, _Toxic Deception_, chapters 3–5; Herman, “Corporate
Junk Science,” pp. 232–34, 237–43.

137. Fagin-Lavelle, _Toxic Deception_, chapter 3; Herman, “Corporate
Junk Science,” pp. 232–34.

138. Herman, “Corporate Junk Science,” p. 235.

139. Ibid., pp. 245–48.

140. Ibid., pp, 234–44.

141. Ibid., p. 240; see also Thornton, _Pandora’s Poison_, chapter 9.

142. John Canham-Clyne, “Health Care Reform: Not Journalistically
Viable,” _EXTRA!_ (July-August 1993); Canham-Clyne, “When ‘Both Sides’
Aren’t Enough: The Restricted Debate over Health Care Reform,” _EXTRA!_
(January-February 1994); Vicente Navarro, _The Politics of Health
Policy: The U.S. Reforms, 1980–1994_ (Oxford: Blackwell, 1994).

143. See Bagdikian, _Media Monopoly_, pp. xxvii–xxix.

144. See Dean Baker and Mark Weisbrot, _Social Security: The Phony
Crisis_ (Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 2000).

145. Noam Chomsky, _Deterring Democracy_ (London: Verso, 1991), pp.
114–21.

146. Noam Chomsky, “The Media and the War: What War?” in Hamid Mowlana
et al., _Triumph of the Image: The Media’s War in the Persian Gulf—A
Global Perspective_ (Boulder, Colo.: Westview, 1992); Douglas Kellner,
_The Persian Gulf TV War_ (Boulder, Colo.: Westview, 1992); Chomsky,
_The New Military Humanism_ (Monroe, Maine: Common Courage Press, 1999);
Edward Herman, “The Media’s Role in U.S. Foreign Policy: The Persian
Gulf War,” in Herman, _Myth of the Liberal Media_, chapter 12; Philip
Hammond and Edward Herman, eds., _Degraded Capability: The Media and the
Kosovo Crisis_ (London: Pluto, 2000).



PREFACE



[]


IN THIS BOOK, WE SKETCH OUT A “PROPAGANDA MODEL” AND apply it to the
performance of the mass media of the United States. This effort reflects
our belief, based on many years of study of the workings of the media,
that they serve to mobilize support for the special interests that
dominate the state and private activity,¹ and that their choices,
emphases, and omissions can often be understood best, and sometimes with
striking clarity and insight, by analyzing them in such terms.

Perhaps this is an obvious point, but the democratic postulate is that
the media are independent and committed to discovering and reporting the
truth, and that they do not merely reflect the world as powerful groups
wish it to be perceived. Leaders of the media claim that their news
choices rest on unbiased professional and objective criteria, and they
have support for this contention in the intellectual community.² If,
however, the powerful are able to fix the premises of discourse, to
decide what the general populace is allowed to see, hear, and think
about, and to “manage” public opinion by regular propaganda campaigns,
the standard view of how the system works is at serious odds with
reality.³

The special importance of propaganda in what Walter Lippmann referred to
as the “manufacture of consent” has long been recognized by writers on
public opinion, propaganda, and the political requirements of social
order.⁴ Lippmann himself, writing in the early 1920s, claimed that
propaganda had already become “a regular organ of popular government,”
and was steadily increasing in sophistication and importance.⁵ We do not
contend that this is all the mass media do, but we believe the
propaganda function to be a very important aspect of their overall
service. In the first chapter we spell out a propaganda model, which
describes the forces that cause the mass media to play a propaganda
role, the processes whereby they mobilize bias, and the patterns of news
choices that ensue. In the succeeding chapters we try to demonstrate the
applicability of the propaganda model to the actual performance of the
media.

Institutional critiques such as we present in this book are commonly
dismissed by establishment commentators as “conspiracy theories,” but
this is merely an evasion. We do not use any kind of “conspiracy”
hypothesis to explain mass-media performance. In fact, our treatment is
much closer to a “free market” analysis, with the results largely an
outcome of the workings of market forces. Most biased choices in the
media arise from the preselection of right-thinking people, internalized
preconceptions, and the adaptation of personnel to the constraints of
ownership, organization, market, and political power. Censorship is
largely self-censorship, by reporters and commentators who adjust to the
realities of source and media organizational requirements, and by people
at higher levels within media organizations who are chosen to implement,
and have usually internalized, the constraints imposed by proprietary
and other market and governmental centers of power.

There are important actors who do take positive initiatives to define
and shape the news and to keep the media in line. It is a “guided market
system” that we describe here, with the guidance provided by the
government, the leaders of the corporate community, the top media owners
and executives, and the assorted individuals and groups who are assigned
or allowed to take constructive initiatives.⁶ These initiators are
sufficiently small in number to be able to act jointly on occasion, as
do sellers in markets with few rivals. In most cases, however, media
leaders do similar things because they see the world through the same
lenses, are subject to similar constraints and incentives, and thus
feature stories or maintain silence together in tacit collective action
and leader-follower behavior.

The mass media are not a solid monolith on all issues. Where the
powerful are in disagreement, there will be a certain diversity of
tactical judgments on how to attain generally shared aims, reflected in
media debate. But views that challenge fundamental premises or suggest
that the observed modes of exercise of state power are based on systemic
factors will be excluded from the mass media even when elite controversy
over tactics rages fiercely.

We will study a number of such cases as we proceed, but the pattern is,
in fact, pervasive. To select an example that happens to be dominating
the news as we write, consider the portrayal of Nicaragua, under attack
by the United States. In this instance, the division of elite opinion is
sufficiently great to allow it to be questioned whether sponsorship of a
terrorist army is effective in making Nicaragua “more democratic” and
“less of a threat to its neighbors.” The mass media, however, rarely if
ever entertain opinion, or allow their news columns to present materials
suggesting that Nicaragua is more democratic than El Salvador and
Guatemala in every non-Orwellian sense of the word;⁷ that its government
does not murder ordinary citizens on a routine basis, as the governments
of El Salvador and Guatemala do;⁸ that it has carried out socioeconomic
reforms important to the majority that the other two governments somehow
cannot attempt;⁹ that Nicaragua poses no military threat to its
neighbors but has, in fact, been subjected to continuous attacks by the
United States and its clients and surrogates; and that the U.S. fear of
Nicaragua is based more on its virtues than on its alleged defects.¹⁰
The mass media also steer clear of discussing the background and results
of the closely analogous attempt of the United States to bring
“democracy” to Guatemala in 1954 by means of a CIA-sponsored invasion,
which terminated Guatemalan democracy for an indefinite period. Although
the United States supported elite rule and helped to organize state
terror in Guatemala (among many other countries) for decades, actually
subverted or approved the subversion of democracy in Brazil, Chile, and
the Philippines (again, among others), is “constructively engaged” with
terror regimes on a global basis, and had no concern about democracy in
Nicaragua as long as the brutal Somoza regime was firmly in power,
nevertheless the media take government claims of a concern for
“democracy” in Nicaragua at face value.¹¹

Elite disagreement over tactics in dealing with Nicaragua is reflected
in public debate, but the mass media, in conformity with elite
priorities, have coalesced in processing news in a way that fails to
place U.S. policy into meaningful context, systematically suppresses
evidence of U.S. violence and aggression, and puts the Sandinistas in an
extremely bad light.¹² In contrast, El Salvador and Guatemala, with far
worse records, are presented as struggling toward democracy under
“moderate” leaders, thus meriting sympathetic approval. These practices
have not only distorted public perceptions of Central American
realities, they have also seriously misrepresented U.S. policy
objectives, an essential feature of propaganda, as Jacques Ellul
stresses:

The propagandist naturally cannot reveal the true intentions of the
principal for whom he acts.… That would be to submit the projects to
public discussion, to the scrutiny of public opinion, and thus to
prevent their success.… Propaganda must serve instead as a veil for such
projects, masking true intention.¹³

The power of the government to fix frames of reference and agendas, and
to exclude inconvenient facts from public inspection, is also
impressively displayed in the coverage of elections in Central America,
discussed in chapter 3, and throughout the analysis of particular cases
in the chapters that follow.

When there is little or no elite dissent from a government policy, there
may still be some slippage in the mass media, and facts that tend to
undermine the government line, if they are properly understood, can be
found, usually on the back pages of the newspapers. This is one of the
strengths of the U.S. system. It is possible that the volume of
inconvenient facts can expand, as it did during the Vietnam War, in
response to the growth of a critical constituency (which included elite
elements from 1968). Even in this exceptional case, however, it was very
rare for news and commentary to find their way into the mass media if
they failed to conform to the framework of established dogma
(postulating benevolent U.S. aims, the United States responding to
aggression and terror, etc.), as we discuss in chapter 5. During and
after the Vietnam War, apologists for state policy commonly pointed to
the inconvenient facts, the periodic “pessimism” of media pundits, and
the debates over tactics as showing that the media were “adversarial”
and even “lost” the war. These allegations are ludicrous, as we show in
detail in chapter 5 and appendix 3, but they did have the dual advantage
of disguising the actual role of the mass media and, at the same time,
pressing the media to keep even more tenaciously to the propaganda
assumptions of state policy. We have long argued that the “naturalness”
of these processes, with inconvenient facts allowed sparingly and within
the proper framework of assumptions, and fundamental dissent virtually
excluded from the mass media (but permitted in a marginalized press),
makes for a propaganda system that is far more credible and effective in
putting over a patriotic agenda than one with official censorship.

In criticizing media priorities and biases we often draw on the media
themselves for at least some of the facts. This affords the opportunity
for a classic _non sequitur_, in which the citations of facts from the
mainstream press by a critic of the press is offered as a triumphant
“proof” that the criticism is self-refuting, and that media coverage of
disputed issues is indeed adequate. That the media provide some facts
about an issue, however, proves absolutely nothing about the adequacy or
accuracy of that coverage. The mass media do, in fact, literally
suppress a great deal, as we will describe in the chapters that follow.
But even more important in this context is the question of the attention
given to a fact—its placement, tone, and repetitions, the framework of
analysis within which it is presented, and the related facts that
accompany it and give it meaning (or preclude understanding). That a
careful reader looking for a fact can sometimes find it with diligence
and a skeptical eye tells us nothing about whether that fact received
the attention and context it deserved, whether it was intelligible to
the reader or effectively distorted or suppressed. What level of
attention it deserved may be debatable, but there is no merit to the
pretense that because certain facts may be found in the media by a
diligent and skeptical researcher, the absence of radical bias and de
facto suppression is thereby demonstrated.¹⁴

One of our central themes in this book is that the observable pattern of
indignant campaigns and suppressions, of shading and emphasis, and of
selection of context, premises, and general agenda, is highly functional
for established power and responsive to the needs of the government and
major power groups. A constant focus on victims of communism helps
convince the public of enemy evil and sets the stage for intervention,
subversion, support for terrorist states, an endless arms race, and
military conflict—all in a noble cause. At the same time, the devotion
of our leaders and media to this narrow set of victims raises public
self-esteem and patriotism, as it demonstrates the essential humanity of
country and people.

The public does not notice the silence on victims in client states,
which is as important in supporting state policy as the concentrated
focus on enemy victims. It would have been very difficult for the
Guatemalan government to murder tens of thousands over the past decade
if the U.S. press had provided the kind of coverage they gave to the
difficulties of Andrei Sakharov or the murder of Jerzy Popieluszko in
Poland (see chapter 2). It would have been impossible to wage a brutal
war against South Vietnam and the rest of Indochina, leaving a legacy of
misery and destruction that may never be overcome, if the media had not
rallied to the cause, portraying murderous aggression as a defense of
freedom, and only opening the doors to tactical disagreement when the
costs to the interests they represent became too high.

The same is true in other cases that we discuss, and too many that we do
not.

We would like to express our thanks to the following people for their
assistance in the preparation of this book: James Aronson, Phillip
Berryman, Larry Birns, Frank Brodhead, Holly Burkhalter, Donna Cooper,
Carol Fouke, Eva Gold, Carol Goslant, Roy Head, Mary Herman, Rob Kirsch,
Robert Krinsky, Alfred McClung Lee, Kent MacDougall, Nejat Ozyegin,
Nancy Peters, Ellen Ray, William Schaap, Karin Wilkins, Warren Witte,
and Jamie Young. The authors alone remain responsible for its contents.



[]  _1_ A PROPAGANDA MODEL 



[]


THE MASS MEDIA SERVE AS A SYSTEM FOR COMMUNICATING messages and symbols
to the general populace. It is their function to amuse, entertain, and
inform, and to inculcate individuals with the values, beliefs, and codes
of behavior that will integrate them into the institutional structures
of the larger society. In a world of concentrated wealth and major
conflicts of class interest, to fulfil this role requires systematic
propaganda.¹

In countries where the levers of power are in the hands of a state
bureaucracy, the monopolistic control over the media, often supplemented
by official censorship, makes it clear that the media serve the ends of
a dominant elite. It is much more difficult to see a propaganda system
at work where the media are private and formal censorship is absent.
This is especially true where the media actively compete, periodically
attack and expose corporate and governmental malfeasance, and
aggressively portray themselves as spokesmen for free speech and the
general community interest. What is not evident (and remains undiscussed
in the media) is the limited nature of such critiques, as well as the
huge inequality in command of resources, and its effect both on access
to a private media system and on its behavior and performance.

A propaganda model focuses on this inequality of wealth and power and
its multilevel effects on mass-media interests and choices. It traces
the routes by which money and power are able to filter out the news fit
to print, marginalize dissent, and allow the government and dominant
private interests to get their messages across to the public. The
essential ingredients of our propaganda model, or set of news “filters,”
fall under the following headings: (1) the size, concentrated ownership,
owner wealth, and profit orientation of the dominant mass-media firms;
(2) advertising as the primary income source of the mass media; (3) the
reliance of the media on information provided by government, business,
and “experts” funded and approved by these primary sources and agents of
power; (4) “flak” as a means of disciplining the media; and (5)
“anticommunism” as a national religion and control mechanism. These
elements interact with and reinforce one another. The raw material of
news must pass through successive filters, leaving only the cleansed
residue fit to print. They fix the premises of discourse and
interpretation, and the definition of what is newsworthy in the first
place, and they explain the basis and operations of what amount to
propaganda campaigns.

The elite domination of the media and marginalization of dissidents that
results from the operation of these filters occurs so naturally that
media news people, frequently operating with complete integrity and
goodwill, are able to convince themselves that they choose and interpret
the news “objectively” and on the basis of professional news values.
Within the limits of the filter constraints they often are objective;
the constraints are so powerful, and are built into the system in such a
fundamental way, that alternative bases of news choices are hardly
imaginable. In assessing the newsworthiness of the U.S. government’s
urgent claims of a shipment of MIGs to Nicaragua on November 5, 1984,
the media do not stop to ponder the bias that is inherent in the
priority assigned to government-supplied raw material, or the
possibility that the government might be manipulating the news,²
imposing its own agenda, and deliberately diverting attention from other
material.³ It requires a macro, alongside a micro- (story-by-story),
view of media operations, to see the pattern of manipulation and
systematic bias.

Let us turn now to a more detailed examination of the main constituents
of the propaganda model, which will be applied and tested in the
chapters that follow.


1.1. SIZE, OWNERSHIP, AND PROFIT ORIENTATION OF THE MASS MEDIA: THE FIRST FILTER

In their analysis of the evolution of the media in Great Britain, James
Curran and Jean Seaton describe how, in the first half of the nineteenth
century, a radical press emerged that reached a national working-class
audience. This alternative press was effective in reinforcing class
consciousness: it unified the workers because it fostered an alternative
value system and framework for looking at the world, and because it
“promoted a greater collective confidence by repeatedly emphasizing the
potential power of working people to effect social change through the
force of ‘combination’ and organized action.”⁴ This was deemed a major
threat by the ruling elites. One MP asserted that the working-class
newspapers “inflame passions and awaken their selfishness, contrasting
their current condition with what they contend to be their future
condition—a condition incompatible with human nature, and those
immutable laws which Providence has established for the regulation of
civil society.”⁵ The result was an attempt to squelch the working-class
media by libel laws and prosecutions, by requiring an expensive security
bond as a condition for publication, and by imposing various taxes
designed to drive out radical media by raising their costs. These
coercive efforts were not effective, and by mid-century they had been
abandoned in favor of the liberal view that the market would enforce
responsibility.

Curran and Seaton show that the market _did_ successfully accomplish
what state intervention failed to do. Following the repeal of the
punitive taxes on newspapers between 1853 and 1869, a new daily local
press came into existence, but not one new local working-class daily was
established through the rest of the nineteenth century. Curran and
Seaton note that

Indeed, the eclipse of the national radical press was so total that when
the Labour Party developed out of the working-class movement in the
first decade of the twentieth century, it did not obtain the exclusive
backing of a single national daily or Sunday paper.⁶

One important reason for this was the rise in scale of newspaper
enterprise and the associated increase in capital costs from the
mid-nineteenth century onward, which was based on technological
improvements along with the owners’ increased stress on reaching large
audiences. The expansion of the free market was accompanied by an
“industrialization of the press.” The total cost of establishing a
national weekly on a profitable basis in 1837 was under a thousand
pounds, with a break-even circulation of 6,200 copies. By 1867, the
estimated start-up cost of a new London daily was 50,000 pounds. The
_Sunday Express_, launched in 1918, spent over two million pounds before
it broke even with a circulation of over 250,000.⁷

Similar processes were at work in the United States, where the start-up
cost of a new paper in New York City in 1851 was $69,000; the public
sale of the _St. Louis Democrat_ in 1872 yielded $456,000; and city
newspapers were selling at from $6 to $18 million in the 1920s.⁸ The
cost of machinery alone, of even very small newspapers, has for many
decades run into the hundreds of thousands of dollars; in 1945 it could
be said that “Even small-newspaper publishing is big business … [and] is
no longer a trade one takes up lightly even if he has substantial
cash—or takes up at all if he doesn’t.”⁹

Thus the first filter—the limitation on ownership of media with any
substantial outreach by the requisite large size of investment—was
applicable a century or more ago, and it has become increasingly
effective over time.¹⁰ In 1986 there were some 1,500 daily newspapers,
11,000 magazines, 9,000 radio and 1,500 TV stations, 2,400 book
publishers, and seven movie studios in the United States—over 25,000
media entities in all. But a large proportion of those among this set
who were news dispensers were very small and local, dependent on the
large national companies and wire services for all but local news. Many
more were subject to common ownership, sometimes extending through
virtually the entire set of media variants.¹¹

Ben Bagdikian stresses the fact that despite the large media numbers,
the twenty-nine largest media systems account for over half of the
output of newspapers, and most of the sales and audiences in magazines,
broadcasting, books, and movies. He contends that these “constitute a
new Private Ministry of Information and Culture” that can set the
national agenda.¹²

Actually, while suggesting a media autonomy from corporate and
government power that we believe to be incompatible with structural
facts (as we describe below), Bagdikian also may be understating the
degree of effective concentration in news manufacture. It has long been
noted that the media are tiered, with the top tier—as measured by
prestige, resources, and outreach—comprising somewhere between ten and
twenty-four systems.¹³ It is this top tier, along with the government
and wire services, that defines the news agenda and supplies much of the
national and international news to the lower tiers of the media, and
thus for the general public.¹⁴ Centralization within the top tier was
substantially increased by the post-World War II rise of television and
the national networking of this important medium. Pre-television news
markets were local, even if heavily dependent on the higher tiers and a
narrow set of sources for national and international news; the networks
provide national and international news from three national sources, and
television is now the principal source of news for the public.¹⁵ The
maturing of cable, however, has resulted in a fragmentation of
television audiences and a slow erosion of the market share and power of
the networks.

Table 1-1 provides some basic financial data for the twenty-four media
giants (or their controlling parent companies) that make up the top tier
of media companies in the United States.¹⁶ This compilation includes:
(1) the three television networks: ABC (through its parent, Capital
Cities), CBS, and NBC (through its ultimate parent, General Electric
[GE]); (2) the leading newspaper empires: _New York Times, Washington
Post, Los Angeles Times_ (Times-Mirror), _Wall Street Journal_ (Dow
Jones), Knight-Ridder, Gannett, Hearst, Scripps-Howard, Newhouse
(Advance Publications), and the Tribune Company; (3) the major news and
general-interest magazines: _Time, Newsweek_ (subsumed under _Washington
Post_)_, Reader’s Digest, TV Guide_ (Triangle), and _U.S. News & World
Report_; (4) a major book publisher (McGraw-Hill); and (5) other
cable-TV systems of large and growing importance: those of Murdoch,
Turner, Cox, General Corp., Taft, Storer,¹⁷ and Group W (Westinghouse).
Many of these systems are prominent in more than one field and are only
arbitrarily placed in a particular category (Time, Inc., is very
important in cable as well as magazines; McGraw-Hill is a major
publisher of magazines; the Tribune Company has become a large force in
television as well as newspapers; Hearst is important in magazines as
well as newspapers; and Murdoch has significant newspaper interests as
well as television and movie holdings).

These twenty-four companies are large, profit-seeking corporations,
owned and controlled by quite wealthy people. It can be seen in table
1-1 that all but one of the top companies for whom data are available
have assets in excess of $1 billion, and the median size (middle item by
size) is $2.6 billion. It can also be seen in the table that
approximately three-quarters of these media giants had after-tax profits
in excess of $100 million, with the median at $183 million.

Many of the large media companies are fully integrated into the market,
and for the others, too, the pressures of stockholders, directors, and
bankers to focus on the bottom line are powerful. These pressures have
intensified in recent years as media stocks have become market
favorites, and actual or prospective owners of newspapers and television
properties have found it possible to capitalize increased audience size
and advertising revenues into multiplied values of the media
franchises—and great wealth.¹⁸ This has encouraged the entry of
speculators and increased the pressure and temptation to focus more
intensively on profitability. Family owners have been increasingly
divided between those wanting to take advantage of the new opportunities
and those desiring a continuation of family control, and their splits
have often precipitated crises leading finally to the sale of the family
interest.¹⁹

[]

This trend toward greater integration of the media into the market
system has been accelerated by the loosening of rules limiting media
concentration, cross-ownership, and control by non-media companies.²⁰
There has also been an abandonment of restrictions—previously quite
feeble anyway—on radio-TV commercials, entertainment-mayhem programming,
and “fairness doctrine” threats, opening the door to the unrestrained
commercial use of the airwaves.²¹

The greater profitability of the media in a deregulated environment has
also led to an increase in takeovers and takeover threats, with even
giants like CBS and Time, Inc., directly attacked or threatened. This
has forced the managements of the media giants to incur greater debt and
to focus ever more aggressively and unequivocally on profitability, in
order to placate owners and reduce the attractiveness of their
properties to outsiders.²² They have lost some of their limited autonomy
to bankers, institutional investors, and large individual investors whom
they have had to solicit as potential “white knights.”²³

While the stock of the great majority of large media firms is traded on
the securities markets, approximately two-thirds of these companies are
either closely held or still controlled by members of the originating
family who retain large blocks of stock. This situation is changing as
family ownership becomes diffused among larger numbers of heirs and the
market opportunities for selling media properties continue to improve,
but the persistence of family control is evident in the data shown in
table 1-2. Also evident in the table is the enormous wealth possessed by
the controlling families of the top media firms. For seven of the
twenty-four, the market value of the media properties owned by the
controlling families in the mid-1980s exceeded a billion dollars, and
the median value was close to half a billion dollars.²⁴ These control
groups obviously have a special stake in the status quo by virtue of
their wealth and their strategic position in one of the great
institutions of society. And they exercise the power of this strategic
position, if only by establishing the general aims of the company and
choosing its top management.²⁵

The control groups of the media giants are also brought into close
relationships with the mainstream of the corporate community through
boards of directors and social links. In the cases of NBC and the Group
W television and cable systems, their respective parents, GE and
Westinghouse, are themselves mainstream corporate giants, with boards of
directors that are dominated by corporate and banking executives. Many
of the other large media firms have boards made up predominantly of
insiders, a general characteristic of relatively small and
owner-dominated companies. The larger the firm and the more widely
distributed the stock, the larger the number and proportion of outside
directors. The composition of the outside directors of the media giants
is very similar to that of large non-media corporations. Table 1-3 shows
that active corporate executives and bankers together account for a
little over half the total of the outside directors of ten media giants;
and the lawyers and corporate-banker retirees (who account for nine of
the thirteen under “Retired”) push the corporate total to about
two-thirds of the outside-director aggregate. These 95 outside directors
had directorships in an additional 36 banks and 255 other companies
(aside from the media company and their own firm of primary
affiliation).²⁶

[]

In addition to these board linkages, the large media companies all do
business with commercial and investment bankers, obtaining lines of
credit and loans, and receiving advice and service in selling stock and
bond issues and in dealing with acquisition opportunities and takeover
threats. Banks and other institutional investors are also large owners
of media stock. In the early 1980s, such institutions held 44 percent of
the stock of publicly owned newspapers and 35 percent of the stock of
publicly owned broadcasting companies.²⁷ These investors are also
frequently among the largest stockholders of individual companies. For
example, in 1980-81, the Capital Group, an investment company system,
held 7.1 percent of the stock of ABC, 6.6 percent of Knight-Ridder, 6
percent of Time, Inc., and 2.8 percent of Westinghouse.²⁸ These
holdings, individually and collectively, do not convey control, but
these large investors can make themselves heard, and their actions can
affect the welfare of the companies and their managers.²⁹ If the
managers fail to pursue actions that favor shareholder returns,
institutional investors will be inclined to sell the stock (depressing
its price), or to listen sympathetically to outsiders contemplating
takeovers. These investors are a force helping press media companies
toward strictly market (profitability) objectives.



_______________________________________________________________ TABLE 1-3  AFFILIATIONS OF THE OUTSIDE DIRECTORS OF TEN LARGE MEDIA COMPANIES (OR THEIR PARENTS) IN 1986^(*)


PRIMARY AFFILIATION

NUMBER

PERCENT

______________________________________________________________

Corporate executive

39

41.1

Lawyer

8

8.4

Retired (former corporate executive or banker)

13 (9)

13.7 (9.5)

Banker

8

8.4

Consultant

4

4.2

Nonprofit organization

15

15.8

Other

8

8.4

  Total

95

100.0

       OTHER RELATIONSHIPS

Other directorships (bank directorships)

255 (36)

Former government officials

15

Member of Council on Foreign Relations

20

So is the diversification and geographic spread of the great media
companies. Many of them have diversified out of particular media fields
into others that seemed like growth areas. Many older newspaper-based
media companies, fearful of the power of television and its effects on
advertising revenue, moved as rapidly as they could into broadcasting
and cable TV. Time, Inc., also, made a major diversification move into
cable TV, which now accounts for more than half its profits. Only a
small minority of the twenty-four largest media giants remain in a
single media sector.³⁰

The large media companies have also diversified beyond the media field,
and non-media companies have established a strong presence in the mass
media. The most important cases of the latter are GE, owning RCA, which
owns the NBC network, and Westinghouse, which owns major
television-broadcasting stations, a cable network, and a radio-station
network. GE and Westinghouse are both huge, diversified multinational
companies heavily involved in the controversial areas of weapons
production and nuclear power. It may be recalled that from 1965 to 1967,
an attempt by International Telephone and Telegraph (ITT) to acquire ABC
was frustrated following a huge outcry that focused on the dangers of
allowing a great multinational corporation with extensive foreign
investments and business activities to control a major media outlet.³¹
The fear was that ITT control “could compromise the independence of
ABC’s news coverage of political events in countries where ITT has
interests.”³² The soundness of the decision disallowing the acquisition
seemed to have been vindicated by the later revelations of ITT’s
political bribery and involvement in attempts to overthrow the
government of Chile. RCA and Westinghouse, however, had been permitted
to control media companies long before the ITT case, although some of
the objections applicable to ITT would seem to apply to them as well. GE
is a more powerful company than ITT, with an extensive international
reach, deeply involved in the nuclear power business, and far more
important than ITT in the arms industry. It is a highly centralized and
quite secretive organization, but one with a vast stake in “political”
decisions.³³ GE has contributed to the funding of the American
Enterprise Institute, a right-wing think tank that supports
intellectuals who will get the business message across. With the
acquisition of ABC, GE should be in a far better position to assure that
sound views are given proper attention.³⁴ The lack of outcry over its
takeover of RCA and NBC resulted in part from the fact that RCA control
over NBC had already breached the gate of separateness, but it also
reflected the more pro-business and _laissez-faire_ environment of the
Reagan era.

The non-media interests of most of the media giants are not large, and,
excluding the GE and Westinghouse systems, they account for only a small
fraction of their total revenue. Their multinational outreach, however,
is more significant. The television networks, television syndicators,
major news magazines, and motion-picture studios all do extensive
business abroad, and they derive a substantial fraction of their
revenues from foreign sales and the operation of foreign affiliates.
_Reader’s Digest_ is printed in seventeen languages and is available in
over 160 countries. The Murdoch empire was originally based in
Australia, and the controlling parent company is still an Australian
corporation; its expansion in the United States is funded by profits
from Australian and British affiliates.³⁵

Another structural relationship of importance is the media companies’
dependence on and ties with government. The radio-TV companies and
networks all require government licenses and franchises and are thus
potentially subject to government control or harassment. This technical
legal dependency has been used as a club to discipline the media, and
media policies that stray too often from an establishment orientation
could activate this threat.³⁶ The media protect themselves from this
contingency by lobbying and other political expenditures, the
cultivation of political relationships, and care in policy. The
political ties of the media have been impressive. Table 1-3 shows that
fifteen of ninety-five outside directors of ten of the media giants are
former government officials, and Peter Dreier gives a similar proportion
in his study of large newspapers.³⁷ In television, the revolving-door
flow of personnel between regulators and the regulated firms was massive
during the years when the oligopolistic structure of the media and
networks was being established.³⁸

The great media also depend on the government for more general policy
support. All business firms are interested in business taxes, interest
rates, labor policies, and enforcement and nonenforcement of the
antitrust laws. GE and Westinghouse depend on the government to
subsidize their nuclear power and military research and development, and
to create a favorable climate for their overseas sales. The _Reader’s
Digest, Time, Newsweek_, and movie- and television-syndication sellers
also depend on diplomatic support for their rights to penetrate foreign
cultures with U.S. commercial and value messages and interpretations of
current affairs. The media giants, advertising agencies, and great
multinational corporations have a joint and close interest in a
favorable climate of investment in the Third World, and their
interconnections and relationships with the government in these policies
are symbiotic.³⁹

In sum, the dominant media firms are quite large businesses; they are
controlled by very wealthy people or by managers who are subject to
sharp constraints by owners and other market-profit-oriented forces;⁴⁰
and they are closely interlocked, and have important common interests,
with other major corporations, banks, and government. This is the first
powerful filter that will affect news choices.


1.2. THE ADVERTISING LICENSE TO DO BUSINESS: THE SECOND FILTER

In arguing for the benefits of the free market as a means of controlling
dissident opinion in the mid-nineteenth century, the Liberal chancellor
of the British exchequer, Sir George Lewis, noted that the market would
promote those papers “enjoying the preference of the advertising
public.”⁴¹ Advertising did, in fact, serve as a powerful mechanism
weakening the working-class press. Curran and Seaton give the growth of
advertising a status comparable with the increase in capital costs as a
factor allowing the market to accomplish what state taxes and harassment
failed to do, noting that these “advertisers thus acquired a de facto
licensing authority since, without their support, newspapers ceased to
be economically viable.”⁴²

Before advertising became prominent, the price of a newspaper had to
cover the costs of doing business. With the growth of advertising,
papers that attracted ads could afford a copy price well below
production costs. This put papers lacking in advertising at a serious
disadvantage: their prices would tend to be higher, curtailing sales,
and they would have less surplus to invest in improving the salability
of the paper (features, attractive format, promotion, etc.). For this
reason, an advertising-based system will tend to drive out of existence
or into marginality the media companies and types that depend on revenue
from sales alone. With advertising, the free market does not yield a
neutral system in which final buyer choice decides. The _advertisers’_
choices influence media prosperity and survival.⁴³ The ad-based media
receive an advertising subsidy that gives them a price-marketing-quality
edge, which allows them to encroach on and further weaken their ad-free
(or ad-disadvantaged) rivals.⁴⁴ Even if ad-based media cater to an
affluent (“upscale”) audience, they easily pick up a large part of the
“downscale” audience, and their rivals lose market share and are
eventually driven out or marginalized.

In fact, advertising has played a potent role in increasing
concentration even among rivals that focus with equal energy on seeking
advertising revenue. A market share and advertising edge on the part of
one paper or television station will give it additional revenue to
compete more effectively—promote more aggressively, buy more salable
features and programs—and the disadvantaged rival must add expenses it
cannot afford to try to stem the cumulative process of dwindling market
(and revenue) share. The crunch is often fatal, and it helps explain the
death of many large-circulation papers and magazines and the attrition
in the number of newspapers.⁴⁵

From the time of the introduction of press advertising, therefore,
working-class and radical papers have been at a serious disadvantage.
Their readers have tended to be of modest means, a factor that has
always affected advertiser interest. One advertising executive stated in
1856 that some journals are poor vehicles because “their readers are not
purchasers, and any money thrown upon them is so much thrown away.”⁴⁶
The same force took a heavy toll of the post-World War II
social-democratic press in Great Britain, with the _Daily Herald, News
Chronicle_, and _Sunday Citizen_ failing or absorbed into establishment
systems between 1960 and 1967, despite a collective average daily
readership of 9.3 million. As James Curran points out, with 4.7 million
readers in its last year, “the _Daily Herald_ actually had almost double
the readership of _The Times_, the _Financial Times_ and the _Guardian_
combined.” What is more, surveys showed that its readers “thought more
highly of their paper than the regular readers of any other popular
newspaper,” and “they also read more in their paper than the readers of
other popular papers despite being overwhelmingly working class.…”⁴⁷ The
death of the _Herald_, as well as of the _News Chronicle_ and _Sunday
Citizen_, was in large measure a result of progressive strangulation by
lack of advertising support. The _Herald_, with 8.1 percent of national
daily circulation, got 3.5 percent of net advertising revenue; the
_Sunday Citizen_ got one-tenth of the net advertising revenue of the
_Sunday Times_ and one-seventh that of the _Observer_ (on a
per-thousand-copies basis). Curran argues persuasively that the loss of
these three papers was an important contribution to the declining
fortunes of the Labor party, in the case of the _Herald_ specifically
removing a mass-circulation institution that provided “an alternative
framework of analysis and understanding that contested the dominant
systems of representation in both broadcasting and the mainstream
press.”⁴⁸ A mass movement without any major media support, and subject
to a great deal of active press hostility, suffers a serious disability,
and struggles against grave odds.

The successful media today are fully attuned to the crucial importance
of audience “quality”: CBS proudly tells its shareholders that while it
“continuously seeks to maximize audience delivery,” it has developed a
new “sales tool” with which it approaches advertisers: “Client Audience
Profile, or CAP, will help advertisers optimize the effectiveness of
their network television schedules by evaluating audience segments in
proportion to usage levels of advertisers’ products and services.”⁴⁹ In
short, the mass media are interested in attracting audiences with buying
power, not audiences per se; it is affluent audiences that spark
advertiser interest today, as in the nineteenth century. The idea that
the drive for large audiences makes the mass media “democratic” thus
suffers from the initial weakness that its political analogue is a
voting system weighted by income!

The power of advertisers over television programming stems from the
simple fact that they buy and pay for the programs—they are the
“patrons” who provide the media subsidy. As such, the media compete for
their patronage, developing specialized staff to solicit advertisers and
necessarily having to explain how their programs serve advertisers’
needs. The choices of these patrons greatly affect the welfare of the
media, and the patrons become what William Evan calls “normative
reference organizations,”⁵⁰ whose requirements and demands the media
must accommodate if they are to succeed.⁵¹

For a television network, an audience gain or loss of one percentage
point in the Nielsen ratings translates into a change in advertising
revenue of from $80 to $100 million a year, with some variation
depending on measures of audience “quality.” The stakes in audience size
and affluence are thus extremely large, and in a market system there is
a strong tendency for such considerations to affect policy profoundly.
This is partly a matter of institutional pressures to focus on the
bottom line, partly a matter of the continuous interaction of the media
organization with patrons who supply the revenue dollars. As Grant
Tinker, then head of NBC-TV, observed, television “is an
advertising-supported medium, and to the extent that support falls out,
programming will change.”⁵²

Working-class and radical media also suffer from the political
discrimination of advertisers. Political discrimination is structured
into advertising allocations by the stress on people with money to buy.
But many firms will always refuse to patronize ideological enemies and
those whom they perceive as damaging their interests, and cases of overt
discrimination add to the force of the voting system weighted by income.
Public-television station WNET lost its corporate funding from Gulf +
Western in 1985 after the station showed the documentary “Hungry for
Profit,” which contains material critical of multinational corporate
activities in the Third World. Even before the program was shown, in
anticipation of negative corporate reaction, station officials “did all
we could to get the program sanitized” (according to one station
source).⁵³ The chief executive of Gulf + Western complained to the
station that the program was “virulently anti-business if not
anti-American,” and that the station’s carrying the program was not the
behavior “of a friend” of the corporation. The London _Economist_ says
that “Most people believe that WNET would not make the same mistake
again.”⁵⁴

In addition to discrimination against unfriendly media institutions,
advertisers also choose selectively among programs on the basis of their
own principles. With rare exceptions these are culturally and
politically conservative.⁵⁵ Large corporate advertisers on television
will rarely sponsor programs that engage in serious criticisms of
corporate activities, such as the problem of environmental degradation,
the workings of the military-industrial complex, or corporate support of
and benefits from Third World tyrannies. Erik Barnouw recounts the
history of a proposed documentary series on environmental problems by
NBC at a time of great interest in these issues. Barnouw notes that
although at that time a great many large companies were spending money
on commercials and other publicity regarding environmental problems, the
documentary series failed for want of sponsors. The problem was one of
excessive objectivity in the series, which included suggestions of
corporate or systemic failure, whereas the corporate message “was one of
reassurance.”⁵⁶

Television networks learn over time that such programs will not sell and
would have to be carried at a financial sacrifice, and that, in
addition, they may offend powerful advertisers.⁵⁷ With the rise in the
price of advertising spots, the forgone revenue increases; and with
increasing market pressure for financial performance and the diminishing
constraints from regulation, an advertising-based media system will
gradually increase advertising time and marginalize or eliminate
altogether programming that has significant public-affairs content.⁵⁸

Advertisers will want, more generally, to avoid programs with serious
complexities and disturbing controversies that interfere with the
“buying mood.” They seek programs that will lightly entertain and thus
fit in with the spirit of the primary purpose of program purchases—the
dissemination of a selling message. Thus over time, instead of programs
like “The Selling of the Pentagon,” it is a natural evolution of a
market seeking sponsor dollars to offer programs such as “A Bird’s-Eye
View of Scotland,” “Barry Goldwater’s Arizona,” “An Essay on Hotels,”
and “Mr. Rooney Goes to Dinner”—a CBS program on “how Americans eat when
they dine out, where they go and why.”⁵⁹ There are exceptional cases of
companies willing to sponsor serious programs, sometimes a result of
recent embarrassments that call for a public-relations offset.⁶⁰ But
even in these cases the companies will usually not want to sponsor close
examination of sensitive and divisive issues—they prefer programs on
Greek antiquities, the ballet, and items of cultural and national
history and nostalgia. Barnouw points out an interesting contrast:
commercial-television drama “deals almost wholly with the here and now,
as processed via advertising budgets,” but on public television, culture
“has come to mean ‘other cultures.’ … American civilization, here and
now, is excluded from consideration.”⁶¹

Television stations and networks are also concerned to maintain audience
“flow” levels, i.e., to keep people watching from program to program, in
order to sustain advertising ratings and revenue. Airing program
interludes of documentary-cultural matter that cause station switching
is costly, and over time a “free” (i.e., ad-based) commercial system
will tend to excise it. Such documentary-cultural-critical materials
will be driven out of secondary media vehicles as well, as these
companies strive to qualify for advertiser interest, although there will
always be some cultural-political programming trying to come into being
or surviving on the periphery of the mainstream media.


1.3. SOURCING MASS-MEDIA NEWS: THE THIRD FILTER

The mass media are drawn into a symbiotic relationship with powerful
sources of information by economic necessity and reciprocity of
interest. The media need a steady, reliable flow of the raw material of
news. They have daily news demands and imperative news schedules that
they must meet. They cannot afford to have reporters and cameras at all
places where important stories may break. Economics dictates that they
concentrate their resources where significant news often occurs, where
important rumors and leaks abound, and where regular press conferences
are held. The White House, the Pentagon, and the State Department, in
Washington, D.C., are central nodes of such news activity. On a local
basis, city hall and the police department are the subject of regular
news “beats” for reporters. Business corporations and trade groups are
also regular and credible purveyors of stories deemed newsworthy. These
bureaucracies turn out a large volume of material that meets the demands
of news organizations for reliable, scheduled flows. Mark Fishman calls
this “the principle of bureaucratic affinity: only other bureaucracies
can satisfy the input needs of a news bureaucracy.”⁶²

Government and corporate sources also have the great merit of being
recognizable and credible by their status and prestige. This is
important to the mass media. As Fishman notes,

Newsworkers are predisposed to treat bureaucratic accounts as factual
because news personnel participate in upholding a normative order of
authorized knowers in the society. Reporters operate with the attitude
that officials ought to know what it is their job to know.… In
particular, a newsworker will recognize an official’s claim to knowledge
not merely as a claim, but as a credible, competent piece of knowledge.
This amounts to a moral division of labor: officials have and give the
facts; reporters merely get them.⁶³

Another reason for the heavy weight given to official sources is that
the mass media claim to be “objective” dispensers of the news. Partly to
maintain the image of objectivity, but also to protect themselves from
criticisms of bias and the threat of libel suits, they need material
that can be portrayed as presumptively accurate.⁶⁴ This is also partly a
matter of cost: taking information from sources that may be presumed
credible reduces investigative expense, whereas material from sources
that are not prima facie credible, or that will elicit criticism and
threats, requires careful checking and costly research.

The magnitude of the public-information operations of large government
and corporate bureaucracies that constitute the primary news sources is
vast and ensures special access to the media. The Pentagon, for example,
has a public-information service that involves many thousands of
employees, spending hundreds of millions of dollars every year and
dwarfing not only the public-information resources of any dissenting
individual or group but the _aggregate_ of such groups. In 1979 and
1980, during a brief interlude of relative openness (since closed down),
the U.S. Air Force revealed that its public-information outreach
included the following:

140 newspapers, 690,000 copies per week
_Airman_ magazine, monthly circulation 125,000
34 radio and 17 TV stations, primarily overseas
45,000 headquarters and unit news releases
615,000 hometown news releases
6,600 interviews with news media
3,200 news conferences
500 news media orientation flights
50 meetings with editorial boards
11,000 speeches⁶⁵

This excludes vast areas of the air force’s public-information effort.
Writing back in 1970, Senator J. W. Fulbright had found that the air
force public-relations effort in 1968 involved 1,305 full-time
employees, exclusive of additional thousands that “have public functions
collateral to other duties.”⁶⁶ The air force at that time offered a
weekly film-clip service for TV and a taped features program for use
three times a week, sent to 1,139 radio stations; it also produced 148
motion pictures, of which 24 were released for public consumption.⁶⁷
There is no reason to believe that the air force public-relations effort
has diminished since the 1960s.⁶⁸

Note that this is just the air force. There are three other branches
with massive programs, and there is a separate, overall
public-information program under an assistant secretary of defense for
public affairs in the Pentagon. In 1971, an _Armed Forces Journal_
survey revealed that the Pentagon was publishing a total of 371
magazines at an annual cost of some $57 million, an operation sixteen
times larger than the nation’s biggest publisher. In an update in 1982,
the _Air Force Journal International_ indicated that the Pentagon was
publishing 1,203 periodicals.⁶⁹ To put this into perspective, we may
note the scope of public-information operations of the American Friends
Service Committee (AFSC) and the National Council of the Churches of
Christ (NCC), two of the largest of the nonprofit organizations that
offer a consistently challenging voice to the views of the Pentagon. The
AFSC’s main office information-services budget in 1984–85 was under
$500,000, with eleven staff people.⁷⁰ Its institution-wide press
releases run at about two hundred per year, its press conferences thirty
a year, and it produces about one film and two or three slide shows a
year. It does not offer film clips, photos, or taped radio programs to
the media. The NCC Office of Information has an annual budget of some
$350,000, issues about a hundred news releases per year, and holds four
press conferences annually.⁷¹ The ratio of air force news releases and
press conferences to those of the AFSC and NCC taken together are 150 to
1 (or 2,200 to 1 if we count hometown news releases of the air force),
and 94 to 1 respectively. Aggregating the other services would increase
the differential by a large factor.

Only the corporate sector has the resources to produce public
information and propaganda on the scale of the Pentagon and other
government bodies. The AFSC and NCC cannot duplicate the Mobil Oil
company’s multimillion-dollar purchase of newspaper space and other
corporate investments to get its viewpoint across.⁷² The number of
individual corporations with budgets for public information and lobbying
in excess of those of the AFSC and NCC runs into the hundreds, perhaps
even the thousands. A corporate _collective_ like the U.S. Chamber of
Commerce had a 1983 budget for research, communications, and political
activities of $65 million.⁷³ By 1980, the chamber was publishing a
business magazine (_Nation’s Business_) with a circulation of 1.3
million and a weekly newspaper with 740,000 subscribers, and it was
producing a weekly panel show distributed to 400 radio stations, as well
as its own weekly panel-discussion programs carried by 128 commercial
television stations.⁷⁴

Besides the U.S. Chamber, there are thousands of state and local
chambers of commerce and trade associations also engaged in
public-relations and lobbying activities. The corporate and
trade-association lobbying network community is “a network of well over
150,000 professionals,”⁷⁵ and its resources are related to corporate
income, profits, and the protective value of public-relations and
lobbying outlays. Corporate profits before taxes in 1985 were $295.5
billion. When the corporate community gets agitated about the political
environment, as it did in the 1970s, it obviously has the wherewithal to
meet the perceived threat. Corporate and trade-association image and
issues advertising increased from $305 million in 1975 to $650 million
in 1980.⁷⁶ So did direct-mail campaigns through dividend and other mail
stuffers, the distribution of educational films, booklets and pamphlets,
and outlays on initiatives and referendums, lobbying, and political and
think-tank contributions. Aggregate corporate and trade-association
political advertising and grass-roots outlays were estimated to have
reached the billion-dollar-a-year level by 1978, and to have grown to
$1.6 billion by 1984.⁷⁷

To consolidate their preeminent position as sources, government and
business-news promoters go to great pains to make things easy for news
organizations. They provide the media organizations with facilities in
which to gather; they give journalists advance copies of speeches and
forthcoming reports; they schedule press conferences at hours
well-geared to news deadlines;⁷⁸ they write press releases in usable
language; and they carefully organize their press conferences and “photo
opportunity” sessions.⁷⁹ It is the job of news officers “to meet the
journalist’s scheduled needs with material that their beat agency has
generated at its own pace.”⁸⁰

In effect, the large bureaucracies of the powerful _subsidize_ the mass
media, and gain special access by their contribution to reducing the
media’s costs of acquiring the raw materials of, and producing, news.
The large entities that provide this subsidy become “routine” news
sources and have privileged access to the gates. Non-routine sources
must struggle for access, and may be ignored by the arbitrary decision
of the gatekeepers. It should also be noted that in the case of the
largesse of the Pentagon and the State Department’s Office of Public
Diplomacy,⁸¹ the subsidy is at the taxpayers’ expense, so that, in
effect, the citizenry pays to be propagandized in the interest of
powerful groups such as military contractors and other sponsors of state
terrorism.

Because of their services, continuous contact on the beat, and mutual
dependency, the powerful can use personal relationships, threats, and
rewards to further influence and coerce the media. The media may feel
obligated to carry extremely dubious stories and mute criticism in order
not to offend their sources and disturb a close relationship.⁸² It is
very difficult to call authorities on whom one depends for daily news
liars, even if they tell whoppers. Critical sources may be avoided not
only because of their lesser availability and higher cost of
establishing credibility, but also because the primary sources may be
offended and may even threaten the media using them.

Powerful sources may also use their prestige and importance to the media
as a lever to deny critics access to the media: the Defense Department,
for example, refused to participate in National Public Radio discussions
of defense issues if experts from the Center for Defense Information
were on the program; Elliott Abrams refused to appear on a program on
human rights in Central America at the Kennedy School of Government, at
Harvard University, unless the former ambassador, Robert White, was
excluded as a participant;⁸³ Claire Sterling refused to participate in
television-network shows on the Bulgarian Connection where her critics
would appear.⁸⁴ In the last two of these cases, the authorities and
brand-name experts were successful in monopolizing access by coercive
threats.

Perhaps more important, powerful sources regularly take advantage of
media routines and dependency to “manage” the media, to manipulate them
into following a special agenda and framework (as we will show in detail
in the chapters that follow).⁸⁵ Part of this management process consists
of inundating the media with stories, which serve sometimes to foist a
particular line and frame on the media (e.g., Nicaragua as illicitly
supplying arms to the Salvadoran rebels), and at other times to help
chase unwanted stories off the front page or out of the media altogether
(the alleged delivery of MIGs to Nicaragua during the week of the 1984
Nicaraguan election). This strategy can be traced back at least as far
as the Committee on Public Information, established to coordinate
propaganda during World War I, which “discovered in 1917–18 that one of
the best means of controlling news was flooding news channels with
‘facts,’ or what amounted to official information.”⁸⁶

The relation between power and sourcing extends beyond official and
corporate provision of day-to-day news to shaping the supply of
“experts.” The dominance of official sources is weakened by the
existence of highly respectable unofficial sources that give dissident
views with great authority. This problem is alleviated by “co-opting the
experts”⁸⁷—i.e., putting them on the payroll as consultants, funding
their research, and organizing think tanks that will hire them directly
and help disseminate their messages. In this way bias may be structured,
and the supply of experts may be skewed in the direction desired by the
government and “the market.”⁸⁸ As Henry Kissinger has pointed out, in
this “age of the expert,” the “constituency” of the expert is “those who
have a vested interest in commonly held opinions; elaborating and
defining its consensus at a high level has, after all, made him an
expert.”⁸⁹ It is therefore appropriate that this restructuring has taken
place to allow the commonly held opinions (meaning those that are
functional for elite interests) to continue to prevail.

This process of creating the needed body of experts has been carried out
on a deliberate basis and a massive scale. Back in 1972, Judge Lewis
Powell (later elevated to the Supreme Court) wrote a memo to the U.S.
Chamber of Commerce urging business “to buy the top academic reputations
in the country to add credibility to corporate studies and give business
a stronger voice on the campuses.”⁹⁰ One buys them, and assures that—in
the words of Dr. Edwin Feulner, of the Heritage Foundation—the
public-policy area “is awash with in-depth academic studies” that have
the proper conclusions. Using the analogy of Procter & Gamble selling
toothpaste, Feulner explained that “They sell it and resell it every day
by keeping the product fresh in the consumer’s mind.” By the sales
effort, including the dissemination of the correct ideas to “thousands
of newspapers,” it is possible to keep debate “within its proper
perspective.”⁹¹

In accordance with this formula, during the 1970s and early 1980s a
string of institutions was created and old ones were activated to the
end of propagandizing the corporate viewpoint. Many hundreds of
intellectuals were brought to these institutions, where their work was
funded and their outputs were disseminated to the media by a
sophisticated propaganda effort.⁹² The corporate funding and clear
ideological purpose in the overall effort had no discernible effect on
the credibility of the intellectuals so mobilized; on the contrary, the
funding and pushing of their ideas catapaulted them into the press.

As an illustration of how the funded experts preempt space in the media,
table 1-4 describes the “experts” on terrorism and defense issues who
appeared on the “McNeil-Lehrer News Hour” in the course of a year in the
mid-1980s. We can see that, excluding journalists, a majority of the
participants (54 percent) were present or former government officials,
and that the next highest category (15.7 percent) was drawn from
conservative think tanks. The largest number of appearances in the
latter category was supplied by the Georgetown Center for Strategic and
International Studies (CSIS), an organization funded by conservative
foundations and corporations, and providing a revolving door between the
State Department and CIA and a nominally private organization.⁹³ On such
issues as terrorism and the Bulgarian Connection, the CSIS has occupied
space in the media that otherwise might have been filled by independent
voices.⁹⁴

The mass media themselves also provide “experts” who regularly echo the
official view. John Barron and Claire Sterling are household names as
authorities on the KGB and terrorism because the _Reader’s Digest_ has
funded, published, and publicized their work; the Soviet defector Arkady
Shevchenko became an expert on Soviet arms and intelligence because
_Time_, ABC-TV, and the _New York Times_ chose to feature him (despite
his badly tarnished credentials).⁹⁵ By giving these purveyors of the
preferred view a great deal of exposure, the media confer status and
make them the obvious candidates for opinion and analysis.

Another class of experts whose prominence is largely a function of
serviceability to power is former radicals who have come to “see the
light.” The motives that cause these individuals to switch gods, from
Stalin (or Mao) to Reagan and free enterprise, is varied, but for the
establishment media the reason for the change is simply that the
ex-radicals have finally seen the error of their ways. In a country
whose citizenry values acknowledgement of sin and repentance, the
turncoats are an important class of repentant sinners. It is interesting
to observe how the former sinners, whose previous work was of little
interest or an object of ridicule to the mass media, are suddenly
elevated to prominence and become authentic experts. We may recall how,
during the McCarthy era, defectors and ex-Communists vied with one
another in tales of the imminence of a Soviet invasion and other lurid
stories.⁹⁶ They found that news coverage was a function of their
trimming their accounts to the prevailing demand. The steady flow of
ex-radicals from marginality to media attention shows that we are
witnessing a durable method of providing experts who will say what the
establishment wants said.⁹⁷

[]


1.4. FLAK AND THE ENFORCERS: THE FOURTH FILTER

“Flak” refers to negative responses to a media statement or program. It
may take the form of letters, telegrams, phone calls, petitions,
lawsuits, speeches and bills before Congress, and other modes of
complaint, threat, and punitive action. It may be organized centrally or
locally, or it may consist of the entirely independent actions of
individuals.

If flak is produced on a large scale, or by individuals or groups with
substantial resources, it can be both uncomfortable and costly to the
media. Positions have to be defended within the organization and
without, sometimes before legislatures and possibly even in courts.
Advertisers may withdraw patronage. Television advertising is mainly of
consumer goods that are readily subject to organized boycott. During the
McCarthy years, many advertisers and radio and television stations were
effectively coerced into quiescence and blacklisting of employees by the
threats of determined Red hunters to boycott products. Advertisers are
still concerned to avoid offending constituencies that might produce
flak, and their demand for suitable programming is a continuing feature
of the media environment.⁹⁸ If certain kinds of fact, position, or
program are thought likely to elicit flak, this prospect can be a
deterrent.

The ability to produce flak, and especially flak that is costly and
threatening, is related to power. Serious flak has increased in close
parallel with business’s growing resentment of media criticism and the
corporate offensive of the 1970s and 1980s. Flak from the powerful can
be either direct or indirect. The direct would include letters or phone
calls from the White House to Dan Rather or William Paley, or from the
FCC to the television networks asking for documents used in putting
together a program, or from irate officials of ad agencies or corporate
sponsors to media officials asking for reply time or threatening
retaliation.⁹⁹ The powerful can also work on the media indirectly by
complaining to their own constituencies (stockholders, employees) about
the media, by generating institutional advertising that does the same,
and by funding right-wing monitoring or think-tank operations designed
to attack the media. They may also fund political campaigns and help put
into power conservative politicians who will more directly serve the
interests of private power in curbing any deviationism in the media.

Along with its other political investments of the 1970s and 1980s, the
corporate community sponsored the growth of institutions such as the
American Legal Foundation, the Capital Legal Foundation, the Media
Institute, the Center for Media and Public Affairs, and Accuracy in
Media (AIM). These may be regarded as institutions organized for the
specific purpose of producing flak. Another and older flak-producing
machine with a broader design is Freedom House. The American Legal
Foundation, organized in 1980, has specialized in Fairness Doctrine
complaints and libel suits to aid “media victims.” The Capital Legal
Foundation, incorporated in 1977, was the Scaife vehicle for
Westmoreland’s $120-million libel suit against CBS.¹⁰⁰

The Media Institute, organized in 1972 and funded by corporate-wealthy
patrons, sponsors monitoring projects, conferences, and studies of the
media. It has focused less heavily on media failings in foreign policy,
concentrating more on media portrayals of economic issues and the
business community, but its range of interests is broad. The main theme
of its sponsored studies and conferences has been the failure of the
media to portray business accurately and to give adequate weight to the
business point of view,¹⁰¹ but it underwrites works such as John Corry’s
exposé of the alleged left-wing bias of the mass media.¹⁰² The chairman
of the board of trustees of the institute in 1985 was Steven V. Seekins,
the top public-relations officer of the American Medical Association;
chairman of the National Advisory Council was Herbert Schmertz, of the
Mobil Oil Corporation.

The Center for Media and Public Affairs, run by Linda and Robert
Lichter, came into existence in the mid-1980s as a “non-profit,
nonpartisan” research institute, with warm accolades from Patrick
Buchanan, Faith Whittlesey, and Ronald Reagan himself, who recognized
the need for an objective and fair press. Their _Media Monitor_ and
research studies continue their earlier efforts to demonstrate the
liberal bias and anti-business propensities of the mass media.¹⁰³

AIM was formed in 1969, and it grew spectacularly in the 1970s. Its
annual income rose from $5,000 in 1971 to $1.5 million in the early
1980s, with funding mainly from large corporations and the wealthy heirs
and foundations of the corporate system. At least eight separate oil
companies were contributors to AIM in the early 1980s, but the wide
representation in sponsors from the corporate community is
impressive.¹⁰⁴ The function of AIM is to harass the media and put
pressure on them to follow the corporate agenda and a hard-line,
right-wing foreign policy. It presses the media to join more
enthusiastically in Red-scare band-wagons, and attacks them for alleged
deficiencies whenever they fail to toe the line on foreign policy. It
conditions the media to expect trouble (and cost increases) for
violating right-wing standards of bias.¹⁰⁵

Freedom House, which dates back to the early 1940s, has had interlocks
with AIM, the World Anticommunist League, Resistance International, and
U.S. government bodies such as Radio Free Europe and the CIA, and has
long served as a virtual propaganda arm of the government and
international right wing. It sent election monitors to the Rhodesian
elections staged by Ian Smith in 1979 and found them “fair,” whereas the
1980 elections won by Mugabe under British supervision it found dubious.
Its election monitors also found the Salvadoran elections of 1982
admirable.¹⁰⁶ It has expended substantial resources in criticizing the
media for insufficient sympathy with U.S. foreign-policy ventures and
excessively harsh criticism of U.S. client states. Its most notable
publication of this genre was Peter Braestrup’s _Big Story_, which
contended that the media’s negative portrayal of the Tet offensive
helped lose the war. The work is a travesty of scholarship, but more
interesting is its premise: that the mass media not only should support
any national venture abroad, but should do so with enthusiasm, such
enterprises being by definition noble (see the extensive review of the
Freedom House study in chapter 5 and appendix 3). In 1982, when the
Reagan administration was having trouble containing media reporting of
the systematic killing of civilians by the Salvadoran army, Freedom
House came through with a denunciation of the “imbalance” in media
reporting from El Salvador.¹⁰⁷

Although the flak machines steadily attack the mass media, the media
treat them well. They receive respectful attention, and their
propagandistic role and links to a larger corporate program are rarely
mentioned or analyzed. AIM head, Reed Irvine’s diatribes are frequently
published, and right-wing network flacks who regularly assail the
“liberal media,” such as Michael Ledeen,¹⁰⁸ are given Op-Ed column
space, sympathetic reviewers, and a regular place on talk shows as
experts. This reflects the power of the sponsors, including the
well-entrenched position of the right wing in the mass media
themselves.¹⁰⁹

The producers of flak add to one another’s strength and reinforce the
command of political authority in its news-management activities. The
government is a major producer of flak, regularly assailing,
threatening, and “correcting” the media, trying to contain any
deviations from the established line. News management itself is designed
to produce flak. In the Reagan years, Mr. Reagan was put on television
to exude charm to millions, many of whom berated the media when they
dared to criticize the “Great Communicator.”¹¹⁰


1.5. ANTICOMMUNISM AS A CONTROL MECHANISM

A final filter is the ideology of anticommunism. Communism as the
ultimate evil has always been the specter haunting property owners, as
it threatens the very root of their class position and superior status.
The Soviet, Chinese, and Cuban revolutions were traumas to Western
elites, and the ongoing conflicts and the well-publicized abuses of
Communist states have contributed to elevating opposition to communism
to a first principle of Western ideology and politics. This ideology
helps mobilize the populace against an enemy, and because the concept is
fuzzy it can be used against anybody advocating policies that threaten
property interests or support accommodation with Communist states and
radicalism. It therefore helps fragment the left and labor movements and
serves as a political-control mechanism. If the triumph of communism is
the worst imaginable result, the support of fascism abroad is justified
as a lesser evil. Opposition to social democrats who are too soft on
Communists and “play into their hands” is rationalized in similar terms.

Liberals at home, often accused of being pro-Communist or insufficiently
anti-Communist, are kept continuously on the defensive in a cultural
milieu in which anticommunism is the dominant religion. If they allow
communism, or something that can be labeled communism, to triumph in the
provinces while they are in office, the political costs are heavy. Most
of them have fully internalized the religion anyway, but they are all
under great pressure to demonstrate their anti-Communist credentials.
This causes them to behave very much like reactionaries. Their
occasional support of social democrats often breaks down where the
latter are insufficiently harsh on their own indigenous radicals or on
popular groups that are organizing among generally marginalized sectors.
In his brief tenure in the Dominican Republic, Juan Bosch attacked
corruption in the armed forces and government, began a land-reform
program, undertook a major project for mass education of the populace,
and maintained a remarkably open government and system of effective
civil liberties. These policies threatened powerful internal vested
interests, and the United States resented his independence and the
extension of civil liberties to Communists and radicals. This was
carrying democracy and pluralism too far. Kennedy was “extremely
disappointed” in Bosch’s rule, and the State Department “quickly soured
on the first democratically elected Dominican President in over thirty
years.” Bosch’s overthrow by the military after nine months in office
had at least the tacit support of the United States.¹¹¹ Two years later,
by contrast, the Johnson administration invaded the Dominican Republic
to make sure that Bosch did not resume power.

The Kennedy liberals were enthusiastic about the military coup and
displacement of a populist government in Brazil in 1964.¹¹² A major
spurt in the growth of neo-Fascist national-security states took place
under Kennedy and Johnson. In the cases of the U.S. subversion of
Guatemala, 1947–54, and the military attacks on Nicaragua, 1981–87,
allegations of Communist links and a Communist threat caused many
liberals to support counterrevolutionary intervention, while others
lapsed into silence, paralyzed by the fear of being tarred with charges
of infidelity to the national religion.

It should be noted that when anti-Communist fervor is aroused, the
demand for serious evidence in support of claims of “communist” abuses
is suspended, and charlatans can thrive as evidential sources.
Defectors, informers, and assorted other opportunists move to center
stage as “experts,” and they remain there even after exposure as highly
unreliable, if not downright liars.¹¹³ Pascal Delwit and Jean-Michel
Dewaele point out that in France, too, the ideologues of anticommunism
“can do and say anything.”¹¹⁴ Analyzing the new status of Annie Kriegel
and Pierre Daix, two former passionate Stalinists now possessed of a
large and uncritical audience in France,¹¹⁵ Delwit and Dewaele note:

If we analyse their writings, we find all the classic reactions of
people who have been disappointed in love. But no one dreams of
criticising them for their past, even though it has marked them forever.
They may well have been converted, but they have not changed.… no one
notices the constants, even though they are glaringly obvious. Their
best sellers prove, thanks to the support of the most indulgent and
slothful critics anyone could hope for, that the public can be fooled.
No one denounces or even notices the arrogance of both yesterday’s
eulogies and today’s diatribes; no one cares that there is never any
proof and that invective is used in place of analysis. Their inverted
hyper-Stalinism—which takes the usual form of total manicheanism—is
whitewashed simply because it is directed against Communism. The
hysteria has not changed, but it gets a better welcome in its present
guise.¹¹⁶

The anti-Communist control mechanism reaches through the system to
exercise a profound influence on the mass media. In normal times as well
as in periods of Red scares, issues tend to be framed in terms of a
dichotomized world of Communist and anti-Communist powers, with gains
and losses allocated to contesting sides, and rooting for “our side”
considered an entirely legitimate news practice. It is the mass media
that identify, create, and push into the limelight a Joe McCarthy,
Arkady Shevchenko, and Claire Sterling and Robert Leiken, or an Annie
Kriegel and Pierre Daix. The ideology and religion of anticommunism is a
potent filter.


1.6. DICHOTOMIZATION AND PROPAGANDA CAMPAIGNS

The five filters narrow the range of news that passes through the gates,
and even more sharply limit what can become “big news,” subject to
sustained news campaigns. By definition, news from primary establishment
sources meets one major filter requirement and is readily accommodated
by the mass media. Messages from and about dissidents and weak,
unorganized individuals and groups, domestic and foreign, are at an
initial disadvantage in sourcing costs and credibility, and they often
do not comport with the ideology or interests of the gatekeepers and
other powerful parties that influence the filtering process.¹¹⁷

Thus, for example, the torture of political prisoners and the attack on
trade unions in Turkey will be pressed on the media only by human-rights
activists and groups that have little political leverage. The U.S.
government supported the Turkish martial-law government from its
inception in 1980, and the U.S. business community has been warm toward
regimes that profess fervent anticommunism, encourage foreign
investment, repress unions, and loyally support U.S. foreign policy (a
set of virtues that are frequently closely linked). Media that chose to
feature Turkish violence against their own citizenry would have had to
go to extra expense to find and check out information sources; they
would elicit flak from government, business, and organized right-wing
flak machines, and they might be looked upon with disfavor by the
corporate community (including advertisers) for indulging in such a
quixotic interest and crusade. They would tend to stand alone in
focusing on victims that from the standpoint of dominant American
interests were _unworthy.¹¹⁸_

In marked contrast, protest over political prisoners and the violation
of the rights of trade unions in Poland was seen by the Reagan
administration and business elites in 1981 as a noble cause, and, not
coincidentally, as an opportunity to score political points. Many media
leaders and syndicated columnists felt the same way. Thus information
and strong opinions on human-rights violations in Poland could be
obtained from official sources in Washington, and reliance on Polish
dissidents would not elicit flak from the U.S. government or the flak
machines. These victims would be generally acknowledged by the managers
of the filters to be _worthy_. The mass media never explain _why_ Andrei
Sakharov is worthy and José Luis Massera, in Uruguay, is unworthy—the
attention and general dichotomization occur “naturally” as a result of
the working of the filters, but the result is the same as if a commissar
had instructed the media: “Concentrate on the victims of enemy powers
and forget about the victims of friends.”¹¹⁹

Reports of the abuses of worthy victims not only pass through the
filters; they may also become the basis of sustained propaganda
campaigns. If the government or corporate community and the media feel
that a story is useful as well as dramatic, they focus on it intensively
and use it to enlighten the public. This was true, for example, of the
shooting down by the Soviets of the Korean airliner KAL 007 in early
September 1983, which permitted an extended campaign of denigration of
an official enemy and greatly advanced Reagan administration arms plans.
As Bernard Gwertzman noted complacently in the _New York Times_ of
August 31, 1984, U.S. officials “assert that worldwide criticism of the
Soviet handling of the crisis has strengthened the United States in its
relations with Moscow.” In sharp contrast, the shooting down by Israel
of a Libyan civilian airliner in February 1973 led to no outcry in the
West, no denunciations for “cold-blooded murder,”¹²⁰ and no boycott.
This difference in treatment was explained by the _New York Times_
precisely on the grounds of utility: “No useful purpose is served by an
acrimonious debate over the assignment of blame for the downing of a
Libyan airliner in the Sinai peninsula last week.”¹²¹ There was a very
“useful purpose” served by focusing on the Soviet act, and a massive
propaganda campaign ensued.¹²²

Propaganda campaigns in general have been closely attuned to elite
interests. The Red scare of 1919–20 served well to abort the
union-organizing drive that followed World War I in the steel and other
industries. The Truman-McCarthy Red scare helped inaugurate the Cold War
and the permanent war economy, and it also served to weaken the
progressive coalition of the New Deal years. The chronic focus on the
plight of Soviet dissidents, on enemy killings in Cambodia, and on the
Bulgarian Connection helped weaken the Vietnam syndrome, justify a huge
arms buildup and a more aggressive foreign policy, and divert attention
from the upward redistribution of income that was the heart of Reagan’s
domestic economic program.¹²³ The recent propaganda-disinformation
attacks on Nicaragua have been needed to avert eyes from the savagery of
the war in El Salvador and to justify the escalating U.S. investment in
counterrevolution in Central America.

Conversely, propaganda campaigns will _not_ be mobilized where
victimization, even though massive, sustained, and dramatic, fails to
meet the test of utility to elite interests. Thus, while the focus on
Cambodia in the Pol Pot era (and thereafter) was exceedingly
serviceable, as Cambodia had fallen to the Communists and useful lessons
could be drawn by attention to their victims, the numerous victims of
the U.S. bombing _before_ the Communist takeover were scrupulously
ignored by the U.S. elite press. After Pol Pot’s ouster by the
Vietnamese, the United States quietly shifted support to this “worse
than Hitler” villain, with little notice in the press, which adjusted
once again to the national political agenda.¹²⁴ Attention to the
Indonesian massacres of 1965–66, or the victims of the Indonesian
invasion of East Timor from 1975 onward, would also be distinctly
unhelpful as bases of media campaigns, because Indonesia is a U.S. ally
and client that maintains an open door to Western investment, and
because, in the case of East Timor, the United States bears major
responsibility for the slaughter. The same is true of the victims of
state terror in Chile and Guatemala, U.S. clients whose basic
institutional structures, including the state terror system, were put in
place and maintained by, or with crucial assistance from, U.S. power,
and who remain U.S. client states. Propaganda campaigns on behalf of
these victims would conflict with government-business-military interests
and, in our model, would not be able to pass through the filtering
system.¹²⁵

Propaganda campaigns may be instituted either by the government or by
one or more of the top media firms. The campaigns to discredit the
government of Nicaragua, to support the Salvadoran elections as an
exercise in legitimizing democracy, and to use the Soviet shooting down
of the Korean airliner KAL 007 as a means of mobilizing public support
for the arms buildup, were instituted and propelled by the government.
The campaigns to publicize the crimes of Pol Pot and the alleged KGB
plot to assassinate the pope were initiated by the _Reader’s Digest_,
with strong follow-up support from NBC-TV, the _New York Times_, and
other major media companies.¹²⁶ Some propaganda campaigns are jointly
initiated by government and media; all of them require the collaboration
of the mass media. The secret of the unidirectionality of the politics
of media propaganda campaigns is the multiple filter system discussed
above: the mass media will allow any stories that are hurtful to large
interests to peter out quickly, if they surface at all.¹²⁷

For stories that are _useful_, the process will get under way with a
series of government leaks, press conferences, white papers, etc., or
with one or more of the mass media starting the ball rolling with such
articles as Barron and Paul’s “Murder of a Gentle Land” (Cambodia), or
Claire Sterling’s “The Plot to Kill the Pope,” both in the _Reader’s
Digest_. If the other major media like the story, they will follow it up
with their own versions, and the matter quickly becomes newsworthy by
familiarity. If the articles are written in an assured and convincing
style, are subject to no criticisms or alternative interpretations in
the mass media, and command support by authority figures, the propaganda
themes quickly become established as true even without real evidence.
This tends to close out dissenting views even more comprehensively, as
they would now conflict with an already established popular belief. This
in turn opens up further opportunities for still more inflated claims,
as these can be made without fear of serious repercussions. Similar wild
assertions made in contradiction of official views would elicit powerful
flak, so that such an inflation process would be controlled by the
government and the market. No such protections exist with
system-supportive claims; there, flak will tend to press the media to
greater hysteria in the face of enemy evil. The media not only suspend
critical judgment and investigative zeal, they compete to find ways of
putting the newly established truth in a supportive light. Themes and
facts—even careful and well-documented analyses—that are incompatible
with the now institutionalized theme are suppressed or ignored. If the
theme collapses of its own burden of fabrications, the mass media will
quietly fold their tents and move on to another topic.¹²⁸

Using a propaganda model, we would not only anticipate definitions of
worth based on utility, and dichotomous attention based on the same
criterion, we would also expect the news stories about worthy and
unworthy victims (or enemy and friendly states) to differ in _quality_.
That is, we would expect official sources of the United States and its
client regimes to be used heavily—and uncritically—in connection with
one’s own abuses and those of friendly governments, while refugees and
other dissident sources will be used in dealing with enemies.¹²⁹ We
would anticipate the uncritical acceptance of certain premises in
dealing with self and friends—such as that one’s own state and leaders
seek peace and democracy, oppose terrorism, and tell the truth—premises
which will not be applied in treating enemy states. We would expect
different criteria of evaluation to be employed, so that what is
villainy in enemy states will be presented as an incidental background
fact in the case of oneself and friends.¹³⁰ What is on the agenda in
treating one case will be off the agenda in discussing the other.¹³¹ We
would also expect great investigatory zeal in the search for enemy
villainy and the responsibility of high officials for abuses in enemy
states, but diminished enterprise in examining such matters in
connection with one’s own and friendly states.

The quality of coverage should also be displayed more directly and
crudely in placement, headlining, word usage, and other modes of
mobilizing interest and outrage. In the opinion columns, we would
anticipate sharp restraints on the range of opinion allowed expression.
Our hypothesis is that worthy victims will be featured prominently and
dramatically, that they will be humanized, and that their victimization
will receive the detail and context in story construction that will
generate reader interest and sympathetic emotion. In contrast, unworthy
victims will merit only slight detail, minimal humanization, and little
context that will excite and enrage.

Meanwhile, because of the power of establishment sources, the flak
machines, and anti-Communist ideology, we would anticipate outcries that
the worthy victims are being sorely neglected, that the unworthy are
treated with excessive and uncritical generosity,¹³² that the media’s
liberal, adversarial (if not subversive) hostility to government
explains our difficulties in mustering support for the latest national
venture in counterrevolutionary intervention.

In sum, a propaganda approach to media coverage suggests a systematic
and highly political dichotomization in news coverage based on
serviceability to important domestic power interests. This should be
observable in dichotomized choices of story and in the volume and
quality of coverage. In the chapters that follow we will see that such
dichotomization in the mass media is massive and systematic: not only
are choices for publicity and suppression comprehensible in terms of
system advantage, but the modes of handling favored and inconvenient
materials (placement, tone, context, fullness of treatment) differ in
ways that serve political ends.

* Dow Jones & Co.; Washington Post; New York Times; Time, Inc.; CBS;
Times-Mirror; Capital Cities; General Electric; Gannett; and
Knight-Ridder.



[]  _2_ WORTHY AND UNWORTHY VICTIMS



[]


A PROPAGANDA SYSTEM WILL CONSISTENTLY PORTRAY PEOPLE abused in enemy
states as _worthy_ victims, whereas those treated with equal or greater
severity by its own government or clients will be _unworthy_. The
evidence of worth may be read from the extent and character of attention
and indignation. We will show in this chapter that the U.S. mass media’s
practical definitions of worth are political in the extreme and fit well
the expectations of a propaganda model. While this differential
treatment occurs on a large scale, the media, intellectuals, and public
are able to remain unconscious of the fact and maintain a high moral and
self-righteous tone. This is evidence of an extremely effective
propaganda system.


2.1. JERZY POPIELUSZKO VERSUS A HUNDRED RELIGIOUS VICTIMS IN LATIN AMERICA

A useful comparison can be made between the mass media’s treatment of
Jerzy Popieluszko, a Polish priest murdered by the Polish police in
October 1984, and the media’s coverage of priests murdered within the
U.S. sphere of influence. In our model, Popieluszko, murdered in an
enemy state, will be a worthy victim, whereas priests murdered in our
client states in Latin America will be unworthy. The former may be
expected to elicit a propaganda outburst by the mass media; the latter
will not generate sustained coverage.

2.1.1. Quantitative aspects of coverage.

Table 2-1 shows, on row 1, the coverage of Popieluszko’s murder and the
trial of his murderers by the _New York Times, Time_ and _Newsweek_, and
CBS News. Rows 2 through 5 summarize the coverage in the same media
given to religious personnel murdered in Latin America by agents of U.S.
client states:¹ Row 2 shows the coverage given seventy-two individuals
in a list of Latin American religious “martyrs” named by Penny Lernoux
in her book _Cry of the People_; row 3 describes media coverage of
twenty-three priests, missionaries, and other religious workers murdered
in Guatemala between January 1980 and February 1985. Row 4 summarizes
the coverage of the murder of Archbishop Oscar Romero, of El Salvador,
shot by an assassin in March 1980. Row 5 shows the level of media
coverage of four U.S. women religious workers, murdered in El Salvador
in December 1980.

The coverage of the Popieluszko murder not only dwarfs that of the
unworthy victims, it constitutes a major episode of news management and
propaganda. Nothing comparable can be found for victims within the free
world.² It can be seen that the _New York Times_ featured the
Popieluszko case on its front page on ten different occasions, and the
intensity of coverage assured that its readers would know who
Popieluszko was, that he had been murdered, and that this sordid
violence had occurred in a Communist state. By contrast, the public
would not have seen mention of the names of Father Augusto Ramírez
Monasterio, father superior of the Franciscan order in Guatemala,
murdered in November 1983, or Father Miguel Ángel Montufar, a Guatemalan
priest who disappeared in the same month that Popieluszko was killed in
Poland, or literally dozens of other religious murder victims in the
Latin American provinces, who were sometimes given substantial coverage
in the local press of the countries in which the murders took place.

In fact, _none_ of the extremely prominent victims of murder in Latin
America, including Archbishop Romero and the four American churchwomen,
received anywhere near the attention accorded Popieluszko. We will show
below that the _quality_ of treatment of the worthy and unworthy victims
also differed sharply. While the coverage of the worthy victim was
generous with gory details and quoted expressions of outrage and demands
for justice, the coverage of the unworthy victims was low-keyed,
designed to keep the lid on emotions and evoking regretful and
philosophical generalities on the omnipresence of violence and the
inherent tragedy of human life. This qualitative difference is already
apparent in placement and editorializing: ten front-page articles on
Popieluszko is a statement about importance, as is the fact of three
editorials denouncing the Poles, without a single editorial denunciation
for the murderers of the unworthy victims.

By comparing rows 1 and 6 of table 2-1, we can see that for every media
category the coverage of the worthy victim, Popieluszko, exceeded that
of the entire set of one hundred unworthy victims taken together. We
suspect that the coverage of Popieluszko may have exceeded that of all
the many hundreds of religious victims murdered in Latin America since
World War II, as the most prominent are included in our hundred. From
the table we can also calculate the _relative_ worthiness of the world’s
victims, as measured by the weight given them by the U.S. mass media.
The worth of the victim Popieluszko is valued at somewhere between 137
and 179 times that of a victim in the U.S. client states;³ or, looking
at the matter in reverse, a priest murdered in Latin America is worth
less than a hundredth of a priest murdered in Poland.

The claim is sometimes made that unworthy victims are so treated by the
U.S. mass media because they are killed at a great distance, and are so
unlike ourselves that they are easy to disregard.⁴ Poland, however, is
farther away than Central America, and its cultural and business links
with the United States are not as great as those of Latin American
countries in general. Three of the religious victims among the
twenty-three murdered in Guatemala (row 3) were American citizens, a
consideration that failed to light a fire under the media. Even the four
American churchwomen raped and murdered by members of the Salvadoran
National Guard failed to elicit attention comparable with that accorded
Popieluszko. Their relative valuation by the _New York Times_ was less
than a tenth that of the Polish priest, and we will show later that the
coverage of these American victims displayed considerably less outrage
and passion than that of Popieluszko.⁵

The coverage of Popieluszko was somewhat inflated by the fact that his
murderers were quickly tried, and in a trial that American reporters
could freely report. Almost every murder of the Latin American victims
was carried out by official or paramilitary forces in crimes that were
never investigated or prosecuted under law, and were on occasion even
subject to active official cover-ups (as we describe below in connection
with Romero and the four churchwomen). Only in the case of the four
murdered American women, in El Salvador, was there sufficient pressure
to force some kind of investigation and legal process. As we will see,
this legal process was barely noted by the mass media (in contrast with
their intense interest in the Popieluszko trial), and the press did not
comment upon or explore the significance of the fact that there was a
relatively serious trial in “totalitarian” Poland, while state murders
were being carried out on a daily basis without any investigations or
trials of the murderers in a number of countries within the U.S. sphere
of influence called “fledgling democracies.”

[]

2.1.2. Coverage of the Popieluszko case

Jerzy Popieluszko was an activist priest and a strong supporter of the
Solidarity movement in Poland. In an effort to eliminate or intimidate
him, members of the Polish secret police abducted him on October 19,
1984. He was beaten, bound, and gagged, and eventually thrown into a
reservoir. His body was found several days later. In the furor that
ensued, the police directly involved in the killing were quickly
identified and were eventually tried and given stiff jail sentences. As
we have seen, the level of attention given to the case in the United
States was very great. The quality of coverage was also extremely well
designed to score political points, and contrasts sharply with the
quality of coverage of unworthy victims.

2.1.2(A). FULLNESS AND REITERATION OF THE DETAILS OF THE MURDER AND THE
DAMAGE INFLICTED ON THE VICTIM. The coverage of the Popieluszko murder
was notable for the fullness of the details regarding his treatment by
the police and the condition of the recovered body. What is more, these
details were repeated at every opportunity. The condition of the body
was described at its recovery, at the trial when the medical evidence
was presented, and during the testimony of the perpetrators of the
crime.⁶ At the trial, the emotional strain and guilt manifested by the
police officers were described time and again, interspersed with the
description of how Popieluszko pleaded for his life, and evidence of the
brutality of the act. Numerous unflattering photos of the policemen on
trial were presented, adding dramatic detail in support of the image of
police viciousness. In the courtroom, the guilty police sit, one with “a
nervous tic on the right side of his face [that] caused his dark
mustache to twitch uncontrollably,” with “tear-filled testimony [that]
gave the trial some of its most dramatic moments” (_Time_, Feb. 18,
1985). The police weep openly or bow their heads in the face of the
grisly evidence. Popieluszko himself was humanized, with descriptions of
his physical characteristics and personality that made him into
something more than a distant victim.⁷ In sum, the act of violence and
its effects on Popieluszko were presented in such a way as to generate
the maximum emotional impact on readers. The act was vicious and
deserved the presentation it received. The acts against the unworthy
victims were also vicious, but they were treated very differently.

2.1.2(B) STRESS ON INDIGNATION, SHOCK, AND DEMANDS FOR JUSTICE. In a
large proportion of the articles on the Popieluszko murder there are
quotations or assertions of outrage, indignation, profound shock, and
mourning, and demands that justice be done. Steady and wholly
sympathetic attention is given to demonstrators, mourners, weeping
people, work stoppages, masses held in honor of the victim, and
expressions of outrage, mainly by nonofficial sources. The population
“continues to mourn,” “public outrage mounted,” the pope is deeply
shaken, and even Jaruzelski condemns the action. The net effect of this
day-in-day-out repetition of outrage and indignation was to call very
forcible attention to a terrible injustice, to put the Polish government
on the defensive, and, probably, to contribute to remedial action.

2.1.2(C). THE SEARCH FOR RESPONSIBILITY AT THE TOP. In article after
article, the U.S. media raised the question: how high up was the act
known and approved? By our count, eighteen articles in the _New York
Times_ stressed the question of higher responsibility, often with
aggressive headlines addressed to that point.⁸ A number of articles
bring in a Soviet link (“Lawyer Seemingly [_sic_] Implies a Soviet Link
in Slaying of Priest” [Jan. 31, 1985]), and Michael Kaufman, of the
_Times_, twice manages to drag in the plot to kill the pope, which the
U.S. press, led by the _New York Times_, had been trying to tie in with
the Soviets and Bulgarians.⁹ These links to the Soviet Union and the
Bulgarian Connection are established by finding someone who says what
the reporter and his paper want to dredge up—in no case was there a
trace of supportive evidence.

_Time, Newsweek_ and CBS News played the same game of aggressively
raising questions about “Hints of a Contract from the Top” (_Time_) and
“Keeping the Lid on Murder” (_Newsweek_), and _Time_ raised questions
about possible Soviet involvement as well as the Bulgarian Connection.

2.1.2(D). CONCLUSIONS AND FOLLOW-UP. The _New York Times_ had three
editorials on the Popieluszko case. In each it focused on the
responsibility of the higher authorities and the fact that “A police
state is especially responsible for the actions of its police”
(“Murderous Poland,” Oct. 30, 1984). It freely applied words like
“thuggery,” “shameless,” and “crude” to the Polish state. The fact that
police officers were quickly identified, tried, and convicted it
attributed to the agitation at home and abroad that put a limit on
villainy. This is a good point, and one that we stress throughout this
book: villainy may be constrained by intense publicity. But we also
stress the corresponding importance of a _refusal_ to publicize and the
leeway this gives murderous clients under the protection of the United
States and its media, where the impact of publicity would be far
greater.¹⁰ The _Times_ also fails to note the contrast between murderous
Poland and murderous El Salvador—in the latter country, no murders of
Salvadorans by the security forces or the death squads connected to them
have ever resulted in a trial. The absence of such a comparison, as well
as the failure of the _Times_ to produce an editorial entitled
“Murderous El Salvador,” illustrates how a serviceable terrorism is
protected in a propaganda mode.¹¹


2.2. RUTILIO GRANDE AND THE UNWORTHY SEVENTY-TWO

As shown on table 2-1, the unworthy seventy-two on Penny Lernoux’s list
of martyrs were subject to a grand total of eight articles in the _New
York Times_, one in _Newsweek_, and none in _Time_, and they were never
mentioned on CBS News in the years of index coverage (1975–78). A total
of seven names on the Lernoux list were mentioned in the eight _Times_
articles, and two different ones were discussed in _Newsweek_, which
means that sixty-three of the murders were blacked out entirely in these
important media vehicles. None of the eight articles in the _New York
Times_ had any details or dramatic quality that might evoke sympathetic
emotion. They described the murders as remote events in a distant world
(see the _Times’_s description of the murder of Michael Jerome Cypher,
in table 2-2). But that is a matter of editorial choice. The drama is
there for the asking—only the press concern is missing.¹²

TABLE 2-2

THE SAVAGERIES INFLICTED ON WORTHY AND
UNWORTHY VICTIMS, AS DEPICTED
IN THE _NEW YORK TIMES_

[]

_WORTHY VICTIMS_

_JERZY POPIELUSZKO_, A POLISH PRIEST, MURDERED ON OCTOBER 19, 1984.

(1) Account at finding of body: “The sources who saw the priest’s body
on Tuesday, said it was badly bruised, indicating he had been beaten
after he was kidnapped on a highway near the town of Torun. The autopsy
also showed that Father Popieluszko had been gagged at the mouth and
apparently tied with a rope from neck to feet so that if he struggled he
would strangle himself, they said. The sources said they could not
confirm reports quoting members of the slain priest’s family as saying
he had suffered injuries to his jaw and skull” (Dec. 29, 1984).

(2) Account at trial of murderers: “The film showed clearly that the
priest’s bent legs were tied to a noose around his neck in such a way
that if he straightened them he would be strangled. The rope binding his
hands had evidently come loose in the water. Several gags had also
worked free and lay covering his clerical collar and the front of his
cassock. From his legs hung a sack of rocks that, according to earlier
testimony, had been carried all over Poland for the week that the three
assailants were pursuing the priest. When the cameras were trained on
the priest’s face, the narration by a police officer at the reservoir
declared that ‘there are clear signs of beating.’ This was confirmed by
medical evidence offered Thursday by Dr. Maria Byrdy, a pathologist, who
said Father Popieluszko had been struck more than a dozen times with a
club” (Jan. 26, 1985).

_UNWORTHY VICTIMS_

_MICHAEL JEROME CYPHER_, AN AMERICAN PRIEST MURDERED IN HONDURAS.

“The bodies were found in a dynamited well on an eastern Honduran
estate …” (July 19, 1975). Note: There was no arrest or trial.

_JAIME ALCINA_, A SPANISH PRIEST OF THE CATHOLIC ACTION WORKERS
MOVEMENT, FOLLOWING HIS ARREST IN CHILE:

“Several days later a body with 10 bullet holes in the back was found in
the Mapocho River. A Spanish consul identified the body as that of
Father Alcina” (Oct. 1, 1973). Note: There was no arrest or trial.

[]

_ARCHBISHOP OSCAR ARNOLFO ROMERO_, MURDERED IN EL SALVADOR ON MARCH 24,
1980:

“Archbishop Romero was killed by a sniper who got out of a red car,
apparently stood just inside the door of the Chapel of the Divine
Providence Hospital, fired a single shot at the prelate and fled. The
bullet struck the archbishop in the heart, according to a doctor at the
hospital where the prelate was taken” (Mar. 25, 1980). _Note:_ There was
no arrest or trial.

_MARÍA ROSARIO GODOY DE CUEVAS_, SECRETARY OF THE MUTUAL SUPPORT GROUP,
MURDERED IN GUATEMALA ON APRIL 4, 1985:

“The body of the secretary of the Support Group for Families of the
Detained and Disappeared in Guatemala was found Friday in a ravine nine
miles south of Guatemala City, according to a spokesman for the group.
The bodies of her brother and young son were also in the car” (Apr. 7,
1985, p. 5).^(*) _Note:_ There was no arrest or trial.

_JEAN DONOVAN, ITA FORD, DOROTHY KAZEL, AND MAURA CLARKE_, FOUR AMERICAN
WOMEN MURDERED IN EL SALVADOR, DECEMBER 4, 1980:

(1) Account at the finding of the bodies:

“Witnesses who found the grave said it was about five feet deep. One
woman had been shot in the face, another in the breast. Two of the women
were found with their blood-stained underpants around their ankles”
(Dec. 5, 1980).^(*)

(2) Account at the trial of the murderers:

No description was given, although medical testimony was presented to
the court; see text.

* For details that were not presented in this account, see the
accompanying text.

The murder of one of the seventy-two, Father Rutilio Grande, was an
important landmark in the escalation of violence in El Salvador and in
its effect on the newly appointed conservative archbishop of San
Salvador, Oscar Romero. Rutilio Grande was a Jesuit, the pastor of
Aguilares, and a progressive who helped organize peasants in self-help
groups. He was strongly opposed by the local landlords, police, and
military commanders, but he was a national figure in the Salvadoran
church and was a friend of the archbishop. Rutilio Grande was shot to
death, along with a teenager and a seventy-two-year-old peasant, while
on his way to Mass on March 12, 1977. According to a church autopsy, the
bullets that riddled the priest were of the same caliber as the Manzer
guns used by the police. “By ‘coincidence,’ all telephone communications
in the area were cut off within an hour of the triple assassination.
Police patrols normally active in the region mysteriously
disappeared.”¹³ Archbishop Romero wrote to the president of El Salvador,
Arturo Armando Molina, urging a thorough investigation, which was
promised. A week later, the church having established that it was
probably police bullets that had killed the three victims, Romero wrote
a harsher letter to Molina, noting the absence of a promised official
report and pointing out that comments, “many of them unfavorable to your
government,” have been made. With continued inaction, Romero threatened
to refuse church participation in any official government event unless
the murders were investigated and the killers brought to justice.
Romero’s biographer writes:

Six weeks later, the lawyer chosen by Romero to follow the case reported
“an embarrassing and clear indifference toward the investigation on the
part of state organizations.” A suspect ordered arrested by a judge was
living unconcernedly in El Paisnal, and no one had ordered the bodies
exhumed and examined. The bullets are still in the graves.¹⁴

Rutilio Grande’s murder followed a series of forcible expulsions of
foreign clergy by the Molina government and several earlier murders of
church personnel. Romero and the clergy deliberated at great length on
their course of action in response to this escalation of the violence
against them. They tried to get out their messages of concern, but many
were not heard because of newspaper censorship. They finally decided to
take dramatic action: temporary school closings, and implementation of
the previously mentioned threat to refuse to support the government and
other power groups on official occasions.

This entire package of murder and church response was hardly lacking in
drama and newsworthiness. Yet murder, the confrontation of the desperate
church with a repressive state, and the dramatic acts carried out to try
to mobilize support in its self-defense were subject to a virtual
blackout in the U.S. mass media. The murder of Rutilio Grande was
mentioned in _Newsweek_ (“Priests in Peril,” Aug. 1, 1977), but it never
once reached the audiences of the _New York Times, Time_, or CBS News.
This was important in allowing the terror to go on unimpeded. To
paraphrase the _New York Times_ editorial on “murderous Poland”: no
publicity and agitation, no containment of terror.


2.3. ARCHBISHOP OSCAR ROMERO

The murder of Archbishop Oscar Romero, the highest Catholic church
official in El Salvador, was “big news,” and its political implications
were enormous. At the time of his murder, Romero had become the foremost
and most outspoken critic of the policy of repression by murder being
carried out by the U.S.-supported military government. In his last
sermon, he appealed to members of the army and security forces to refuse
to kill their Salvadoran brethren, a call that enraged the officer corps
trying to build a lower-class military that was willing to kill freely.
Romero had been placed on right-wing death lists and received threats
from the right wing, which from the beginning had been closely linked to
the army and intelligence services.¹⁵ Only a few weeks prior to his
murder he had written a forceful letter to President Jimmy Carter
opposing the imminent granting of U.S. aid to the junta as destructive
of Salvadoran interests. The Carter administration had been so disturbed
by Romero’s opposition to its policies that it had secretly lobbied the
pope to curb the archbishop.¹⁶

Romero, in short, was not merely an “unworthy” victim, he was an
important activist in opposition to the local alliance of army and
oligarchy and to U.S. policy in El Salvador. The U.S. media’s news
coverage of the archbishop’s murder and its follow-up reflected well his
threatening role, reaching new levels of dishonesty and propaganda
service in their coverage of this and related events.

2.3.1. Details of the murder and public response

The details of the Romero murder provided by the U.S. mass media were
concise (see table 2-2). While there were expressions of shock and
distress, there were very few quotations and expressions of outrage by
supporters of Romero. There were no statements or quotations suggesting
that the murder was intolerable and that the guilty must be found and
brought to justice. The _New York Times_ had no editorial condemning, or
even mentioning, the murder. It was quickly placed in the larger
framework of alleged killings by both the left and the right that were
deeply regretted by Salvadoran and U.S. officials.

2.3.2. The propaganda line: a reformist junta trying to contain the violence of right and left

The Salvadoran and U.S. governments contended at the time of Romero’s
murder that the killing going on in El Salvador was being done by
extremists of the right and the left, not by the Salvadoran armed forces
and their agents; and that the government was trying its best to contain
the killings and carry out reforms. John Bushnell, of the State
Department, stated before a House appropriations committee that “there
is some misperception by those who follow the press that the government
is itself repressive in El Salvador,” when in fact the violence is “from
the extreme right and the extreme left” and “the smallest part” of the
killings come from the army and security forces.¹⁷ This statement was a
knowing lie,¹⁸ contradicted by all independent evidence coming out of El
Salvador and refuted by Archbishop Romero on an almost daily basis.¹⁹ In
his letter to Carter sent on February 17, 1980, the archbishop pointed
out that aid to the junta had resulted in increasing repressive violence
by the government, “amassing a total dead and wounded far higher than in
the previous military regimes.” And Romero explained to Carter that the
idea that the junta was reformist was a myth, that “neither the junta
nor the Christian Democrats govern the country,” but, rather, power is
in the hands of the army, serving itself and the oligarchy.²⁰

What gave Bushnell’s statement a certain credibility was the fact that
there had been a “reformist coup” by young army officers in October
1979, and liberals and progressives entered the early junta. However, as
Raymond Bonner points out,

The young, progressive officers who carefully plotted the coup lost
control of it as swiftly as they had executed it. Their ideals and
objectives were subverted by senior, more conservative officers who had
the backing of [U.S. Ambassador] Devine and the U.S. Embassy in El
Salvador and key Carter administration officials in Washington.²¹

The progressive elements on the junta found themselves entirely without
power, and gradually exited or were forced out, along with large numbers
from the cabinet and administration. José Napoleón Duarte joined the
junta in March to serve as a fig leaf and public-relations agent of the
army, but all those who were not satisfied to serve in that role
departed.²²

Once the old-guard military had seized control from the progressive
officers in October 1979, it began a general war of extermination
against all progressive individuals and organizations in El Salvador. By
the end of May, church sources reported 1,844 civilian deaths already in
1980, a figure that reached 10,000 by the end of the year, almost all at
the hands of the government. A guerrilla war was _forced_ on the center
and left by the policy of unconstrained violence of the Carter-supported
government. The government was not centrist and reformist—it was a
military regime of the right, closely linked to the terrorist force
ORDEN and the death squads, and it used them regularly as proxies. The
paramilitary groups were not uncontrollable—they were doing what the
army wanted them to do. The paramilitary forces and death squads of El
Salvador had extensive interlocking relationships with the official
military and security forces and their U.S. counterparts. There was a
revolving door of personnel, close cooperation in sharing information,
funding of the paramilitary groups by the official forces, and a
division of labor between them. The paramilitary did jobs for which the
official forces wished to disclaim responsibility.²³

Although the paramilitary group ORDEN was formally abolished at the time
of the October 1979 coup, it was secretly maintained and had a close
relationship with the regular military establishment. According to one
detailed account,

The reformers had officially abolished ORDEN, the old information
network. But … military officers suspicious of the young reformers
secretly reestablished and expanded much of the old intelligence system
into a grass-roots intelligence network that fed names of suspected
subversives to military and paramilitary death squads. Four days after
the coup, D’Aubuisson said in an interview, he was assigned by members
of the high command to help reorganize ANSESAL [an intelligence
communication network] inside a military compound under the chief of
staffs office—out of the reach of civilians in the new junta.²⁴

This secret assignment of D’Aubuisson was confirmed by junta member
Colonel Jaime Abdul Gutiérrez, and then Deputy Defense Minister Colonel
Nicholas Carranza.²⁵

The U.S. mass media, however, followed the Bushnell formula virtually
without deviation: there was a “civil war between extreme right and
leftist groups” (_New York Times_, Feb. 25, 1980); the “seemingly well
meaning but weak junta” was engaging in reforms but was unable to check
the terror (_Time_, Apr. 7, 1980). The U.S. mass media had featured
heavily the reformist character of the revolutionary junta, but they
uniformly suppressed evidence of the powerlessness, frustrations, and
early resignation of the progressives, and their replacement by
civilians willing to serve as “front men” for state terror. Román
Mayorga, an engineer and university professor who had been the unanimous
choice of the original coup plotters, resigned on January 3, 1980, along
with Guillermo Manuel Ungo “and at least 37 of the highest ranking
government officials, including the heads of all government agencies.”²⁶
But for the media, these events never happened, and the junta was still
a “weak centrist government … beset by implacable extremes” (_New York
Times_ editorial, Apr. 28, 1980), not a right-wing government of
massacre. Robin K. Andersen points out that

None of the networks reported … the final resignation of the junta
members. Even CBS, which had reported at length on the appointment of
Román Mayorga, failed to report his resignation, or any of the others.
For television news viewers, these political developments never
happened. Television news coverage omitted every reference to this
all-important political power struggle that could have accounted for the
abuses that continued.… The civilian lack of control, and even their
resignation, had no effect on the way in which the news characterized
the junta; it continued to be labeled moderate.²⁷

And the Salvadoran government has continued to be “moderate” and
“centrist” up to today.

Other media suppressions aided in bolstering the myth of the neutral
junta standing between the extreme right and the extreme left. On March
29, 1980, the _New York Times_ carried a Reuters dispatch noting the
resignation of three high Salvadoran officials, who, according to the
article, “resigned last night in protest against the junta’s inability
to halt violence by leftist and rightist forces.”²⁸ The preceding day,
an AP dispatch recorded the same resignations, but without any
explanation of the reasons for this. One of the resigning officials,
Undersecretary of Agriculture Jorge Alberto Villacorta, issued a public
statement saying that

I resigned because I believed that it was useless to continue in a
government not only incapable of putting an end to the violence, but a
government which itself is generating the political violence through
repression.… Recently, in one of the large estates taken over by the
agrarian reform, uniformed members of the security forces accompanied by
a masked person pointed out the directors of the self-management group
and then these individuals were shot in front of their co-workers.²⁹

It can be seen from the statement that the reference in the Reuter’s
dispatch to protest “against the junta’s inability to halt violence by
leftist and rightist forces” is a gross misrepresentation, and it is
evident that an honest transmission of Villacorta’s statement would have
contradicted the propaganda line.

At Archbishop Romero’s funeral, on March 30, 1980, where many thousands
gathered to pay tribute, bomb explosions and gunfire killed some forty
people and injured hundreds more. The version of the event provided by
U.S. Ambassador Robert White and the Salvadoran government was that
“armed terrorists of the ultra left sowed panic among the masses and did
all they could to provoke the security forces into returning fire. But
the discipline of the armed forces held.”³⁰ Joseph Treaster’s account in
the _New York Times_ quotes Duarte that the violence was from the left.
It also quotes a junta statement that the army was strictly confined to
its barracks, and Treaster says, “There was no sign of uniformed
government forces in the plaza before or during the shooting.” No other
version of the facts is mentioned. However, a mimeographed statement on
March 30, signed by twenty-two church leaders present at the funeral,
claimed that the panic had been started by a bomb thrown from the
national palace, followed by machine-gun and other shots coming from its
second floor.³¹ This account was suppressed by Treaster and was never
mentioned in the _New York Times_.

In a follow-up article of April 7, 1980, Treaster repeats that on March
30 the junta ordered all military forces into their barracks, and that
they obeyed “even though they knew leftists with weapons were pouring
into the central plaza.” Treaster asserts this government claim as fact,
and he continues to suppress sources and evidence that contradict this
government allegation. He also fails to explain why the leftists would
indiscriminately shoot their own people paying homage to the
archbishop.³²

The title of Treaster’s article of April 7, 1980, is “Slaying in
Salvador Backfires on Rebels.” The article reads as follows:

The murder of Archbishop Oscar Arnulfo Romero two weeks ago and the
killing of 30 at his funeral may have benefited, rather than hurt, the
ruling civilian-military junta, in the view of many diplomats,
businessmen and Government officials.

The extreme right is being blamed for the killing of the Archbishop and
the extreme left is being blamed for the shooting and bombing that
turned the crowded central plaza into chaos as Archbishop Romero was
being eulogized.

“It’s not so much that the junta gained,” said Robert E. White, the
United States Ambassador to El Salvador, “but that its opponents on the
extreme right and left have lost prestige. The net result is a boost in
prestige for the junta.”

We may note how the title of the article transforms the murder of the
leader of the dissident forces (and then of his followers at the
funeral) from a moral issue deserving outrage into a question of
political advantage, and turns that against the rebels. It would be hard
to imagine the _New York Times_ publishing an article on Popieluszko
headed “Slaying in Poland Backfires on Solidarity Movement,” featuring
perhaps the playing up by the official press of demonstrator
aggressiveness or violence. Note also how the question of identifying
the killer of Romero, and the government’s obligation to seek justice,
has been pushed into the background. Finally, there is the statement
that “the extreme left is being blamed” for the deaths in the plaza. Use
of the passive voice allows Treaster to avoid specification of just who
is blaming the extreme left. He mentions as his sources for the article
as a whole “many diplomats, businessmen and Government officials”—he
doesn’t even pretend to have talked to ordinary Salvadorans or church
representatives—but his only citation near the statement that “the
extreme left is being blamed” is the then-U.S. ambassador, Robert White.
By relying only on government handouts and carefully avoiding readily
available conflicting evidence and alternative views, the _Times_ once
again found the means of applying the usual formula of a deadly right
offsetting a deadly left, with the junta favored by the U.S. government
once more placed in the middle—with enhanced prestige!

2.3.3. Misrepresentation of Romero’s views

As we noted earlier, Romero was unequivocal in laying the blame for the
violence in El Salvador on the army and security forces, and he viewed
the left and popular groupings as victims provoked into self-defense by
violence and injustice. The peoples’ organizations, he told Carter, are
“fighting to defend their most fundamental human rights” against a
military establishment that “knows only how to repress the people and
defend the interests of the Salvadorean oligarchy.” And in his diary,
Romero completely repudiated the idea that the army was reacting to
somebody else’s violence—the security forces are instruments “of a
general program of annihilation of those on the left, who by themselves
would not commit violence or further it were it not for social injustice
that they want to do away with.”³³ Thus Joseph Treaster’s statement on
the front page of the _New York Times_ that Romero “had criticized both
the extreme right and the extreme left for widespread killing and
torture in El Salvador” (Mar. 31, 1980) is straightforward lying: Romero
never accused the left of torture or widespread killing, he never
equated the right and the left, and he was quite clear that the
government (an agent of the right) was the primary killer. In this
respect, Romero’s perception, essentially the same as that _privately_
conveyed to the press by the U.S. government, was grossly falsified in
public by both the government and press.³⁴

Interestingly, a year later, in an article marking the anniversary of
the assassination of Archbishop Romero, Edward Schumacher, of the
_Times_, noted that under Romero’s successor, Archbishop Rivera y Damas,
“the church has moved to a more centrist position in the civil war
between the Government and the guerrillas.”³⁵ Of course, if the church
now takes a centrist position, as opposed to its position under Romero,
this constitutes an admission that the theme played by Treaster and the
_Times_ a year previously of an even-handed Romero was a lie (which it
was). Is it possible that the _Times_ always finds the church in the
middle and is lying one year later as well? The question must remain
open, as his successor has been much more circumspect than Romero. The
willingness of the right wing and the army to murder people like Romero
might have affected Archbishop Rivera y Damas’s ability to speak his
mind freely and forced public caution. The point does not arise for
Schumacher and the _Times.³⁶_

2.3.4. The loss of interest in responsibility at the top

With Popieluszko, the media tried hard to establish that there was
knowledge of and responsibility for the crime at higher levels of the
Polish government. Soviet interest and possible involvement were also
regularly invoked. With Romero, in contrast, no such questions were
raised or pressed.

The media did note that Romero opposed aid to the Salvadoran junta
(which Carter provided anyway), but they failed to convey the depth of
his hostility to U.S. policy and the importance of his oppositional role
(although it was far more threatening to U.S. policy than Popieluszko
was to the Soviet Union). The press never mentioned the special emissary
sent by Carter to the pope in an attempt to bring Romero into line, or
the fact that the head of the Jesuit order in Central America was called
to Rome, probably in response to this U.S. pressure.³⁷ The media also
suppressed Romero’s appeal to the military to refuse to kill, a fact
that would have made much clearer how strongly opposed he was to the
official policies, and how convenient his murder was to the rulers of El
Salvador.

Although Romero was far and away the most important establishment figure
aligned with the popular movements, the media pretended at first that
the affiliation of his killers was a complete mystery. The _Washington
Post_ supposed an equal likelihood of a left- or right-wing source, and
the _Miami Herald_ noted on March 27 that “Both stood to benefit from
any chaos his death might have created.” (No American paper suggested
that Popieluszko might have been murdered by Solidarity sympathizers to
discredit the Polish government.) This foolishness was the minority
position—the bulk of the press suggested that the killer was probably a
rightist, but of obscure connection. The reliable Duarte suggested that
the killing was too professional to be indigenous—it must have been a
contract job from the outside. This view was dutifully repeated by the
_New York Times, Time, Newsweek_, and CBS News.³⁸

If, as seemed very likely, the killer was a Salvadoran rightist, or
someone in their employ, what was his connection, if any, with the army
and security forces? We saw earlier that the linkages between the death
squads and the army were close: there was at least some degree of common
command, shared operations, and mutual protection. Could the killer have
been a member of the armed forces? Given the links of the army to the
paramilitary forces, wasn’t it likely that they knew who killed Romero?
The U.S. mass media did not _raise_, let alone press, these questions.
When D’Aubuisson’s link to the murder became public knowledge, the media
failed to make this a big issue, and his close relations to the official
forces were not examined and discussed. This is evidence of a propaganda
system at work.

Any possible _U.S_. connection to the crime was, of course, “far out,”
and could not be raised in the U.S. media. That we don’t do this sort of
thing is an ideological premise of the patriotic press, no matter what
the facts of recent history tell us.³⁹ But still, the question might
have been raised whether the environment that the United States was
helping to create in El Salvador, training and aiding a murderous army
whose violence had driven Romero to passionate opposition, made the
United States indirectly guilty of the murder? The press never discussed
this point either. The _Times_ quotes Secretary of State Cyrus Vance on
the murder: “Two weeks ago I wrote the Archbishop and said: ‘We share a
repugnance for the violence provoked by both extremes that is taking the
lives of innocent people. We deplore the efforts of those seeking to
silence the voices of reason and moderation with explosives,
intimidation and murder.’ ”⁴⁰ The paper points out that the letter from
Vance was in reply to Romero’s appeal to cease supplying arms. The
article failed to include the gist of Romero’s argument, and it did not
quote that part of Vance’s letter that rejected the archbishop’s appeal.
The report also did not take note of Vance’s serious misrepresentation
of the archbishop’s position when he says that “We _share_ a repugnance
[for] … both extremes”; Romero attributed the killings to the army and
the right, not “both extremes.” We may note also that while Romero was
victimized by the very forces that Vance supported, and Romero’s
forecasts seem to be vindicated by his own murder, there is no hint in
the account of any irony or criticism of Vance and his associates. Here
the press cannot plead lack of knowledge. As later conceded, the media
knew very well that the security forces were the source of the violence.

2.3.5. Murder unavenged—or triumphant

The assassins of Archbishop Romero were never “officially” discovered or
prosecuted, and he joined the ranks of the tens of thousands of other
Salvadorans murdered without justice being done. But in contrast with
Popieluszko, the U.S. mass media seemed quite uninterested in who
committed the act or in demanding just retribution.

Subsequently, a great deal of evidence became available showing that
Roberto D’Aubuisson was at the center of a conspiracy to murder Romero.
On the basis of numerous interviews with Arena party activists and U.S.
officials, and examination of State Department cables, investigative
reporters Craig Pyes and Laurie Becklund claimed in 1983 that
D’Aubuisson had planned the assassination with a group of active-duty
military officers, who drew straws for the honor of carrying out the
murder.⁴¹ Former ambassador Robert White, who had access to State
Department cables and other inside information during his tenure in
office, also stated before a congressional committee in February 1984
that “beyond any reasonable doubt” D’Aubuisson had “planned and ordered
the assassination” of Archbishop Romero, and White gave details on the
planning meeting and the subsequent execution of the trigger man to keep
him quiet.⁴² Further evidence of D’Aubuisson’s involvement in the murder
came to light with the confession of Roberto Santivánez, a former high
official in Salvadoran intelligence. According to Santivánez, the murder
of Romero was planned and carried out by D’Aubuisson with the aid of
former national guardsmen of Somoza, but “under the protection of
General García and Colonel Carranza.”⁴³ Pyes’s and Becklund’s informants
also indicated that D’Aubuisson was a subordinate and political ally of
Carranza, who was the number two man in the Salvadoran military until
his ouster under U.S. pressure in December 1980. Carranza then moved
over to head the Treasury Police. D’Aubuisson also worked with the
National Guard’s G-2 central intelligence office while the guard was
headed by General Eugenio Vides Casanova. Pyes and Becklund write that
“During the time Vides commanded the Guard, active-duty military
officers working with the G-2 were linked in State Department cables to
the March 1980 assassination of Archbishop Oscar Arnulfo Romero.…”⁴⁴
Note that Vides Casanova became minister of defense, the post he still
holds, under the Duarte government.

In short, there was substantial evidence concerning the identity of
Romero’s murderers, and there were significant links of the murders to
the highest officials of the Salvadoran military establishment. In fact,
a judicial investigation in El Salvador headed by Judge Atilio Ramírez
quickly pointed a finger at D’Aubuisson and General Medrano, a U.S.
protégé in El Salvador. But Ramirez soon fled the country after several
threats and an attempt on his life, and active pursuit of the case in El
Salvador ended. In exile, Judge Ramírez claimed that the
criminal-investigation group of the police didn’t arrive at the scene of
the crime till four days after it was committed, and that neither the
police nor the attorney general provided his court with any evidence. He
concluded that there was “undoubtedly” a “kind of conspiracy to cover up
the murder” from the very beginning.⁴⁵

Needless to say, Judge Ramírez’s testimony was not featured in the U.S.
media, nor was the accumulating evidence of D’Aubuisson’s involvement
given significant play. It was back-page material at best, treated
matter-of-factly and never put in a framework of indignation and outrage
by the use of emotive language or by asking allies of Romero to comment
on the evidence, and it never elicited strident demands for justice. To
this day one will find no mention of the fact that the effective rulers
of this “fledgling democracy” are military officers who were closely
associated with D’Aubuisson and his cabal and may well have been
implicated in the assassination.

After D’Aubuisson was caught in a raid on May 8, 1980, with documents
showing that he was planning a coup and with evidence of his involvement
in the murder of Romero, he was arrested and faced with the threat of
trial and imprisonment. An assembly of the entire officer corps of the
Salvadoran army—seven hundred strong—was quickly convened, and demanded
his release. He was turned loose shortly thereafter, with the
concurrence of the minister of defense.⁴⁶ The documents found in his
possession dropped out of sight. The security forces also raided the
legal-aid office of the archbishopric, removing all of their files
bearing on the assassination. At the previously mentioned meeting of the
Salvadoran officer corps, Colonel Adolfo Majano, the last of the
reformers in the “reformist” junta of 1979, was denounced, and he
quickly exited from the junta, to be replaced by yet another hard-liner.
The army had expressed its solidarity with the hard-line-death-squad
right, and the junta was adjusted to meet this new threat to the image
of a reformist junta, with Duarte advanced to president, serving as a
figurehead for the benefit of Congress and the media, to ensure that
arms would flow to the killers.

The U.S. mass media gave little notice to this important display and
consolidation of the power of the extreme right, and the semi-official
vindication of the murderers of Archbishop Romero. This was telling
evidence about the nature of power in El Salvador and the fictional
quality of the claim that the government was centrist or reformist.
Unbiased media would have featured and explained the meaning of this
information. But these facts contradicted the Carter-Reagan mythology,
so the media predictably remained silent about these events and
continued to perpetuate the myth. On November 29, 1980, following the
massacre of the leaders of the opposition in San Salvador, the _Times_
suggested that there is “a severe challenge to the credibility” of the
government, but there is no hint that the revolt of May 1980 had changed
their view of April 28 that this was a “weak centrist government.”

The media also adjusted nicely, then and later, to the rehabilitation of
the probable murderer of Romero and his reintegration into the official
power structure. As D’Aubuisson sought high office and eventually became
president of the Salvadoran legislature, the U.S. mass media did not
focus on his record as the probable organizer of the murder of
Archbishop Romero and as the acknowledged leader of the death squads and
a mass murderer. Even the open anti-Semitism of this Fascist was kept
under the rug.⁴⁷ We would submit that if an anti-Semite and professional
assassin, who was suspected of having organized the murder of
Popieluszko in Poland, ran for office and became head of the Polish
legislature, there might have been a raised eyebrow or two in the U.S.
media.

Throughout this period, media coverage adopted a central myth contrived
by the government, and confined its reporting and interpretation to its
basic premises: the “moderate government” that we support is plagued by
the terrorism of the extremists of the left and right, and is unable to
bring it under control. The U.S. government and the media understood
very well that the violence was overwhelmingly the responsibility of
both the U.S.-backed security forces, which were, and remain, the real
power in the country, and the paramilitary network they created to
terrorize the population. But this truth was inexpressible. To this day
the media maintain the central myth of earlier years, long after having
conceded quietly that it was a complete fabrication. Reporting on the
prospects for peace in El Salvador, Lindsey Gruson comments that “Today,
death squads of the right and left no longer terrorize the population
into submission and silence,” thanks to the success of President Duarte
and his U.S. supporters in moving the country toward democracy—exactly
as a propaganda model would predict.⁴⁸


2.4. COVERAGE OF THE SALVADORAN NATIONAL GUARDS’ MURDER OF THE FOUR U.S. CHURCHWOMEN AND ITS FOLLOW-UP

On December 2, 1980, four U.S. churchwomen working in El Salvador—Maura
Clarke, Jean Donovan, Ita Ford, and Dorothy Kazel—were seized, raped,
and murdered by members of the Salvadoran National Guard. This crime was
extremely inconvenient to the Carter administration, which was
supporting the Salvadoran junta as an alleged “reformist” government and
trying to convince the public and Congress that that government was
worthy of aid. While temporarily suspending military aid to El Salvador,
the Carter administration sought a quick and low-keyed resolution of the
case. It resumed aid at the drop of an announced rebel offensive,
and—contrary to its promises—before there was any investigatory response
by the Salvadoran government. A commission headed by William P. Rogers
was quickly sent to El Salvador to inquire into the facts and offer U.S.
aid in an investigation. The commission reported that it had “no
evidence suggesting that any senior Salvadoran authorities were
implicated in the murders themselves,” but there is no indication that
it ascertained this by any route beyond asking the authorities whether
they were involved. The commission acknowledged that justice was not
thriving in El Salvador,⁴⁹ but it proposed no independent investigation,
merely urging the Salvadoran junta to pursue the case vigorously. It
noted that the junta promised that the truth “would be pursued wherever
it led anywhere in the country at any level.”⁵⁰ Rogers was later to
concede that perhaps he was a bit optimistic in expecting the Salvadoran
junta to pursue the case seriously.⁵¹

With the arrival of the Reagan administration, the already badly
compromised concern to find the culprits diminished further, and the
dominance of the interest in protecting the client regime in El Salvador
became still more overwhelming. It was quickly clear that the whole
business could be forgotten—along with the thousands of Salvadorans
already killed—except for the demands of public relations. The
willingness to support any feasible cover-up was also quite evident.
Secretary of State Alexander Haig stated before the House Committee on
Foreign Affairs that the evidence “led one to believe” that the four
women were killed trying to run a roadblock—a shameless lie that was
soon acknowledged as such by the State Department.⁵² The Reagan
ambassador to the UN, Jeane Kirkpatrick, went Haig one better,
suggesting that the four women were political activists for the
“Frente”—as with Haig’s statement, an outright lie—hinting quite broadly
that they were fair game.⁵³

Although Kirkpatrick also asserted that the Salvadoran government
“unequivocally” was “not responsible” for the murders, evidence was soon
available that showed that members of the National Guard had killed the
four women. The administration then moved to the position that it was
clear that the local guardsmen had “acted alone.” This was asserted and
reiterated despite the absence of any supportive investigation, and
important leads suggesting the contrary were ignored. A propaganda model
would expect that this preferred government explanation would be honored
by the mass media, and that in contrast with the Popieluszko case, where
useful points could be scored by searching for villainy at the top, the
mass media would now be less eager to find that which their government
was anxious to avoid.

The difference between the murder of the four women and the thousands of
others uninvestigated and unresolved in El Salvador was that the
families of these victims were Americans and pressed the case,
eventually succeeding in getting Congress to focus on these particular
murders as a test case and political symbol. This forced these killings
onto the political agenda. A trial and convictions were ultimately
required as a condition for certification and aid to the military
government of El Salvador. Both the Reagan administration and the
Salvadoran military were thus obligated to “see justice done”—in this
one instance. It took three-and-a-half years for justice to triumph in
this one case, with a lid still kept on top-level involvement. It was a
challenge to the mass media to present these murders, and the delayed
and aborted outcome, in such a way as to keep indignation low and to
downplay the quality of a system that murdered the women and had to be
_forced_ to find a set of low-level personnel guilty of the crime (which
it took them years to do). The media met this challenge with flying
colors.

2.4.1. Details of the savagery

The finding of Popieluszko’s body was front-page news for the _New York
Times_—in fact, the initial _failure_ to find his body made the front
page—and in all the media publications analyzed here, the details of his
seizure, the disposition of his body, and the nature of his wounds were
recounted extensively and with barely concealed relish (see table 2-2).
These details were also repeated at every opportunity (and, most
notably, at the trial). The finding of the bodies of the four women, by
contrast, was a back-page item in the _Times_, and in all four of the
media institutions in our sample the accounts of the violence done to
the four murdered women were very succinct, omitted many details, and
were not repeated after the initial disclosures. No attempt was made to
reconstruct the scene with its agony and brutal violence, so that the
drama conveyed in the accounts of Popieluszko’s murder was entirely
missing. The murder of the four churchwomen was made remote and
impersonal.

The _Time_ account, for example, after giving the names of the victims,
says, “Two of the women had been raped before being shot in the back of
the head.” The _New York Times_ account, shown in table 2-2, is also
quite succinct. The Rogers Commission report pointed out that one of the
victims had been shot through the back of the head with a weapon “that
left exit wounds that destroyed her face.” The Rogers report also noted
that those present at the disinterment found “extensive” wounds and that
“the bodies were also bruised.” Raymond Bonner’s account, in _Weakness
and Deceit_, noted that

In the crude grave, stacked on top of each other were the bodies of four
women. The first hauled out of the hole was Jean Donovan, twenty-seven
years old, a lay missionary from Cleveland. Her face had been blown away
by a high calibre bullet that had been fired into the back of her head.
Her pants were unzipped; her underwear twisted around her ankles. When
area peasants found her, she was nude from the waist down. They had
tried to replace the garments before burial. Then came Dorothy Kazel, a
forty-year-old Ursuline nun also from Cleveland. At the bottom of the
pit were Maryknoll nuns Ita Ford, forty, and Maura Clarke, forty-nine,
both from New York. All the women had been executed at close range. The
peasants who found the women said that one had her underpants stuffed in
her mouth; another’s had been tied over her eyes. All had been raped.

We may note the failure of _Time_ and the _New York Times_ to mention
the bruises (which both of these publications mentioned and repeated, as
regards Popieluszko); the failure to mention the destruction of Jean
Donovan’s face; the suppression of the degrading and degraded use of the
nuns’ underwear;⁵⁴ the failure to give the account of the peasants who
found the bodies. These and other details given by Bonner and suppressed
by _Time_ and the _New York Times_ (and also _Newsweek_ and CBS News)
add emotional force and poignancy to the scene. Such details are
included for a Popieluszko, but not for four American women murdered by
a U.S. client state. The Rogers report also pointed out that the
forensic surgeons sent to the scene of the crime by the junta, at the
urging of Ambassador Robert White, refused to perform an autopsy on the
ground that no surgical masks were available. This touch, which would
have cast the junta and its agents in a bad light, was also omitted from
U.S. media accounts.

In the Popieluszko case, both the finding of the body _and the trial_
were occasions for an aggressive portrayal of the details of the act of
murder and the condition of the body. The mass-media reticence on such
matters at the time of the finding of the bodies of the four women was
exceeded by their restraint at the trial. Lydia Chavez, of the _New York
Times_, who attended the trial, notes that there were eight hours of
testimony and seven hours of argument that focused on the women’s work
in El Salvador “and on the details of their kidnappings and deaths,” but
her article gave no details whatsoever on the medical evidence.

2.4.2. Lack of indignation and insistent demands for justice

In the Popieluszko case, the press conveyed the impression of
intolerable outrage that demanded immediate rectification. In the case
of the murder of the four American women, while the media asserted and
quoted government officials that this was a brutal and terrible act, it
was not declared intolerable, and the media did not insist on (or quote
people who demanded) justice. The media relied heavily on “senior
officials” of the U.S. and Salvadoran governments, who expressed a more
resigned view of the situation and were prepared to allow the Salvadoran
system of justice to work things out. Correspondingly, the media also
moved into a philosophical vein—the women, as _Time_ points out, were
“victims of the mindless, increasing violence” of El Salvador (Dec. 15,
1980). With Popieluszko, it was live government officials who committed
the crime, not blind forces (that are hard to bring to book).

Even the funeral and memorial services for the women in the United
States were not allowed to serve as an occasion for outrage and a demand
for justice. For the most part, they were ignored and suppressed. The
_New York Times_ (Dec. 8, 1981) gave a tiny, back-page, UPI account of
the memorial service for Sister Dorothy Kazel, featuring the apolitical
statement by Bishop Anthony M. Pilla that “The life of a missionary has
never been easy or glamorous.”

We must consider, too, that as Ambassador Kirkpatrick indicated, the
victims may have been asking for it. As _Newsweek_ observed (Dec. 15,
1980), “The violence in El Salvador is likely to focus with increasing
ferocity on the Roman Catholic Church. Many priests and nuns advocate
reform, and some of them are militant leftists. Such sentiments mean
trouble, even for more moderate members of the clergy.” (Note here also
the impersonality of “the violence”—nowhere in the article is there a
suggestion that the U.S.-backed government initiated, and was doing the
bulk of, the murdering.) In the case of Popieluszko, by contrast, the
media never once suggested that he was a regrettable victim of
escalating conflict between the state and rebellious forces (or between
East and West). That situation was much simpler than the one in El
Salvador: Popieluszko was murdered by officials of the state, and this
was intolerable. The complexities and resort to philosophical inanities
about unallocable “violence” are reserved for deaths in the provinces.

2.4.3. The lack of zeal in the search for villainy at the top

As we saw earlier, in the Popieluszko case the mass media eagerly,
aggressively, and on a daily basis sought and pointed to evidence of
top-level involvement in the killing. In the case of the killings of the
four women, we can observe a completely different approach. Here the
media found it extremely difficult to locate Salvadoran government
involvement in the murders, even with evidence staring them in the face.
Their investigatory zeal was modest, and they were happy to follow the
leads of (“Trust me”) Duarte and U.S. officials as the case unfolded.
They played dumb. The Salvadoran army and security forces had been
killing _Salvadorans_, in the same way they had killed the four women,
for months. What is more, the churches with which the women were
connected had been recently threatened by the army. More direct evidence
was that local peasants had been forced to bury the bodies by the local
military. But the media did not use this information to help them find
the locus of the murders.

The initial line of the U.S. and Salvadoran governments was that there
was no proof of military involvement, although the military’s
concealment of the bodies was not proper. A statement issued by the
junta on December 8 claimed that the murderers were “terrorists of the
extreme right,”⁵⁵ and Duarte reiterated this view to the press, which
passed it along. In keeping with the government line, twenty days after
the murders, the _New York Times_ still spoke only of “unidentified
assailants,” although the leads to the National Guard were already
plentiful, and it repeated the Rogers report finding that the security
forces may have tried to “conceal the deaths” after the bodies had been
found.⁵⁶

Gradually, so much evidence seeped out to show that the women had been
murdered by members of the National Guard that the involvement of
government forces could no longer be evaded. A two-part process of
“damage limitation” ensued, expounded by Salvadoran and U.S. officials
and faithfully reflected in the media. One was a distinction between the
government and the National Guard. In the Popieluszko case, the reader
was never allowed to forget that the murdering police were part of the
Polish government. In the case of the four American women, it was barely
evident in the mass media that the killers had any connection with the
Salvadoran government. This was in keeping with the basic myth, also
consistently followed by the media, that the Salvadoran government was
reformist and centrist, trying to control killings by extremists of the
right and left.⁵⁷ This fabrication allowed a two-track system of massive
killing by the army and its affiliates and simultaneous claims of regret
by the reformers unable to control the extremists. This was reminiscent
of the heyday of mass murder in Argentina, when the _New York Times_
regularly portrayed the junta and people like the recently convicted
General Videla as moderates “unable to control the right-wing
extremists” who were killing people.⁵⁸

The most important goal of the immediate damage-containment process was
to stifle any serious investigation of the responsibility of the
officials of the Salvadoran government. The Salvadoran strategy was
foot-dragging from beginning to end, as the idea of convicting soldiers
for killing anybody was contrary to Salvadoran practice, and, moreover,
there is little doubt that the responsibility for the crime went high.
The U.S. official strategy, once it was clear that the National Guard
was responsible for the killing, was to get the low-level killers tried
and convicted—necessary to vindicate the system of justice in El
Salvador, at least to the extent of keeping the dollars flowing from
Congress—while protecting the “reformers” at the top. On September 30,
1981, Ambassador Deane Hinton stated with assurance that the local
national guardsmen “were acting on their own,” although internal State
Department documents of the time recognized that the Salvadoran
investigation had been a joke, and other evidence existed suggesting
top-level involvement.⁵⁹ Nonetheless, the official position was clear.
To go along with the official line, the mass media had to stop
investigating high-level involvement and even to suppress evidence
emerging from other sources. And so they proceeded to do this.

After a two-month investigation of the murders, the reporter John Dinges
filed a story through Pacific News Service that showed the murders to
have been preplanned in some detail.⁶⁰ First, there were intercepted
radio communications indicating military discussions of the arrival of
the women at the airport, and other evidence of close surveillance of
their flight plans, all suggesting a coordinated and extensive military
operation. Second, a former deputy minister of planning described to
Dinges a half-hour presentation by Salvadoran Defense Minister Guillermo
García in the national palace, denouncing the nuns and priests in the
very area of the murders and stating that something must be done, only
two weeks prior to the murders.

In a remarkable feat of self-censorship, most of the mass media
completely ignored the Dinges findings. Dinges’s report appeared in the
_Washington Post_, the _Los Angeles Times_, and some fifteen other
papers, but not a word of it found its way into the _New York Times,
Time, Newsweek_, or CBS News, and _its leads were not pursued_ by any
media. Instead, the media kept repeating the assurances of Duarte and
U.S. officials that they were satisfied that the killings did not go
beyond the local national guardsmen, and that the matter would be
pursued diligently through proper legal channels.

In March 1984, Colonel Roberto Santivánez, a high official in Salvadoran
intelligence, agreed to “talk” about the death-squad network in El
Salvador, and his claims found their way onto CBS News and the front
page of the _New York Times_.⁶¹ Santivánez gave highly credible details
about the murder of the four women, indicating that the act had been
committed on the specific order of Colonel Oscar Edgardo Casanova, who
was in charge of the zone in which the killings took place. Colonel
Casanova was transferred to another assignment two weeks after the
murder as part of the official cover-up. His first cousin Eugenio Vides
Casanova, the minister of defense chosen by Duarte and head of the
National Guard in December 1980, knew about the murder order by his
cousin, as did Duarte. Although this crushing evidence implicated a high
officer in the murder and the current minister of defense and Duarte in
the cover-up, there was no follow-up to this story, no connection back
to the Dinges story of high-level discussions of the need to do
something about the religious workers—no editorials, no indignation, and
no pressure for action.

In sum, the leads provided by Dinges, and the testimony of Santivánez,
strongly suggest that the killing of the women was based on a high-level
decision. The evidence is even clearer that middle-level officials of
the government ordered the killing, and that the highest-level officials
engaged in a continuing and systematic cover-up. In the Polish case, the
evidence of top-level involvement was never forthcoming, but the issue
was pursued by the U.S. mass media relentlessly. In the case of the four
churchwomen, where the evidence of top-level involvement was abundant,
the U.S. mass media failed to press the matter, or even to engage in the
pursuit of obvious investigative leads.

We cannot describe here the full details of the failure of the
Salvadoran process of justice, which never moved forward except under
U.S. pressure and threats.⁶² The mass media did at one point berate the
Salvadoran government for “stonewalling” the investigation,⁶³ but the
media entirely failed to capture the depth and scope of the stonewalling
process, or to remark on its significance in this “fledgling democracy,”
and they generally transmitted Salvadoran and U.S. government claims
about the state of the process without sarcasm or expressions of
outrage. If they _had_ given full details, the Salvadoran government
would have been thoroughly discredited. Thus, the extensive evidence
concerning official Salvadoran refusals to take action or to interrogate
relevant witnesses, and concerning threats to witnesses, lawyers, and
judges—which would have been aired with delight if applicable to a
Polish investigation—were ignored.

A few illustrations of the Salvadoran proceedings will have to suffice
here. Two years after the crime, for example,

 … the prosecutors expressed ignorance of the testimony [in the court
record] of former guardsman César Valle Espinoza, dated August 9, 1982,
which quotes Subsergeant Colindres Alemán as stating on December 2,
1980, that there were “superior orders” to apprehend the women. They
were also ignorant of the statement of former National Guard Sergeant
Dagoberto Martinez, taken by the FBI in Los Angeles, California, which
establishes the existence of a cover-up of the crime as early as
December 1980.⁶⁴

A second illustration of the process: two of three judges assigned to
the case resigned for fear of their lives. As we noted, Judge Ramirez,
who was investigating the Romero murder, fled for the same reason. This
line of evidence has cumulative weight, but it was never treated as a
whole by the press (and was barely mentioned as individual items of
back-page news). A third illustration: according to former ambassador
Robert White, two national guardsmen who might have been able to link
higher-ranking officers to the murders of the women were killed by
military death squads, then listed as missing in action.⁶⁵ A final
illustration: when the Salvadoran triggermen were finally assigned
attorneys, one of the three, Salvador Antonio Ibarra, was prepared to
defend the men seriously. His colleagues pressed Ibarra to abide by the
statement that “the possibility of a cover-up had been thoroughly
investigated” and rejected. He refused to go along with this request,
with the consequence that on October 30, 1983, Ibarra was seized by the
National Guard and tortured at its headquarters.⁶⁶ Released only under
U.S. pressure, Ibarra fled the country, leaving the way clear for a
lawyer team that would accept the notion that there had been a “thorough
investigation” of top-level involvement. This last incident alone made
it into the mass media in isolated and fleeting treatment; the others,
and the package, were not featured in the free press.

The U.S. government also engaged in a systematic cover-up—of both the
Salvadoran cover-up and the facts of the case. The U.S. mass media,
while briefly noting the Salvadoran stonewalling, failed to call
attention to the equally important lies and suppressions of their own
government. As we have pointed out, both the Carter and Reagan
administrations put protection of its client above the quest for justice
for four U.S. citizens murdered by agents of that government. The U.S.
government’s stonewalling to protect its client took many forms. One was
an active collaboration in the Salvadoran cover-up. Former National
Guard sergeant Dagoberto Martinez was allowed to emigrate to the United
States in December 1980, and although a subsequent interview by the FBI
indicated that Martinez admitted knowledge of the perpetrators of the
crime and a failure to report that information—in violation of
Salvadoran law—no action was taken against him. U.S. officials also
reiterated that there was no reason to believe that higher-level
officials knew about the crime or participated in it, when they had
clear knowledge of a cover-up and a refusal to investigate.⁶⁷ The State
Department also regularly lied about the thoroughness of the
investigation. Ambassador Hinton stated in public that national
guardsman Pérez Nieto “was thoroughly interrogated and repeatedly denied
that anyone superior to him had ordered him to watch the women.” A State
Department cable, however, describes Nieto’s testimony as “incomplete,
evasive, and uncooperative.”⁶⁸

A second form of official U.S. participation in the cover-up was a
refusal to make public information on the Salvadoran investigation and
evidence uncovered by the United States itself. The Rogers report was
released belatedly, in a version that edited out the original report’s
statement about the sad state of the Salvadoran system of justice. In
response to a growing chorus of criticism of the delays, Judge Harold R.
Tyler was appointed by the U.S. government to carry out a further
investigation. His report was kept under wraps for a long time, again
apparently because it had some serious criticism of the Salvadoran
judicial process that would have interfered with Reagan administration
plans to claim progress every time such certification was required.⁶⁹
The families of the victims and their attorneys regularly found the U.S.
government unwilling to release information on the case. The argument
given was that the information was sensitive, and that releasing it
would interfere with the legal process in El Salvador. As the Salvadoran
process was a sick joke, moving only in response to U.S. threats, the
official rationale was transparently fraudulent. Furthermore, Duarte was
regularly making statements that the arrested guardsmen were surely
guilty, and that nobody higher than them was involved, which blatantly
prejudged the case. The only plausible rationale for the U.S. cover-up
is that the administration wanted to minimize adverse publicity
concerning the performance of its murderous client. Information on what
was really going on, or its own internal analyses of the case or
appraisals of the Salvadoran legal process, would make the client look
bad. The administration hoped that the case would “go away,” but until
that happened, it wanted the publicity flow to be under its control.

Part of the reason the administration wanted control was to allow it to
claim reasonable progress in the pursuit of the case whenever the
military government was due for more money. As with other right-wing
satellites, “improvement” is always found at money-crunch time. In its
July 1982 certification report, the State Department found that
“substantial progress” had been made in the case and predicted a trial
in the fall of 1982. In early 1983, the certification report noted
“significant developments” in the case. This manipulation of evidence to
protect the flow of arms and money to the regime would not be easy with
full disclosure—or with a critical and honest press.

This cover-up of the Salvadoran judicial process, even though four
murdered American women were involved, did not arouse the press to
indignation or satire, nor did it cause them to provide more than
minimal coverage of the inquiry.

2.4.4. The trial—five national guardsmen for $19.4 million

The trial of the five immediate killers of the four women should have
been presented in a Kafkaesque framework, but the U.S. media played it
very straight. The trial took place three-and-a-half years after the
acts of murder, despite the fact that the triggermen were immediately
identified and despite enormous U.S. pressure. Two of three judges
assigned to the case had resigned out of fear for their lives, and the
only independent defense attorney had fled the country after a session
of torture at National Guard headquarters. The defense at the trial made
no effort to defend the men on the grounds of “orders from above,”
although this is a standard defense in such cases, and significant
evidence was available for use in this instance. The mass media failed
to note the point, although it suggests fear, a deal, or both, and
although, as we saw in the Popieluszko case, the media are sometimes
immensely alert to cover-ups. In March 1984, former intelligence officer
Santivánez stated that the guardsmen knew that “If they don’t name
Casanova, they will get out of jail as soon as it is feasible.”⁷⁰ This
testimony was not referred to in the trial context—the media played
dumb.

Like the Salvadoran elections of 1982 and 1984, this trial was
thoroughly American in staging and motivation. As Ana Carrigan put it:

Security in the courtroom was in the hands of a special Judicial
Protection Unit, formed and trained in Glencoe, Alabama; the jurors were
driven to the courtroom in the morning and returned to their homes after
the verdict in bullet-proof American embassy vehicles; meals and camp
beds were provided by the embassy so that if necessary the jurors and
the staff of the court could sleep overnight within the protection of
the guarded courthouse; and when the electricity failed, just as the
prosecution began to make its presentation, light was restored by means
of hurricane lamps delivered by embassy staff.⁷¹

The stakes were U.S. dollars. Congress had frozen $19.4 million pending
the favorable outcome of the case. Within twenty-four hours of the
decision, the State Department, announcing that justice had been done,
released the money to the charge of Minister of Defense Vides Casanova,
who had been head of the National Guard on December 4, 1980, when the
murders took place, whose first cousin, according to Colonel Santivánez,
had given the direct order to kill, and who had so effectively protected
his cousin and stalled the prosecution of underlings for three-
and-a-half years.

In conformity with the predictions of a propaganda model, the mass media
failed entirely to capture the quality of this scene—the American
omnipresence, the courtroom security, the failure of the defense to
press the responsibility of the higher authorities, the role of Vides
Casanova, the literal money transaction for justice _in this single
case_, which dragged on for three-and-a-half years. _Newsweek_ found the
result a “remarkable achievement,” in an article entitled “A Defeat for
a Death Squad” (June 4, 1984), despite the fact that it was the National
Guard that killed the women. The article does stress the difficulties in
bringing and winning the case, and the possibility of a cover-up of
higher-level personnel, but it does not use this information to point up
the nature of the system being supported by the United States. It also
closes out the discussion with reference to the Tyler report discounting
high-level involvement, without quoting the report’s acknowledgment of
“some evidence supporting the involvement of higher-ups” or mentioning
the report’s admission of the limits of its information. No reference is
made to Santivánez or the Dinges report: _Newsweek_ sticks to an
official source, and misreads it.


2.5. TWENTY-THREE RELIGIOUS VICTIMS IN GUATEMALA, 1980–85

The modern history of Guatemala was decisively shaped by the
U.S.-organized invasion and overthrow of the democratically elected
regime of Jacobo Arbenz in June 1954. Since that time, while Guatemala
has remained securely within the U.S. sphere of influence, badly needed
economic and social reforms were put off the agenda indefinitely,
political democracy was stifled, and state terror was institutionalized
and reached catastrophic levels in the late 1970s and early 1980s. Given
the client status of Guatemala and the fact that the antidemocratic
counterrevolution served important elite interests, a propaganda model
suggests that its victims will be “unworthy,” which should be reflected
in both the quantity and quality of media attention. Furthermore,
whereas victimization in Soviet client states like Poland and
Czechoslovakia is regularly traced back to the Soviet occupations, a
propaganda model would predict that the U.S. media will not explain the
contemporary Guatemalan environment of state terror as a natural product
of the U.S. intervention in 1954 (and thereafter). On the contrary, we
would expect the United States to be portrayed as a benevolent and
concerned bystander, trying its very best to curb abuses of right and
left extremists.

Before looking at the media’s handling of Guatemala, however, let us
step back for a brief review of the crucial period 1945–54 and its
sequel to set the stage for an examination of the media’s role in the
1980s. Arbenz and his predecessor, Juan Arévalo, led the first
democratic system in Guatemalan history. During the decade of their
rule, newspapers, social groups, unions, peasants, and political parties
could organize without fear of repression or murder.⁷² But this fragile
democracy rested on a base of concentrated land ownership and foreign
control of land and strategic facilities that was a constant threat to
its independence and political freedom, as well as a human disaster. The
struggle for unionization and land reform during the democratic decade
was motivated in part by a desire to build a mass constituency that
would provide an institutional base for democracy.⁷³ Each progressive
move by both Arévalo and Arbenz was greeted with fierce hostility by the
local oligarchy, the multinational corporate community, and the U.S.
government.⁷⁴ “Communism” was found to be in control, or a threat, from
the time trade unions were allowed to organize in 1947, and Arbenz’s
modest and effective land reform was the last straw.⁷⁵ With U.S.
initiative, organization, funding, and direct psychological warfare and
terror operations, a tiny mercenary army ousted Arbenz and installed an
“anti-Communist” regime.

From 1954 to the present day, neither reform nor democracy, let alone
radical change, has been possible in Guatemala. The main reason for this
is that the forces into whose hands the United States delivered that
country in 1954 “bitterly opposed any change that might affect, however
slightly, their entrenched position,”⁷⁶ and they had learned from the
1945–54 lesson that democracy moves inexorably toward reform and threats
to privilege in a system of extreme inequality. The very brief
interludes of tentative openness after 1954 witnessed the quick
emergence of protective organizations of urban workers and the
peasantry, strikes, and reformist and radical parties and organizations.
As Piero Gleijeses puts it, “in the last months of the Arana period
[1970–74], the repression had acquired a more selective character, and
on repeated occasions Laugerud [Arana’s successor, 1974–78] refrained
from ‘settling’ strikes by force.”⁷⁷ But the feebleness of the reforms
and the awakened hopes and pressures forced a further choice; and “given
the nature of the regime,” the wave of terror that followed “was the
only logical choice” for the Guatemalan ruling class.⁷⁸

Another reason for the failures of both reform and democracy has been
ongoing U.S. influence. The U.S. establishment found the pluralism and
democracy of the years 1945–54 intolerable, and it eventually ended that
experiment.⁷⁹ In the succeeding thirty-two years of U.S. guidance, not
only has Guatemala gradually become a terrorist state rarely matched in
the scale of systematic murder of civilians, but its terrorist
proclivities have increased markedly at strategic moments of escalated
U.S. intervention. The first point was the invasion and
counterrevolution of 1954, which reintroduced political murder and
large-scale repression to Guatemala following the decade of democracy.
The second followed the emergence of a small guerrilla movement in the
early 1960s, when the United States began serious counterinsurgency (CI)
training of the Guatemalan army. In 1966, a further small guerrilla
movement brought the Green Berets and a major CI war in which 10,000
people were killed in pursuit of three or four hundred guerrillas. It
was at this point that the “death squads” and “disappearances” made
their appearance in Guatemala. The United States brought in police
training in the 1970s, which was followed by the further
institutionalization of violence. The “solution” to social problems in
Guatemala, specifically attributable to the 1954 intervention and the
form of U.S. assistance since that time, has been permanent state
terror. With Guatemala, the United States invented the
“counterinsurgency state.”

The special role of the army in the counterinsurgency state gradually
elevated its status and power, and eventually gave it the institutional
capacity to rule Guatemala. As in many U.S. client states, the military
used its power to carve out economic opportunities and to steal,
directly or indirectly.⁸⁰ The terrorism, thievery, and autonomy of the
Guatemalan military reached a temporary peak—later surpassed by Ríos
Montt—during the reign of Lucas García (1978–82). This overlapped the
brief interlude of the Carter human-rights policy, during which there
was open criticism of the Guatemalan government and a brief and partial
cutoff of arms supply from the United States under congressional
pressure.⁸¹ Even during the Carter years, however, relations with
Guatemala were not hostile—it was as if a child in the family were
naughty and briefly put in the corner. Part of the reason for the
willingness of the Carter government to provide no new arms supplies was
that the bad boy was in no danger. In El Salvador in 1980, by contrast,
where the Carter administration saw the possibility of a left-wing
victory, support was quickly forthcoming to a right-wing terror regime.

During the Reagan years, the number of civilians murdered in Guatemala
ran into the tens of thousands, and disappearances and mutilated bodies
were a daily occurrence.⁸² Studies by Amnesty International (AI),
Americas Watch (AW), and other human-rights monitors have documented a
military machine run amok, with the indiscriminate killing of peasants
(including vast numbers of women and children), the forcible relocation
of hundreds of thousands of farmers and villagers into virtual
concentration camps, and the enlistment of many hundreds of thousands in
compulsory civil patrols.⁸³ Reagan, however, visiting Guatemala in
December 1982, commented that head of state Ríos Montt was “totally
committed to democracy” and was receiving a “bum rap” on human-rights
abuses. Two months earlier, AI released its report describing sixty
different Indian villages in which massacres of civilians took place in
a three-month period, with the total killed exceeding 2,500.⁸⁴

The Reagan policy toward Guatemala was, as with South Africa,
“constructive engagement.”⁸⁵ From the beginning, the administration
strove to embrace and provide arms to the military governments. Ongoing
mass murder was merely an inconvenience. One method by which the
administration sought to rehabilitate our relations with the Guatemala
regimes was by continual lying about their human-rights record (with
Reagan himself setting the standard). Stephen Bosworth, of the State
Department, assured a House committee in July 1981 that the Lucas García
government was successfully attacking the guerrillas “while taking care
to protect innocent bystanders.”⁸⁶ The State Department’s Country Report
on Human Rights for 1981 also found it impossible to determine who was
doing all the killing in Guatemala, and disappearances were attributed
to the “right” and the “left,” but not to the government. Amnesty
International, by contrast, in February 1981, gave detailed evidence
that the thousands of murders were almost entirely governmental in
origin, including those of the death squads, whose victims were targeted
in an annex of Guatemala’s national palace under the direct supervision
of President Lucas García.⁸⁷

With the overthrow of Lucas García, suddenly, as if by magic, the Reagan
administration line altered, and Stephen Bosworth “could not emphasize
strongly enough the favorable contrast between the current human rights
situation in Guatemala and the situation last December.…” Melvyn
Levitsky, deputy assistant secretary of state for human rights, told
another congressional committee that “the United States cannot easily
sustain a relationship with a government which engages in violence
against its own people,” as with the Lucas García regime.⁸⁸

When Lucas García was in power, Bosworth found it a caring regime that
protected the innocent, and the State Department couldn’t determine that
the government was doing any killing. With Lucas García ousted, the
State Department discovered that he was an indiscriminate murderer and
assumed a high moral tone about his behavior. That is, the State
Department implicitly conceded that it was lying earlier and counted on
the press not to point this out. Of course, the reason for the switch
was to help make a favorable case for Lucas García’s successor, Ríos
Montt. Under Ríos Montt there was “a dramatic decline” in human-rights
abuses, according to State Department spokesman John Hughes in January
1983. Ríos Montt is the one whom Reagan found to be getting a bum rap.
But as we noted, Amnesty International found Ríos Montt to be another
top-rank murderer, who appears to have exceeded his predecessor in
civilian massacres.

When Ríos Montt was ousted in his turn, once again the State Department
line shifted. It was admitted that things had been terrible under Ríos
Montt in 1982, but _now_ there was a dramatic improvement, and the
government was showing “increased sensitivity to human rights
questions.”⁸⁹ It is evident that we have here a consistent pattern that
may be formulated into a quasi-law: in the case of a terrorist state
with which the administration wants “constructive engagement,” things
are always OK and improving; but when that regime is ousted, its record
deteriorates ex post facto and looks most unfavorable compared with the
humanistic and sensitive one now in power! This droll pattern of
identical apologetics for each successor terrorist, and ex post
denigration of the one ousted, is an Orwellian process that the Western
press associates with totalitarian states, but it happens here. And it
can only occur if the mass media are cooperative. They must be willing
to downplay or ignore the large-scale murders going on in Guatemala in
the first place. In that context, the serial apologetics, the lies
defending each murderer, and the mind-boggling hypocrisy will hardly be
newsworthy.

Given the U.S. role in originating and sustaining the Guatemalan
counterinsurgency state, and the fact that that state is dedicated to
blocking the growth of popular organizations (i.e., “anti-Communist” in
Orwellian rhetoric) and has a strong U.S. business presence, a
propaganda model would anticipate a lack of media interest in its
“unworthy” victims and an evasion of the U.S. role in its evolution and
practices. We would expect reports on Guatemala put out by Amnesty
International and other human-rights groups to be downplayed or ignored,
despite their spectacular data and horrifying stories. This is a strong
test of the model, as the number of civilians murdered between 1978 and
1985 may have approached 100,000, with a style of killing reminiscent of
Pol Pot. As AI pointed out in 1981:

The bodies of the victims have been found piled up in ravines, dumped at
roadsides or buried in mass graves. Thousands bore the scars of torture,
and death had come to most by strangling with a garrotte, by being
suffocated in rubber hoods or by being shot in the head.⁹⁰

The expectations of a propaganda model are fully realized in this case.
Referring to our table 2-1 comparison of media treatment of twenty-three
religious victims in Guatemala with the coverage accorded Popieluszko,
only four of the twenty-three were ever mentioned by name in our media
sample, and the twenty-three taken together had approximately
one-twentieth of the space in the _New York Times_ that the newspaper of
record gave to Popieluszko. In the case of the murder in Guatemala of
the American priest Rev. Stanley Rother, the _New York Times_ reported
on August 5, 1981, in a tiny back-page article, that three men had been
arrested for questioning in the shooting. What was the outcome of the
arrests? Were the arrested persons tried? Readers of the _Times_ will
never know, and the Guatemalan government did not have to suffer the
embarrassment and pressure of the press raising questions in this or any
of the remaining twenty-two Guatemalan cases.

Along with the minuscule attention to the murder of Guatemalan priests,
the details of the killings were brief, and no sense of outrage was
generated or sustained.⁹¹ The few lengthier articles never discuss the
role of the 1954 coup and the long training and supply relationship of
the United States to the Guatemalan police and army;⁹² rather, they
almost invariably put the killings in the format of a civil war with
unexplained atrocities of extremists of the right and left (see
“Archbishop Oscar Romero,” p. 48). An AP dispatch in the _New York
Times_ of May 16, 1981, is entitled “Four Guatemalans Slain in
Leftist-Rightist Rivalry.” The article, which reports on the murder of
one of our twenty-three priests, the Reverend Carlos Gálvez Galindo,
says: “The attacks appeared to be related to the long struggle for power
between leftists and rightists.” A UPI dispatch in the _Times_ of July
29, 1981, reporting on the murder of Rev. Stanley Rother, also relates
the attack to “right-wing extremists”—not the Guatemalan government.

_Time_ has Rother and his Guatemalan villagers “caught in the middle of
an undeclared civil war.…”⁹³ _Time_ never explains the roots of the
civil war, nor the crucial role of the United States in refusing to
allow peaceful social change and installing the institutions of
permanent counterrevolution. _Time_ does, in most unusual fashion, point
out that the government was responsible for the “overwhelming majority”
of the killings, and even more exceptionally, it cites Amnesty
International’s evidence that the paramilitary death squads are an arm
of the government. But the article fails to give illustrations of the
scope and quality of the murders, and retreats, as noted, to the
civil-war rationale. Even more compromising is its framing of the U.S.
policy debate. According to _Time_, “Yet Guatemala confronts the Reagan
administration with one of its toughest foreign policy challenges: on
one hand, the country is viewed as a victim of Cuban-sponsored
insurgency, needing U.S. support; on the other, the government obviously
violates human rights.” The dichotomy offered by _Time_ is a bit uneven:
the Cuban sponsorship is a Cold War ploy for which no evidence has ever
been given, but it provides a convenient propaganda framework that is
regularly deployed by the State Department to divert attention from its
support of mass murderers. _Time_ thus elevates it to equality with a
real and extremely serious charge—and without an honest citation even to
a political hack. The “on the other hand” is, despite the “obviously,” a
gross understatement. The Reagan administration chose to support and
provide regular apologetics for a genocidal government that was using a
policy of massacre to destroy a purely indigenous revolt. The
“challenge” for the Reagan administration—quite different from that
portrayed by _Time—_was how to _sell_ the support of mass murder. _Time_
did its little bit by unqualified transmission of the claim of a
Cuban-based insurgency, which posed a serious dilemma for policy-making.

The holocaust years 1978–85 yielded a steady stream of documents by
human-rights groups that provided dramatic evidence of a state terrorism
in Guatemala approaching genocidal levels. Many of these documents had a
huge potential for educating and arousing the public, but as a
propaganda model would anticipate, they were treated in our media sample
in a manner that minimized their informational value and capacity to
create and mobilize public indignation. Using a selection of ten
important reports on Guatemala by Amnesty International and Americas
Watch issued in the years 1981–87, we could only find _mention_ of four
of them in our media sample.⁹⁴ None of these four made it to the first
page, and none provided the basis for an editorial or the building up of
a press campaign of sustained coverage and indignation. The spectacular
AI report of 1981 on _“Disappearances”: A Workbook_, describing a
frightening development of state terrorism in the Nazi mold, was
entirely ignored in our media sample, as was AI’s March 1985 report on
_“Disappearances” … under the Government of General Oscar Humberto Mejía
Víctores_, which if publicized would have interfered with the media’s
portrayal of the Guatemalan elections of 1984–85 as exercises in
legitimation (as described in the next chapter). AW’s 1985 report on the
Mutual Support Group was ignored, as was the 1987 study of human rights
in Guatemala during Cerezo’s first year. We return to the Mutual Support
Group in the next section. We will see in the next chapter, too, that
the media reported Cerezo’s election in a framework of hopefulness and
optimism, despite prior electoral experience in Guatemala and Cerezo’s
own expressed doubts about his ability to rule; the ignoring of AW’s
retrospective describing the actual results of Cerezo’s presidency
reflects the media’s general failure to follow up on the effects of
client state elections (as we show in chapter 3 with regard to El
Salvador).

We described earlier the important Americas Watch study _Guatemala
Revised: How the Reagan Administration Finds “Improvements” in Human
Rights in Guatemala_, whose most striking and important theme was the ex
post facto admission by the State Department that its apologetics for
the _previous_ general had been false. This illuminating document was
ignored in our media sample, except for the _New York Times_, which gave
it a three-inch article on page 7 under the benign title “Rights Group
Faults U.S. on Guatemala Situation” (Sept. 24, 1985). The article
describes the report as saying that the administration has refused to
acknowledge major human-rights abuses in Guatemala, but it fails to
mention the stress on the ex post facto tacit admission of lying.
Mentioning this would, of course, suggest that the _Times’_s primary
source for its “news” is thoroughly untrustworthy. The last paragraph of
the article, which absorbs a quarter of the three inches devoted to this
document, gives a State Department response to the AW report, which is
that AW is “less a human rights organization than it is a political
one.” The brazen hypocrisy of this retort would have been clear and
dramatic if the article had given the gist of AW’s evidence that the
administration was not merely an apologist for state terrorism in
Guatemala, but was also demonstrably dishonest.

In its concern to protect the Guatemalan generals in their terroristic
assault on the population, the Reagan administration took umbrage at
organizations like Amnesty International and Americas Watch and mounted
a systematic campaign in 1981 and 1982 to discredit them as left-wing
and politically biased. In a letter dated September 15, 1982, directed
to AI and the Washington Office on Latin America, Assistant Secretary of
State Thomas Enders assailed the reporting of these organizations as
one-sided and apologetic for the “ferocious” and “terrorist attacks”—of
the guerrillas. Enders writes that

No one would deny the possibility [_sic_] of units of the military, in
contravention of stated policy, having been involved in violations of
human rights. What is important is that since March 23 the Government of
Guatemala has committed itself to a new course and has made significant
progress.⁹⁵

This amazing piece of apologetics for an army that was in the midst of
slaughtering thousands of civilians was distributed within Guatemala as
an official U.S. document, and its full text appeared in the Guatemalan
press. AW states:

We find this use of the letter unconscionable in light of the risks run
by human rights investigators in a political climate like Guatemala’s.
It also appears to us to be further evidence that the State Department,
like the Guatemalan government, admits no neutrals in the Guatemalan
conflict; the bringer of bad news becomes, through this reasoning, part
of the enemy, to be publicly discredited if possible.

Americas Watch also indicated that the State Department’s substantive
criticisms of AW and AI were not merely incompetent but, more important,
were based largely on the assumed truthfulness of Guatemalan army claims
(a form of gullibility displayed clearly in the statement by Enders
quoted above).

As we discussed in chapter 1, the government is a primary flak producer
as well as information source. This Guatemala episode is an important
illustration of the government’s efforts to silence competing sources of
information. It is interesting that the _New York Times_ never mentioned
or criticized this sinister campaign, even though it was carried out in
the context of a policy protecting mass murderers. We will see in the
next chapter that _Time_ magazine cooperated with the campaign, citing
Americas Watch only once on Guatemala, but with the qualifying
explanation that it is “a controversial group that is often accused of
being too sympathetic to the left” (the State Department, on which
_Time_ relies very heavily, is never subject to any adjective suggesting
any bias). The _Washington Post_ (Dec. 4, 1982) had one back-page
article by Terri Shaw, on the Enders letter, which features the State
Department charges in the title—“Embassy Sees ‘Disinformation’ on
Guatemala: U.S. Report Says Rights Groups are Used”—and in the text. The
author allows the embassy claim that “the report never was meant to be
made public” to stand unchallenged, and never refers to the threat posed
to human-rights monitors by the release of such State Department
charges. The human-rights groups are allowed to suggest a State
Department intent to discredit, but the word “disinformation” is never
applied to State Department allegations, and no serious examination of
the content of those charges is provided. This superficial piece
exhausts the sample media’s coverage of this State Department campaign.
The AW report _Human Rights in Guatemala: No Neutrals Allowed_, which
discusses this campaign and the Enders letter, was never mentioned.


2.6. THE MUTUAL SUPPORT GROUP MURDERS IN GUATEMALA

Human-rights monitoring and protective agencies have had a very
difficult time organizing and surviving in the “death-squad democracies”
of El Salvador and Guatemala. Between October 1980 and March 1983, five
officials of the Human Rights Commission of El Salvador were seized and
murdered by the security forces. In accord with a propaganda model,
these murders should have been of little interest to the U.S. mass
media, and this expectation is borne out by evidence. As an illustrative
comparison, the _New York Times_ had a grand total of four back-page
articles on these five murders,⁹⁶ whereas, during the same period, the
_Times_ had thirty-five articles on the Soviet human-rights activist
Natan Sharansky, not all of them on the back pages. The proportionality
of attention fits well our general propaganda-model analysis of the
media’s treatment of worthy and unworthy victims.

Guatemala has been even more inhospitable to human-rights organizations
than El Salvador. Guatemalan Archbishop Monsignor Próspero Penados del
Barrio asserted in 1984 that “It is impossible for a human rights office
to exist in Guatemala at the present time.”⁹⁷ “Disappearances” as an
institutional form began in Guatemala in the mid-1960s and eventually
reached levels unique in the Western Hemisphere, with the total
estimated to be some 40,000.⁹⁸ Protest groups that have formed to seek
information and legal redress have been consistently driven out of
business by state-organized murder. The Association of University
Students (AEU) sought information on the disappeared through the courts
in the course of a brief opening in 1966, but after one sensational
exposé of the police murder of twenty-eight leftists, the system closed
down again. As McClintock points out, “In the next few years many AEU
leaders and member law students were hunted down and killed.”⁹⁹ In the
1970s, a Committee of the Relatives of the Disappeared was organized by
the AEU, with headquarters in San Carlos National University. As
Americas Watch points out, “It disbanded after plainsclothesmen walked
into the University’s legal aid center on March 10, 1974, and shot and
killed its principal organizer, lawyer Edmundo Guerra Theilheimer, the
center’s director.”¹⁰⁰ Another human-rights group, the National
Commission for Human Rights, was created in the late 1970s by
psychologist and journalist Irma Flaquer. Her son was murdered, and she
herself “disappeared” on October 16, 1980.

According to the British Parliamentary Human Rights Group, in 1984 alone
there were an average of one hundred political murders and over forty
disappearances per month in Guatemala.¹⁰¹ These figures are almost
surely an underestimate, as only the disappearances that took place in
and around Guatemala City received any publicity. The greater number of
murders and disappearances occur among rural and Indian families who do
not have the resources to complain and are more exposed to retaliation.

In this context of murder, fear, and the prior failure of all
human-rights organizations, the Mutual Support Group, or GAM, was formed
in June 1984. It was a product of the desperation felt by people seeking
information on the whereabouts of disappeared relatives and willing to
take serious risks to that end. Many of them had suffered enormous pain
in frustrating searches and inquiries that never bore fruit. There is no
legal redress in Guatemala, and nothing useful can be obtained by
appeals to the police or courts of law. Mr. Hicho, looking for his
disappeared daughter, saw some one hundred bodies in the months he spent
at the morgue, and “seventy to seventy-five percent of them had been
tortured.”¹⁰² Others took different painful routes in their search. In
early 1985, one woman was told by an army officer that her husband was
still alive, and that he would see to his return if she slept with him.
She did so, and her husband turned up dead shortly thereafter.¹⁰³

The intention of the organizers of GAM was to seek strength by
collective action, and to use it to gather data and seek redress by
petition and publicity. Their hope for survival and success rested, in
part, on the fact that the chief of state, Mejía Víctores, was being
built up by the Reagan administration as another “reformer,” and the
Reagan-Mejía Víctores team was trying to establish the appropriate
“image” to induce Congress to loosen the purse strings. GAM also had
support within Guatemala from Archbishop Penados del Barrio and other
church groups and lay persons, although few felt able to speak up in the
system of unconstrained state terror. Internationally, GAM received
significant political support from progressive and humanitarian
political parties and human-rights groups.

Thirty members of the newly organized GAM held a press conference in
Guatemala City in June 1984, denouncing the disappearances and calling
on the government “to intervene immediately in order to find our loved
ones.” In the latter part of June, and again in early August, masses
were held in the Metropolitan Cathedral to express concern over the fate
of the disappeared, with the initial services held by the university
rector, Meyer Maldonado, and Archbishop Penados. A thousand people
attended the August mass. On August 1, the group first met with General
Mejía Víctores, at which time he promised to investigate the
disappearances. In ads placed in the major newspapers on August 8 and 9,
GAM put his promises on the public record. Subsequently the group began
to call attention to the government’s failure to follow through on the
August 1 promises, and they moved gradually to other actions. In October
1984 they sponsored a march and mass for the disappeared at the
cathedral—the first mass demonstration in Guatemala since May 1, 1980
(at which time protestors were seized on the streets and an estimated
one hundred were assassinated, or disappeared).

The organization continued to grow, from the initial handful to 225
families in November 1984 and then to 1,300 in the spring of 1986. Most
of the members were women, a large majority peasant women from the
countryside. They were persistent. After initial petitions, requests,
meetings, and marches, they began to make explicit accusations and
“publicly charge elements of the national security forces as directly
responsible for the capture and subsequent disappearance of our family
members.”¹⁰⁴ They asked for an investigation, an accounting, and
justice. They appealed to the constituent assembly and began regular
protests in downtown Guatemala City, banging pots and pans and, on
occasion, peacefully occupying buildings.

Nothing, of course, was done in response to the GAM demands. The
assembly had no powers anyway, but was too fearful even to pass a
resolution of support. The military rulers toyed with GAM. In public,
with the press on hand, Mejía Víctores would say, “I don’t want to shirk
responsibilities and something has to be done.” But when the press was
not there, he said, “It seems as though you are accusing me—and we don’t
have them [the disappeared].” “You have them,” we said. “We don’t have
them,” he replied.¹⁰⁵ The military rulers were getting annoyed, and
phone threats, letters of warning, and open surveillance intensified.
Two days after the exchange between Mejía Víctores and GAM, the tortured
bodies of two disappeared associated with GAM members showed up, one
placed in front of his house with his eyes gouged out and his face
barely recognizable.

In a television interview on March 14, 1985, Mejía Víctores said that
GAM was “being used by subversion, because if they have problems,
solutions are being found, and they have been given every advantage to
[solve these problems].”¹⁰⁶ A spate of newspaper headlines followed,
stressing government warnings and allegations that GAM was being
manipulated by subversives. In mid-March, General Mejía Víctores was
asked on television what action the government would take against GAM.
He replied, “You’ll know it when you see it.”¹⁰⁷

On March 30, 1985, GAM leader Héctor Gómez Calito was seized, tortured,
and murdered. (The six policemen who had come for him were themselves
assassinated shortly after his death.)¹⁰⁸ He had been burned with a
blowtorch, on the stomach and elsewhere, and beaten on the face so
severely that his lips were swollen and his teeth were broken; his
tongue had been cut out. Then, on April 4, another leader of GAM, María
Rosario Godoy de Cuevas, her twenty-one-year-old brother, and her
two-year-old son were picked up, tortured, and murdered. Her breasts had
bite marks and her underclothing was bloody; her two-year-old son had
had his fingernails pulled out.

On grounds of newsworthiness, the murders of the two GAM leaders, along
with the brother and the child of one of them, would seem to deserve
high-order attention. Their bravery was exceptional; the villainy they
were opposing was extraordinary; the justice of their cause was
unassailable; and the crimes they suffered were more savage than those
undergone by Popieluszko. Most important of all, these were crimes for
which we bear considerable responsibility, since they were perpetrated
by clients who depend on our support, so that exposure and pressure
could have a significant effect in safeguarding human rights. On the
other hand, the Reagan administration was busily trying to enter into
warmer and more supportive relations with the Guatemalan military regime
and, as we described earlier, was going to great pains to put the regime
in a favorable light. A propaganda model would anticipate that even
these dramatic and horrifying murders would be treated in a low-key
manner and quickly dropped by the mass media—that, unlike Popieluszko,
there would be no sustained interest, no indignation capable of rousing
the public (and disturbing the administration’s plans). These
expectations are fully vindicated by the record.

Table 2-3 compares media coverage of the Popieluszko case with that of
the murders of the GAM leaders. It is immediately obvious that the
treatment is radically different in the two cases. The GAM murders
couldn’t even make “the news” at _Time, Newsweek_, or CBS News. The _New
York Times_ never found these murders worthy of the front page or
editorial comment, and we can see that the intensity of its coverage was
slight. The first report of the quadruple murder was on April 7, 1985,
in a tiny item on page 5 of the paper in which it is mentioned that the
body of María Rosario Godoy de Cuevas was found in her car in a ravine,
along with the bodies of her brother and her young son. In neither this
item nor any succeeding article does the _Times_ provide details on the
condition of the bodies, or mention that the two-year-old child had his
fingernails torn out.¹⁰⁹

In other respects, too, the _Times_ articles, all written by Stephen
Kinzer, generally employ an apologetic framework. That is, they don’t
focus on the murders—who the victims were, the details of the violence,
who did it, why, and the institutional structures and roots of organized
murder of which these are an obvious part. With Popieluszko, these were
_the_ issues. Kinzer has little or nothing on the details of the GAM
murders and very little on the victims and the experiences that brought
them to GAM, and the question of who did it and what was being done (or
not done) to bring the murderers to justice he hardly considers. Kinzer
takes it for granted that the murders were committed by agents of the
state, but he doesn’t say this explicitly, or discuss the background, or
provide a framework for evaluating the case. He looks “objectively” at
the scene, quoting some of the GAM survivors in brief and rhetorical
statements that are offset by quotes from the generals: they approved
the formation of GAM (an ambiguous half-truth); they appointed an
investigating committee that “found no evidence of secret detention
centers in Guatemala” (no mention of the composition of the committee,
no counter-evidence, and no mention of issues they may have
overlooked—like disappeared who are murdered); and they deny any
responsibility for the murder of Godoy, her brother, and her son, who
they claim to have been victims of an auto accident. If Kinzer had given
the details of the victims’ injuries, this lie would have been exposed
as such, and further questions would have suggested themselves.

[]

In article after article, Kinzer repeats that the Mejía Víctores
government has pledged to return to civilian rule shortly, which helps
deflect attention from the ongoing killing and its causes, and from the
GAM murders under discussion; he also does not tell us just what
“civilian rule” would mean in a terrorist state in which, as he knows,
the effective rulers would be the same military forces.¹¹⁰ In the
Popieluszko case, once it was established that the police had committed
the murder, the media spent a great deal of space discussing the police
apparatus and police methods, as well as attending to the responsibility
of the people at higher levels for the murder. Kinzer doesn’t discuss
these questions at all. The structure of the Guatemalan murder machine
and how it works would make a good story, and numerous details of its
operations were available, but this did not fit the government agenda
and the _Times_ format. Similarly, the role of Mejía Víctores in the
murder of the GAM leaders—recall his warnings just prior to the murders,
and consider his virtually unlimited discretionary power to murder or
protect the citizenry—is ignored. But once again, the links to the top
in the case of unworthy victims do not fit the propaganda format. Kinzer
does a nice job of making the GAM murders seem to be part of the natural
background—regrettable but inevitable, part of the complex inheritance
of a troubled country, and possibly, it is hoped, to be rectified when
the new civilian government takes power.

In an attempt to gain support abroad, two of the remaining leaders of
GAM, Nineth de García and Herlindo Hideo de Aquino, traveled to Europe
in March and April 1986, after the inauguration of the elected civilian
president, Christian Democrat Vinicio Cerezo. One of their most
important messages was that killings and disappearances had not abated
at all during the first three months of Cerezo’s presidency, and that
the death squads had actually reappeared and were active in Guatemala
City. Because of ill health, Nineth de García canceled her visits in
Washington, D.C., and flew directly from Europe to Chicago, where she
was scheduled to receive the key to the city from Mayor Harold
Washington. As she went through customs in Chicago, however, the
officials of the Immigration and Naturalization Service searched,
interrogated, and harassed her for two hours, one of the customs
officials calling her a subversive and a Communist. They also seized
literature she carried and threatened to deport her, despite her
intended brief stopover and valid visa. This intimidation had its
effect, and Nineth de García flew directly to Guatemala. A friend
attended the banquet in her place to accept the key presented by Mayor
Washington.

This incident is revealing. It is unlikely that Sharansky or Walesa
would be so treated by the INS, but if by some chance they were, the
press outcry would be great.¹¹¹ When a press conference was held in
Chicago by supporters of GAM to protest this outrage, the major media
did not attend, and neither the press releases nor the follow-up letter
from a congressional group signed by Senator Daniel Patrick Moynihan
could break the silence. The convergence between Reagan administration
policy toward Guatemala and media priorities was complete. (According to
two organizers of the Chicago press conference, full information on this
event was given Steve Greenhouse, the _New York Times_’s reporter in
Chicago, but not a word about this incident appeared in the newspaper of
record.)

A press release by the Guatemalan army on September 17, 1986, accused
GAM of conducting

 … a black campaign of falsehood … insults and insolence directed at the
military institution that exceed [the boundaries] of liberty and
tolerance for free speech. The army cannot permit the insidiousness and
truculence of GAM’s maneuvers … that attempt to compromise the
democratic international image of Guatemala.¹¹²

Although very similar threats preceded the murder of two leaders of GAM
in March and April of 1984, the U.S. mass media entirely ignored this
new information—despite strenuous efforts by GAM, the Guatemalan Human
Rights Commission, and their allies to elicit publicity. As in the past,
the unworthiness of these victims remains an essential ingredient in the
Guatemalan army’s continued freedom to kill.



[]  _3_ LEGITIMIZING VERSUS MEANINGLESS THIRD WORLD ELECTIONS: EL SALVADOR GUATEMALA NICARAGUA



[]


THIRD WORLD ELECTIONS PROVIDE AN EXCELLENT TESTING ground for a
propaganda model. Some elections are held in friendly client states to
legitimize their rulers and regimes, whereas others are held in
disfavored or enemy countries to legitimize _their_ political systems.
This natural dichotomization is strengthened by the fact that elections
in the friendly client states are often held under U.S. sponsorship and
with extensive U.S. management and public-relations support. Thus, in
the Dominican Republic in 1966, and periodically thereafter, the United
States organized what have been called “demonstration elections” in its
client states, defined as those whose primary function is to convince
the home population that the intervention is well intentioned, that the
populace of the invaded and occupied country welcomes the intrusion, and
that they are being given a democratic choice.¹

The elections in El Salvador in 1982 and 1984 were true demonstration
elections, and those held in Guatemala in 1984–85 were strongly
supported by the United States for image-enhancing purposes. The
election held in Nicaragua in 1984, by contrast, was intended to
legitimize a government that the Reagan administration was striving to
destabilize and overthrow. The U.S. government therefore went to great
pains to cast the Nicaraguan election in an unfavorable light.

A propaganda model would anticipate mass-media support of the state
perspective and agenda. That is, the favored elections will be found to
legitimize, no matter what the facts; the disfavored election will be
found deficient, farcical, and failing to legitimize—again, irrespective
of facts. What makes this another strong test of a propaganda model is
that the Salvadoran and Guatemalan elections of 1982 and 1984–85 were
held under conditions of severe, ongoing state terror against the
civilian population, whereas in Nicaragua this was not the case. To find
the former elections legitimizing and the Nicaraguan election a farce,
the media would have had to use different standards of evaluation in the
two sets of cases, and, more specifically, it would have been necessary
for them to avoid discussing state terror and other basic electoral
conditions in the Salvadoran and Guatemalan elections. As we will see,
the media fulfilled these requirements and met the needs of the state to
a remarkable degree.

In order to demonstrate the applicability of a propaganda model in these
cases, we will first describe the election-propaganda framework that the
U.S. government tried to foist on the media; we will then review the
basic electoral conditions under which elections were held in the three
countries; and finally, we will examine how the U.S. mass media treated
each of the three elections.


3.1. ELECTION-PROPAGANDA FRAMEWORKS

The U.S. government has employed a number of devices in its sponsored
elections to put them in a favorable light. It has also had an
identifiable agenda of issues that it wants stressed, as well as others
it wants ignored or downplayed. Central to demonstration-election
management has been the manipulation of symbols and agenda to give the
favored election a positive image. The sponsor government tries to
associate the election with the happy word “democracy” and the military
regime it backs with support of the elections (and hence democracy). It
emphasizes what a wonderful thing it is to be able to hold any election
at all under conditions of internal conflict, and it makes it appear a
moral triumph that the army has agreed to support the election (albeit
reluctantly) and abide by its results.

The refusal of the rebel opposition to participate in the election is
portrayed as a rejection of democracy and proof of its antidemocratic
tendencies, although the very _plan_ of the election involves the
rebels’ exclusion from the ballot.² The sponsor government also seizes
upon any rebel statements urging nonparticipation or threatening to
disrupt the election. These are used to transform the election into a
dramatic struggle between, on the one side, the “born-again” democratic
army and people struggling to vote for “peace,” and, on the other, the
rebels opposing democracy, peace, and the right to vote. Thus the
dramatic denouement of the election is _voter turnout_, which measures
the ability of the forces of democracy and peace (the army) to overcome
rebel threats.

Official observers are dispatched to the election scene to assure its
public-relations success. Nominally, their role is to see that the
election is “fair.” Their real function, however, is to provide the
_appearance_ of fairness by focusing on the government’s agenda and by
channeling press attention to a reliable source.³ They testify to
fairness on the basis of long lines, smiling faces, no beatings in their
presence, and the assurances and enthusiasm of U.S. and client-state
officials.⁴ But these superficialities are entirely consistent with a
staged fraud. Fairness depends on fundamental conditions established in
advance, which are virtually impossible to ascertain under the brief,
guided-tour conditions of official observers. Furthermore, official
observers in sponsored elections rarely ask the relevant questions.⁵
They are able to perform their public-relations function because the
government chooses observers who are reliable supporters of its aims and
publicizes their role, and the press gives them respectful attention.⁶

“Off the agenda” for the government in its own sponsored elections are
all of the basic parameters that make an election meaningful or
meaningless prior to the election-day proceedings. These include: (1)
freedom of speech and assembly; (2) freedom of the press; (3) freedom to
organize and maintain intermediate economic, social, and political
groups (unions, peasant organizations, political clubs, student and
teacher associations, etc.); (4) freedom to form political parties,
organize members, put forward candidates, and campaign without fear of
extreme violence; and (5) the absence of state terror and a climate of
fear among the public. Also off the agenda is the election-day “coercion
package” that may explain turnout in terms other than devotion to the
army and its plans, including any legal requirement to vote, and
explicit or implicit threats for _not_ voting. Other issues that must be
downplayed in conforming to the government propaganda format are the
U.S. government’s role in organizing and funding the election, the
internal propaganda campaign waged to get out the vote, outright fraud,
and the constraints on and threats to journalists covering the election.

Another issue off the government agenda is the _purpose_ of the
election. If its role is to influence the home population, spelling this
out might arouse suspicions concerning its authenticity. In the case of
the Vietnam election of 1967 and the El Salvador elections of 1982 and
1984, the purpose of the elections was not merely to placate the home
public but also to mislead them on the ends sought. In both instances it
was intimated that an election would contribute to a peaceable
resolution to the conflict, whereas the intent was to clear the ground
for intensified warfare. Nobody who proposed a peace option could appear
as a serious candidate in Vietnam in 1967,⁷ and as we describe below,
there was no peace candidate at all in El Salvador in either 1982 or
1984, although the polls and reporters kept saying that peace was the
primary concern of the electorate. This highlights both the fraudulence
of these elections and the urgency that the intentions of the sponsor be
kept under wraps.

In elections held in disfavored or enemy states, the U.S. government
agenda is turned upside down. Elections are no longer equated with
democracy, and U.S. officials no longer marvel at the election being
held under adverse conditions. They do not commend the army for
supporting the election and agreeing to abide by the results. On the
contrary, the leverage the dominant party obtains by control of and
support by the army is put forward in this case as compromising the
integrity of the election. Rebel disruption is no longer proof that the
opposition rejects democracy, and turnout is no longer the dramatic
denouement of the struggle between a democratic army and its rebel
opposition. _Now_ the stress is on the hidden motives of the sponsors of
the election, who are trying to legitimize themselves by this tricky
device of a so-called election.

Most important, the agenda of factors relevant to appraising an election
is altered. From the stress on the superficial—long lines and smiling
faces of voters, the simple mechanics of election-day balloting, and the
personalities of the candidates—attention is now shifted to the basic
parameters that were off the agenda in the sponsored election. As noted
by Secretary of State Shultz, “The important thing is that if there is
to be an electoral process, it be observed not only at the moment when
people vote, but in all the preliminary aspects that make an election
meaningful.” Spelling this out further, Shultz mentioned explicitly that
for elections to be meaningful, “rival political groups” must be allowed
“to form themselves and have access to people, to have the right of
assembly, to have access to the media.”⁸ These remarks were made apropos
of the 1984 _Nicaraguan_ election. No congresspersons or media
commentators raised any question about whether these criteria should
perhaps be applied to the Salvadoran or Guatemalan elections scheduled
during the same year.

In brief, the government used a well-nigh perfect system of Orwellian
doublethink: forgetting a criterion “that has become inconvenient, and
then, when it becomes necessary again,… draw[ing] it back from oblivion
for just so long as it is needed.”⁹ It even acknowledges this fact: a
senior U.S. official told members of the Latin American Studies
Association (LASA) observing the Nicaraguan election:

The United States is not obliged to apply the same standard of judgment
to a country whose government is avowedly hostile to the U.S. as for a
country like El Salvador, where it is not. These people [the
Sandinistas] could bring about a situation in Central America which
could pose a threat to U.S. security. That allows us to change our
yardstick.¹⁰

But while a government may employ a blatant double standard, media which
adhere to minimal standards of objectivity and are not themselves part
of a propaganda system would apply a single standard. Did the mass media
of the United States follow a single standard in dealing with the
elections in El Salvador, Guatemala, and Nicaragua, or did they follow
their government’s agenda in order to put the Salvadoran and Guatemalan
elections in a favorable light and to denigrate the one held in
Nicaragua?


3.2. BASIC ELECTORAL CONDITIONS IN EL SALVADOR, GUATEMALA, AND NICARAGUA, 1982–85

All three of these countries, in which elections were held in the years
1982–85, were in the midst of serious conflict: Nicaragua was being
subjected to regular border incursions by the U.S.-organized and
supplied contras. El Salvador was in the midst of a combination civil
conflict and externally (U.S.) organized and funded counterinsurgency
war. Guatemala, as we noted earlier, had evolved into a
counterinsurgency state, with permanent warfare to keep the majority of
Indians and other peasants in their place, and violent repression was
structured into the heart of the political system.

Despite the common feature of ongoing conflict, however, electoral
conditions were far more favorable in Nicaragua than in El Salvador and
Guatemala, for several reasons. First, and crucially important, in the
latter countries, at the time of the elections the army was still
engaged in mass slaughter of the civilian population, with the toll in
the tens of thousands in each country and the killing often carried out
with extreme sadism. Nothing remotely similar was true in Nicaragua.
These facts, which are not controversial among people with a minimal
concern for reality, immediately establish a fundamental distinction
with regard to the electoral climate. In countries that are being
subject to the terror of a rampaging murder machine, supported or run by
a foreign power, electoral conditions are fatally compromised in
advance, a point that the media would recognize at once if we were
considering the sphere of influence of some official enemy.¹¹

A further—and related—distinction was that the ruling Sandinista
government was a popular government, which strove to serve majority
needs and could therefore _afford_ to allow greater freedom of speech
and organization. The LASA report on the Nicaraguan election notes that
their program “implies redistribution of access to wealth and public
services. The state will use its power to guarantee fulfillment of the
basic needs of the majority population.” The “logic of the majority,”
the report continues, also implies the involvement of “very large
numbers of people in the decisions that affect their lives.”¹² Qualified
observers conclude that the Nicaraguan government pursued this logic,
although this fact is excluded from the free press. After citing the
World Bank’s observation that “Governments … vary greatly in the
commitment of their political leadership to improving the condition of
the people and encouraging their active participation in the development
process,” Dianna Melrose, of the charitable development agency Oxfam,
states that “From Oxfam’s experience of working in seventy-six
developing countries, Nicaragua was to prove exceptional in the strength
of that Government commitment.”¹³ The Salvadoran and Guatemalan
governments, by contrast, were ruled by elites that had been struggling
desperately for decades to avoid the very kinds of reforms the
Sandinistas were implementing. Extreme repression was the longstanding
method of control of the majority in El Salvador and Guatemala, with
vigorous and unceasing U.S. support. The aim of this repression was to
keep the populace apathetic and to destroy popular organizations that
might lay the basis for meaningful democracy. The Sandinistas were
engaged in mobilizing the majority and involving them in political life,
which they could afford to do because their programs were intended to
serve the general population.

A third factor affecting electoral conditions was that in El Salvador
and Guatemala the conflict was internal, and violence against the
majority was integral to the struggle. In Nicaragua, the conflict was
one involving an externally sponsored aggression that had very limited
internal support. The Sandinistas could appeal to nationalist
sentiments, easily mobilized against Yankee-organized terrorism. The
Salvadoran and Guatemalan governments could hardly do the same—the
Salvadoran government especially had to contend with a negative
nationalist reaction to obvious foreign (i.e., U.S.) domination and
manipulation of its affairs, a fact that reached the level of absurdity
when Duarte, visiting Washington in the fall of 1987, made himself an
object of ridicule throughout Latin America by promptly kissing the
American flag. While the Sandinistas did increasingly crack down on
internal supporters of the contras as the conflict intensified, by the
standards the United States usually applies to this region dissenters
were dealt with remarkably benignly in Nicaragua.¹⁴ In El Salvador and
Guatemala, the ruling elites could not afford such toleration, and
repression by large-scale terror had long been institutionalized in
these states.

A fourth factor making for a more benign electoral environment in
Nicaragua, paradoxically, was U.S. hostility and the power of its
propaganda machine. Every arrest or act of harassment in Nicaragua was
publicized and transformed into evidence of the sinister quality of the
Sandinista government in the free press of the United States. Meanwhile,
as we described in chapter 2, the Guatemalan and Salvadoran regimes
could indulge in torture, rape, mutilation, and murder on a daily and
massive basis without invoking remotely proportional attention,
indignation, or inferences about the quality of these regimes. In the
context, the Nicaraguan government was under intense pressure to toe the
mark, whereas the U.S. satellites were free to murder at will without
serious political cost.

Let us examine briefly how El Salvador, Guatemala, and Nicaragua
compared in the individual categories of conditions of a free election,
before we turn to the media treatment of these issues.

3.2.1. Free speech and assembly.

In El Salvador, the right to free speech and free assembly was legally
suspended under a state-of-siege order of March 7, 1980. Decree No. 507
of December 3, 1980, essentially destroyed the judicial system,
permitting the armed forces to hold citizens without charge or evidence
for 180 days. Under these rulings, in the thirty months before the March
1982 election, and prior to the 1984 elections, many thousands of
civilians were seized, imprisoned, tortured, raped, and murdered outside
of legal processes for alleged “subversive” actions and thoughts. The
state of siege was lifted in early 1982 solely for the six parties
contesting the election, and it was lifted entirely ten days before the
election for all Salvadorans—although, unfortunately, the citizenry was
not informed of this fact until after the election was over and
state-of-siege conditions were reimposed.¹⁵ The practice of exposing
mutilated bodies for the edification of the citizenry became
institutionalized in the early 1980s in El Salvador. We described in
chapter 2 the difficulty the U.S. government had in getting underlings
jailed, tried, and convicted for the murder of four American citizens,
even under intense U.S. pressure. The people of El Salvador had no
protection whatsoever from the state terrorists, apart from that
afforded by the guerrilla army in the regions under their control. The
threat of extreme violence by the state against dissident speech was
acute in El Salvador in 1982 and 1984, and was incompatible with a free
election.

In Guatemala, similarly, during 1984 and 1985, and for many years
before, the actions of the armed forces against alleged subversives was
entirely outside the rule of law. Thousands were seized, tortured, and
killed without warrant and without any individual right to hearing or
trial. As in El Salvador, mutilation and exposure of the tortured bodies
became commonplace in the late 1970s and the 1980s.¹⁶ The courts were
dominated by the military, as the latter would simply not execute or
obey a court order of which they disapproved, and the judges were not
inclined to challenge the military for reasons of dependency or fear.
Even Viscount Colville of Culross, the special rapporteur of the UN
General Assembly who has been a notorious apologist for the Guatemalan
regime, after pointing out that over eighty members of the judiciary,
court staff, and legal profession had been murdered in the early 1980s
and that many others were threatened, says that “Such events make their
mark and cannot quickly be mitigated.”¹⁷ Two illustrations of the lack
of court autonomy may be noted here: in May 1983, Ricardo Sagastume
Vidaure, then president of the supreme court, was simply removed by
military order for attempting to bring military personnel under the
jurisdiction of the legal system.¹⁸ On July 19, 1984, Colonel Djalmi
Domínguez, head of public relations for the army, told the newspaper
_Prensa Libre_ that the army wouldn’t tolerate its members being taken
to court on any charges.¹⁹

In the early 1980s, following the mass killings and village destruction
of 1980–83, vast numbers of peasants were resettled in “model villages”
and other places under army control, and over 800,000 males were made
obligatory members of civil patrols with military functions under close
army surveillance. According to the British parliamentary group that
visited Guatemala in 1984, “The civilian patrol system is implemented by
terror, and designed also to sow terror.… People who do anything out of
the ordinary come under immediate suspicion and are taken by the patrols
to the army’s _destacamiento_. Interrogation will be done by the army,
but the killing of murdered suspects [is] often by the civilian
patrols.”²⁰ Bishops Taylor and O’Brien, representing the Roman Catholic
Bishops’ Conferences of Scotland and England-Wales respectively,
reported after their visit to Guatemala in 1984 that

The civilian population is under almost total control by a heavy army
and police presence throughout the country, which we were able to
observe. There is also a nationwide network of civil defense patrols,
military commissioners and informers, and “model villages” serving in
some cases as internment camps for the Indian population from the areas
of conflict. Much of Guatemala resembles a country under military
occupation. One of our informants summed up the situation by saying that
the military had established a system of “structural control.”²¹

The InterAmerican Commission on Human Rights, following an on-site visit
in May 1985, also found that freedom of speech and assembly did not
exist in Guatemala:

The right of assembly and freedom of association, considered in Articles
15 and 16 of the American Convention, are also restricted and curtailed,
because existing security measures in the Development Poles and the
strict supervision of the Civil Defense Patrols inhibit residents from
taking part in any social, ideological, cultural or other assemblies or
associations. All such meetings, when they do occur, are subject to
surveillance, supervision and control by the authorities, so they do not
enjoy the freedom implied by such rights.²²

Public demonstrations were permissible in Guatemala during the 1984–85
elections, with three days’ advance notice and approval of the military
authorities. In the Guatemalan context, however, this grant of rights
was not meaningful. The delegation of the International Human Rights Law
Group and the Washington Office on Latin America noted that whatever the
election guarantees,

the military and civil defense patrols and the climate of fear also made
it difficult for many Guatemalans to organize and assemble. One local
observer said that years of terror and oppression against local
organizations had demobilized the whole rural population: “Four CUC
[peasant league] members were killed in this village alone. Now it would
be very difficult to organize any kind of group.” Civil patrols, police
and army checkpoints on highways, and the need for travel permits for
residents of the model villages impeded free movement. In the rural
areas the civil patrols discouraged gatherings because people feared
being reported.²³

It was noted by many observers of the Guatemalan elections that although
the big issues in that country were land distribution and reform and
human rights, no political candidates discussed or advocated either land
reform, or restructuring the military and forcing an accounting of tens
of thousands of “disappearances.” One Christian Democratic adviser
explained to the law group that “We Christian Democrats haven’t raised
such issues because this isn’t the moment to start a confrontation with
either the army or the private sector.”²⁴

In short, despite the “momentary improvement in the conditions of free
speech” that occurred during the election campaign, Guatemala did not
meet the first condition of a free election. The rural masses were under
army discipline and traumatized by mass killings and the absence of any
vestige of rule of law, and the candidates were unable to raise openly
the fundamental issues of the society.

Free speech and rights of assembly were constrained in Nicaragua in 1984
by social pressures and threats and by a state of siege that had been
terminated some six months prior to the November 1984 election. Very
important differences existed, however, between the Nicaraguan
constraints and those prevailing in El Salvador and Guatemala. Most
important, in Nicaragua the army and police did not regularly seize
alleged subversives, and torture and murder them. Mutilated bodies have
not been put on public display as a part of the system of public
education. What the law group called the “constant, overt political
terror” in Guatemala, based on “numerous documented massacres of whole
villages,” and what the former Salvadoran official Leonel Gómez called
the state of “fearful passivity” prevalent in El Salvador, did not apply
to Nicaragua. In Nicaragua, in 1984, dissidents were able to speak
freely without fear of murder, and the LASA group noted that “Every
member of our delegation was approached at least once by an irate
citizen as we walked around Managua and other cities. Several of these
encounters turned into heated arguments between the individual who had
approached us and passers-by who joined the discussion.… These people
did not feel intimidated.”²⁵

Freedom of assembly in Nicaragua was somewhat limited by harassment,
but, once again, it was not ruled out by state terror, as was the case
in El Salvador and Guatemala. The LASA delegation examined in detail the
charges of Sandinista harassment of opposition-group meetings and found
them largely unfounded, concluding that the contesting parties “were
able to hold the vast majority of their rallies unimpeded by pro-FSLN
demonstrations.…”²⁶

Our conclusion is that the first basic condition of a free election was
partially met in Nicaragua, but was not met at all in El Salvador and
Guatemala.

3.2.2. Freedom of the press.

In El Salvador, the only substantial newspapers critical of the
government, _La Crónica del Pueblo_ and _El Independiente_—neither by
any means radical papers—were closed in July 1980 and January 1981,
respectively, the first because its top editor and two employees were
murdered and mutilated by the security forces, the second because the
army arrested its personnel and destroyed its plant. The church paper
and radio station were repeatedly shut down by bombing attacks. No paper
or station representing the principal opposition has been able to
operate except clandestinely. Over thirty journalists have been murdered
in El Salvador since the revolutionary junta took power. An intensified
campaign against the press occurred just prior to the 1982 election. On
March 10, a death list of thirty-five journalists was circulated by a
“death squad,” and on March 18 the mutilated bodies of four Dutch
journalists were recovered.²⁷ None of the murders of journalists in El
Salvador was ever “solved”—they were essentially murders carried out
under the auspices of the state.

In Guatemala, forty-eight journalists were murdered between 1978 and
1985,²⁸ and many others have been kidnapped and threatened. These
killings, kidnappings, and threats have been a primary means of control
of the media. As in El Salvador, nobody has yet been apprehended and
tried for any of these crimes, which must be viewed as murders carried
out by the state or with state approval. There are no papers or radio or
television stations in Guatemala that express the views of the rebels or
the majority Indian population or the lower classes in general. “At
most, the variants reflect shades of strictly conservative thinking.”²⁹
Given the extreme climate of fear, and threats for stepping out of line,
even the conservative press is cautious and engages in continuous
self-censorship. All the central topics that should be debated in this
terrorized society are carefully avoided.³⁰

In Nicaragua, once again, there have been no reported deaths of
journalists by state terrorists, nor even threats of personal violence.
In 1984, the majority of the fifty-odd radio stations were privately
owned, and some of them provided their own news programs; four other
independent producers supplied radio news programs without prior
censorship. Foreign radio and television from commercial and U.S.
propaganda sources broadcasting from Costa Rica, Honduras, and elsewhere
were of growing importance in 1984.³¹ Two of the three newspapers were
privately owned, one supportive of the government but critical of
specific programs and actions, the other violently hostile. The latter,
_La Prensa_, which represented the small, ultraconservative minority and
supported the contras and a foreign-sponsored invasion of the country,
was allowed to operate throughout the 1984 election, although it was
censored. The censorship still allowed the paper to publish manifestos
of opposition groups and a pastoral letter critical of the regime. No
comparable paper has been allowed to exist above-ground, even briefly,
in El Salvador and Guatemala.

There is no doubt that the media in Nicaragua have been under government
constraint, with censorship and periodic emergency controls that
seriously encroached on freedom of the press.³² It should be noted,
however, that Nicaragua is under foreign attack and in a state of
serious warfare. John S. Nichols points out that under the U.S.
Espionage Act of 1917, over one hundred publications were banned from
the mails, and hundreds of people were jailed for allegedly interfering
with military recruitment. Furthermore,

Given that the United States was a relatively mature and homogenous
political system during World War I and was not particularly threatened
by the fighting, the range of public discussion tolerated in Nicaragua
during the first five years of the revolution was remarkable. Despite
assertions by President Reagan, IAPA, and others that the control of the
Nicaraguan media was virtually totalitarian, the diversity of ownership
and opinion was unusual for a Third World country, particularly one at
war.³³

Our conclusion is that the condition of freedom of the press necessary
for a free election was clearly absent in El Salvador and Guatemala, and
that it was partially met in Nicaragua.

3.2.3. Freedom of organization of intermediate groups.

Perhaps the most important fact about El Salvador in the two years prior
to the election of March 1982 was the decimation of popular and private
organizations that could pose any kind of challenge to the army and
oligarchy. As we noted in chapter 2, this was the main thrust of policy
of the revolutionary junta from late 1979 onward, and thousands of
leaders were murdered and numerous organizations were destroyed or
driven underground. The teachers’ union was decimated by several hundred
murders; the university was occupied, looted, and closed down by the
army; organized student and professional groups were destroyed by
arrests and killings, and even the peasant union sponsored by the
AFL-CIO (i.e., supporters of the regime) had some one hundred of its
organizers and leaders murdered between October 1979 and the election of
March 1982.³⁴

In Guatemala, too, intermediate organizations such as peasant and trade
unions, teacher and student groups, and professional organizations have
been regularly attacked by the armed forces since 1954. The process of
demobilization of institutions threatening the dominant elites
culminated in the early 1980s, when by government proclamation “illicit
association” was made punishable by law. All groups “which follow, or
are subordinated to, any totalitarian system of ideology” (evidently an
exception is made of the Guatemalan armed forces and the
national-security ideology) are illicit. Only the armed forces determine
when illicitness occurs. If General Mejía Víctores finds the GAM mothers
to be agents of subversion, they may be killed (see chapter 2). Unions,
peasant groups, student and professional organizations have grown up
periodically in Guatemala, only to be crushed by systematic murder as
soon as their demands were pressed with any vigor. The 1984–85 elections
followed the greatest era of mass murder in modern Guatemalan
history—under the regimes of Lucas García, Ríos Montt, and Mejía
Víctores. Union membership in 1985 was below its 1950 level, and other
urban groups were decimated or inactive; the peasant majority was
totally demobilized and under the tight control and surveillance of the
military.

In Nicaragua, again the contrast with the two U.S. clients is marked.
Under Sandinista management there was a spurt in union and peasant
organization. A deliberate attempt was made to mobilize the population
to participate in decision-making at the local level and to interact
with higher-level leaders. Oxfam compliments the Nicaraguan government
highly for this effort, as we pointed out earlier.

There is legitimate debate over the extent to which the grass-roots and
other organizations sponsored by the ruling FSLN are independent, and
whether they might not be a vehicle for both state propaganda and
coercion. Oxfam America and its parent organization in London clearly
find them constructive. Luis Héctor Serra contends that the grass-roots
organizations are relatively autonomous, and that their close
relationship to the leadership of the FSLN “did not obstruct their
capacity to express the concerns of their members at the local level.”³⁵
He concludes that the popular organizations were “profoundly democratic”
in their effects of involving the populace in decision-making and
educating them on the possibilities of participation in public life.³⁶
The difference with the organization of the Guatemalan peasantry in
“poles of development,” where the essence of the organization was, quite
openly, military control by terror and enforced _nonparticipation_, is
quite dramatic, whatever one’s general assessment of the FSLN popular
organizations may be.

We conclude that on the third basic condition for a free election, El
Salvador and Guatemala did not qualify in the years 1984–85; Nicaragua
did, at least to a significant degree.³⁷

3.2.4. Freedom to organize parties, field candidates, and campaign for office

No party of the left could organize and present candidates in the 1982
and 1984 elections in El Salvador. The Democratic Front (FDR) had been
quickly driven underground. Five of its top leaders were seized in El
Salvador in November 1980 by official and paramilitary forces, and were
tortured, mutilated, and killed. A year before the March 1982 election,
the army published a list of 138 “traitors,” which included virtually
all politicians of the left and left-center. Colonel Gutiérrez, a
powerful member of the junta, had stated forcefully that the FDR could
not participate in the election because it was a “front” for the
guerrillas. The invitation to the FDR and the FMLN to lay down their
arms and compete in the election was thus fraudulent, a fact confirmed
by the admission of the U.S. embassy that the FDR could not safely
campaign in El Salvador, with the accompanying suggestion that they
might do so by means of videotapes sent in from outside the country’s
borders!³⁸ Subsequently, even Duarte, the preferred candidate of the
United States, was unable to campaign outside San Salvador in 1982 for
fear of murder, and scores of Christian Democratic politicans were
killed in the years 1980–84.³⁹ In short, not only radical but even
pro-U.S., mildly reformist parties could not escape decimation by
political murder during those years.

It should also be emphasized that no party could organize and run
candidates in El Salvador that put high priority on terminating the war
by negotiations with the rebels. What makes this especially important is
that reporters and observers were unanimous in 1982 that the main thing
the public wanted out of the election was peace. The propaganda formula
for getting out the vote in 1982 was “ballots versus bullets,” with the
implication that ballots were a possible route to a reduction in the use
of bullets. If, in fact, no peace candidate was eligible to run, the
election was a fraud for this reason alone.

Defenders of these elections have argued that there was a substantial
difference between the candidates, especially between D’Aubuisson and
Duarte, so that voters had a meaningful choice.⁴⁰ But D’Aubuisson and
Duarte did not disagree on the central issue of interest to the
Salvadoran people—whether to fight to win, or to strive for a negotiated
settlement with the rebels. Both were members of the war party, with
only tactical differences. Although Duarte made occasional demagogic
claims that he would talk with the rebels and bring about peace, he
never spelled out a peace-making agenda, never went beyond suggesting
“dialogue” (as opposed to “negotiations,” which imply the possibility of
substantive concessions), and never departed from the position that the
rebels should lay down their arms and participate in the new “democracy”
that Duarte and the army had established.

Duarte joined the junta at a moment of severe crisis in March 1980, when
all the progressive civilians had left and immediately after the murder
of the Christian Democratic attorney-general, Mario Zamora, by the newly
prospering death squads. It was clear that the army and affiliated death
squads had embarked on a policy of large-scale massacre. Duarte provided
the fig leaf and apologetics that the army needed for the second
_matanza_.⁴¹ We believe that Duarte never would have received U.S.
support and protection, and could not have survived in El Salvador,
unless he had made it clear that he was in basic accord with the aims of
the U.S. administration and the Salvadoran army. From 1980 onward,
Duarte always accepted fully the pursuit of a military solution and no
compromise with “the subversives” (a phrase that Duarte uses
continually, just as do the army and death-squad leaders). As Raymond
Bonner points out,

The repression in 1980 reached a magnitude surpassed only by the [first]
_matanza_ and was far worse than anything imagined under General
Romero.… By the end of the year the number [murdered] had reached at
least 9,000. Every day mutilated bodies, missing arms or heads, were
found: behind shopping centers; stuffed in burlap bags and left on dusty
rural roads; hurled over cliffs into ravines.⁴²

And through all of this, Duarte not only provided the facade of
“reform,” he regularly complimented the army for its loyal service. In a
letter published in the _Miami Herald_ on November 9, 1981, Duarte wrote
that

The armed forces are waging a heroic battle against a cruel and pitiless
enemy supported by great resources of ideological aggression. This goes
parallel with armed aggression.… This would be one more prey in the
conquest plan in the Central American region that Moscow has designed to
pursue. Immediately after that its greatest reward would be the North
American nation.…

In brief, the Salvadoran public was never offered the option that the
press itself acknowledged the voters craved.

In Guatemala, as in El Salvador, no parties of the left participated in
the 1984 election for a constituent assembly, and only one crippled
party made a tentative but wholly ineffectual foray in the 1985
presidential election.⁴³ The main guerrilla movements were, of course,
outside the electoral orbit. Their leaders would have been killed if
apprehended, but they would not have participated anyway without a
drastic alteration in basic social and electoral conditions.⁴⁴ Even a
centrist party like the Christian Democrats had suffered scores of
murders in the years 1980–83, and the current president of Guatemala,
the Christian Democrat Vinicio Cerezo, survived three known
assassination attempts. No seriously left party could have qualified in
1984–85 under the laws of “illicit association” mentioned earlier.

The peasant majority was not represented or spoken for by any candidate.
The Guatemalan Human Rights Commission, an organization not able to
function within Guatemala, has pointed out that national political
parties that speak for major groups like the working class or indigenous
people “do not exist and … as a result, these sectors are
institutionally excluded from the political system.”⁴⁵ Americas Watch
states that one of the civil-patrol system’s functions is “to provide
vigilance and control of the local population, preventing any form of
independent political organization.”⁴⁶ This exclusion of the peasantry
from any political opportunity was reflected in two ways in the 1984–85
elections. One was that in registering for the election, only 3 percent
of the electorate signed up as members of political parties. Another,
more compelling, is that no candidate in the election urged land reform,
although this was one of the two central issues in Guatemala (the other
being unconstrained army murder, also not an issue in the election,
given the understanding on all sides that the army will remain the
ruling force, whoever gains office).

As with Duarte in El Salvador, the presence of Vinicio Cerezo as a
candidate, and as the eventual winner in the 1985 election, raises the
question of whether, despite the constraints on the left, Cerezo did not
really offer a significant option to the voting public. Cerezo
differentiated himself from his electoral rivals, especially toward the
end of the campaign and the runoff, by expressing compassion for the
masses and a determination to make changes in the human-rights picture
and mass poverty. He occasionally mentioned the need for structural
reform, although he was not specific and stressed that the first
requirement was to reestablish civilian control. He was quite clear,
however, that if he were elected, his power would be nominal at first
and would have to be enlarged while he was in office:

The election will not bring automatic transfer of real power to the
president. There will be a handover of _formal_ power. What are my
chances of consolidating that power? Fifty-fifty.⁴⁷

During the election campaign, Cerezo never straightforwardly addressed
the question of land reform, and news reports in Guatemala suggested
that he had promised the landowners’ lobby that land reform was not on
his agenda.⁴⁸ Similarly, he did not promise any legal action against
those who had murdered thousands, nor did he say that he would dismantle
the counterinsurgency state. There would seem to have been at least a
tacit understanding between Cerezo and the military that he would
protect them against prosecution and preserve their power and relative
autonomy; in fact, he could not do otherwise and survive.⁴⁹ In the year
and a half that has elapsed since he took office, Cerezo has made no
meaningful move toward land reform, has supported the army vigorously
against any accounting, and has made no move to dismantle the civil
patrols, the development poles, and other features of institutionalized
terror.⁵⁰ The human-rights situation in Guatemala “remains terrible,”⁵¹
although improved (but partly because higher rates of killing are no
longer deemed beneficial). The poor, for whom he expressed so much
compassion during the electoral campaign, have suffered further losses
in real income, as Cerezo’s “reforms” have accommodated the demands of
the army and oligarchy. He is on very poor terms with the Mutual Support
Group. Thus, the postelection pattern shows that Cerezo, in part by
prior agreement but more decisively by structural constraints, has been
entirely unable to serve his mass constituency. In the 1984–85 election,
Cerezo gave the Guatemalan people an opportunity to vote for a man of
seeming goodwill and good intentions, but one unable to respond to
democratic demands opposed by the _real_ rulers of the state.

In Nicaragua, in 1984, the spectrum of candidates was much wider than in
El Salvador, Guatemala, or, for that matter, the United States.⁵² The
Conservative Democratic party and the Independent Liberal party both
issued strong calls for respect for private property, reduced government
control of the economy, elimination of press and other controls, and a
foreign policy of greater nonalignment and accommodation. Both were able
to denounce the Sandinistas for the war and to call for depoliticization
of the army and negotiations with the contras. Arturo Cruz, after
lengthy negotiations with representatives of the government, chose not
to run in the 1984 election. But this was a voluntary act of Cruz
(albeit under heavy U.S. pressure),⁵³ in contrast with the position of
the left in El Salvador and Guatemala, and was not based on physical
threats to his person or limits on his access to the populace.⁵⁴

The FSLN had a strong advantage over the opposition parties as the party
in power, defending the country from foreign attack and having mobilized
the population for their own projects of development. The LASA group
felt that much of the incumbency advantage of the FSLN was
characteristic of governments everywhere, and concluded:

It seems clear that the FSLN took substantial advantage of its incumbent
position and, in some ways, abused it. However, the abuses of incumbency
do not appear to have been systematic; and neither the nature of the
abuses nor their frequency was such as to cripple the opposition
parties’ campaigns or to cast doubt on the fundamental validity of the
electoral process.… Generally speaking, in this campaign the FSLN did
little more to take advantage of its incumbency than incumbent parties
everywhere (including the United States) routinely do, and considerably
_less_ than ruling parties in other Latin American countries
traditionally have done.⁵⁵

We would conclude that the ability of candidates to qualify and run, and
the range of options, was substantially greater in Nicaragua than in El
Salvador and Guatemala. Furthermore, as all major political groups of
the left were off the ballot by threat of violence in the latter two
cases, those elections fail to meet still another basic electoral
condition.

3.2.5. Absence of state terror and a climate of fear

During the years 1980–84 the death squads worked freely in El Salvador,
in close coordination with the army and security forces. The average
rate of killings of civilians in the thirty months prior to the 1982
election was approximately seven hundred per month. Many of these
victims were raped, tortured, and mutilated. All of this was done with
complete impunity, and only the murder of four American women
elicited—by dint of congressional pressure—any kind of legal action.
Even William Doherty of the American Institute for Free Labor
Development—a longtime supporter of U.S. policy in El Salvador—asserted
before a congressional committee that there was no system of justice
operative in that country, while Leonel Gómez, a former land-reform
official in El Salvador, told the same committee a bit later that state
terror had put the population in a state of “fearful passivity.”⁵⁶

In Guatemala, too, the endemic fear based on years of unconstrained and
continuing army violence was a dominant fact of national life. According
to Americas Watch, writing in early 1985,

Torture, killings, and disappearances continue at an extraordinary rate,
and millions of peasants remain under the strict scrutiny and control of
the government through the use of civil patrols and “model villages.”
Guatemala remains, in short, a nation of prisoners.⁵⁷

The law group described Guatemala in 1985 as “a country where the
greater part of the people live in permanent fear.”⁵⁸

In the case of Nicaragua, we repeat the central fact that differentiates
it from the U.S. client states: in 1984 its government was not murdering
civilians.⁵⁹ The main fear of ordinary citizens in Nicaragua was of
violence by the contras and the United States.

Our conclusion is that the fifth condition for a free election was met
in Nicaragua, but not in El Salvador and Guatemala. And our overall
finding is that neither El Salvador nor Guatemala met _any_ of the five
basic conditions of a free election, whereas Nicaragua met some of them
well, others to a lesser extent.


3.3. THE COERCION PACKAGES IN EL SALVADOR, GUATEMALA, AND NICARAGUA

As we noted, in the U.S. government’s sponsored elections, voter turnout
is interpreted as public support for the election and its sponsors. In
disapproved elections (here, Nicaragua), this frame is abandoned, and
voter turnout is either ignored or declared meaningless because of
limited options or coercive threats by the authorities. But the question
of coercive threats should clearly be raised in all cases where this is
a potential problem. As we have just described, the elections in El
Salvador were held under conditions of military rule where mass killings
of “subversives” had taken place and a climate of fear had been
established. If the government then sponsors an election and the local
military authorities urge people to vote, a significant part of the vote
should be assumed to be a result of built-in coercion. A propaganda
model would anticipate that the U.S. mass media make no such assumption,
and they did not.

In El Salvador in 1982 and 1984, voting was also required by law. The
law stipulated that failure to vote was to be penalized by a specific
monetary assessment, and it also called on local authorities to check
out whether voters did in fact vote. This could be done because at the
time of voting one’s identification card (ID, _cédula_) was stamped,
acknowledging the casting of a vote. Anybody stopped by the army and
police would have to show the ID card, which would quickly indicate
whether the individual had carried out his or her patriotic duty. Just
prior to the March 1982 election, Minister of Defense García warned the
population in the San Salvador newspapers that the failure to vote would
be regarded as an act of treason. And in the 1984 election, “Advertising
by the government and military prior to the elections stressed the
obligation to vote rather than the freedom to vote.”⁶⁰ Given the climate
of fear, the voting requirement, the ID stamp, the army warning, and the
army record in handling “traitors,” it is evident that the coercive
element in generating turnout in Salvadoran elections has been large.
This is supported by queries made by independent observers on the
reasons why Salvadorans voted.⁶¹

In Guatemala, as in El Salvador, voting was required by law; nonvoters
were subject to a fine of five _quetzales_ ($1.25). Also, as in El
Salvador, newspaper ads sponsored by the army asserted that it was
treasonous to fail to vote or to vote null or blank.⁶² The law group
reported that “many” people expressed fears that nonvoting would subject
them to reprisals, and after the military threats in the week before the
election there was “a widespread belief that failure to vote would be
punishable by more than the _five-quetzal_ fine stipulated by law.”⁶³

In Nicaragua, while registration was obligatory, _voting was not
required by law_. Voter-registration cards presented on election day
were retained by election officials, so that the failure to vote as
evidenced by the lack of a validated voter credential could not be used
as the basis of reprisals.⁶⁴ Most of the voters appeared to LASA
observers to be voting under no coercive threat—they did not have to
vote by law; they were urged to vote but not threatened with the
designation of “traitors” for not voting; there were no obvious means of
identifying nonvoters; and the government did not kill dissidents, in
contrast to the normal practice in El Salvador and Guatemala.

In sum, Nicaragua did not have a potent coercion package at work to help
get out the vote—as did the Salvadoran and Guatemalan governments.


3.4. EL SALVADOR: HOW THE U.S. MEDIA TRANSFORMED A “DERANGED KILLING MACHINE” INTO THE PROTECTOR OF AN INCIPIENT DEMOCRACY

In reporting on the 1982 Salvadoran election, the U.S. mass media
closely followed the government agenda. The personalities of the
candidates, the long lines waiting to vote, alleged rebel disruption,
and “turnout” were heavily featured.⁶⁵ As Jack Spence pointed out,
“every media outlet, particularly the networks, cast the election-day
story in a framework of voting in the midst of extensive guerrilla
violence at polling places.”⁶⁶ Warren Hoge and Richard Meislin, of the
_New York Times_, repeated day after day that the rebels were
threatening disruption, Hoge asserting that “The elections have taken on
a significance beyond their outcome because leftist guerrillas mounted a
campaign to disrupt them and discourage voters from going to the
polls.”⁶⁷ This is a precise statement of the government’s propaganda
frame. But Hoge and Meislin never once cited a rebel source vowing
disruption, and nobody else did, either. On election day no voters were
killed or polling stations attacked, and the general level of rebel
military activity was below average. In short, the disruption claims
were falsifications of both plans and election-day results, but as they
fit the patriotic agenda they were given prominence, repeated
frequently, and used to establish the contest between the forces of good
and evil.⁶⁸ At the election-day close, Dan Rather exclaimed, “A triumph!
A million people to the polls.” Rather did not regard it as a triumph
that the Sandinistas got 700,000 people to the polls—a higher proportion
of the population, and without a voting requirement. The propaganda
frame of the government gave turnout high importance in the Salvadoran
election but none in the Nicaraguan election, and Rather followed like a
good lap dog.

Neither Rather nor any other media analyst on or before March 30, 1982,
noted that voting was required by law in El Salvador, and not one
mentioned the warning by the defense minister, General Guillermo García,
in the San Salvador newspapers that nonvoting was treasonous.⁶⁹ The
basic parameters were entirely off the media agenda. The destruction of
_La Crónica_ and _El Independiente_ and the murder of twenty-six
journalists prior to the election were unmentioned in discussing the
election’s quality and meaning.⁷⁰ The army and its allies had been
killing civilians on a massive scale in El Salvador, for many months
before (and into) March 1982. Would this not create a climate of fear
and, in conjunction with a state of siege, somewhat encumber free debate
and free choice? The point was rarely even hinted at in the mass media.

Could candidates run freely and campaign without fear of murder? Could
the rebels qualify and run? After all, if it was a civil war, the rebels
were clearly the “main opposition.” Again, the mass media played dumb.
They pretended that this exclusion was not important, or that it
represented a willful boycott by the rebels rather than a refusal based
on conditions unfavorable to a free election and a blatantly stacked
deck. Neither the March 1981 death list nor the Gutierrez statement that
the FDR would not be permitted to run were mentioned by the mass media
in our sample. They never once suggested that the election _plan_ was to
create an electoral environment of extreme coercion and bias in which
the rebels could not run, and then use this for the dramatic game of
disruption and triumphant turnout. That the military agreed to the
election because it couldn’t lose was never suggested by these media.

The role of the army was summarized by Warren Hoge in the _New York
Times:_

Is the military playing any role in the election? Members of the
military are not allowed to vote, and the armed forces are pledged to
protect voters from violence and to respect the outcome of the
contest.⁷¹

We may note that the army’s mass killing of civilians and systematic
destruction and demobilization of virtually all popular organizations in
El Salvador over the preceding thirty months, which bears on what
Secretary of State Shultz referred to as the “preliminary aspects that
make an election mean something,” is not part of the army’s “role” for
Hoge and the _Times_. Hoge repeats the Salvadoran army’s pledge, not
only taking it at face value, but never suggesting that it (and the
election itself) was meaningless in a terror state where the “main
opposition” was off the ballot and only the war parties were able to
field candidates. In the propaganda framework, the security forces of
client states “protect elections”;⁷² only those of enemy states
interfere with the freedom of its citizens to vote without constraint.

As noted earlier, observers and reporters in El Salvador all agreed that
the populace was most eager for an end to the war, and government
propaganda even stressed that voting was an important vehicle to that
end—the public was urged to substitute “ballots for bullets.” But no
peace party was on the Salvadoran ballot. And after the election was
over, the war went on, and the death squads continued to flourish. This
is in accordance with the hypothesis that the real purpose of the
election was to placate the home population of the United States and
render them willing to fund more war and terror. It is a poor fit to the
hypothesis that the people of El Salvador had a free choice. An honest
press would point up the failure of the election to substitute “ballots
for bullets.” The mass media of the United States did not raise the
issue.

Nor did the experience of 1982 and its aftermath affect the media’s
willingness to follow the patriotic agenda once again in 1984. We will
return to this below in a statistical comparison of the _New York
Times’s_ coverage of the Salvadoran and Nicaraguan elections.


3.5. “FIRST STEP: GUATEMALA OPTS FOR MODERATION”⁷³

The U.S. government was less deeply involved in the Guatemalan elections
of 1984 and 1985 than it was in those held in El Salvador, but, as we
saw in chapter 2, the Reagan administration went to great pains to put a
favorable gloss on the murderous regimes of Lucas García, Ríos Montt,
and Mejía Víctores, and to attempt to reintegrate them fully into the
free-world alliance.⁷⁴ It encouraged the 1984–85 elections, provided
advisory and financial support for election management, and gave
public-relations assistance and sent official observers to help put the
election in a favorable light. There was little effort made to disguise
the fact that the purpose of the election, from the standpoint of the
Reagan administration and the ruling army, was to alter the
international “image” of Guatemala in order to facilitate aid and loans.

With the administration supporting the new look, but without the
intensity of commitment and propaganda backup brought to bear in El
Salvador, and given the steady stream of reports of ongoing mass murder
in Guatemala, a propaganda model would anticipate a media response that
put the Guatemalan elections in a favorable light, but with
qualifications. There was, in fact, far less coverage than of the
Salvadoran election; what there was had a little more “balance,” but the
apologetic framework was still overwhelmingly dominant.

A telling manifestation of bias was the media’s ready acceptance of the
Guatemalan elections as meaningful, even though they were admittedly for
image-making, in a context of long-standing army rule and massacre, and
despite new institutional arrangements in the countryside—the massive
relocations of the population, the “model villages,” and the
civil-defense patrols—that were, on their face, incompatible with a free
election. In an enemy state where an election was held under comparable
conditions, it would be designated a meaningless public-relations
exercise.⁷⁵ In the case of Guatemala, however, the civil patrols and
ongoing massacres were rarely mentioned, sources that addressed these
matters were ignored, and the overall tone of the news was cautiously
hopeful and optimistic. It was the consensus that the 1984 election for
a constituent assembly was “encouraging” and an important first step,
and that the 1985 presidential election _“ended_ [emphasis added] more
than 30 years of military domination” (_Newsweek_, Jan. 17, 1986). Dan
Rather, on CBS News, reported that Cerezo became Guatemala’s “first
civilian leader after thirty years of almost uninterrupted military
rule” (Dec. 9, 1985). This is ambiguous, but the implication, directly
asserted by _Newsweek_, is that Cerezo, not the army, _rules_. Julio
Méndez Montenegro was a civilian president from 1966 to 1970, but he did
not rule, and he was eventually discredited by the fact that he presided
over a huge escalation of army violence. Given the earlier experience,
the fact that the generals had made it clear that the civilian
government was “a project” of the military,⁷⁶ and Cerezo’s own expressed
reservations about his power, objective news reporting would have been
careful about an alleged _ending_ of military rule.

As in the case of El Salvador, the murderous rule of the Guatemalan
generals did not delegitimize them for the U.S. mass media nor suggest
any possible justice to the rebel cause. _Time_ noted (Feb. 27, 1984)
that a leftist insurgency “poses a permanent challenge to the regime,”
but it did not inquire into the roots of this insurgency or suggest that
its leaders constituted a “main opposition” whose ability to run would
be an “acid test” of election integrity (as they pronounced in
Nicaragua). _Time_ also did not observe that the regime poses a
permanent challenge to the survival of its population. The mass murders
of the Guatemalan state were even semi-justified by the unquestioned
need to quell insurgents—“Much of the killing,” says _Time_, “is linked
to Mejía’s success against the insurgents.” The phrase “linked to” is an
apologetic euphemism to obscure the fact that Mejía’s “success” was
based on the mass murder of men, women, and children in literally
hundreds of destroyed villages.⁷⁷ Mejía has a “mixed record,” with the
mass murder offset by “improvements in some important areas” (the State
Department, quoted by _Time_). Mejía, says _Time_, “won support because
he has kept the promises he made after seizing power.” _Time_ never
explains how it determined that Mejía “won support,” or from whom, other
than the U.S. State Department. Was the press then free to speak out?
Did a system of justice come into being?

In chapter 2 we summarized Americas Watch’s demonstration that the
Reagan administration made serial adjustments in its apologetics for
each successive Guatemalan terrorist general, _with a lagged, tacit
acknowledgment that it had previously been lying_. This has no influence
whatsoever on _Time’s_ treatment of State Department pronouncements as
authentic truth—the standard from which other claims may be evaluated.
Thus _Time_ says that “Americas Watch, a controversial group that is
often accused of being too sympathetic to the left, called Guatemala ‘a
nation of prisoners.’ ” _Time_ doesn’t independently evaluate the
quality of sources—the State Department is unchallenged because it
expounds the official and patriotic truth. Americas Watch is denigrated
(and only rarely cited, even with a dismissing put-down) because it
challenges official propaganda. _Pravda_ could hardly be more
subservient to state demands than _Time_ in its coverage of
demonstration elections.⁷⁸

The mass media’s sourcing on the Guatemalan election was confined almost
entirely to U.S. officials and official observers, the most prominent
Guatemalan political candidates, and generals. Spokespersons for the
insurgents—what in Nicaragua would be labeled the “main opposition”—the
smaller parties, spokespersons for popular organizations, the churches,
human-rights groups, and ordinary citizens, were essentially ignored by
the media. _Time, Newsweek_ and CBS News almost never talked to ordinary
citizens or spokespersons for the insurgents. Stephen Kinzer, in the
_Times_, had only one citation to a rebel source in several dozen
articles on Guatemala during the election periods, although on election
day in 1984 he did speak with a number of ordinary citizens (who gave a
much less optimistic view than Kinzer’s usual sources).

The restricted menu of media sources flows from and reinforces the
media’s propensity to adopt a patriotic agenda. U.S. government
officials and observers are always optimistic and hopeful in their
statements about sponsored elections. The leading contestant politicians
are also moderately optimistic, as they have a good chance of acquiring
at least nominal power. They do, however, express occasional doubts
about whether the army will relinquish power. This allows the election
drama to assume a slightly different character from that in El Salvador,
where it was the democratic army “protecting the election” versus the
undemocratic rebels who refused to lay down their arms and participate.
In Guatemala, the frame was: Will the generals keep their promise to
stay in the barracks? The triumph is that they _do_ stay in the
barracks—a civilian president takes office and now “rules.” The media
then quickly drop the subject, so that whether the army really does
relinquish power to the civilian leaders is never checked out (just as
the “peace” sought by the populace in El Salvador was never considered
in retrospect). In Poland, in January 1947, and Nicaragua, in 1984, and
in enemy states generally, the focus was on the _substance_ of power,
and the extent to which that power shaped the electoral results in
advance, as by limiting the ability of important constituencies to run
for office and compete effectively. Not so for Guatemala.

If the mass media had enlarged their sources, fundamental conditions
would have assumed greater prominence. For example, before both the July
1, 1984, and December 1985 elections in Guatemala, the Guatemala
Bishops’ Conference issued pastoral statements that suggested in no
uncertain terms and with detailed arguments that conditions in the
country were incompatible with a free election. Its pastoral letter of
June 8, 1984, focused on the civil-defense patrols as “susceptible to
manipulation,” and it discussed the disappearances, “insatiable
corruption,” and the fact that sociopolitical structures are “not
capable of promoting the welfare of the whole society.”⁷⁹ Stephen Kinzer
mentioned this report in a _Times_ news article of July 22, 1984, but
his reference is made _after_ the election of July 1, and Kinzer did not
use it to frame the discussion of electoral conditions and to arrive at
an assessment of the quality of the election. Furthermore, his summary
of the twenty-seven-page report, that it “denounced torture, electoral
fraud, concentration of wealth and ‘massacres of entire families,’ ”
ignores the quite specific critique of the conditions bearing on an
election. _Time_ mentioned this pastoral letter briefly; _Newsweek_ and
CBS News never mentioned it.

In connection with the 1985 election, the bishops put forth another
powerful statement, once again questioning whether an election can be
meaningful in “a situation close to slavery and desperation.”⁸⁰ They
point out that the civil-defense patrols, the “ideology of national
security,” and hunger and impoverishment are not conducive to serious
elections:

In order that the longed-for results be obtained, there must be not only
the freedom at the moment of casting one’s vote, but also a whole series
of particular social, political and economic conditions which are,
unfortunately, not happening in Guatemala. In effect there still persist
in Guatemala harsh violence, lack of respect for human rights and the
breaking of basic laws. It is a fact that any citizen pressured,
terrorized or threatened is not fully able to exercise his/her right to
vote or to be elected conscientiously.

This letter was not mentioned in the major media or anywhere else, to
our knowledge, although the bishops are conservative, credible, and one
of the few organized bodies in Guatemala not crushed by state terror.

There were other dissenting voices in Guatemala—politicians of the
lesser parties, union officials, human-rights groups, lawyers, and
jurists—who spoke out occasionally on the limits to free electoral
conditions in Guatemala. And there were events of note that threw a
powerful light on the subject. Most of these were blacked out in the
U.S. mass media. For example,⁸¹ on July 4, 1984, the Guatemalan Human
Rights Commission issued a statement in Mexico saying that the
election’s meaning should be viewed in the context of three important
facts: namely, that the requirements for a meaningful election
stipulated by the United Nations in a March 14 statement had not been
met; that the left had been excluded from participation in the election;
and that 115 persons had been murdered or disappeared in the thirty days
prior to the election of July 1. This statement, and the facts cited by
the commission, were ignored in the U.S. press.

Consider also the following facts: On May 3, General Oscar Mejía
Víctores removed Ricardo Sagastume Vidaure from his position as
president of the judiciary and the supreme court. On April 11, the
judiciary had issued writs of habeas corpus on behalf of 157 kidnapped
individuals, and Sagastume had protested to Mejía Víctores over the
difficulty in proceeding against military abuses. On May 4, Acisco
Valladares Molina, head of the Populist party, noted that Sagastume had
been “fired like a simple subordinate.” On May 8, a communiqué from the
Guatemalan bar association stated that in Guatemala there is no rule of
law, as demonstrated by the constant violation of human rights and
uncontrolled exercise of arbitrary power. By May 8, at least sixteen
judicary officials, including supreme court and court of appeals
magistrates, had resigned in protest at Sagustume’s removal.

Stephen Kinzer never discussed any of these events, or their meaning, in
the _Times_, nor did any of his colleagues elsewhere in the mass media.
This is in accord with our hypothesis that in elections held in client
states, fundamental electoral conditions, such as the presence or
absence of the rule of law, are off the agenda. The point applies to
other relevant structural conditions. Thus, while Kinzer occasionally
mentioned the civil-defense patrols, he never described them and their
operations in any detail or tied them in with other institutional
structures of control, and he failed to relate them in a systematic way
to army power. The numerous reports on these coercive institutions and
their terrorist role by Amnesty International, Americas Watch, and the
British Parliamentary Human Rights Group were almost never cited by
Kinzer in providing facts relevant to the Guatemalan elections. Although
the constituent assembly elected in 1984 produced a new constitution,
Kinzer never once discussed the nature of this instrument, which
validated the special army role and structural constraints on freedom of
the press.

Kinzer was reporting news in a way that fit the _Times’_s editorial
position and the U.S. government agenda. The _Times_ editorial frame was
that “The military, in power for most of 31 years, has honored its
promise to permit the free election of a civilian president.”⁸² Kinzer’s
news articles of the same period convey the same message—one of them is
entitled “After 30 Years Democracy Gets a Chance in Guatemala” (Nov. 10,
1985)—which accurately summarizes the contents, although they contain an
undercurrent of reserved final judgment. That central message was false,
however, if the basic conditions of a free election were not met, if the
army’s power remained unimpaired, and if these were confirmed in a
written constitution that allows the army freedom from the rule of law
and a license to kill without constraint from the nominal “democracy.”⁸³
Kinzer could only convey this false message by ignoring the Sagastume
case, the institutional arrangements of the counterinsurgency state, the
ongoing murders, and the omnipresent fear—i.e., the basic conditions of
a free election—and by laying stress instead on expressions of hope,
orderliness of the election processes, and army promises—i.e., the
government’s propaganda agenda in a demonstration election.

In what must be one of the low points of his journalistic career, in an
article of December 27, 1985 (“Guatemala Vote Heartens Nicaragua
Parties”), Kinzer even implies that the Guatemala election establishes
an electoral model for Nicaragua. He describes a Cerezo visit to
Nicaragua, in which Kinzer features the encouragement Cerezo gives to
the dissident parties that perhaps the power of the Sandinistas can be
broken by patience (implying that Cerezo had broken the power of the
army in Guatemala and was in full command). The article closes with a
quote from an opposition figure: “Ortega is now the last President in
Central America who wears a military uniform, and the contrast is going
to be evident.” Nowhere in the article does Kinzer point out that army
power can not be read from whether the head of state wears a uniform, or
that the rule of the army in Guatemala has not yet been overcome. He
does not refer to the fact that the Guatemalan army has killed tens of
thousands of ordinary civilians. Nor does he show any recognition of the
fact that the election held in Nicaragua was much more open than that
held in Guatemala. On the contrary, this is a fact that the media,
including the _New York Times_, explicitly and consistently deny, in
accordance with state imperatives.

As in the case of El Salvador, the U.S. mass media never suggested that
the exclusion of the Guatemalan insurgent groups rendered the Guatemalan
election meaningless. Kinzer several times mentioned with extreme
brevity that the left was off the ballot, but he never asked anybody to
discuss the meaning of this in terms of the options available to the
various segments of society. As coauthor of an important book on this
topic, Kinzer is well aware of the facts.⁸⁴ The vast majority of
Guatemalans are very poor, and they have been entirely excluded from
political participation or representation since 1954. The insurgency
grew out of the parlous condition and exploitation of that mass, and the
absence of any possibility of a democratic process to alleviate
injustice and misery. The ruling army had allowed only parties to run
and civilians to hold office who agreed, tacitly or explicitly, to keep
off the policy agenda all matters of central concern to the impoverished
majority. There is no way to measure the strength of popular support for
the insurgents, but in light of the fact that they espouse programs well
oriented to the interests of the general population and have been able
to maintain an insurgency without significant external aid, and that the
army response has been a war against virtually the entire rural
population, the rebel claim to be a “main opposition” would appear to be
stronger than that of Arturo Cruz and his upper-class Nicaraguan
associates. And if the rebels—or any candidates who would threaten the
army and oligarchy in ways appealing to the majority—cannot qualify in a
Guatemalan election, is it not essentially fraudulent? This was strongly
suggested in both 1984 and 1985 by the Guatemalan Bishops’ Conference,
but this respectable source, in contrast with Arturo Cruz and Robert
Leiken, is blacked out. As with El Salvador, the election was not
evaluated, either in advance or in retrospect, on the basis of whether
or not the fundamental requirements of a free election were met. For the
U.S. government, the insurgents were not a main opposition, Guatemalan
state terror was merely a public-relations inconvenience, and the
elections were fair. The mass media’s treatment of the Guatemalan
election reflected well this government propaganda agenda.


3.6. NICARAGUA: MEDIA SERVICE IN THE DELEGITIMIZING PROCESS

In contrast with the Salvadoran and Guatemalan cases, the Reagan
administration was intent on discrediting the Nicaraguan election, which
threatened to legitimize the Sandinista government and thus weaken the
case for U.S. funding of a terrorist army. The administration had been
berating the Sandinistas for failing to hold an election, but the actual
holding of one was inconvenient. From the inception of Nicaraguan
planning for the election, therefore, the administration began to
express doubts about its quality. And just as it devoted itself to
creating a positive image of the two client-state elections, so it
expended substantial resources to depict the Nicaraguan election in the
worst possible light. The media dutifully followed course, as a
propaganda model predicts.

The mass media failed to call attention to the cynicism of first
assailing Nicaragua for failing to hold an election, and then striving
to have the election either postponed or discredited.⁸⁵ _Time_ even
cites the absence of “official delegations [of observers] from the major
western democracies” (Nov. 19, 1984), as if this were evidence of
something discreditable in the election, rather than as a reflection of
U.S. power. There were 450-odd foreign observers in attendance at the
Nicaraguan election, some with superb credentials, observing more freely
and at greater length than the official U.S. observers in El Salvador
and Guatemala. _Time_ and the rest of the mass media paid no attention
to them.⁸⁶

Stephen Kinzer’s use of observers is noteworthy. In the case of
Nicaragua, he completely ignored the unofficial observers—many
exceedingly well qualified to observe, as we have noted—and he even
ignored the official Dutch government team, drawn from the center-right
and highly apologetic about atrocities in El Salvador, which observed
both the Salvadoran and the Nicaraguan elections and concluded that the
elections in Nicaragua “were more open than in El Salvador, in the sense
that more people were able to take part; that the opposition did not
fear for their lives”; and that “the legitimation of the regime is thus
confirmed.”⁸⁷ In Guatemala, by contrast, he cited the official observer
report in both the 1984 and 1985 elections, despite their great bias and
superficiality (see the report discussed in appendix 1). In the 1984
Guatemala election, Kinzer did refer to the report of the unofficial
Human Rights Law Group that we cited earlier, quoting their statement
that the voting process was “procedurally correct,” but neglecting to
note here and elsewhere their numerous statements to the effect that
“the greater part of the population lives in permanent fear” (p. 4), so
that “procedural correctness” has little meaning.

With no U.S.-government-designated official observers available in
Nicaragua, the media relied even more heavily than usual on U.S.
government handouts. It is enlightening to compare this conduited
propaganda of the mass media with the findings of foreign-observer teams
on the scene in Nicaragua. For the purpose of this comparison, which
follows, we will use two such reports. One, that of the Irish
Inter-Party Parliamentary Delegation, is _The Elections in Nicaragua,
November 1984_. The delegation was composed of four individuals, three
from right-wing or moderate-right political parties, who spent seventeen
days in Nicaragua at the time of the election. We will also use as a
basis of comparison of media coverage the previously cited report of the
15-member delegation sent by the Latin American Studies Association
(LASA), half of whom had had “substantial field experience” in Nicaragua
itself. This delegation spent eight days in Nicaragua before the
election, traveled in a rented bus, determined their own itinerary, and
“spoke with anyone who we chose to approach (as well as numerous people
who spontaneously approached us).”⁸⁸

3.6.1. Tone of negativism and apathy

_Time_ magazine hardly attempts to hide the fact that it takes its cues
from Washington. It quotes John Hughes, then a public-relations man for
the State Department (and previously, and subsequently, a columnist for
the _Christian Science Monitor_)_:_ “It was not a very good election.…
It was just a piece of theatre for the Sandinistas.”⁸⁹ _Time_ follows
this cue with a series of denigrating strokes: “The Sandinistas win, as
expected.… The Nicaraguan election mood was one of indifference.… The
outcome was never in doubt.… Something of an anticlimax” (all in the
issue of November 19, 1984). In an earlier article (October 29), _Time_
indulged in the same negative refrain: “A campaign without suspense,”
voters “too apathetic to go to the polls at all” (this was a forecast
dredged up well before the election). In both articles, “fear” was also
featured heavily. In the Salvadoran election, _Time’s_ tone was
different: “There was no denying the remarkable sense of occasion”
(i.e., the Reagan administration had a big public-relations investment
in the election); “hundreds of thousands … braved the threats, and
sometimes the bullets, of the Marxist-led [FMLN] to join long serpentine
polling lines for the country’s much awaited presidential elections”
(Apr. 9, 1984).⁹⁰ In Guatemala too, “Some 1.8 million voters braved
four-hour polling lines, tropical rainstorms and a bewildering array of
political choices to cast ballots in their country’s most open and
fraud-free elections in more than a decade” (July 16, 1984). There is
never apathy or fear of _government_ force in _Time_’s renditions of
demonstration elections.

Stephen Kinzer, in the _Times_, also took a far less kindly view of the
election in Nicaragua than of those in Guatemala, giving enormous
attention to election opponents like the U.S. candidate Arturo Cruz
(whereas in Guatemala he almost completely ignored the small parties,
union protesters, rebels, and human-rights groups), and finding more
people voting out of fear than he did in Guatemala, a remarkable
discovery given the circumstances in the two countries.⁹¹ He focuses
steadily on the Sandinistas’ efforts to get out the vote, the fact that
the election result is a foregone conclusion, claims of the breaking up
of election rallies, and allegations of unfairness and withdrawals by
the opposition. As with _Time_, the voters are “philosophical,”
“enthusiasm for the election was not universal,” and “there was little
visible enthusiasm.” Kinzer did not compare the electoral modalities,
range of options, or other basic conditions in Nicaragua and Guatemala
(or El Salvador). In short, he discussed different questions in his news
reporting on the elections in Nicaragua and Guatemala, adhering closely
to the propaganda frame.⁹²

On the alleged negativism and apathy, both the Irish and LASA
delegations noted that voting was not required in Nicaragua and was
entirely secret. Therefore, as the Irish delegation pointed out, the low
rate of abstention is more meaningful and “invalidates predictions that
large sectors of the population were opposed to the election.
Furthermore, the percentage of spoiled votes (7.4 percent) is comparable
to any European election in a country with a highly literate population”
(p. 7). They also note that

Speaking with one old man, awaiting his turn to vote in a rural polling
station, one member of the delegation inquired: “What difference do you
see between this and any other election in which you voted?” He replied:
“Everything.” “In what way?” He simply shrugged: “Everything is
different.”

The U.S. media never located anybody like this old man. The Irish
delegation also pointed out that

Some observers from other countries suggested that the people did not
appear enthusiastic as they went to the polls. This is not surprising as
people stood in long queues waiting patiently their turn to go behind
the curtain to mark their ballot paper. One member of the delegation who
had the opportunity to observe voters in the American election just two
days later, noted no greater enthusiasm for standing in queues there!

It is our belief that the invariable enthusiasm and optimism found by
the U.S. mass media in client-state elections, and the apathy and
negativism found in elections in states disfavored by the U.S.
administration, has nothing to do with electoral realities and must be
explained entirely by an imposed propaganda agenda and the filtering out
of contrary opinion and information.

3.6.2. Ignoring the superior quality of the Nicaraguan election

In the propaganda format, a great deal of attention is paid to the
mechanical properties of elections in client states, but not in states
whose elections are being denigrated. This was true in the cases under
discussion. _Time_ (Apr. 9, 1984) described in detail the elaborate
electoral preparations in El Salvador, the “tamper-proof” procedures,
the use of transparent Lucite ballot boxes, and the indelible-ink
marking and stamping of ID cards. It turned out, however, that the
high-tech, computerized voting procedures weren’t understood by the
population, more than half of whom were illiterate. At no point did
_Time_, or its media colleagues, raise any question about the importance
of improving literacy as a necessary prelude to an election; nor did
they suggest that the Lucite boxes might compromise the secrecy of the
vote, or that the stamped ID card might be a coercive instrument helping
to explain turnout.

Nicaragua went to great pains to provide for election secrecy, and for
an easy and intelligible system of voting. For one thing, they had a
massive literacy campaign before the election, making electoral printed
matter generally accessible. Both the Irish and LASA delegations mention
this as an electoral plus. Nicaragua also put a high priority on getting
a complete registration list and getting the voters registered. The
Irish delegation noted that “Recent elections in other Central American
countries such as El Salvador and Guatemala did not introduce such
measures, and there was considerable debate concerning the validity of
their registers, which were based on out-of-date census figures,
incomplete official registers of population changes, and other sources”
(p. 5). Nicaragua also deliberately avoided transparent ballot boxes, ID
stamping, and any other mechanism that would allow the authorities to
identify whether or how somebody had voted. LASA points out that

The ballots were also printed on heavy opaque white paper. The contrast
with Somoza-era elections is striking. The Somozas used translucent
ballots, so virtually everyone assumed that their ballot was not secret.
The same problem occurred in the 1984 elections in El Salvador, where
thin-paper ballots were deposited in transparent ballot boxes. The vote
in Nicaragua in 1984 was truly a _secret_ ballot (p. 14).

In Nicaragua, also, there was proportional voting, which made it
possible for the smaller parties to obtain legislative representation.
Parties could also qualify quite easily to participate in the election.
In Guatemala, 4,000 signatures were needed to qualify in 1984, a large
number and not easy for dissident parties to collect in a society with
daily political murders.

Stephen Kinzer and his associates never mentioned these differences.
More generally, the substantial merits of the Nicaraguan elections were
never contrasted with the procedures in the U.S. client states, a
comparison that would have been most revealing and that would have
thoroughly undermined the Reagan agenda to which the media were
committed in their reporting of the election. _Time_, as noted, mentions
the compromised Salvadoran procedures as if they were meritorious. The
_Times_ mentioned the transparent voting boxes in El Salvador only once
(Richard Meislin, on March 25, 1984), repeating without question the
official line that the purpose of the translucent boxes was to prevent
fraud. Any other possibility is unmentioned. _Newsweek_ and CBS News
ignored these matters.

3.6.3. Rebel disruption into the black hole; turnout no longer an index of triumph of democracy

In the Salvadoran election, rebel disruption was a central feature of
the government’s propaganda frame. Because the rebels opposed the
election, voting by the people proved their rejection of the rebels and
approval of the army. Turnout was the index of democratic triumph and
rebel defeat. As we saw, the mass media followed this frame without
question. In the case of Nicaragua, the propaganda format was
reversed—the rebels were the good guys, and the election held by the bad
guys was condemned in advance. Rebel opposition to the election—and
efforts at disruption—did not make voting and a large turnout a
repudiation of the rebels and approval of the Sandinistas.

The U.S. mass media once again followed the government agenda, _even
though it meant an exact reversal of the standards they had applied in
the Salvadoran election_. The contras and their supporters urged the
public not to vote, and interfered with the election process with at
least as much vigor as (and with more killings than) the rebels in El
Salvador. Furthermore, voting was more assuredly secret and the citizens
were not required to vote, or to have ID cards stamped indicating that
they had. And the Sandinistas did not kill ordinary citizens on a daily
basis, as was true in the “death-squad democracies.” Thus turnout was
far more meaningful in the Nicaraguan election than in the ones held in
El Salvador and Guatemala—the public was free to abstain as well as to
vote for opposition parties.

The U.S. mass media disposed of this problem mainly by massive
suppression. They simply ignored the contra-U.S. campaign for
abstention, waged with threats and attacks on polling places and
election workers; and they buried the fact of an effectively secret vote
and the right _not_ to vote,⁹³ just as, in parallel, they had inflated
rebel disruption efforts in El Salvador in 1982 and 1984 and buried the
voting _requirement_ and other pressures to vote.

Although the _New York Times_ had gone out of its way to focus on the
“challenge” of rebel opposition and alleged disruption as giving turnout
special meaning in the Salvadoran election of 1982,⁹⁴ Stephen Kinzer
never once mentioned that the contras attacked a number of polling
stations and had issued radio appeals for abstention.⁹⁵ For Kinzer,
neither these facts nor the U.S. campaign to discredit were seen as
posing a “challenge” that made turnout meaningful in Nicaragua.

The Irish delegation pointed out that “The Parties of the Democratic
Coordinating Committee [based in the business community] opposed the
voter registration, and called for a boycott of this process” (p. 5),
and it noted that eleven polling stations were closed down by
counterrevolutionary activities (p. 7). The public voted in large
numbers “despite the possible dangers involved,” which suggested to the
Irish delegation that turnout was significant and “showed how important
the election was to the people” (p. 6). LASA pointed out the various
ways in which the “main opposition” called for voter abstention, and
cited the radio warnings broadcast into the country from Costa Rica
threatening that voters would be killed by the contras (pp. 16, 28).
LASA also pointed out that “voter turnout was heavy,” with “more
enthusiasm among voters in low-income areas than in more affluent
neighborhoods.”⁹⁶ Like _Time_, LASA notes that the turnout did not quite
realize the expectations of FSLN officials, but unlike _Time_, LASA
points out that the rate of participation achieved “compares very
favorably with the rates achieved in 11 other recent Latin American
elections, as well as the 1984 U.S. presidential election …” (p. 16).⁹⁷

In sum, the two observer reports discuss rebel disruption in Nicaragua,
turnout, and the meaning of that turnout. The U.S. mass media, which had
featured these matters heavily in reference to the Salvadoran
election—where they fitted the government’s propaganda agenda—found them
entirely unnewsworthy as regards Nicaragua.

3.6.4. The revived sensitivity to coercion

As we described earlier, the “coercion package” was off the agenda for
the U.S. government and mass media in addressing the Salvadoran and
Guatemalan elections. So was the element of fear engendered by mass
murder and the absence of any rule of law in these U.S. client states.
Coercion and fear were back on the agenda, however, for Nicaragua. This
revival was illustrated with amazing dishonesty and hypocrisy in _Time_,
which had never mentioned fear and pressures from the government as
factors possibly explaining turnout in the U.S.-sponsored elections,
even after the murder of 50,000 civilians. In Nicaragua, however, the
“pugnacious” Sandinistas had “an awesome monopoly of force,” and getting
them to “relax their grip,” which was “essential for free electoral
competition,” was extremely dubious. _Time’_s Central American
correspondent George Russell even located a “Latin American diplomat”
who says, “You can’t have democracy where there is no personal liberty
at all” (Oct. 8 and May 14, 1984). Russell and _Time_ had never found
the Salvadoran government “pugnacious,” with any “awesome monopoly of
force,” or as having a “grip” that needed relaxing for electoral
competition, and personal liberty was never mentioned as lacking or even
pertinent to Salvadoran elections. For the Nicaraguan election, however,
_Time_ found that “The pressure to participate was high: many citizens
feared they would lose precious rationing cards.” Further, “the
government had made it clear that it considered failure to vote a
counterrevolutionary stance.” Later, quoting Daniel Ortega, “All
Nicaraguans who are Nicaraguans are going to vote. The only ones who are
not going to vote are sellouts” (Nov. 19, 1984).

As we pointed out earlier, both the Guatemalan and Salvadoran army
warned the public that voting was required by law and that nonvoting was
treasonous. These statements were more precisely _warnings_, __ whereas
Ortega’s was an insult but not a clear threat. Ortega’s was the only
such statement of its kind reported, and _Time’_s statement that the
government “made it clear” that nonvoting was “counterrevolutionary” is
doubly dishonest—the statement was not clearly a warning, and
“counterrevolutionary” is an invidious word concocted by _Time_. The
official government position _as expressed in the law_ was that
Nicaraguans did not have to vote. _Time_ suppresses this fact. It
suppresses the secrecy of the ballot and absence of a checkable ID card,
so that there would have been no way to implement a threat even if one
had been made. It suppresses the fact that the Nicaraguan army did not
regularly murder even “counterrevolutionaries,” whereas the Salvadoran
and Guatemalan armies murdered numerous people who weren’t
“revolutionaries” but were somehow in the way. In short, propaganda
could hardly be more brazen.

_Time’_s alleged “fact,” that “many” people feared the removal of the
rationing card, is contested by LASA, which states that “in our
interviews in many neighborhoods in several cities, we found no evidence
that ration cards were being held back or withdrawn … for _any_ reason.”
They note that there were five reports filed with the supreme electoral
council alleging intimidation by threat of withdrawal of ration cards,
“but none of these allegations were sustained upon investigation” (p.
27). _Time_ does not indicate the source of its evidence and fails to
provide a single illustration of the “many” cases.

We noted earlier that Stephen Kinzer cited more claims of coercion in
the Nicaraguan than the Guatemalan elections, a remarkable journalistic
achievement, given the unchallenged facts about the actual scale and
character of repression in the two states. His playing down of state
terror in Guatemala as a basic factor affecting the quality of the
election in all its dimensions—the ability of candidates to run, freedom
of speech and press, the existence of intermediate groups, endemic fear,
and the meaning of turnout—amounts to massive deceit. His Nicaraguan
coverage also involved large-scale misrepresentation. He did not point
out the _absence_ of mass killings, and he failed to mention the absence
of a coercion package—no transparent boxes, no requirement that an ID
card be stamped, and no legal obligation to vote. Kinzer’s one notice of
the voting requirement in his fourteen articles on the election amounts
to serious deception—he quotes a voter as follows: “ ‘I’ve always voted
because it is always required,’ he said. ‘Of course, the law says one
thing, but after a while one realizes that voting is part of patriotism,
and patriotism leads to long life.’ ”⁹⁸ Kinzer’s source implies but
doesn’t say directly that voting is not legally required in Nicaragua,
and this murky statement—the closest Kinzer ever comes to acknowledging
the absence of a voting requirement—is counter-balanced by his
respondent’s suggestion that voting may be based on some kind of threat.

Both the Irish and LASA delegations stressed the superior protection of
secrecy in the balloting, which, in LASA’s words, was “meticulously
designed to minimize the potential for abuses” (p. 15). They also
emphasized the fact that voting was not required by law, and that,
contrary to the U.S. government propaganda expounded by _Time_ and other
media entities, the coercive elements in getting out the vote were
small. Human-rights abuses by the government that contribute to an
environment of fear, LASA pointed out, were “on a very small scale” when
“compared to other nations in the region …” (p. 28). In fact, they note
that fear in Nicaragua is directed more to the United States and the
contras than to the government in Managua.

3.6.5. The “main opposition” to the fore

As we saw, in El Salvador and Guatemala, the fact that the insurgents
were off the ballot did not faze the U.S. media one bit. Neither did
Duarte’s acknowledgment in 1981 that “the masses were with the
guerrillas” when he joined the junta a year earlier (which would clearly
make them a “main opposition”).⁹⁹ Nor were the media affected by the
army’s murder of the opposition leadership in both El Salvador and
Guatemala. In El Salvador, the exclusion of the rebels was part of the
U.S. government’s electoral plan; they were, therefore, not a “main
opposition,” and the debarment and even murder of their leaders did not
compromise election quality. In the Nicaraguan case, in sharp contrast,
the U.S. government worked with a different frame—the exclusion of its
sponsored rebels and any other candidates was a serious matter that
threatened the quality of the election. The media followed like good
little doggies (lap- rather than watch-).

The central dramatic propaganda line for the Nicaraguan election pressed
by U.S. officials was the alleged struggle of Arturo Cruz to induce the
Sandinistas to create an open system in which he would be able to
compete fairly, the failure of the “Marxists-Leninists” to make adequate
concessions, Cruz’s refusal to compete, and the subsequent “exclusion”
of the “main opposition.” Cruz, however, was a “main opposition” only in
the propaganda construct of the U.S. government and mass media. A
longtime expatriate (who now concedes that he was on the CIA payroll),
with no mass base in Nicaragua, Cruz would almost certainly have done
poorly in a free election.¹⁰⁰ There is good reason to believe that Cruz
never intended to run, but that he and his sponsors had held out this
possibility precisely to allow the propaganda frame to be used
effectively.¹⁰¹

The mass media focused on the Cruz drama heavily and uncritically. Cruz
was given enormous play: he was continually referred to as the “main
opposition” or “leading opponent” of the ruling party (without any
supporting evidence), and his candidacy was made “an acid test of the
Sandinistas’ democratic intentions” (_Time_, Oct. 29, 1984). For the
_Times_, the election would be a “sham” without Cruz (editorial, Oct. 7,
1984), and its news columns placed “main opposition” Cruz on center
stage, from which vantage point he could regularly denounce the
proceedings as a “farce” or sham.¹⁰² The _Times_ did have one good
back-page article that provided evidence that Cruz had not intended to
run or would not have been allowed to run by his closest Nicaraguan
allies and U.S. officials, and that his function was, as we stated, to
discredit the election by pretending to be interested, thus capturing
press attention.¹⁰³ But this low-keyed article stood alone and did not
alter the unremitting focus on the alleged exclusion of this alleged
main opposition as the centerpiece of the Nicaraguan election drama.

In focusing on an alleged “main opposition” in Nicaragua, which
voluntarily chose not to run, while ignoring a _real_ main opposition in
El Salvador, excluded by force and plan, the mass media simply adopted
without question the government’s propaganda framework. Sources that
would speak to the condition of the “main opposition” in El Salvador and
the significance of its exclusion—both Salvador ans and foreign
observers—were simply ignored.¹⁰⁴ In the case of the Nicaraguan
election, in contrast, Cruz and U.S. government officials were given the
floor to present their themes, which were transmitted on a daily basis
with no accompanying notice of their possible falsity and manipulative
intent, in perfect accord with the expectations of a propaganda model.

The Reagan administration not only dangled Cruz before the media, it
tried hard to induce or bribe other candidates in the Nicaraguan
election to withdraw in order to fulfil the prophecy of a meaningless
election. The brazenness of this intervention by a great power was
remarkable, but the U.S. media gave it minimal attention. They never
denounced it as antidemocratic, they failed to link it to Cruz’s
campaign (with its suggestion of a larger effort to discredit by
boycott), and they never suggested that voter “turnout” was more
meaningful given the active U.S. campaign to discredit the election. On
October 31, 1984, Stephen Kinzer noted that senior U.S. officials
confirmed accounts of “regular contacts” with the Nicaraguan parties.
Kinzer’s article is headlined “Nicaraguan Parties Cite Sandinista and
U.S. Pressure,” the headline and article itself equating the
government’s aid to, and agreements with, its own political parties with
U.S. intervention to get the Nicaraguan parties to boycott the election!
CBS, _Newsweek_, and _Time_ ignored the U.S. bribe program entirely.
_Time_ gave great emphasis to the number of candidates and the
withdrawal of several, but it never once mentioned that this was helped
along by U.S. connivance, bribes, and pressure. It even quotes without
comment the State Department fabrication that “it did not try to
influence the outcome of the election” (Nov. 19, 1984). All substantive
evidence is placed in the black hole. In the same article, _Time_
asserts that “the U.S. had pushed hard for elections in which all
parties felt free to participate,” a fabrication of considerable
audacity.

As regards the scope of electoral options in Nicaragua, the Irish
delegation noted that “The [political parties] law guarantees
participation to political parties of all ideologies,” an interesting
point validated by a range of political opinion in the contesting
parties far wider than that found in El Salvador and Guatemala (or the
United States).

LASA states that “No major political tendency in Nicaragua was denied
access to the electoral process in 1984” (p. 18). This, of course, could
not be said of El Salvador and Guatemala. These important features of
the Nicaraguan law and practice were not mentioned in the U.S. media or
compared with those of the client states.

The Irish delegation stressed two facts about Cruz as the “main
opposition.” First,

The delegation found no evidence that these parties [the three small
Cruz-related parties that boycotted the election] had wide support
within the country. Speaking with many political figures, including
representatives of the legitimate opposition parties, it became clear
that the intention of Arturo Cruz to stand for election was dubious from
the start.… While considerable coverage was given to these parties in
the international press, members of the delegation found that their
impact among the population was scant and few people supported their
policies (p. 7).

Second, the Irish delegation stressed the fact that the populace was
free _not_ to vote or to spoil votes, and the low level of both,
“despite the abstentionism promoted by” the Cruz parties, deflated their
claims to any serious support (p. 7). The LASA report reached similar
conclusions, based on an extensive review of the evidence, namely: (1)
that “circumstantial evidence” indicates the strong probability that
Cruz had no intention of running, and (2) that he had no mass base and
would have been badly beaten.

In retrospect, Kinzer concedes the fact, although with the customary
propaganda twist. He writes that “Ortega’s landslide victory was never
in doubt,” because “the opposition was splintered” (and, as he fails to
observe, had no popular base, in contrast to the well-organized
Sandinista party), and “because the Sandinistas controlled the electoral
machinery.” Neither he nor anyone else has offered a particle of
evidence that Sandinista control over the electoral machinery made the
elections a sham, or to contest the conclusion of the LASA delegation
that “the FSLN did little more to take advantage of its incumbency than
incumbent parties everywhere (including the United States) routinely
do.” A few days earlier, Kinzer had quoted Arturo Cruz as observing that
the Sandinistas deserve credit for having overthrown Somoza and “having
broken barriers in Nicaragua that had to be broken, and that is
irreversible,” because “the Sandinistas were working in the catacombs
while we in the traditional opposition were out of touch with the rising
expectations of the masses.” As Kinzer knows, but will not write, the
same was true at the time of the 1984 elections, which is why the
Sandinista victory was never in doubt. This deceitful dismissal of the
1984 elections is one of Kinzer’s many contributions to the media
campaign to contrast the “elected presidents” of the four Central
American “democracies” with the Sandinista dictator Ortega, not an
elected president by U.S. government imprimatur. The specific context
was the massive media campaign to attribute the failures of the
Guatemala City peace agreement of August 1987 to the Sandinistas, in
accordance with Reagan administration priorities, on the eve of the
crucial congressional vote on renewed contra aid.¹⁰⁵

LASA also stresses the fact that Cruz—effectively representing the
contras, a segment of the local business community, and the United
States—could have run in the Nicaraguan election, with excellent
funding, ample media access, and without fear of being murdered. Even
without Cruz the contras had an electoral voice. LASA notes that

We know of no election in Latin America (or elsewhere) in which groups
advocating the violent overthrow of an incumbent government have
themselves been incorporated into the electoral process, particularly
when these groups have been openly supported by a foreign power. The
_contras_ nevertheless had a voice in the 1984 election campaign. Two of
the Coordinadora-affiliated parties, the PSD and the PLC, supported
their inclusion in the elections. And while denying that they
represented the _contras_, Arturo Cruz and the Coordinadora seemed to
endorse and promote their cause, both within Nicaragua and abroad (p.
18).

LASA also discusses in some detail the U.S. intervention in the
election, noting the terrorizing overflights by U.S. planes during the
election campaign, and considering at some length the U.S. efforts to
induce the withdrawal of candidates. LASA reported the claims by both
Liberal and Conservative party figures that the United States offered
specific and large sums of money to get candidates to withdraw from the
election.

3.6.6. The concern over freedom of the press and assembly

Not only the rights of any and all candidates to run for public office,
but other basic conditions that had been off the agenda in El Salvador
and Guatemala were of deep concern to the U.S. government and mass media
in reference to Nicaragua. The _New York Times, Time, Newsweek_, and CBS
News all put great stress on the trials and tribulations of _La
Prensa_,¹⁰⁶ although during the Salvadoran election none of them had
even mentioned the destruction by physical violence and murder of _La
Crónica_ and _El Independiente_, or the toll of murdered journalists.
Mob violence allegedly organized by the government, and the threat of
the neighborhood defense committees, were featured by _Time_ in
Nicaragua, whereas ORDEN and the death squads in El Salvador and
Guatemala it had never mentioned as pertinent to election quality. Basic
conditions of a free election were not only back on the media agenda,
but there were strong suggestions that Nicaragua was failing to meet
these conditions. These suggestions were based almost entirely on quotes
from U.S. officials and Cruz and his allies in Nicaragua. The media
never gave evidence of having actually looked into these matters for
themselves or tapped independent sources of evidence.

Richard Wagner, on CBS News (Nov. 3, 1984), citing as usual Arturo Cruz
as the “strongest opposition,” also mobilizes a single Nicaraguan
citizen (no doubt selected at random) who says: “How can this be free
elections [_sic_] when we don’t have freedom of speech, freedom of the
press?” Wagner says that “In addition to censorship” there were food
shortages, a deteriorated transportation system, an unpopular draft, and
church opposition, so that “it becomes apparent why a free and open
election is not in the cards.” The cynicism in failing to raise the
question of _why_ there are food shortages and a deteriorated
transportation system in Nicaragua is remarkable. Wagner also misses
another distinction between Nicaragua and El Salvador; the former has an
“unpopular draft,” whereas in the terror state of El Salvador there is
no draft—instead there is press-ganging of young men into the army from
the slums, refugee camps, and rural areas, while the young sons of the
wealthy live the high life in San Salvador and Miami (much the same is
true in Guatemala and Honduras). Wagner’s double standard is also
remarkable. In El Salvador in 1982 and 1984 there was far more severe
censorship (including outright murder), food shortages, a deteriorating
transport system, and church opposition—and more pertinent, a complete
exclusion of the “main opposition” and massive state terror—but these
didn’t make it apparent to CBS News that a free and open election was
not in the cards in that U.S.-sponsored election.¹⁰⁷

The Irish delegation and LASA, especially the latter, addressed these
issues, gave evidence of having examined them seriously, and came up
with conclusions sharply at odds with the U.S. government-media
portrayals. LASA provided an extensive discussion of the Sandinista
defense committees and the scope of the _turba_ violence and
interference with freedom of assembly, concluding that the total number
of disruptive incidents reported was “quite small,” and that the most
serious occurred before the official campaign began. “In spite of Daniel
Ortega’s unfortunate statement on these disruptions, there is no
evidence that the FSLN had a coherent strategy of stimulating or
orchestrating them” (p. 24). As regards the defense committees, LASA
concluded that they did not seem to be functioning as a spying network
and that there was no serious evidence that they were a force making for
intimidation (p. 27). LASA makes two additional points ignored by the
free press. One is that the electoral commission “placed paid
advertisements in the press urging citizens to respect the rights of all
political parties to hold rallies without interference” (p. 24). The
second is that the Cruz rallies that were disrupted were held in
violation of the electoral law, which requires permits for campaign
rallies and promises police protection. “In other words, given their
decision not to register, Cruz and the Coordinadora were deliberately
campaigning outside of the legal framework of protections which had been
created by the electoral law” (p. 25). LASA also compares the violence
in the Nicaraguan election with that elsewhere in the area and in the
Nicaraguan context, concluding that “compared to other nations in the
region and in the face of a war against the contras, such abuses are on
a very small scale” (p. 28).

LASA also discussed freedom of the press, which it regards as one of the
election’s most troublesome features. It considers the imposition of
press censorship to have been damaging to the election’s quality and
credibility, even though the argument of the Sandinistas, that a country
at war “can’t allow a newspaper which is the instrument of the enemy to
publish its opinions freely” (Sergio Ramirez), is viewed as not wholly
unreasonable. Nevertheless, while the censorship was also somewhat
arbitrary and legalistic, LASA concluded that “The opposition could and
did get its message out” (p. 26). And the finding overall was that the
Nicaraguan election “by Latin American standards was a model of probity
and fairness” (p. 32).

The U.S. mass media did not concur, but it is striking how they avoid
comparisons and data. The way in which the media can denounce
restrictions on freedom of the press in Nicaragua after having totally
ignored the question in El Salvador, where restrictions were far more
severe, is remarkable. This process of dichotomization is so
internalized that the writers use the double standard within the same
article, apparently unaware of their own bias. In an article in the _New
York Times_ of March 12, 1984, “Clear Choices in Salvador, Murky Plans
in Nicaragua,” Hedrick Smith regards the choices as “clear” in El
Salvador, whereas in Nicaragua the problem is whether in an election the
Sandinistas will “give up significant power and control.” Multiple
parties from the far right to the center-right in El Salvador
demonstrate clear choices, but a variety of parties from right to far
left in Nicaragua didn’t cause Smith to perceive real choices there,
although he didn’t explain why. It apparently never occurs to Smith that
there is an issue of whether the army and United States “will give up
power and control” (and their determination to fight to victory) by the
electoral route in El Salvador.

Are there essential freedoms and absence of coercion in El Salvador that
are necessary for a truly free election? Hedrick Smith talks about
substantive electoral conditions _only_ in Nicaragua. He provides
extensive detail on the trials of _La Prensa_, press censorship, the
Sandinista monopoly of power, and limits allegedly imposed on opposition
candidates in Nicaragua. Not a word, however, on death-squad and army
murders of civilians in El Salvador or the Draconian laws of the state
of siege. How many journalists have been killed in El Salvador? Papers
closed? Radio stations blown up? Union leaders and political figures
murdered? These questions are off the agenda in U.S.-staged elections,
and Hedrick Smith ignores them. As a de facto spokesman for his
government, the _Times_ commentator uses doublethink with as much
insouciance as Reagan and Shultz.


3.7. QUANTITATIVE EVIDENCE OF SYSTEMATIC MEDIA BIAS

To demonstrate more rigorously the structural bias in media coverage of
Third World elections, tables 3-1, 3-2, and 3-3 compare the topics
mentioned in the _New York Times_ in its articles on the Nicaraguan and
Salvadoran elections of 1984. The tables are organized according to the
U.S. government agenda described earlier. The elements in the upper part
of the tables are the approved issues—rebel disruption, personalities,
election mechanics, etc.—that the government wishes to stress in its
sponsored elections. Below the line are the basic conditions and other
negative elements that are off the agenda in sponsored elections. Our
hypothesis is that the media will follow the agenda, stressing
personalities and other elements above the line in sponsored elections
and playing down basic conditions, whereas in elections like that in
Nicaragua the agenda will be reversed—the stress will be placed on basic
conditions.



__________________________________________________________________________ TABLE 3-1 TOPICS INCLUDED AND EXCLUDED IN THE _NEW YORK TIMES_’S COVERAGE OF THE SALVADORAN ELECTION OF MARCH 25, 1984*


TOPICS

NUMBER OF ARTICLES DEALING WITH TOPIC

PERCENTAGE OF ARTICLES DEALING WITH TOPIC

__________________________________________________________________________

THOSE COMPATIBLE WITH THE U.S. GOVERNMENT’S AGENDA FOR THE SALVADORAN
ELECTION:

1. Democratic purpose and hopes

6

21.4

2. Rebel disruption

15

53.6

3. Turnout

7

25.0

4. Election mechanics

9

32.1

5. Personalities and political infighting

10

35.7

6. Official reflections on the election

10

35.7

7. The army as protector of the election

5

17.9

THOSE INCOMPATIBLE WITH THE U.S. GOVERNMENT’S AGENDA FOR THE SALVADORAN
ELECTION:

8. The public-relations purpose

3

10.7

9. U.S. investment in the election

2

7.1

10. Fraud in the 1982 election

0

0

11. The existence of free speech and assembly— legal state of siege

1

3.6

12. Freedom of the press

0

0

13. Organizational freedom

0

0

14. Limits on the ability of candidates to qualify and campaign

0

0

15. Prior state terror and climate of fear

3

10.7

16. Power of armed forces, links to candidates and parties, as possible
negative factor

1

3.6

17. Legal obligation to vote

4

14.3

18. Legal penalties for nonvoting

2

7.1

19. Marking of voters’ fingers

1

3.6

20. Stamping identification cards

2

7.1

21. Legal requirement that authorities check within 10 days, that voters
have voted

0

0

22. Possible nonlegal threat to nonvoters from death squads and security
forces

0

0

23. Use of transparent voting urns

1

3.6

24. Legal right of the security forces to an armed presence at voting
stations

0

0



__________________________________________________________________________ TABLE 3-2 TOPICS INCLUDED AND EXCLUDED IN THE NEW YORK TIMES’S COVERAGE OF THE NICARAGUAN ELECTION PLANNED FOR NOVEMBER 4, 1984^(*)


TOPICS

NUMBER OF ARTICLES DEALING TOPICS WITH TOPIC

PERCENTAGE OF ARTICLES DEALING WITH TOPIC

__________________________________________________________________________

THOSE COMPATIBLE WITH THE U.S. GOVERNMENT’S AGENDA FOR THE NICARAGUAN
ELECTION: (OF THE 7 ITEMS IN TABLE 3-1, ALL ARE BLANKS EXCEPT ONE.)

1. Election mechanics

3

37.5

THOSE INCOMPATIBLE WITH THE U.S. GOVERNMENT’S AGENDA FOR THE NICARAGUAN
ELECTION:^(**)

2. The public-relations purpose

3

37.5

3. Free speech

2

25.0

4. Freedom of the press

6

75.0

5. Organizational freedom

4

50.0

6. Ability of candidates to qualify and run

5

62.5

7. Power of the armed forces, link to state, as negative factor

3

37.5



__________________________________________________________________________ TABLE 3-3 TOPICS INCLUDED AND EXCLUDED IN THE NEW YORK TIMES’S COVERAGE OF THE NICARAGUAN ELECTION OF NOVEMBER 4, 1984^(*)


TOPICS

NUMBER OF ARTICLES DEALING WITH TOPIC

PERCENTAGE OF ARTICLES DEALING WITH TOPIC

__________________________________________________________________________

THOSE COMPATIBLE WITH THE U.S. GOVERNMENT’S AGENDA FOR THE NICARAGUAN
ELECTION:

1. Democratic purpose and hopes

1

4.8

2. Rebel disruption

0

0

3. Turnout

5

23.8

4. Election mechanics

0

0

5. Personalities and political infighting

3

14.3

6. Official reflections on the election

3

14.3

7. The army as protector of the election

0

0

THOSE INCOMPATIBLE WITH THE U.S. GOVERNMENT’S AGENDA FOR THE NICARAGUAN
ELECTION:

8. The public-relations purpose

7

33.3

9. Sandinista investment in the election

2

9.5

10. Fraud in prior elections

NA

NA

11. Free speech and assembly

8

38.1

12. Freedom of the press

6

28.6

13. Organizational freedom

2

9.5

14. Limits on the ability of candidates to qualify and campaign

11

52.4

15. Prior state terror and climate of fear

3

14.3

16. Control of armed forces by government

3

14.3

17. Legal obligation to vote

NA

4.8

18. Legal penalties for nonvoting

NA

NA

19. Marking of voters’ fingers

1

NA

20. Stamping identification cards

NA

NA

21. Legal requirement to check voting

NA

NA

22. Nonlegal threat to nonvoters

1

4.8

23. Use of transparent voting urns

NA

NA

24. Security force presence at voting stations

NA

NA

NA = Not Applicable

It can readily be seen in table 3-1 that in the Salvadoran election the
_Times_’s news coverage dealt heavily with subjects above the line and
neglected the basic conditions that make an election meaningful in
advance. We can observe how the _Times_ totally ignores the question of
freedom of the press, organizational freedom, and limits on the ability
of candidates to run.¹⁰⁸ Table 3-2 shows how the _Times_ treated the
forthcoming Nicaraguan election in the same two-month period covered in
table 3-1. It is evident that the paper focuses heavily on the
fundamental conditions of a free election, i.e., on topics that it was
entirely ignoring while addressing the Salvadoran election. Table 3-3
shows the breakdown of topics covered by the _Times_ during the
Nicaraguan election later in the year. Again, although the differences
are less marked than the ones in tables 3-1 and 3-2, the substantial
attention to basic conditions in the Nicaraguan case is clear,
reflecting editorial news choices that follow a patriotic agenda. As the
basic conditions for a free election were superior in Nicaragua and the
coercive elements less acute, the emphasis on basic conditions only in
the Nicaraguan case is even more clearly evidence of systematic bias.


3.8. THE MIG CRISIS STAGED DURING NICARAGUA’S ELECTION WEEK

As _Newsweek_ pointed out on November 19, 1984, “The story of the
freighter [to Nicaragua, allegedly carrying MIGs] first broke during the
election-night coverage,” but at no point does _Newsweek_ (or _Time_,
the _Times_, or CBS News) suggest that the timing was deliberate. The
_Times_, in its extensive coverage of the MIGs that weren’t there, at
one point quotes a Nicaraguan official who suggests that the crisis was
purely a public-relations operation, but that exhausts the _Times’_s
exploration of this point. Although the MIGs weren’t there, and the
timing was perfect for diverting attention from a successful election
that the Reagan adminstration had been attempting to discredit, the
elite media asked no questions, even in retrospect. The administration
claimed that when the freighter was loaded, satellite observation was
blocked so that the cargo was unknown. The mass media presented this as
fact, making no effort to evaluate the claim.

What the media chose to focus on was administration assessments of what
it might do _if_ MIGs were in fact being delivered. This allowed the
whole frame of discourse to shift to the assumption that the
_Nicaraguans_ had _done_ something (and something intolerable, to boot).
_Newsweek_, in a retrospective article entitled “The MIGs That Weren’t
There,” had a lead head: “To bring in high-performance craft indicates
that they are contemplating being a threat to their neighbors.” The fact
that the MIGs _weren’t_ brought in, as stated in the article’s very
title—that this was a concoction of U.S. officials—doesn’t interfere
with imputing an intention to the Nicaraguans based on a nonexistent
fact. The assertion that they were contemplating being a threat, as
opposed to defending themselves against a proxy invasion, is also a
patriotic editorial judgment. _Newsweek_ also says in the text that “All
sides appeared to be playing a very clumsy and very dangerous game.”
This is an intriguing form of evenhandedness. A person who, admittedly,
had been falsely accused of robbery by an assailant is alleged to be
“playing a dangerous game,” along with the attacker who is also the
bearer of false witness.¹⁰⁹

In the middle of an article on the Nicaraguan election, _Time_ inserts
the government claim that a ship carrying crates of the type used to
transport MIG-21s was due at a Nicaraguan port. _Time_ never questions a
government propaganda ploy, no matter how blatant, and it offers a
retrospective only when the government tacitly concedes it had
deliberately deceived. Like _Newsweek_ and the _Times, Time_ allows the
government to set the agenda with a public-relations statement: _if_ the
Nicaraguans did this, it would be a challenge to the United States. How
then would we react, what are our policy options, etc. The truth of the
claim and the likelihood that this is a manipulative ploy to help remove
the unwanted elections from attention are not discussed; and, naturally,
the fact that this is part of a policy of aggression against a tiny
victim is never raised.

The only credits in the media coverage of the MIG crisis go to CBS News.
On November 6, Dan Rather gave the straight administration “news” that
MIGs might be on their way and that a strategic option to destroy them
was under consideration. On November 7 and 8, however, perhaps out of a
recognition that it had once again been “used,” CBS gave substantial
coverage to Nicaraguan Foreign Minister Miguel D’Escoto’s rebuttal,
which allowed him to point out the absurdity of the Nicaraguan “threat,”
the tie-in of the MIG claims to the Nicaraguan election, and the U.S.
refusal to go along with the Contadora peace proposals.

The MIG ploy was, nevertheless, entirely successful. A tone of crisis
was manufactured, and “options” against the hypothetical Sandinista
“threat” were placed at the center of public attention. The Nicaraguan
election was not discussed. LASA points out that “The final results of
Nicaragua’s election were not even reported by most of the international
media. They were literally buried under an avalanche of alarmist news
reports” (p. 31). LASA concludes that the Nicaraguan electoral process
was manipulated, as the U.S. government claims, but by the U.S.
government itself in its efforts to discredit an election that it did
not want to take place. The Salvadoran and Guatemalan elections
successfully legitimized the U.S.-backed regimes, at least for American
elite opinion. The far more honest Nicaraguan election failed to
accomplish this, thanks to the loyal service of the media.


3.9. THE ROLE OF OFFICIAL “OBSERVERS” IN REINFORCING A PROPAGANDA LINE

Official observers provide a perfect example of the use of
government-controlled “experts” and “pseudo-events” to attract media
attention and channel it in the direction of the propaganda line. And
they regularly succeed in doing this in demonstration elections, no
matter how brief their stay and foolish their comments (see appendix 1).
The media take it for granted that official observers are newsworthy:
they are notables, their selection by the government from “reputable”
institutions adds to their credibility, and their observations will have
effects on opinion and policy. This rationale is in the nature of a
self-fulfilling prophecy; they have effects only because the media
accord them attention. As the official observers reliably commend the
elections as fair without the slightest attention to basic conditions,
the media’s regular use of these observers for comments on election
quality violates norms of substantive objectivity in the same manner as
the use of any straight government handout by the _Times_ or
_Pravda.¹¹⁰_

The Nicaraguan election was remarkable for the number of foreign
observers and observer teams. We pointed out earlier that _Time_
mentioned 450 foreign observers, but the magazine failed to cite any one
of them (relying instead, and characteristically, on State Department
handouts). As we saw, the State Department was able to get the media to
follow its agenda, even though this involved them in a blatant reversal
of the criteria they had employed the same year in El Salvador and
Guatemala. It was also able to induce the media to disregard the outcome
of the Nicaraguan election, with the help of the diversionary MIG ploy.
The media also allowed major lies to be institutionalized—for example,
that coercion was greater and pluralistic choices less in the Nicaraguan
than in the Salvadoran and Guatemalan elections, and that the latter
were legitimizing in a substantive sense, in contrast with Nicaragua.

These propaganda lies could not have been perpetrated if such reports as
those of the Irish delegation and LASA had been accorded proper weight.
LASA actually contacted the major mass-media outlets and tried to
interest them in doing a story on their report. LASA was turned down by
every major outlet. The LASA report is probably the best-documented and
most closely reasoned observer report ever written. Its authors are far
and away the most qualified group ever to write such a report, half with
field experience in Nicaragua, and the document was an official report
of the major scholarly organization that deals with Central America. The
authors represent a variety of opinions, on balance liberal but
revealing a strong critical capability (and in no sense biased, as are
the official observer teams to whom the media accord much attention).
Their report covers every issue of importance and openly confronts and
weighs evidence. If one reads the LASA report, and then the accounts of
the Nicaraguan election in _Time, Newsweek_, and the _New York Times_,
it is not so much the difference in conclusions that is striking but the
difference in depth, balance, and objectivity. LASA offers serious
history and context, a full account of the organization of the election,
and a full discussion of each relevant issue with comparisons to other
elections. We believe that an important reason the mass media failed to
use LASA as a source of information was that its report contradicts in
every way the propaganda claims which the media were disseminating daily
and uncritically. Thus its very credibility, objectivity, and quality
were disturbing, and necessitated that it be bypassed by institutions
serving a propaganda function.


3.10. CONCLUDING NOTE

As we have seen, electoral conditions in Nicaragua in 1984 were far more
favorable than in El Salvador and Guatemala, and the observer team of
LASA found the election in Nicaragua to have been “a model of probity
and fairness” by Latin American standards.¹¹¹ In El Salvador and
Guatemala, _none_ of the five basic preconditions of a free election was
met. In both of these countries, state-sponsored terror, including the
public exposure of mutilated bodies, had ravaged the civilian population
up to the very day of the elections. In both, voting was required by
law, and the populace was obliged to have ID cards signed, testifying
that they had voted. In both, the main rebel opposition was off the
ballot by law, by credible threat of violence, and by plan.
Nevertheless, in exact accord with the propaganda line of the state, the
U.S. mass media found the large turnouts in these countries to be
triumphs of democratic choice, the elections legitimizing, and
“fledgling democracies” thus created. This was accomplished in large
part by the media’s simply refusing to examine the basic conditions of a
genuinely free election and their application to these client-state
elections. Only for the Nicaraguan election did the media look at
matters such as freedom of the press, and they did this with conspicuous
dishonesty. Despite its superiority on every substantive count, the
Nicaraguan election was found by the media to have been a sham and to
have failed to legitimize.

Given the earlier similar performance of the mass media in the cases of
the U.S.-sponsored elections in the Dominican Republic in 1966 and
Vietnam in 1967, we offer the tentative generalization that the U.S.
mass media will _always_ find a Third World election sponsored by their
own government a “step toward democracy,” and an election held in a
country that their government is busily destabilizing a farce and a
sham. This is, of course, what a propaganda model would predict,
although the degree of subservience to state interests in the cases we
have examined was extraordinary, given the absence of overt coercion.
The “filters” yield a propaganda result that a totalitarian state would
be hard put to surpass.

Having perpetrated a successful fraud in the interests of the state, the
media proceeded, in subsequent years, to reinforce the imagery
established by their deception. Guatemala and El Salvador were “new
democracies” with “elected presidents.” Nicaragua, in contrast, is a
Marxist-Leninist dictatorship that does not have an “elected president”
and would never permit elections unless compelled to do so by U.S.
force. On December 1, 1987, the _New York Times_, in an editorial urging
the administration not to betray Haitian Democrats by “shrugging off
impoverished and anarchic Haiti as a hopeless case,” states that doing
so “would undermine Washington’s protestations about the need for free
elections in Nicaragua.” The wording is murky, and the remarks on Haiti
characteristically ignore Washington’s support of the Duvalierists who
made the elections a mockery, but it is clear that the _Times_ accepts
the Reagan line that free elections were not held in Nicaragua in 1984
and that the U.S. goal is to bring about free elections. This line is
based on major falsifications, but in keeping with their propaganda
function, the _Times_ as well as the other major media find Big
Brother’s portrayal of elections in Central America to be true, by hook
or by crook.

As we stressed earlier, the media’s adherence to the state propaganda
line is extremely functional. Just as the government of Guatemala could
kill scores of thousands without major repercussion because the media
recognized that these were “unworthy” victims, so today aid to state
terrorists in El Salvador and Guatemala, and the funding of contra
attacks on “soft targets” in Nicaragua, depend heavily on continued
media recognition of “worth” and an appropriate legitimization and
delegitimization. As their government sponsors terror in all three
states (as well as in Honduras), we may fairly say that the U.S. mass
media, despite their righteous self-image as opponents of something
called terrorism, serve in fact as loyal agents of terrorism.

* Based on a study of the 28 articles on the El Salvador election that
appeared in the _New York Times_ between Feb. 1 and Mar. 30, 1984.

* Based on a study of the 8 articles on the forthcoming Nicaraguan
election that appeared in the _New York Times_ between Feb. 1 and Mar.
30, 1984.

** Many of the topics listed in Table 3-1 under this subheading are not
relevant to the Nicaraguan election—all that are covered in the articles
examined are listed here.

* Based on a study of 21 news articles appearing between Sept. 5 and
Nov. 6, 1984.



[]  _4_ THE KGB-BULGARIAN PLOT TO KILL THE POPE: FREE-MARKET DISINFORMATION AS “NEWS”



[]


IN THE CASE OF THE SALVADORAN, GUATEMALAN, AND NICARAGUAN elections, the
government was the moving force in providing the suitable frames of
analysis and relevant facts, with the mass media’s role mainly that of
channeling information and assuring that the government’s agenda was not
seriously challenged. With the shooting of the pope, in May 1981, and
the eventual charges of a KGB-Bulgarian plot, the mass media played a
much larger role in originating the claims and in keeping the pot
boiling from inception to conclusion of the case.¹

In many ways, however, the process was similar. A dominant frame was
eventually produced that interpreted the shooting of the pope in a
manner especially helpful to then-current elite demands. A campaign
quickly ensued in which the serviceable propaganda line was instilled in
the public mind by repetition. Alternative frames were ignored, and
sources inclined toward other ways of looking at the issue were excluded
from the mass media. Facts were selected that fit the dominant frame;
others were passed by even if they bore on the validity of its
premises.² At the same time, the dominant sources, who had been allowed
to monopolize mass-media space, complained bitterly that their voices
could not be heard over the din of Soviet propaganda. When the legal
proceeding brought against the Bulgarians in Italy was lost after a
lengthy trial, this was rationalized by the media as far as could be
done. No serious retrospectives were entertained, and, without resolving
the contradictions, the story was then dropped.

What makes the Bulgarian Connection so apt an illustration of the value
of a propaganda model is that there was no credible case for a Bulgarian
Connection from the very beginning, and long before the Rome trial it
had taken on a truly comic aspect. But the mass media played it straight
to the bitter end. An analogous sequence carried out in Moscow, with the
West as the target—with a half-crazed criminal, after seventeen months
in a Soviet prison and some friendly sessions with the KGB and a
prosecutor, implicating employees of the American embassy in a
conspiracy to murder, and subsequently changing his testimony on a daily
basis—would have been hooted off the stage in the West without anyone
even bothering to look at alleged evidence. The Bulgarian Connection,
however, although no less absurd, met the criterion of utility.

The case began when Mehmet Ali Agca shot and seriously injured Pope John
Paul II in St. Peter’s Square on May 13, 1981. Agca was a Turkish
rightist and assassin long associated with the Gray Wolves, an affiliate
of the extreme right-wing Nationalist Action party. Initial Western news
reports pointed out that Agca was a wanted criminal who had escaped from
a Turkish prison in 1979, and that his durable political affiliations
had been with the Fascist right. His motives in shooting the pope were
unclear. Agca’s friends were violently anti-Communist, so that, at
first, pinning the crime on the East seemed unpromising.

Two factors allowed a KGB-Bulgarian plot to be developed. The first was
that in his travels through Europe in the Gray Wolves underground, which
carried him through twelve different countries, Agca had stayed for a
period in Bulgaria. Turkish drug dealers, who had connections with the
Gray Wolves, also participated in the drug trade in Bulgaria. There
were, therefore, some “links” between Agca and Bulgarians, minimal facts
that would eventually be put to good use.

The second factor was Western elite needs and the closely associated
flare-up of a carefully stoked anti-Communist fervor in the West. At the
first meeting of the Jonathan Institute, in Jerusalem, in July 1979, at
which a large Western political and media contingent were present
(including Claire Sterling, George Will, George Bush, and Robert Moss),³
the main theme pressed by Israeli Prime Minister Menahem Begin in his
opening address, and by many others at the conference, was the
importance and utility of pressing the terrorism issue and of tying
terrorism to the Soviet Union.⁴ Claire Sterling did this in her 1981
volume _The Terror Network_, which became the bible of the Reagan
administration and the international right wing, and elevated Sterling
to the status of number one mass-media expert on that subject. Terrorism
and Soviet evil were the centerpieces of the Reagan administration’s
propaganda campaign that began in 1981, designed to support its planned
arms increase, placement of new missiles in Europe, and interventionist
policies in the Third World. Thus the shooting of the pope by Agca in
May 1981 occurred at a time when important Western interests were
looking for ways to tie the Soviet Union to “international terrorism.”⁵


4.1. THE STERLING-HENZE-KALB MODEL

Although the initial media reaction to the shooting was that the roots
of the act would seem to lie in Turkish right-wing ideology and
politics, some rightists immediately seized the opportunity to locate
the origins of the plot in the Soviet bloc. Only six days after the
assassination attempt, the Italian secret-service organization SISMI
issued a document which claimed that the attack had been announced by a
Soviet official at a meeting of the Warsaw Pact powers in Bucharest,
Romania, and that Agca had been trained in the Soviet Union.
Subsequently, this “information” was shown to have been fabricated by
SISMI or one of its intelligence sources, but it entered the stream of
allegations about the plot in a book published in West Germany and via
further citations and leaks.⁶

The _Reader’s Digest_ saw the propaganda opportunity presented by the
assassination attempt quite early, and hired both Paul Henze, a longtime
CIA officer and propaganda specialist, and Claire Sterling to
investigate the topic. Sterling’s September 1982 article in the
_Reader’s Digest_, “The Plot to Kill the Pope,” was the most important
initiator of the Bulgarian Connection, and its ideas and those of Paul
Henze formed the basis for the NBC-TV program “The Man Who Shot the
Pope—A Study in Terrorism,” narrated by Marvin Kalb and first aired on
September 21, 1982.

The Sterling-Henze-Kalb (SHK) model, in which Agca was an agent of the
Bulgarians (and, indirectly, of the Soviet Union), quickly became the
dominant frame of the mass media, through the great outreach of the
_Reader’s Digest_ and the NBC-TV program (which was repeated in revised
form in January 1983), and the ready, even eager, acceptance of this
view by the other mainstream media.⁷ The mass media in our
sample—_Newsweek, Time_, the _New York Times_, and CBS News—all accepted
and used the SHK model from the beginning, and retained that loyalty to
the end of the Rome trial in March 1986. In the process they excluded
alternative views and a great deal of inconvenient fact. With the
_Reader’s Digest_, the _Wall Street Journal_, the _Christian Science
Monitor_, and NBC-TV also firmly adhering to the SHK line, it quickly
established a dominant position throughout the mainstream media.

In the balance of this and the following two sections, we will describe
the SHK model, discuss its weaknesses, and outline an alternative frame
explaining Agca’s confession implicating the Bulgarians, which the media
ignored. We will then turn to a closer examination of the media’s
gullible reception of the SHK view and its fit to a propaganda model.

The SHK model had the following essential elements:

1. MOTIVE. In Sterling’s _Reader’s Digest_ article, the preeminent
motive in the assassination attempt was a Soviet desire to weaken NATO,
to be accomplished by implicating a Turk in the assassination of the
pope: “The Turk was there at St. Peter’s to signal Christendom that
Islamic Turkey was an alien and vaguely sinister country that did not
belong in NATO.” This motive was accompanied (and soon supplanted) by
the contention that the shooting was to help quell the Solidarity
movement in Poland by removing its most important supporter. At one
point Paul Henze suggested that the intent of the KGB was perhaps merely
to “wing” the pope, not kill him, as a warning, as in a James Bond
movie. The costs and risks to the Soviet bloc of such a venture were
never discussed by Sterling, Henze, or Kalb.

2. THE PROOF OF SOVIET AND BULGARIAN INVOLVEMENT. Before Agca’s
confession and his identification of Bulgarians in November 1982, the
evidence on which SHK relied was confined to the fact that Agca had
stayed in Bulgaria in the summer of 1980, and that Turkish drug traders
with links to the Gray Wolves did business in Bulgaria. In November
1982, Agca named three Bulgarians as his alleged accomplices and claimed
to have been hired by the Bulgarians to do the job. He offered no
credible evidence and named no witnesses to any dealings with
Bulgarians, so that the new “evidence” was simply Agca’s assertions,
after seventeen months in an Italian prison.

3. THE IDEOLOGICAL ASSUMPTIONS. As the case looked extremely thin,
especially before Agca’s new confession of November 1982, the gaps were
filled by ideological assumptions: This is the kind of thing the Soviets
do. The Soviet Union and Bulgaria have been actively striving to
“destabilize” Turkey.⁸ If there is no hard evidence it is because the
Soviets are consummate professionals who cover their tracks and maintain
“plausible deniability.” The KGB hired Agca in Turkey and caused him to
use a rightist cover to obscure the fact that he was a KGB agent.
Although Agca traveled through eleven other countries, his stay in
Bulgaria was crucial because Bulgaria is a totalitarian state and the
police know everything; therefore they knew who Agca was, and they must
have been using him for their own purposes.⁹


4.2. PROBLEMS WITH THE STERLING-HENZE-KALB MODEL

The basic Sterling-Henze-Kalb model suffered from a complete absence of
credible evidence, a reliance on ideological premises, and internal
inconsistencies. As problems arose, the grounds were shifted, sometimes
with a complete reversal of argument.¹⁰

An initial problem for the model was the Bulgarian-Soviet motive. In
this connection, we should note the extreme foolishness of Sterling’s
original suggestion that the Eastern bloc went to the trouble of
locating a Turkish Fascist to shoot the pope in order to make Turkey
look bad, and thereby to loosen its ties to NATO. That such a loosened
tie would follow from a Turkish Fascist shooting the pope is not
sensible, nor is it likely that the conservative Soviet leadership would
indulge in such a fanciful plan even if it had a greater probability of
“success.”¹¹ This theory assumed that Agca would be caught and
identified as a Turk, but that he wouldn’t reveal that he had been hired
by the Bulgarians and the Soviets. Subsequently, Sterling suggested that
Agca was supposed to have been shot in the square to assure his silence.
The amazingly incompetent KGB failed to accomplish this simple task. SHK
also maintained at various points that Agca may not even have known who
hired him, so he couldn’t implicate the East. Later, when Agca claimed
that he had been heavily involved with Bulgarians in Rome, Sterling and
Henze lapsed into silence on the failure of the KGB to maintain a
semblance of plausible deniability.

SHK finally settled firmly on the idea that quelling the Polish
Solidarity movement was the real Soviet-Bulgarian motive. But this
theory is as implausible as its predecessor, when we take account of
timing and elementary cost-benefit analysis. Agca was allegedly
recruited in Turkey long before Solidarity existed. In a variant
Sterling version of the timing of his recruitment, Agca was hired by the
Bulgarians in July 1980, which was still prior to the Gdansk shipyard
strike, and thus before Solidarity appeared a credible threat to Soviet
control. The risks and costs of an assassination attempt would seem
heavy—and, in fact, the costs to the Soviet Union and Bulgaria were
severe based merely on the widespread belief in their involvement, even
in the absence of credible evidence. The supposed benefits from the act
are also not plausible. The assassination of the pope, especially if
blamed on the Soviet Union, would infuriate and unify the Poles and
strengthen their opposition to a Soviet-dominated regime. And the
further costs in damaged relations with Western Europe—which were
extremely important to the Soviet Union in 1981, with the gas pipeline
being negotiated and with the placement of new U.S. missiles in Western
Europe a major Soviet concern—would seem to militate against taking
foolish risks.¹²

A second problem with the SHK model is that Agca had threatened to kill
the pope in 1979 at the time of a papal visit to Turkey—again, long
before Solidarity existed. This suggests that Agca and the Turkish right
had their own grievances against the pope and a rationale for
assassinating him that was independent of any Soviet influence. It was
partly for this reason that SHK argue that Agca was recruited by the
Soviet Union in Turkey before the pope’s visit there, setting him up for
the later attack. But not only is this pure speculation unsupported by a
trace of evidence, it fails to explain why the entire Fascist press, not
just Agca, assailed the pope’s visit in 1979. Was the entire Fascist
right serving Soviet ends? The only time this issue was ever raised in
the mass media, on the “McNeil-Lehrer News Hour” of January 5, 1983,
Paul Henze stated in no uncertain terms that “there was no [press]
opposition” to the pope’s visit in 1979. The Turkish journalist Ugur
Mumcu, however, assembled a large collection of citations from the
Turkish rightist press of the time to demonstrate that Henze’s statement
was false.¹³

A third problem for the SHK model was that Agca was a committed
rightist, and therefore not a likely candidate for service to the
Communist powers (although perhaps amenable to fingering them as
co-conspirators in a prison context). SHK strove mightily to make Agca
out to be a rootless mercenary, but the best they could come up with was
the fact that Agca didn’t seem to have been registered as a member of
the Gray Wolves.¹⁴ But all his friends, associates, and affiliations
from high school days onward were Gray Wolves, and in his travels
through Europe up to the time of his May 13, 1981, rendezvous, he moved
solely through the Gray Wolves network. While in prison, Agca addressed
a letter to Alparslan Turkes, the leader of the Nationalist Action Party
of Turkey, expressing his continued commitment and loyalty. This letter
was bothersome to Sterling and Henze as it is inconsistent with their
depiction of Agca as apolitical, and Sterling dismissed it without
argument as a “laughably clumsy forgery.” A problem, however, is that
Agca’s letter was introduced as evidence in a trial in Ankara by the
Turkish military authorities, usually adequate proof for Sterling of
authenticity. She doesn’t mention this fact or examine their case. Ugur
Mumcu devotes five pages of his book _Agca Dossier_ to a detailed
account of the Turkes letter, describing the great pains the authorities
took, including tapping outside experts, to establish its authenticity.
The conclusion on all sides was that the letter was genuine.

A fourth problem with the SHK model is the notion that because of the
efficiency of the Bulgarian secret police, Agca’s presence in Sofia must
have been known to them, and he must therefore have been on their
payroll. This assumed efficiency is an ideological assumption
unsupported by any evidence and contradicted by actual Bulgarian and
Soviet performance. There is no evidence that the Bulgarians ever
identified Agca, who was using a false passport. Furthermore, the
contention that the Bulgarian police know everything was refuted in
important testimony during the Rome trial on September 22, 1985, when
Gray Wolves official Abdullah Catli stated that many Gray Wolves
preferred to traverse Bulgaria because it was easy to hide in the large
flow of Turkish immigrant traffic through that country.

A fifth problem for the SHK model was the fact that Agca seems to have
gotten his gun through the Gray Wolves network, not from the Bulgarians,
who presumably could have slipped it to him quite easily in Rome. In her
_Reader’s Digest_ article, Sterling traced Agca’s gun to Horst
Grillmaier, an Austrian gun dealer who, according to Sterling, had fled
behind the Iron Curtain after May 13, 1981, to avoid questioning in the
West. It turned out later, however, that Grillmaier was a former Nazi
who specialized in supplying right-wing gun buyers; that he had not
disappeared behind the Iron Curtain at all; and that the gun had
proceeded through a number of intermediaries, to be transmitted to Agca
by a Gray Wolves friend. Sterling handles the disintegration of the
original Grillmaier line by simply shifting to a new conspiratorial
ground: the clever Bulgarians had Agca purchase a gun through a known
Fascist to strengthen the case that Agca was a right-winger who could
not possibly be connected to the Communist powers.

A final _set_ of problems for the SHK model lies in the extraordinary
level of incompetence and gross violations of the principles of
plausible deniability that it attributes to the Bulgarian and Soviet
secret police—features that coexist uneasily with the superspy image
invoked elsewhere in the model. At various points, SHK contended that
the Soviets and Bulgarians were professionals who could afford to go
after the pope because they would never be implicated themselves. But
hiring Agca, a wanted criminal and a mentally unbalanced rightist, would
appear extremely foolish, as the cover would quickly be blown in the
likely event that he was caught. In Sterling’s initial tale, the KGB
_wanted_ him to be caught—or at least to have his body identified—to
discredit Turkey. With the shift to weakening Solidarity as the motive,
the threat of disclosure of Bulgarian-Soviet involvement would seem very
serious. Yet the Bulgarians and KGB hired Agca and then failed to kill
him. Another anomaly was bringing Agca to Sofia for instructions. If he
had already been recruited in Turkey, wouldn’t bringing him to Sofia be
a foolish compromising of his carefully prepared “cover”? If so, doesn’t
his visit to Sofia constitute an argument _against_ Soviet and Bulgarian
involvement?

While Agca’s November 1982 confession that he had Bulgarian
co-conspirators made the Bulgarian Connection instantly “true” for the
Western media, it wreaked havoc with the SHK model and with the logic of
“plausible deniability.” If, as Agca confessed, the Bulgarians connived
with him in Rome, escorted him to St. Peter’s Square to plan the attack,
entertained him at their apartments, and participated in the attack
itself, what happens to the logic of the “cover”?


4.3. AN ALTERNATIVE MODEL

An alternative explanation of the Bulgarian Connection can be derived
from the questions the U.S. press would surely have raised if an
analogous scenario had occurred in Moscow, in which Agca, who had
briefly visited the United States on his travels, and has been in a
Soviet prison for seventeen months after having shot a high Soviet
official, now confesses that three U.S. embassy members were his
co-conspirators. In this case, the U.S. press would have paid close
attention to the convenience of the confession to Soviet propaganda
needs, to the seventeen-month delay in the naming of Americans, and to
the obvious possibility that Agca had been encouraged or coerced into
revising his story. They would have focused intently on Agca’s prison
conditions, his visitors there, his amenability to a “deal” with his
captors, and any evidence in his statements or from other sources that
he had been coached. The fact that Agca had visited the United States,
among twelve countries, would not be considered strong evidence of CIA
involvement, and the press might even have pointed out that a minimally
competent CIA would not have brought Agca to Washington for instructions
in the first place.

The alternative model would take the same fact that SHK start out
with—Agca’s stay in Sofia, Bulgaria—but interpret it differently. That
visit violates principles of plausible deniability and would be
especially foolish if the KGB had already recruited Agca in Turkey. On
the other hand, it provides a Western propaganda system with the
necessary tie between Agca’s terrorist attack in Rome and the Soviet
bloc. The _convenience_ of Agca’s confession—to Socialist leader Craxi,
to the Christian Democrats and neo-Fascists in Italy, and to Reagan
searching for a tie-in between “international terrorism” and the Soviet
Union—is also crystal clear, and would immediately suggest to an
objective press the possibility that this “demand” might have elicited
an appropriate “supply” from the imprisoned Agca. The lag in Agca’s
naming of any Bulgarians—seventeen months after he entered an Italian
prison and seven months after he had agreed to “cooperate” with the
investigating magistrate, Ilario Martella—is also highly suggestive. Why
did it take him so long to name his co-conspirators? Sterling tried to
explain this on the ground that Agca had hopes that the Bulgarians would
“spring him” and gave them time; his successive elaborations of claims
and subsequent retractions she explained in terms of Agca’s “signaling”
to his alleged partners. This complex and speculative attempt to
rationalize inconvenient facts is not necessary; a very straightforward
explanation based on Agca’s character and affiliations and the
inducements known to have been offered to him (described below) does
quite nicely.¹⁵ Furthermore, Sterling’s explanation does not account for
the fact that Agca failed to provide serious evidence late in the trial,
long after it was clear that the Bulgarians had not responded to his
alleged signals.

Another suggestive feature of Agca’s confession is that it _followed_
the creation and wide media distribution of the SHK model. During the
course of the investigation of the plot, it was revealed that the
imprisoned Agca had access to newspapers, radio, and television, among
other modes of personal communication with the outside world. It was
also brought out in the investigation that Agca’s “desire for personal
publicity seems unquenchable.… At one point in the Italian
investigation, he abruptly clammed up when the magistrates refused his
demand that journalists be present as he ‘confessed.’ ”¹⁶ Agca was
interrogated about a possible Bulgarian connection long before his
confession, and was surely aware that his interrogators would be quite
pleased to have him produce one. And by the fall of 1982 one was being
provided to him in the press and on the screen every day.

We mentioned earlier that the Italian secret-service agency SISMI had
actually distributed a piece of disinformation tying the Soviets to the
assassination attempt within days of the attack. At the time of the
shooting, SISMI was headed by General Giuseppe Santovito, a member of
the extreme right-wing organization Propaganda Due (P-2), and SISMI and
the other intelligence agencies were heavily infiltrated with P-2
members. A P-2 scandal broke in Italy in March 1981, and by August
Santovito had been forced to leave SISMI, but the rightist grip on this
organization was by no means broken.

An important feature of Italian politics in the period from 1966 through
1981 was the protection given by the intelligence services to right-wing
terror, under a program designated the “strategy of tension.”¹⁷ One
aspect of this strategy was the carrying out of right-wing terrorist
attacks, which were then attributed to the left, frequently with the
help of forged documents and planted informers committing perjury. The
point of the strategy was to polarize society, discredit the left, and
set the stage for a rightist coup. Many P-2 members in the armed forces
and intelligence services took part in implementing this program, and
many others were sympathetic to its aims. In July 1984, an Italian
parliamentary commission published its final report on the P-2
conspiracy, and it and its accompanying volumes of hearings pointed up
the politicization of the intelligence services, their frequent use of
techniques of disinformation, and their connivance with and protection
of right-wing terror. In July 1985 a Bologna court issued a decision in
which it named SISMI and its officers as having engaged in numerous
forgeries, and also in having collaborated in covering up the Bologna
terrorist bombing of 1980.¹⁸

SISMI participated in a five-hour interrogation of Agca in December
1981, exploring his link to “international terrorism.” Investigating
Judge Martella acknowledges in his long investigative report that he had
spoken to Agca about the possibility of a commuted sentence if he
“cooperated,” and the Italian press quoted Agca’s lawyer’s report of the
terms of proposed deals that had been offered to Agca.¹⁹ There were also
a variety of reports in the European and dissident media of pressures
applied to Agca while in prison. A London _Sunday Times_ team pointed
out in May 1983 that the secret services “visited Agca and warned him
that once his solitary confinement was over, ‘the authorities could no
longer guarantee his safety.’ ”²⁰ According to Orsen Oymen, a Turkish
expert on the case, the Catholic chaplain in Agca’s prison, Father
Mariano Santini, had frequent access to Agca and was one of those who
pressed him to cooperate with the authorities.²¹ There is some possible
confirmation of Santini’s pressure tactics in a letter which Agca
addressed to the Vatican, dated September 24, 1982, which complained
bitterly of threats to his life emanating from a Vatican emissary.

During the course of the Rome trial, Giovanni Pandico, the principal
Italian state witness in the trial of Mafia leaders in Naples and an
associate of Raphael Cutolo, a Mafia leader who had been in Ascoli
Piceno prison with Agca, claimed in an interview (and subsequently
before the court) that Agca had been coerced, persuaded and coached to
implicate the Bulgarians by Cutolo, Santini, and others. Pandico claimed
that Cutolo himself had been coerced into working on Agca by threats to
himself, and that former SISMI officials Giuseppi Musumeci and Francesco
Pazienza were key initiators of the plot. One of the important
individuals accused by Pandico, Francesco Pazienza, while denying the
charges, gave his own detailed account of who in SISMI _had_
participated in persuading Agca to talk.

From the inception of the case, there were points suggesting that Agca
was coached while in prison. After his long (and unexplained) silence,
Agca identified the Bulgarians in a photo album allegedly shown to him
for the first time on November 9, 1982. But in a speech before the
Italian parliament, the minister of defense, Lelio Lagorio, stated that
Agca had identified the Bulgarians in September of 1982. This
discrepancy has never been explained, but that Agca saw these photos for
the first time on November 9 is not believable.²² A key element in
Agca’s testimony was his claim to have visited the apartment of Sergei
Antonov, one of the Bulgarians arrested in the “plot,” and to have met
his wife and daughter, which was supported by many fine details
regarding Antonov’s hobbies and the characteristics of his apartment.
The defense, however, was able to show that one feature of Antonov’s
apartment mentioned by Agca was in error, although characteristic of the
other apartments in Antonov’s building, which suggests that Agca had
been supplied information based on observation of other apartments. More
important, the defense was able to establish that at the time of Agca’s
visit at which he met Mrs. Antonov, she was out of the country.
Following newspaper publicity given these defense contentions, on June
28, 1983, Agca retracted his claims that he had visited the apartment
and met Antonov’s family. The details he had given about apartment and
family then became inexplicable, except on the supposition that Agca had
been fed information while in prison. In a number of other instances
Agca provided information that bore strong suspicion of having been
provided by officials and agents of the court or the police. The London
_Sunday Times_ reporters, who interviewed one of the accused Bulgarians
in Sofia, wrote that “When asked by Martella in Bulgaria whether he had
any salient physical features, Vassilev said that he had a mole on his
left cheek. In a _subsequent_ confession, as Vassilev points out, ‘Agca
described my mole in _the very same words_ which I used in describing it
here.’ ”²³

During the course of the Rome trial in 1985–86, no trace was ever found
of the money that Agca claimed he had received from the Bulgarians. The
car that Agca indicated the Bulgarians had used to escort him around
Rome was never located. No witness was ever found who saw him in his
many supposed encounters with Bulgarians. His gun was transferred to him
through the Turkish Gray Wolves network, and there was no shortage of
evidence of his meetings with members of the Gray Wolves in Western
Europe. The note that was found on Agca’s person on May 13, 1981, did
not mention any collaborators, and suggested a loose timetable for the
assassination attempt and a planned railroad trip to Naples.

In sum, it is highly probable that Agca was offered a deal to talk, and
that it was made clear to him that the people with power over his
well-being wanted him to implicate the Bulgarians and the Soviet Union
in the assassination attempt. He had access to the SHK model even before
he confessed. His confession was therefore suspect from the start, and
an “alternative model” of inducement-pressure coaching was plausible and
relevant, from the Agca’s first implication of Bulgarians. This model
became more cogent over time as Agca retracted strategic claims, and as
no confirming evidence of a Bulgarian Connection was produced. By the
same token, the SHK model, implausible from the beginning, became even
less tenable.


4.4. THE MASS MEDIA’S UNCRITICAL ACCEPTANCE OF THE BULGARIAN CONNECTION

Despite the implausibility of the SHK claim that Agca had been hired by
the Bulgarians and the KGB to shoot the pope, and although it was
sustained by argument that amounted to sheer humbuggery, the Bulgarian
Connection met the standard of utility. In this case, therefore, as a
propaganda model would anticipate, the U.S. mass media accepted the SHK
model as valid, ignored the alternative model, and participated in a
classic propaganda campaign that got the message of Bulgarian-Soviet
guilt over to the public. Some members of the mass media helped
originate the claim of a Bulgarian Connection, while others participated
only in disseminating the SHK line (and excluding alternative views and
inconvenient information).

The campaign began with Sterling’s _Reader’s Digest_ article of
September 1982, which was closely followed by the NBC-TV program of
September 21, 1982. The outreach of these two statements asserting a
Bulgarian Connection was great, and they were widely reported upon in
the rest of the media in the form of a summary of their claims, with
virtually no questions raised about their validity. With Agca’s November
1982 naming of Bulgarians, the mass media began to report the Bulgarian
Connection intensively. This reporting was carried out exclusively
within the frame of the SHK model, and for most of the mass media no
serious departures from this model occurred through the conclusion of
the Rome trial in March 1986.²⁴

Agca’s naming of the Bulgarians was the key fact that generated news
coverage, providing the basis for reiterated details about the
Bulgarians, explanations of the Bulgarian (and Soviet) motive, and
speculation about the political implications of the charges, if
confirmed. A major characteristic of these news reports was their sheer
superficiality, with the charges never seriously examined but merely
regurgitated and elaborated with odd facts and opinion, and with no
departures from the SHK frame (and no hints of the possible relevance of
an alternative frame). The charges constituted a form of vindication of
the SHK model if taken at face value and presented superficially—i.e.,
if the media presentations never considered political convenience,
prison conditions, possible deals, plausible deniability, etc. And this
procedure—a reiteration of Agca claims, supplemented by extremely
superficial pro-plot speculation—was the principal modality by which the
mass media accepted and pushed the propaganda line.

_Newsweek_ provides a prototype of news coverage within the SHK
framework in its article of January 3, 1983, “The Plot to Kill Pope John
Paul II.” The Bulgarian-Soviet motive as portrayed by SHK is reiterated
through quotes from congenial sources—“a precautionary and alternative
solution to the invasion of Poland”—while nobody is quoted discussing
costs and benefits, the nature of the Soviet leadership, or _Western_
benefits from Agca’s confession.²⁵ In fact, _Newsweek_ suggests that
this charging of the Soviet bloc with the assassination attempt is a
painful embarrassment to Western governments (parroting the SHK line on
this point). _Newsweek_ nowhere discusses the seventeen-month lag in
Agca’s confession or his prison conditions, nor does it report in this
(or any later) article the claims and information noted in the London
_Sunday Times_ and the Italian press about inducements or coercive
threats that might have been applied to Agca while in custody.

Agca’s evidence is given credibility by _Newsweek_ through several
devices: repeating his claims several times as the core of the story;
stressing in two separate sequences investigative judge Martella’s
alleged honesty, integrity, conscientiousness, etc.; quoting from
Italian officials who say they “have the evidence” that “Agca operated
in close contact with the Bulgarians”; asserting that “all the evidence
suggests” that Agca is “not crazy.” But most important is the previously
mentioned refusal to discuss the premises of the SHK framework or to use
an alternative frame.

_Newsweek_ swallows intact a series of SHK ideological assumptions, such
as that “investigators [read “Paul Henze”] now think” Agca was probably
using the Gray Wolves as a cover; Bulgaria and the Soviet Union have
long been trying “to destabilize Turkey through terrorism” (quoting
Henze directly); in Sofia, Agca’s presence “must have come to the
attention of the Bulgarian secret police” (duplicating the frequent SHK
error of forgetting their claim that Agca had already been recruited for
the papal assassination attempt in Turkey, as well as erroneously
assuming that the Bulgarian secret police can easily identify Turks
passing through their country). _Newsweek_ states as established fact
that “Agca had help from a huge set of Bulgarians,” although it provides
no evidence for this except assertions by Agca, Italian officials, and
Paul Henze. It reports Agca’s numerous transactions with Bulgarians in
Rome without mentioning the problem of plausible deniability and without
batting an eyelash at the sheer foolishness of the scenario. This
_Newsweek_ article is nonetheless powerful, with its reiteration of many
details, its confidently asserted plots and subplots, its quotes from
many authorities supporting the charges, and its seeming openness and
occasional mention of lack of full proof—but it is a piece of uncritical
propaganda that confines itself strictly within the SHK frame, with the
exception of the single phrase cited earlier.

Initially, the other major media performed quite uniformly in the same
mold—uncritical, trivial, working solely within the bounds of the SHK
model, and entirely bypassing all the hard but obvious questions raised
by the “alternative” model. Of the thirty-two news articles on, or
closely related to, the plot that appeared in the _New York Times
_between November 1, 1982, and January 31, 1983, twelve had no news
content whatever but were reports of somebody’s opinion or speculation
about the case—or refusal to speculate about the issue. (The _Times_
carried one news article whose sole content was that President Reagan
had “no comment” on the case.) More typical was the front-page article
by Henry Kamm, “Bonn is Fearful of Bulgaria Tie with Terrorists” (Dec.
12, 1982), or Bernard Gwertzman’s “U.S. Intrigued But Uncertain on a
Bulgarian Tie” (Dec. 26, 1982). In “news report” after news report,
unnamed individuals are “intrigued,” their interest is “piqued,”
evidence is said to be “not wholly convincing,” or “final proof is still
lacking.” Four of the news articles in the _Times_ were on peripheral
subjects such as smuggling in Bulgaria or papal-Soviet relations. Of the
sixteen more direct news items, _only one_ covered a solid news
fact—namely, Antonov’s arrest in Rome. The other fifteen news items were
trivia, such as Kamm’s “Bulgarians Regret Tarnished Image” (Jan. 27,
1983), or another Kamm piece entitled “Italian Judge Inspects Apartment
of Suspect in Bulgarian Case” (Jan. 12, 1983). All of these expressions
of opinion, doubts, interest, suppositions, and minor detail served to
produce a lot of smoke—which kept the issue of possible Soviet
involvement before the public. They steered quite clear of substantive
issues that bore on motives, quality of evidence, and Turkish and
Italian context.

During the years that followed, to the end of the trial in March 1986,
the mass media, with only minor exceptions, adhered closely and
uncritically to the SHK framework.²⁶ They not only failed to press
alternative questions, they also refused to examine closely the
premises, logic, or evidence supporting the SHK case. Part of the reason
for this was the media’s extraordinary reliance on Sterling and Henze as
sources (and Kalb’s position as a news reporter on NBC-TV), and their
unwillingness to ask these sources probing questions.


4.5. BIASED SOURCING

Sterling and Henze, and to a lesser extent Michael Ledeen, dominated
perceptions of the Bulgarian Connection in the U.S. mass media to a
remarkable degree. Moreover, they affected the course of events in
Italy, as their version of Bulgarian guilt was aired in the Italian
media before Agca named the Bulgarians and may have influenced Martella
as well.²⁷ Sterling and Henze dominated media coverage by virtue of the
very wide distribution of their articles and books on the case, and by
their extensive and uncritical use as experts by the elite press, news
magazines, and television news and talk shows.²⁸ Sterling, in addition
to her _Reader’s Digest_ article, had three substantial pieces in the
_Wall Street Journal_ and several articles in the _New York Times_. Her
views were given repeated airing on CBS News, without rebuttal. Henze
accounted for twelve of the fourteen articles on the Bulgarian
Connection case in the _Christian Science Monitor_ between September
1982 and May 1985, and his articles were used widely elsewhere. The only
opinion piece on the Bulgarian Connection that appeared in the
_Philadelphia Inquirer_ during that same period was by Michael Ledeen.
Sterling, Henze, and Ledeen together accounted for 76 percent of the
time in three shows on the subject on the “McNeil-Lehrer News Hour.” No
tough questions were asked of them on these shows, and no dissident
voices were heard, perhaps because Sterling and Henze refused to appear
on television shows (or in college debates) with people who opposed
their views, and Henze insisted on approving in advance any questions to
be asked. Thus their initial dominance was further enhanced by coercive
tactics.²⁹

If we ask the deeper question of why these experts should predominate in
the first place, we believe the answer must be found in the power of
their sponsors and the congeniality of their views to the corporate
community and the mainstream media. Their messages passed quite easily
through the filters of a propaganda system. Sterling was funded and
published by _Reader’s Digest_, which gave her enormous outreach and
immediate brand-name recognition. The conservative network is fond of
Sterling, so their large stable of columnists and think-tank affiliates,
like the Georgetown Center for Strategic and International Studies
(CSIS) and the American Enterprise Institute, pushes her views. The
Reagan administration was also delighted with Sterling—despite her
frequent denunciations of the CIA and the State Department for their
cowardice in failing to pursue terrorism and the Bulgarian Connection
with sufficient aggressiveness!—and so were the _New York Times, Time,
Newsweek_, CBS News, and many others. Sterling was the outstanding
popular expositor of the theme urged upon the conferees at the Jonathan
Institute meeting of July 1979 and advocated by the Reagan
administration team anxious to create a moral environment for an arms
race and global support of counterrevolutionary freedom fighters.³⁰
Henze, an old CIA hand and protégé of Zbigniew Brzezinski, was also
funded by the _Reader’s Digest_, and Ledeen was affiliated with both the
CSIS and the Reagan political team. If the media transmit literal lies
by this Big Three—which they did frequently—the flak machines remain
silent. As one network official told one of the authors, if a critic of
the Bulgarian Connection were allowed on the air, the official would
“have to make sure that every _i_ was dotted and _t_ crossed; but with
Sterling, there were no problems.”

Again in conformity with a propaganda model, it was of no apparent
concern to the mass media that Sterling, Henze, and Ledeen were
exceptionally biased sources, immune to the rules of evidence and, in
fact, agents of disinformation. We discussed earlier Sterling’s
dismissal of Agca’s commitment to Turkes and her handling of Agca’s gun,
and similar cases could be cited in large number.³¹ Sterling’s _Terror
Network_ is notable for its gullibility in accepting at face value
claims fed her by Israeli, South African, and Argentinian secret police,
and, most notably, the Czech Stalinist defector, Jan Sejna,³² whose
evidence for a Soviet terror network came from a document forged by the
CIA to test Sejna’s integrity!³³ A remarkable feature of Sterling’s
_Time of the Assassins_ and other writings on the Bulgarian Connection
is her reiterated belief that the Reagan administration and CIA dragged
their feet in pursuing the Red plot because of their interest in
détente.³⁴ And despite her phenomenal sales and uncritical reception in
the U.S. media, Sterling bemoaned the “accepted position, the socially
indispensable position … if you care to move in certain circles and if
you care to be accepted at your job professionally” in the West, of
doubting the Bulgarian Connection, which she attributed to the success
of the KGB in pushing a forty-page booklet on the plot by Soviet
journalist Iona Andronov.³⁵

These evidences of charlatanry did not impair Sterling’s credibility
with the U.S. mass media—in fact, the _New York Times_ allowed her
front-page space and a regular role as a reporter of _news_ on the
Bulgarian connection. By doing this, the _Times_ guaranteed that
editorial policy would control the news fit to print. This was displayed
fully in Sterling’s front-page news story of prosecutor Albano’s report
on June 10, 1984. The most important _new_ information in that
report—that on June 28, 1983, Agca had retracted a substantial part of
his evidence against the Bulgarians—was omitted from Sterling’s story,
although she coyly suggested that some undescribed points had been
retracted that were already “corroborated.” This was seriously
misleading. Agca’s having visited Antonov’s apartment and met with his
family was never corroborated, and the details he gave on these matters
had previously been cited by Sterling and Henze as crucial corroboration
of his general claims. His retraction thus led to the important question
of how Agca had learned details about Antonov’s apartment without having
been there. This issue was never seriously addressed in the _New York
Times.³⁶_

Paul Henze was a longtime CIA official who had been head of the CIA
station in Turkey and a specialist in propaganda. Former Turkish head of
state Bulent Ecevit even accused Henze of helping destabilize Turkey
during his term of operations there.³⁷ Henze never refers in his “news”
articles to his active participation in Turkish affairs as a CIA
official. His writings are notable for their consistent apologetics for
military rule in Turkey, for their dishonesty,³⁸ and for the fact that
Henze openly disdains the use of rules of evidence in proving Soviet
villainy.³⁹

Michael Ledeen, as we saw in chapter 1, contends that the mass media
believe Qaddafi more readily than the U.S. government, and focus more
heavily on the victims of state terror in U.S. client states (Indonesia
in East Timor, and Guatemala?) than in enemy and radical states
(Cambodia and Poland?). Again, such absurdities do not reduce Ledeen’s
access to the mass media as an expert on the Bulgarian Connection, or on
anything else.⁴⁰

The mass media not only allowed these disinformation sources to prevail,
they protected them against disclosures that would reveal their dubious
credentials. That Henze was a longtime CIA official was almost never
mentioned in the press (never, to our knowledge, on television), and his
consistent apologetics for the Turkish military regime and frequent lies
were never disclosed. In Sterling’s case, her numerous errors of fact,
foolish arguments, and wilder political opinions were not disclosed to
readers of the _New York Times, Time_, or _Newsweek_, or watchers of CBS
News or the “McNeil-Lehrer News Hour,” and even “newsworthy” matters
bearing on her qualifications were ignored. For example, Sterling’s
numerous attacks on the murdered French activist-radical Henry Curiel
resulted in suits for slander brought against her in Paris. The _New
York Times_ has never mentioned these slander suits, which would put
Sterling in a bad light not only because she lost them in whole or part,
but also because of the insight they provide concerning her sources and
methods. Sterling had gotten much of her information from a French
journalist, George Suffert, who was a conduit for French and South
African intelligence, and who had obligingly placed the African National
Congress at the top of his list of “terrorist” organizations. In her
_Terror Network_, Sterling strongly intimates that Curiel was a KGB
agent, but the French court, on the basis of documents provided by
French intelligence, found no support for this claim. Sterling retreated
to the defense that her insinuation of Curiel’s KGB connection was
merely a “hypothesis” rather than an assertion of fact. The case, in
short, showed that she was a conduit of disinformation, quite prepared
to slander a murdered radical on the basis of claims by extreme
right-wing disinformation sources.

Michael Ledeen, a neoconservative activist and disinformationist, with
ready access to the _Times_, has also received its close protection. His
book _Grave New World_ was reviewed in the _Times_ by William Griffith,
a _Reader’s Digest_ “roving editor” and right-wing MIT political
scientist who found Ledeen’s version of the Bulgarian Connection
entirely convincing.⁴¹ Ledeen was deeply involved with Francesco
Pazienza in the “Billygate” affair and had numerous contacts with
Italian intelligence and the Italian extreme right. The Italian Fascist
and head of P-2, Licio Gelli, hiding in Uruguay, instructed one of his
accomplices to convey a manuscript to Ledeen. Pazienza claimed (and
SISMI head Santovito confirmed) that Ledeen was a member of the Italian
intelligence agency SISMI, with code number Z-3. Ledeen received over
$100,000 from SISMI for services rendered, including the supplying of
stale U.S. intelligence reports that SISMI then passed off as its own.
Ledeen funneled this money into a Bermuda bank account. His manipulative
activities in Italy were on such a scale that in the summer of 1984 a
newly appointed head of SISMI told the Italian parliament that Ledeen
was a “meddler” and _persona non grata_ in Italy.⁴² None of these points
was ever disclosed in the _Times.⁴³_


4.6. THE PROPAGANDA AGENDA: QUESTIONS UNASKED, SOURCES UNTAPPED

There is a close linkage among sources used, frames of reference, and
agendas of the newsworthy. When the mass media chose to use Sterling,
Henze, and Ledeen heavily, they simultaneously adopted a frame of
reference in which the Bulgarians and Soviets were presumed guilty, Agca
was an apolitical mercenary, and justice was being promoted by diligent
Judge Martella in free-world Italy. In the propaganda campaign that
ensued, hard questions about the quality of the SHK model were simply
not asked, and alternative sources and frames were ignored.

A distinction between matters on and off the agenda, such as we used in
the previous chapter, is once again applicable and illuminating. “On the
agenda” are statements by Agca and Martella about Agca’s latest claims
and proofs of Bulgarian involvement, Brzezinski’s opinion on whether the
Bulgarians are likely to have engaged in such an escapade (they were),
or Judy Woodruffs question to Paul Henze as to whether the Soviets
“would have any notion, any desire to try this again” (they do this kind
of thing all the time—just got a little careless here because “they had
got away with so much in Italy”).⁴⁴ As in the Third World election cases
described in chapter 3, the media prefer to focus on superficial detail
about the participants and opinions within a narrow range of
establishment views (plus bluff denials by Bulgarian and Soviet
officials), along with each development supporting the accepted case (a
defector’s accusations, a further Agca confession, an investigator’s or
prosecutor’s report, and leaks of alleged claims or expected new
developments), whatever its credibility.

“Off the agenda” are arguments and facts that would call into question
the validity of the basic SHK model, and those relating to the
“alternative model” (which _starts_ with the question of why Agca
confessed so late and the likelihood that he was encouraged and pressed
to talk). We will run through only a few of the important questions and
points of evidence that the mass media put off the agenda.

The basic SHK model rested its case on the Soviet motive, Agca’s stay in
Sofia, and the high professionalism of the Soviet and Bulgarian secret
police, which made it likely that they were manipulating Agca if he
stopped off in Bulgaria. Only the ABC “20/20” program of May 12, 1983,
explored the Soviet motive in any depth, despite the constant mass-media
reiteration of the SHK line. ABC went to the trouble of asking the
Vatican about the validity of Marvin Kalb’s claim that the pope had
written a note threatening to resign and to return to Poland to lead the
resistance to any Soviet invasion. Cardinal John Krol, speaking for the
Vatican, said that “Not only was there not such a letter, but such a
letter directly from the Pope to Brezhnev would have been a total
departure from all normal procedures. In no way could you conceive of
the Holy Father saying, ‘I would resign.’ ” ABC’s information from the
Vatican too was that the pope’s _spoken_ message to Brezhnev was
conciliatory. This spectacular repudiation of an important element in
the SHK case was unreported in the rest of the media, and simply died
with the ABC broadcast. And any balancing of supposed gains against the
costs and risks to the Soviet Union in sponsoring Agca was simply not
undertaken in the mass media.

None of them stopped to evaluate Agca’s 1979 letter threatening to kill
the pope on his earlier visit to Turkey. Sterling’s ludicrous claim that
the KGB hired a Turk to kill the pope in order to damage Turkey’s
relation to NATO was never discussed. The question of the authenticity
of Agca’s letter to Turkes, which bears on Agca’s political commitments
(and thus another SHK premise), was never discussed in the U.S. mass
media. During the trial, Abdullah Catli’s statement that Bulgaria was a
preferred Gray Wolves route to Europe because of the relative ease of
hiding in the heavy Turkish traffic—which directly contradicts the SHK
claim that the Bulgarian secret police know everything, and that Agca’s
stay in Sofia must therefore have been by Bulgarian official plan—was
never picked up in the U.S. mass media’s coverage of the Rome trial.

The most striking deficiencies of the mass media’s handling of the basic
SHK claims, however, was their remarkable naïveté in the face of the
pseudoscientific speculations of SHK and the _accumulating_ violations
of elementary principles of plausible deniability. The preposterous SHK
claims—without a vestige of evidence—that Agca had been recruited by the
KGB in Turkey for future work, and that he took on the appearance of a
right-winger as a “cover,” were not ridiculed, and were not evaluated
when presented as purported truth.⁴⁵ There was never any discussion in
the mass media of the fact that the thesis of prior recruitment and
careful cultivation of Agca’s cover in Turkey was flatly inconsistent
with the claim that he was brought to Sofia for a lengthy stay for
instructions. With regard to Agca’s alleged open dealings with
Bulgarians in Rome, the mass media simply refused to discuss the fact
that the alleged professionalism and use of the right-wing Turk as a
“cover” had disappeared.

As regards the alternative model, and the likelihood that Agca had been
encouraged and coached, here also the mass media refused to explore
these dissonant possibilities. They simply would not examine and discuss
the _convenience_ of the newly discovered plot for so many Western
interests; the huge time lag in the naming of Bulgarians; Agca’s prison
conditions and prison contacts; reports of meetings, offers, and threats
to Agca to induce him to talk; and the compromised character of the
Italian police and intelligence agencies. This involved the media in the
suppression of important documents.

As one important instance, the July 12, 1984, Italian _Report of the
Parliamentary Commission on the Masonic Lodge P-2_ describes in great
detail the penetration of this massive neo-Fascist conspiracy into the
military establishment, secret services, press, and judiciary, among
others. This report was newsworthy in its own right, but it also had a
bearing on the Bulgarian Connection case, as it addressed
characteristics of Italian institutions that were directly involved in
making and prosecuting the case against the Bulgarians. The _New York
Times, Time, Newsweek_, and CBS Evening News never mentioned the
publication of this report.

As a second major illustration, one year later, in July 1985, the
Criminal Court of Rome handed down a _Judgment in the Matter of
Francesco Pazienza et al_., which described repeated corrupt behavior by
officials of the Italian secret-service agency SISMI, including the
forgery and planting of documents. These officials were also charged
with involvement in a cover-up of the agents carrying out the 1980
Bologna railway-station massacre, the kind of terrorist connection that
attracts frenetic mass-media attention when attributable to suitable
villains. As we noted earlier, SISMI officials had visited Agca in
prison and SISMI had issued a forged document implicating the Soviet
Union in the shooting of the pope on May 19, 1981, only six days after
the assassination attempt. This forgery was never mentioned in the
_Times, Time_, and _Newsweek_, or on CBS News, and the July 1985 court
decision was barely mentioned in a back-page article of the _Times_.

These blackouts are of materials that suggest a corrupt Italian process
and the possibility that Agca was persuaded and coached to pin the plot
on the East. A propaganda system exploiting the alleged Bulgarian
Connection will naturally avoid such documents.

Agca’s extremely loose prison conditions and the numerous claims in the
Italian and dissident U.S. press of visits by Italian intelligence
personnel were also virtually unmentioned by the U.S. mass media
throughout 1982 and 1983. In June 1983, Diana Johnstone, the foreign
editor of the newspaper _In These Times_ submitted on Op-Ed column to
the _New York Times_ and the _Philadelphia Inquirer_ that summarized the
evidence and claims of intelligence-agency visits, the reported threats
to Agca that his open and pleasant prison conditions might be terminated
if he remained uncooperative, and Martella’s proposed deal with Agca.
This Op-Ed offering was rejected, and no commentary or news along these
lines was permitted to surface in the _Times_ or the _Philadelphia
Inquirer_—or elsewhere, to our knowledge. Several years later, in an
article in the _New York Times_ of June 17, 1985, referring to Pandico’s
detailed description of how Agca was coached in prison, John Tagliabue
describes Agca’s prison as “notoriously porous.” But the _Times_ had
never mentioned this notorious fact before, or considered it in any way
relevant to the case.

When Agca identified the Bulgarians in November 1982, the integrity of
the Italian investigative-judicial process in pursuing the case was
already badly compromised for a wide variety of reasons,⁴⁶ but the U.S.
mass media weren’t interested. Nor were they interested in the strange
circumstances of the famous Antonov photo, widely circulated in the
Western press, which shows Antonov very clearly and in a remarkable
likeness watching the scene at St. Peter’s Square on May 13, 1981. This
photo, Martella eventually claimed, was not of Antonov but an American
tourist. But this tourist, who apparently looked exactly like Antonov,
has never been located, and the film from which this shot was taken has
unaccountably disappeared.⁴⁷ Agca’s alterations in his claims about the
Bulgarians, with Martella generously allowing him to change his
recollections about the timing of events on May 13 whenever Bulgarian
counter-evidence was too strong, failed to attract the media’s
attention.⁴⁸ Agca’s June 28, 1983, retraction of his claim that he had
visited Antonov’s apartment and met his family was not mentioned in the
mass media until a full year after the event, and even then suggested to
the press no very serious problems with the case or with Martella’s
investigative work.⁴⁹ How could Agca know details about Antonov’s
apartment if he had never been there? An honest press would have pursued
this relentlessly. The _New York Times_, with Sterling as its reporter,
suppressed the issue.⁵⁰ The rest of the press simply wasn’t interested.

The media also weren’t interested in Orsen Oymen’s finding that the
Vatican had gone to some pains to try to implicate the Bulgarians, or
the trial disclosure that the West German authorities had tried to bribe
Gray Wolves member Oral Celik to come to West Germany and confirm Agca’s
claims. Pandico’s and Pazienza’s insider claims of Mafia and SISMI
involvement in getting Agca to talk were also given only the slightest
attention, and this accumulating mass of materials on the Italian
process was never brought together for a reassessment.

Perhaps the most blatant case of willful ignorance concerned the Italian
fixer and former member of SISMI, Francesco Pazienza. Wanted for several
crimes, Pazienza had fled Italy, and in 1985 he resided in exile in New
York City. Eventually he was seized and held there by the Immigration
and Naturalization Service. Pazienza had been a partner of Michael
Ledeen in the “Billygate” affair in Italy, and retained his connection
after Ledeen became General Haig’s right-hand man in Italy in the early
days of the Reagan presidency. Pazienza had also been a close associate
of SISMI head Giuseppe Santovito. From 1983 onward it was alleged in the
Italian press that Pazienza had been involved in getting Agca to talk,
and he himself eventually made detailed accusations of coaching by
elements of SISMI. Although Pazienza was readily available for
interviews in a New York City jail, the _New York Times_ ignored him.
Our hypothesis is that they did this because if they had talked to him
it would have been difficult to avoid discussing his connections with
Ledeen and Sterling (both _Times_ sources and under _Times_ protection).
This would not have reflected well on the quality of the paper’s
sourcing. Pazienza’s story would also have highlighted the _Times’_s
suppression of facts concerning the corruption of SISMI and raised
questions about coaching. This would have disturbed the propaganda line.

The trial in Rome was awkward for the Western media, as Agca quickly
declared himself to be Jesus and, more important, failed to produce any
supportive evidence backing up his claims of Bulgarian involvement. The
diligent and extensive court investigation found numerous Gray Wolves
links to Agca in the period just up to his assassination attempt, but no
witness to his (allegedly) numerous meetings with Bulgarians in Rome, no
money, no car, and, in the end, no conviction. As we have pointed out,
in addition to the already available evidence of atrocious prison
practice in dealing with Agca, and the 1981 meetings with intelligence
officials and Martella’s offer, there was a steady accumulation of
claims and evidence of pressures on Agca to implicate the Bulgarians.
But, despite this evidence and the failure to convict the Bulgarians
after a lengthy investigation and trial, the mass media of the West
never provided any serious reevaluations of the case. Almost uniformly
they hid behind the fact that an Italian court dismissed the case for
lack of evidence rather than demonstrated innocence. They never hinted
at the possibility that an Italian court and jury might still be biased
against the Eastern bloc and protective of the powerful Western
interests that had supported the Bulgarian Connection so energetically.

The mass media also never looked back at their own earlier claims and
those of the disinformationists to see how they had stood up to the test
of accumulated evidence. On January 3, 1983, _Newsweek_ had quoted an
Italian official who said that “we have substantial evidence … [that]
Agca operated in close contact with the Bulgarians,” and the _New York
Times_ editorialized on October 20, 1984, that “Agca’s accounts of
meetings with Bulgarian officials are verifiable in important details.”
If there was “substantial evidence” and “verifiable” details long before
the trial, why was this evidence not produced in the courtroom? Why,
after an enormous further investigative effort was there still not
enough evidence to sustain a conviction? The U.S. mass media didn’t even
try to answer these questions. This would mean asking serious questions
about the validity of the SHK model and considering alternatives, which
the media have never been prepared to do. For them, the alternative
model, plausible from the beginning and, by March 1986, based on a great
deal of evidence, was still the “Bulgarian view.” The questions raised
by the “Bulgarian view,” we believe, would have been applied by the U.S.
mass media to analogous facts in a Moscow setting. This means that the
view actually employed by the media from beginning to end was a “U.S.
government view,” as suggested by a propaganda model. That this was true
even after the trial ended we show in a detailed analysis in appendix 3,
“Tagliabue’s Finale on the Bulgarian Connection: A Case Study in Bias.”



[]  _5_ THE INDOCHINA WARS (I): VIETNAM



[]


MEDIA COVERAGE OF THE U.S. WARS IN INDOCHINA HAS ENGENDERED a good deal
of bitter controversy, some close analysis of several specific
incidents, and a few general studies.¹ It is widely held that the media
“lost the war” by exposing the general population to its horrors and by
unfair, incompetent, and biased coverage reflecting the “adversary
culture” of the sixties. The media’s reporting of the Tet offensive has
served as the prime example of this hostility to established power,
which, it has been argued, undermines democratic institutions and should
be curbed, either by the media themselves or by the state.

A propaganda model leads to different expectations. On its assumptions,
we would expect media coverage and interpretation of the war to take for
granted that the United States intervened in the service of generous
ideals, with the goal of defending South Vietnam from aggression and
terrorism and in the interest of democracy and self-determination. With
regard to the second-level debate on the performance of the media, a
propaganda model leads us to expect that there would be no condemnation
of the media for uncritical acceptance of the doctrine of U.S.
benevolence and for adherence to the official line on all central
issues, or even awareness of these characteristics of media performance.
Rather, given that the U.S. government did not attain all of its
objectives in Indochina, the issue would be whether the media are to be
faulted for undermining the noble cause by adopting too “adversarial” a
stance and departing thereby from fairness and objectivity.

We shall see that all of these expectations are amply fulfilled.


5.1. THE BOUNDS OF CONTROVERSY

“For the first time in history,” Robert Elegant writes, “the outcome of
a war was determined not in the battlefield, but on the printed page,
and above all, on the television screen,” leading to the defeat of the
United States in Vietnam. The belief that the media, particularly
television, were responsible for U.S. government failures is widely
expressed. It was endorsed by the right-wing media-monitoring
organization Accuracy in Media in its hour-long “Vietnam Op/Ed” aired by
public television in response to its own thirteen-part series on the
war.² According to a more “moderate” expression of this view, the media
had become a “notable new source of national power” by 1970 as part of a
general “excess of democracy,” contributing to “the reduction of
governmental authority” at home and a resulting “decline in the
influence of democracy abroad.” “Broader interests of society and
government” require that if journalists do not impose “standards of
professionalism,” “the alternative could well be regulation by the
government” to the end of “restoring a balance between government and
media.”³ Freedom House Executive-Director Leonard Sussman, commenting on
_Big Story_, the study of media coverage of the Tet offensive sponsored
by Freedom House, describes the “adversarial aspect” of the
press-government relation as “normal,” presupposing without argument
that it has been demonstrated, but asks: “Must free institutions be
overthrown because of the very freedom they sustain?”⁴ John Roche
proceeds further still, calling for congressional investigation of “the
workings of these private governments” who distorted the record in
pursuit of their “anti-Johnson mission,” although he fears Congress is
too “terrified of the media” and their awesome power to take on this
necessary task.⁵

_New York Times_ television critic John Corry defends the media as
merely “unmindful,” not “unpatriotic” as the harsher critics claim. They
are not “anti-American,” despite their adversarial stance; rather, “they
reflect a powerful element of the journalistic-literary-political
culture,” where “the left wins battles … by default” because “its ideas
make up the moral and intellectual framework for a large part of the
culture,” and “television becomes an accomplice of the left when it
allows the culture to influence its news judgments,” as in his view it
regularly does.⁶

Media spokespersons, meanwhile, defend their commitment to independence
while conceding that they may err through excessive zeal in calling the
government to account in vigorous pursuit of their role as watchdog.

Within the mainstream, the debate is largely framed within the bounds
illustrated by the PBS-AIM interchange broadcast on the public
television network. AIM’s “Vietnam Op/Ed” accused PBS of “deliberate
misrepresentation” and other sins, while the producers of the
documentary defended its accuracy. A dozen commentators, ranging from
extreme hawks to mild critics of the war such as General Douglas
Kinnard, added their thoughts.⁷ The program concluded with a studio
wrap-up featuring three “intelligent citizens”: Colonel Harry Summers of
the Army War College, a hawkish critic of the tactics of the war; Peter
Braestrup, one of the harshest critics of media war coverage; and Huynh
Sanh Thong, speaking for what the moderator called “the South Vietnamese
community,” meaning the exile community.

The hypothesis advanced by the propaganda model, excluded from debate as
unthinkable, is that in dealing with the American wars in Indochina, the
media were indeed “unmindful,” but highly “patriotic” in the special and
misleading sense that they kept—and keep—closely to the perspective of
official Washington and the closely related corporate elite, in
conformity to the general “journalistic-literary-political culture” from
which “the left” (meaning dissident opinion that questions jingoist
assumptions) is virtually excluded. The propaganda model predicts that
this should be generally true not only of the choice of topics covered
and the way they are covered, but also, and far more crucially, of the
general background of presuppositions within which the issues are framed
and the news presented. Insofar as there is debate among dominant
elites, it will be reflected within the media, which in this narrow
sense may adopt an “adversarial stance” with regard to those holding
office, reflecting elite dissatisfaction with current policy. Otherwise
the media will depart from the elite consensus only rarely and in
limited ways. Even when large parts of the general public break free of
the premises of the doctrinal system, as finally happened during the
Indochina wars, real understanding based upon an alternative conception
of the evolving history can be developed only with considerable effort
by the most diligent and skeptical. And such understanding as can be
reached through serious and often individual effort will be difficult to
sustain or apply elsewhere, an extremely important matter for those who
are truly concerned with democracy at home and “the influence of
democracy abroad,” in the real sense of these words.

These conclusions concerning media conformism are accepted in part by
mainstream critics of the media. Thus Leonard Sussman, of Freedom House,
observes that “U.S. intervention in 1965 enjoyed near-total … editorial
support.”⁸ The “intervention” in 1965 included the deployment of U.S.
combat forces in Vietnam, the regular bombing of North Vietnam, and the
bombing of South Vietnam at triple the scale in a program of “unlimited
aerial warfare inside the country at the price of literally pounding the
place to bits.”⁹ It is a highly significant fact that neither then, nor
before, was there any detectable questioning of the righteousness of the
American cause in Vietnam, or of the necessity to proceed to full-scale
“intervention.” By that time, of course, only questions of tactics and
costs remained open, and further discussion in the mainstream media was
largely limited to these narrow issues. While dissent and domestic
controversy became a focus of media coverage from 1965, the actual views
of dissidents and resisters were virtually excluded. These individuals
were presented primarily as a threat to order, and while their tactics
might be discussed, their views were not: “The antiwar movement stood at
the bottom of the media’s hierarchy of legitimate political actors,”
Daniel Hallin concludes from his survey of television coverage (the
print media were hardly different), “and its access to the news and
influence over it were still more limited.”¹⁰ All exactly as the
propaganda model predicts.

As the war progressed, elite opinion gradually shifted to the belief
that the U.S. intervention was a “tragic mistake” that was proving too
costly, thus enlarging the domain of debate to include a range of
tactical questions hitherto excluded. Expressible opinion in the media
broadened to accommodate these judgments, but the righteousness of the
cause and nobility of intent were rarely subject to question. Rather,
editorials explained that the “idealistic motives” of “the political and
military commands” who “conceive[d] their role quite honestly as that of
liberators and allies in the cause of freedom … had little chance to
prevail against local leaders skilled in the art of manipulating their
foreign protectors.”¹¹ “Our Vietnamese” were too corrupt and we were too
weak and too naive to resist their manipulations, while “their
Vietnamese” were too wily and vicious. How could American idealism cope
with such unfavorable conditions? At the war’s end, the liberal media
could voice the lament that “the high hopes and wishful idealism with
which the American nation had been born … had been chastened by the
failure of America to work its will in Indochina.”¹² But no conflict can
be perceived between “wishful idealism” and the commitment to “work our
will” in foreign lands, a comment that holds of “the culture” more
broadly.

As for direct reporting, the major charge of the influential Freedom
House study of the Tet offensive, echoed by others who condemn the media
for their overly “adversarial” stance, is that reporting was too
“pessimistic.” We return to the facts, but consideration of the logic of
the charge shows that even if accurate, it would be quite consistent
with a propaganda model. There was, no doubt, increased pessimism within
the German general staff after Stalingrad. Similarly, Soviet elites
openly expressed concern over the wisdom of “the defense of Afghanistan”
and its costs, and some might have been “overly pessimistic” about the
likelihood of success in this endeavor. But in neither case do we
interpret these reactions as a departure from service to the national
cause as defined by the state authorities. The Freedom House charge
tacitly but clearly presupposes that the media must not only accept the
framework of government propaganda, but must be upbeat and enthusiastic
about the prospects for success in a cause that is assumed without
discussion to be honorable and just.

This basic assumption endures throughout, and provides the basic
framework for discussion and news reports. The harshest critics within
the mainstream media, as well as what Corry calls “the culture,” held
that the war began with “blundering efforts to do good,” although “by
1969” (that is, a year after corporate America had largely concluded
that this enterprise should be liquidated) it had become “clear to most
of the world—and most Americans—that the intervention had been a
disastrous mistake,” and that it was a “delusion” to attempt to build “a
nation on the American model in South Vietnam”; the argument against the
war “was that the United States had misunderstood the cultural and
political forces at work in Indochina—that it was in a position where it
could not impose a solution except at a price too costly to itself”
(Anthony Lewis).¹³ Stanley Karnow’s highly praised companion volume to
the PBS television series describes the American war as “a failed
crusade” undertaken for aims that were “noble” although “illusory” and
“motivated by the loftiest intentions”: specifically, the commitment “to
defend South Vietnam’s independence.”¹⁴

Within “the culture,” it would be difficult to find harsher critics of
U.S. Asia policy than John King Fairbank, the dean of American China
scholarship, or Harvard government professor Stanley Hoffmann, or
_Dissent_ editor Irving Howe. In his presidential address to the
American Historical Association in December 1968, Fairbank characterized
the U.S. involvement, which he termed a “disaster,” as the result of “an
excess of righteousness and disinterested benevolence,” an “error” based
on misunderstanding. Howe explained that “we opposed the war because we
believed, as Stanley Hoffman [sic] has written, that ‘Washington could
“save” the people of South Vietnam and Cambodia from Communism only at a
cost that made a mockery of the word “save.” ’ ” Hoffmann explains later
that our efforts in “supporting the South Vietnamese” were “undermined”
by the way the war was fought, while the means adopted to “deter the
North Vietnamese from further infiltration” were “never sufficient”; and
sufficient means, “had the United States been willing to commit them,
would have created for the United States real external dangers with
potential adversaries and in relations with allies.” Again, we find not
the slightest recognition that the familiar pieties of state propaganda
might be subject to some question.¹⁵

In its 1985 tenth-anniversary retrospective on the Vietnam war, _Foreign
Affairs_ presents both the hawk and the dove positions. Representing the
more dovish view, David Fromkin and James Chace assert without argument
that “the American decision to intervene in Indochina was predicated on
the view that the United States has a duty to look beyond its purely
national interests,” and that, pursuant to its “global
responsibilities,” the United States must “serve the interests of
mankind.” “As a moral matter we were right to choose the lesser of two
evils” and to oppose “communist aggression” by the Vietnamese in
Vietnam, but on the “practical side” it was “wrong” because “our side
was likely to lose.” The moral imperatives of our service “to the
interests of mankind” do not, however, require that we intervene to
overthrow governments that are slaughtering their own populations, such
as the Indonesian government we supported in 1965, or our Guatemalan and
Salvadoran clients of the 1980s. On the contrary, they observe, the
success of our Indonesian allies in destroying the domestic political
opposition by violence in 1965 was a respectable achievement that should
have led us to reconsider our Vietnam policy. They cite Lyndon Johnson’s
national security adviser, McGeorge Bundy, who feels in retrospect that
“our effort” in Vietnam was “excessive” after 1965, when “a new
anti-communist government took power in Indonesia and destroyed the
communist party [the only mass-based political party] in that
country …,” incidentally slaughtering several hundred thousand people,
mostly landless peasants, and thus “securing” Indonesia in accord with
our “global responsibilities” and “serving the interests of mankind.”¹⁶

Fromkin and Chace define “opponents of the war”—meaning, presumably,
critics whose views merit serious consideration—as those who “did not
believe that ‘whipping’ the enemy [North Vietnam] was enough, so long as
the enemy refused to submit or surrender.” The media, they say, “brought
home to the American people how little effective control over the
population had been purchased by all of General Westmoreland’s
victories,” thus strengthening the “opponents of the war,” dissatisfied
by our inability to gain “effective control over the population.” “The
media cannot be blamed for pointing out the problem, and if General
Westmoreland knew the answer to it, perhaps he should have revealed it
to the public.”

Outside of those committed to “the cause,” although possibly skeptical
about its feasibility or the means employed, there are only those whom
McGeorge Bundy once described as “wild men in the wings,” referring to
people who dared to question the decisions of the “first team” that was
determining U.S. policy in Vietnam.¹⁷

Quite generally, insofar as the debate over the war could reach the
mainstream during the war or since, it was bounded on the one side by
the “hawks,” who felt that with sufficient dedication the United States
could succeed in “defending South Vietnam,” “controlling the
population,” and thus establishing “American-style democracy” there,¹⁸
and on the other side by the “doves,” who doubted that success could be
achieved in these noble aims at reasonable cost¹⁹—later, there arrived
the “owls,” who observed the proceedings judiciously without succumbing
to the illusions of either extreme of this wrenching controversy.
Reporting and interpretation of the facts were framed in accordance with
these principles.


5.2. “THE WILD MEN IN THE WINGS”

As the elite consensus eroded in the late 1960s, criticism of the “noble
cause” on grounds of its lack of success became more acceptable, and the
category of “wild men in the wings” narrowed to those who opposed the
war on grounds of principle—the same grounds on which they opposed the
Soviet invasions of Hungary, Czechoslovakia, and, later, Afghanistan.
Let us consider how superpower intervention would be presented from a
point of view that permits aggression to be understood as aggression.

In the case of Soviet intervention, there is no serious controversy.
True, the Soviet Union has security concerns in Eastern Europe,
including states that collaborated with the Nazis in an attack on the
Soviet Union that practically destroyed it a generation ago and now
serve as a buffer to a rearmed West Germany that is part of a hostile
and threatening military alliance. True, Afghanistan borders areas of
the Soviet Union where the population could be inflamed by a radical
Islamic fundamentalist revival, and the rebels, openly supported by
bitter enemies of the Soviet Union, are undoubtedly terrorists committed
to harsh oppression and religious fanaticism who carry out violent acts
inside the Soviet Union itself and have been attacking Afghanistan from
Pakistani bases since 1973, six years before the Soviet invasion.²⁰ But
none of these complexities bear on the fact that the Soviet Union
invaded Czechoslovakia, Hungary, and Afghanistan, holds Poland in a firm
grip, etc. True, the Russians were invited into Afghanistan in 1979, but
as the London _Economist_ accurately observed, “an invader is an invader
unless invited in by a government with some claim to legitimacy,”²¹ and
the government that the Soviet Union installed to invite it in plainly
lacked any such claim.

None of these matters elicit serious controversy, nor should they. The
Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, like earlier cases of Soviet
intervention in the region occupied by the Red Army as it drove out the
Nazis during World War II, are described as aggression, and the facts
are reported in these terms. The United Nations has repeatedly condemned
the Soviet aggression in Afghanistan and regularly investigates and
denounces the crimes they have committed. Western reporters cover the
war from the standpoint of the rebels defending their country from
foreign attack, entering Afghanistan with them from their Pakistani
sanctuaries. Official Soviet pronouncements are treated not merely with
skepticism but with disdain.

In the case of the U.S. intervention in Indochina, no such
interpretation has ever been conceivable, apart from “the wild men in
the wings,” although it is at least as well grounded as the standard,
and obviously correct, interpretation of the Soviet aggression in
Afghanistan. Furthermore, the reporting practice of journalists and
commentators is also radically different in the two cases. We put off
for a moment the more significant issue of how the war is understood,
focusing first on the narrower question of journalistic practice.

In sharp contrast to the Soviet aggression, it was standard practice
throughout the Indochina war for journalists to report Washington
pronouncements as fact, even in the extreme case when official
statements were known to be false. Furthermore, this practice persisted
through the period when the media had allegedly had become “a notable
new source of national power” threatening government authority. To
mention only one typical case from the year in which, we are to
understand, this status had been definitively attained (see p. 170), in
March 1970 the media reported a North Vietnamese invasion of Laos on the
basis of a speech by President Nixon announcing that North Vietnamese
forces in Laos had suddenly risen from 50,000 to 67,000. Nixon’s comment
came immediately after the U.S. military attaché in Vientiane had
presented his standard briefing citing the lower figure—a source of much
private amusement among the press corps in Vientiane, as one of us
witnessed at first hand—but the presidential fabrication was reported as
fact. The lower figure was also fraudulent, although this fact was never
reported.²² Throughout the Indochina wars, when official statements were
questioned, it was generally on the basis of U.S. military sources in
the field, so that reporting and analysis remained well within the
bounds set by U.S. power.²³

Only very rarely did U.S. reporters make any effort to see the war from
the point of view of “the enemy”—the peasants of South Vietnam, Laos, or
later Cambodia—or to accompany the military forces of “the enemy”
resisting the U.S. assault. Such evidence as was available was ignored
or dismissed. In reporting the war in Afghanistan, it is considered
essential and proper to observe it from the standpoint of the victims.
In the case of Indochina, it was the American invaders who were regarded
as the victims of the “aggression” of the Vietnamese, and the war was
reported from their point of view, just as subsequent commentary,
including cinema, views the war from this perspective.

Refugee testimony, which could have provided much insight into the
nature of the war, was also regularly ignored. The enemy of the U.S.
government was the enemy of the press, which could not even refer to
them by their own name: they were the “Viet Cong,” a derogatory term of
U.S.-Saigon propaganda, not the National Liberation Front, a phrase
“never used without quotation marks” by American reporters,²⁴ who
regularly referred to “Communist aggression” (E. W. Kenworthy) by the
South Vietnamese in South Vietnam and Communist efforts “to subvert this
country” (David Halberstam)²⁵—their country, then under the rule of a
U.S.-imposed client regime.

To a substantial extent, the war was reported from Washington. In late
1970, when the process of elite defection was well under way, _Los
Angeles Times_ Washington correspondent Jules Witcover described the
Washington scene during the earlier years:

While the press corps in those years diligently reported what the
government said about Vietnam, and questioned the inconsistencies as
they arose, too few sought out opposing viewpoints and expertise until
too late, when events and the prominence of the Vietnam dissent could no
longer be ignored. In coverage of the war, the press corps’ job narrowed
down to three basic tasks—reporting what the government said, finding
out whether it was true, and assessing whether the policy enunciated
worked. The group did a highly professional job on the first task. But
it fell down on the second and third, and there is strong evidence the
reason is too many reporters sought the answers in all three categories
from the same basic source—the government.²⁶

The search for “opposing viewpoints” as things went wrong was also
extremely narrow, limited to the domain of tactics—that is, limited to
the question of “whether the policy enunciated worked,” viewed entirely
from the standpoint of U.S. interests, and with official premises taken
as given.

Furthermore, the U.S. war was openly supported by U.S. allies, some of
whom sent combat forces (Australia, Thailand, South Korea), while others
enriched themselves through their participation in the destruction of
Indochina. For Japan and South Korea, this participation contributed
significantly to their “take-off” to the status of major economic
powers, while Canada and Western Europe also profited from their support
for the U.S. operations. In contrast to the Soviet invasion of
Afghanistan, the United Nations never condemned the U.S. “intervention,”
nor did it investigate or denounce the crimes committed in the course of
U.S. military operations, a reflection of U.S. world power and
influence. These facts notwithstanding, it is common practice to
denounce the UN and world opinion for its “double standard” in
condemning the U.S. “intervention” in defense of South Vietnam while
ignoring the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, regularly described as
“genocidal,” a term never used in the mainstream media with regard to
the United States in Indochina.

At the time of the full-scale U.S. invasion of Vietnam, in 1965, when
there was as yet no debate over the righteousness of the already massive
“intervention,” the United States had not yet succeeded in establishing
a government able or willing to “invite it in.” It appears that the
United States simply _moved in_ without even the formalities of request
or acquiescence by a supposedly sovereign government. Nevertheless, at
the dovish extreme of U.S. journalism, Tom Wicker, explaining his view
that “the United States has no historic or God-given mission to bring
democracy to other nations,” observes that the matter is different in
the case of the “maintenance of freedom” where it already exists:

U.S. support for a democratic regime that is being attacked or subverted
by repressive forces of the left or right might well be justified if
invited—although, _as in Vietnam_, the “freedom” being defended may be
minimal and the cost may be astronomical.²⁷

As a dissident commentator, Wicker recognizes that the “freedom” we were
defending in Vietnam was minimal and that the cost proved too high. But
the doctrine that we were “invited in” remains sacrosanct, and the idea
that we were “defending” nothing beyond our right to impose our will by
violence is completely beyond the range of the thinkable. We might ask
how we would characterize the Soviet media if the harshest condemnation
of the war in Afghanistan that could be expressed in the year 2000 is
that Soviet support for the democratic regime in Afghanistan that
invited the Russians in might be justified, although the “freedom” that
the Soviets were defending was perhaps minimal and the cost was far too
high.

Let us now turn to “the wild men in the wings” who adopt the principles
universally accepted in the case of Soviet aggression when they approach
the U.S. wars in Indochina. The basic facts are not in doubt. By the
late 1940s, U.S. authorities took for granted that in backing France’s
effort to reconquer its Indochina colonies after World War II, they were
opposing the forces of Vietnamese nationalism represented by the Viet
Minh, led by Ho Chi Minh. In 1947, the State Department noted that Ho
had established himself as “the symbol of nationalism and the struggle
for freedom to the overwhelming majority of the population.”²⁸ By
September 1948, the department deplored “our inability to suggest any
practicable solution of the Indochina problem” in the light of “the
unpleasant fact that Communist Ho Chi Minh is the strongest and perhaps
the ablest figure in Indochina and that any suggested solution which
excludes him is an expedient of uncertain outcome,” the Communists under
Ho having “capture[d] control of the nationalist movement,” while the
U.S. “long-term objective” was “to eliminate so far as possible
Communist influence in Indochina.”²⁹ Nonetheless, the United States
supported the cause of France against Vietnam, covering some 80 percent
of the cost of the war at the end and contemplating a direct U.S.
attack, had France agreed.

When the French withdrew, in 1954, the United States at once turned to
the task of subverting the Geneva agreements that laid the groundwork
for unification of Vietnam with countrywide elections by 1956,
establishing a client state in South Vietnam (the GVN) that controlled
its population with substantial violence and rejected the terms of the
Geneva political settlement, with U.S. support. State terrorism evoked
renewed resistance, and by 1959, Viet Minh cadres in the South, who were
being decimated by U.S.-organized state terror, received authorization
to use violence in self-defense, threatening the quick collapse of the
U.S.-imposed regime, which by then had killed tens of thousands of
people and alienated much of the peasantry as well as urban elites. The
Vietnam correspondent for the _London Times_ and the _Economist_, David
Hotham, wrote in 1959 that the Diem regime imposed by the United States

has crushed all opposition of every kind, however anti-Communist it
might be. He has been able to do this, simply and solely because of the
massive dollar aid he has had from across the Pacific, which kept in
power a man who, by all the laws of human and political affairs, would
long ago have fallen. Diem’s main supporters are to be found in North
America, not in Free Vietnam.…³⁰

The leading U.S. government specialist on Vietnamese Communism, Douglas
Pike, whose denunciations of the “Viet Cong” often reached the level of
hysteria, conceded that the NLF “maintained that its contest with the
GVN and the United States should be fought out at the political level
and that the use of massed military might was in itself illegitimate,”
until forced by the United States and its clients “to use counterforce
to survive.”³¹

The Kennedy administration escalated the war in South Vietnam, engaging
U.S. military forces directly in bombing, defoliation, and “advising”
combat troops from 1961 to 1962 as part of an effort to drive several
million people into concentration camps (“strategic hamlets”) in which
they could be “protected” behind barbed wire and armed guard from the
guerrillas whom, the United States conceded, they were willingly
supporting. Douglas Pike assessed indigenous support for the NLF at
about 50 percent of the population at the time—which is more than George
Washington could have claimed—while the United States could rally
virtually no indigenous support. He explained that political options
were hopeless, since the NLF was the only “truly mass-based political
party in South Vietnam,” and no one, “with the possible exception of the
Buddhists, thought themselves equal in size and power to risk entering a
coalition, fearing that if they did the whale [the NLF] would swallow
the minnow.” As for the Buddhists, the United States regarded them “as
equivalent to card-carrying Communists” (Ambassador Henry Cabot Lodge),
and later backed the use of force to destroy their political movement,
to ensure that no independent political force would remain, since no
such force could be controlled.³² In a highly regarded military history
and moral tract in justification of the American war, Guenter Lewy
describes the purpose of the U.S. air operations of the early 1960s,
which involved “indiscriminate killing” and “took a heavy toll of
essentially innocent men, women and children,” in a manner that Orwell
would have appreciated: villages in “open zones” were “subjected to
random bombardment by artillery and aircraft so as to drive the
inhabitants into the safety of the strategic hamlets.”³³

It was conceded on all sides that the government imposed by the United
States lacked any significant popular support. The experienced U.S.
pacification chief John Paul Vann, widely regarded as the U.S. official
most knowledgeable about the situation in South Vietnam, wrote in 1965
that

A popular political base for the Government of South Vietnam does not
now exist.… The existing government is oriented toward the exploitation
of the rural and lower class urban populations. It is, in fact, a
continuation of the French colonial system of government with upper
class Vietnamese replacing the French.… The dissatisfaction of the
agrarian population … is expressed largely through alliance with the
NLF.³⁴

Virtually all parties concerned, apart from the United States, were
making serious efforts in the early 1960s to avoid an impending war by
neutralizing South Vietnam, Laos, and Cambodia—the official stand of the
National Liberation Front, the “Viet Cong” of U.S. propaganda,
essentially the southern branch of the Viet Minh. But the United States
was committed to preventing any political settlement.

Unable to develop any political base in the south, the U.S. government
proceeded to expand the war. It was able to do this by continually
manipulating the political scene in South Vietnam to assure the
attainment of its objective: continued fighting until an anti-Communist
regime, susceptible to American will, was established in the South.
Ambassador Lodge observed in January 1964 that “It is obvious that the
generals are all we have got.”³⁵ And we would keep replacing them until
we got the right ones, “right” meaning that they were willing to follow
orders and fight, not negotiate. One of Diem’s early replacements told
newsmen that he found out that he was going to be the next head of state
only when his U.S. adviser “told me that a coup d’état was planned in
Saigon and that I was to become President.…” General Maxwell Taylor
spoke quite frankly about the need of “establishing some reasonably
satisfactory government,” replacing it if we are not satisfied, either
with civilians, or with “a military dictatorship.”³⁶

It should be noted in this connection that after the long-standing U.S.
manipulation of governments in its client state had finally succeeded in
its aim, and the United States had placed in power two former French
collaborators, Ky and Thieu, whose sole qualification for rule was that
they met the U.S. condition of willingness to fight and evade political
settlement, the U.S. media continued to pretend that the government of
South Vietnam was a free choice of the South Vietnamese people.³⁷ Thus
the _New York Times_ commented editorially on June 4, 1966, that
“Washington cannot shape the political future in Saigon, but it can
continue to urge a search for unity among all the South Vietnamese
political factions pending the September elections.” In fact, the rulers
at the moment had been imposed by the United States, the election was a
U.S. idea, and—needless to say—the South Vietnamese who constituted the
only “truly mass-based political party in South Vietnam” (Pike,
referring to the NLF) were not considered one of the “South Vietnamese
political factions.” As for the “unity” sought by the United States, it
was intended solely to provide a base for prosecution of the U.S. war.
As that goal could be accomplished only by suppression of all popular
movements, later in 1966 the military junta, with U.S. approval and
direct assistance, crushed by force the largest non-Communist group, the
organized Buddhists, thereby clearing the ground for durable rule by
Thieu and Ky. Despite all of this, the U.S. media did not point out that
any basis for a free election had been destroyed, and that the unelected
government was maintained in power solely because its aims were
identical to those of the U.S. administration—that is, that it was a
classic example of a puppet government.³⁸ On the contrary, the junta
never ceased to be the leaders of free and independent South Vietnam,
the word “puppet” being reserved for agents of enemy states.

Returning to the expanding U.S. war, efforts to obtain congressional
support succeeded with the August 7, 1964 resolution, after the Tonkin
Gulf incident, authorizing the president “to take all necessary measures
to repel any armed attack against the forces of the United States and to
prevent further aggression” by the Vietnamese in Vietnam, “a virtual
blank check in waging the war for the Administration.”³⁹

The United States invaded outright in early 1965, also initiating the
regular bombing of North Vietnam in the hope that Hanoi would use its
influence to call off the southern resistance, and to justify the
escalation of the attack against the South, which required something
beyond the “internal aggression” by the NLF within South Vietnam that UN
Ambassador Adlai Stevenson identified as the problem we faced.⁴⁰ By the
time of the U.S. land invasion in 1965, over 150,000 people had been
killed in South Vietnam, according to figures cited by Bernard Fall,
most of them “under the crushing weight of American armor, napalm, jet
bombers and finally vomiting gases,” or victims of the state terrorism
of the U.S.-installed regimes.⁴¹ From January 1965, the United States
also employed Korean mercenaries, some 300,000 in all, who carried out
brutal atrocities in the South. The first regular North Vietnamese unit,
a four-hundred-man battalion, was thought to have been detected in
border areas of the south in late April 1965; until the Tet offensive in
January 1968, according to Pentagon sources, North Vietnamese units,
mainly drawing U.S. forces away from populated centers, were at about
the level of Korean and Thai mercenaries who were terrorizing South
Vietnam, all vastly outnumbered by the U.S. forces.

By 1967, the war had reached such a level of devastation that, in Fall’s
words, “Vietnam as a cultural and historic entity … is threatened with
extinction … [as] … the countryside literally dies under the blows of
the largest military machine ever unleashed on an area of this size.”⁴²
The strategy of destroying South Vietnam was generally considered a
success. Harvard professor and government adviser Samuel Huntington
concluded that “In an absent-minded way the United States in Vietnam may
well have stumbled upon the answer to ‘wars of national liberation,’ ”
namely, “forced-draft urbanization and mobilization” by violence so
extreme as “to produce a massive migration from countryside to city,”
thus “undercutting” the Maoist strategy of organizing the peasant
population (over 80 percent of the population when these techniques were
initiated) and undermining the Viet Cong, “a powerful force which cannot
be dislodged from its constituency so long as the constituency continues
to exist.”⁴³

The Tet offensive of January 1968, conducted almost entirely by South
Vietnamese NLF forces in cities and towns throughout the country,
convinced U.S. elites that the war was proving too costly to the United
States, and that strategy should shift toward a more “capital-intensive”
operation with reliance on an indigenous mercenary army (in the
technical sense of the phrase) and gradual withdrawal of the U.S.
forces, which were by then suffering a severe loss of morale, a matter
of growing concern to military authorities. U.S. forces undertook a
post-Tet “accelerated pacification campaign,” in actuality a mass-murder
operation that demolished the NLF and much of what was left of the
peasant society while killing tens of thousands and extending the
destruction of the country. Much of North Vietnam, particularly the
southern region, was turned into a moonscape, and Laos was battered
under the heaviest bombing in history, including the peasant society of
northern Laos where, the U.S. government conceded, the bombing had no
relation to its war in South Vietnam. The United States bombed and
invaded Cambodia, destroying much of the countryside and mobilizing
embittered peasants to the cause of the Khmer Rouge, previously a
marginal force. By the war’s end, the death toll in Indochina may have
reached four million or more,⁴⁴ and the land and societies were utterly
devastated. Subsequent U.S. policy has sought to prevent any recovery
from this cataclysm by refusing reparations, aid, and trade, and
blocking assistance from other sources—although not all aid: U.S. aid to
the Khmer Rouge in the 1980s appears to have run to many millions.⁴⁵

Applying the principles that we rightly adopt in the case of Soviet
aggression, the conclusion seems obvious. The United States attacked
South Vietnam, arguably by 1962 and unquestionably by 1965, expanding
its aggression to all of Indochina with lethal and long-term effects.
Media coverage or other commentary on these events that does not begin
by recognizing these essential facts is mere apologetics for terrorism
and murderous aggression. The United States was “defending South
Vietnam” in the same sense in which the Soviet Union is “defending
Afghanistan.”

But from the point of view of the media, or “the culture,” there is no
such event in history as the U.S. attack against South Vietnam and the
rest of Indochina. One would be hard put to find even an single
reference within the mainstream to any such event, or any recognition
that history could possibly be viewed from this perspective—just as
_Pravda_, presumably, records no such event as the Soviet invasion of
Afghanistan, only the defense of Afghanistan against “bandits” supported
by the CIA. Even at the peak period of peace-movement activism there was
virtually no opposition to the war within the intellectual culture on
the grounds that aggression is wrong⁴⁶—the grounds universally adopted
in the case of the Soviet invasion of Czechoslovakia in 1968—for a very
simple reason: the fact of U.S. aggression was unrecognized. There was
much debate during the war over whether the North Vietnamese were guilty
of aggression in Vietnam, and as we have seen, even the South Vietnamese
were condemned for “internal aggression” (Adlai Stevenson); but there
was _no discussion_ of whether the United States was guilty of
aggression in its direct attack against South Vietnam, then all of
Indochina. These intriguing facts reflect the overwhelming dominance of
the state propaganda system and its ability to set the terms of thought
and discussion, even for those who believe themselves to be taking an
“adversarial stance.” As for the media, departures from these doctrinal
principles were negligible; indeed, they may well have been literally
zero in the vast coverage and commentary on the war, while it was in
progress or since.

In a revealing article entitled “Lessons of Running Viets’ War,”
published in August 1987, Stanley Karnow, a veteran Asia correspondent
and author of a highly regarded liberal history of the Vietnam War,
argues that the United States erred in Vietnam because it allowed the
Vietnamese people to depend too heavily on us.⁴⁷ Reciprocally, the South
Vietnamese people also “allowed themselves to be lulled into a
complacent sense of dependency on the United States,” thinking we
wouldn’t back down, not realizing that small clients are expendable. The
South Vietnamese people who fought the U.S. invasion are never
mentioned, or considered to be “South Vietnamese” within Karnow’s
patriotic frame, although they constituted the majority of the
population and the only serious political force, according to U.S.
specialists and officials on the scene, and despite the fact that the
U.S.-selected faction repeatedly stressed that “Frankly, we are not
strong enough now to compete with the communists on a purely political
basis.”⁴⁸ A Soviet Karnow would no doubt express similar concern in
retrospect that the Soviet Union allowed the “Afghans” to rely too
heavily on Soviet power.

By the standards we rightly apply to the actions of the Soviet Union or
other official enemies, there is nothing further that need be said about
the media and Indochina. Any further discussion is on a par with the
minor question of whether _Pravda_ reports facts accurately about “the
Soviet defense of Afghanistan.” Adopting the Freedom House-Trilateral
Commission perspective, a Communist party functionary might criticize
_Pravda_ for excessive pessimism or for too adversarial a stance,
contributing to the eventual loss of the war and the takeover of
Afghanistan by feudalist elements committed to terrorism, horrifying
repression of women, religious fanaticism, plans to “march on
Jerusalem,” etc. Or if he found that the reporting was sufficiently
upbeat and not too distorted, he might laud _Pravda_ for its accuracy
and objectivity. But all of this would be nonsense, whatever is
discovered; serious evaluation of the media is effectively over when we
discover that the basic principle of state propaganda—the principle that
the USSR is defending Afghanistan from terrorist attack—is adopted as
the unquestioned framework for further reporting and discussion. The
same is true in the case of U.S. aggression in Indochina.

We cannot quite say that the propaganda model is verified in the case of
the Indochina wars, since it fails to predict such extraordinary,
far-reaching, and exceptionless subservience to the state propaganda
system. The fact that this judgment is correct—as it plainly is—is
startling enough. Even more revealing with regard to Western
intellectual culture is that the simple facts cannot be perceived, and
their import lies far beyond the bounds of the thinkable.

Nevertheless, let us pursue the narrow question of media coverage of
Indochina, bearing in mind that we are now turning to relatively minor
matters, having taken note of a central and quite devastating criticism:
the media’s pervasive, docile, and unthinking acceptance of a set of
patriotic assumptions at such a level as to make further commentary of
secondary significance, at best.


5.3. THE EARLY STAGES: A CLOSER LOOK

The “first Indochina war,” fought by the French and their client forces
and largely supplied by the United States, came to an end with the
Geneva Accords of 1954, which established a partition at the 17th
parallel pending reunification through elections within two years. The
United States pledged not to obstruct these arrangements.

The Geneva settlement was quickly undermined by the United States and
its client regime because it was taken for granted on all sides that
elections would lead to a unified Vietnam under Viet Minh rule.
“American intelligence sources were unanimous that Diem [the
U.S.-imposed client] would lose any national election,” George Kahin
concludes from a close inspection of the available record. The Viet Minh
had agreed to the Geneva decision for regroupment of its forces well to
the north of territories it controlled on the basis of “the assurance
that the struggle for the control of Vietnam would be transferred from
the military to the political level, a realm in which the Vietminh
leaders knew their superiority over the French and their Vietnamese
collaborators was even greater than it was militarily.… For the
Vietminh, this was the heart of the Geneva Agreements.”⁴⁹

The secret U.S. response to the perceived disaster of Geneva was a plan
to resort to military action (including attacks on China if deemed
necessary) in the event of “local Communist subversion or rebellion not
constituting armed attack,” in explicit violation of the UN Charter,
which limits the use of force to self-defense in the event of “armed
attack” until the UN Security Council is able to respond. This crucial
decision, misrepresented beyond recognition in the _Pentagon Papers_
history and generally ignored, also recommended operations against
China, “covert operations on a large and effective scale” throughout
Indochina (including North Vietnam), remilitarization of Japan,
development of Thailand “as the focal point for U.S. covert and
psychological operations in Southeast Asia,” etc.⁵⁰ Defense Secretary
Robert McNamara observed in a memorandum for President Johnson that
“Only the U.S. presence after 1954 held the south together … and enabled
Diem to refuse to go through with the 1954 provision calling for
nationwide free elections in 1956.”⁵¹

Surveying the media during this period, Howard Elterman observes that
“during a six-month period in 1955 and 1956, there was virtually no news
coverage” about the U.S. policy of undermining the Geneva Accords in the
_New York Times_ and the three newsweeklies. Communist charges to this
effect were occasionally mentioned on back pages but dismissed as
propaganda—accurate propaganda, in fact. When the evasion of elections
was conceded, it was justified on the basis of Communist terror and
regimentation. The _Times_ (June 2, 1956) described Vietnam as a country
“divided into the Communist regime in the north and a democratic
government in the south”—namely, the murderous and corrupt Diem
dictatorship. _Newsweek_ denounced the “wide infiltration in South
Vietnam” in support of the “implacable purpose” of the Viet Minh, while
_U.S. News & World Report_ condemned Ho Chi Minh for “plotting new Red
aggression in Southeast Asia.”⁵²

More generally, through 1956 “the press insured that the reading public
would view the war as a struggle between Communism and the Free World,”
Susan Welch observes on the basis of her survey of several leading
journals. Ho Chi Minh and the Viet Minh were presented as “merely agents
of Moscow and Peking whose primary means of gaining support was through
terror and force (although occasional mention was made of their
nationalist appeal),” while France was “a gallant ally … fighting
alongside the United States to preserve liberty and justice in Asia,” a
cause carried on by the United States alone after Geneva. State doctrine
was “never challenged” by editors or columnists. The liberal press
showed particular enthusiasm for the cause, and “News stories also
reinforced the preconceptions of the Administration,” because “the press
relied almost completely on Administration sources for information which
was reported.” Although coverage of Indochina was limited, apart from a
peak in 1954, and faded still further afterwards, “the terms of the
future debate over U.S. policy were being hardened into usage by the
press.”⁵³

With peaceful settlement successfully deterred, the United States and
its client regime turned to the task of internal repression, killing
tens of thousands and imprisoning tens of thousands more.⁵⁴ Diem
supporter and adviser Joseph Buttinger describes “massive expeditions”
in 1956 that destroyed villages, with hundreds or thousands of peasants
killed and tens of thousands arrested by soldiers in regions “controlled
by the Communists without the slightest use of force,” facts that “were
kept secret from the American people”—and still are.⁵⁵

The main target of the repression was the anti-French resistance, the
Viet Minh, which was virtually decimated by the late 1950s. The reasons
for the resort to violence were simple and have been amply documented.⁵⁶
Recourse to violence was the only feasible response to the successes of
the Viet Minh, reconstituted as the National Liberation Front (NLF), in
organizing the peasantry, which left the United States only one option:
to shift the struggle away from the political arena, where it was weak,
to the arena of violence, where it was strong. Despite the
U.S.-organized terror, the Communist party continued to advocate
political action. The outline of strategy for the coming year sent to
the South in late 1958 still called for political struggle without the
use of arms.⁵⁷ As Jeffrey Race documents, when the Communist party
finally authorized the use of violence in self-defense in 1959 in
response to pleas from the southern Viet Minh, the slaughter could no
longer proceed unimpeded, and government authority quickly collapsed.
Nevertheless, “…  the government terrorized far more than did the
revolutionary movement—for example, by liquidations of former Vietminh
by artillery and ground attacks on ‘communist villages,’ and by roundups
of ‘communist sympathizers.’ ”

The fundamental source of strength for the revolutionary movement, Race
continues, was the appeal of its constructive programs—for example, the
land-reform program, which “achieved a far broader distribution of land
than did the government program, and without the killing and terror
which is associated in the minds of Western readers with communist
practices in land reform.” On the contrary, “the principal violence was
brought about not by the Party but by the government, in its attempts to
reinstall the landlords”—the usual pattern, in fact, although not “in
the minds of Western readers.” The lowest economic strata benefited the
most from the redistributive policies implemented. Authority was
decentralized and placed in the hands of local people, in contrast to
the rule of the U.S. client regime, perceived as “outside forces” by
major segments of the local population: “what attracted people to the
revolutionary movement was that it represented a new society in which
there would be an individual _redistribution_ of values, including power
and status as well as material possessions.” In Long An province, near
Saigon, which Race studied intensively, the NLF had become dominant in
the early 1960s, while the government apparatus and its armed forces
dissolved without violent conflict, undermined by NLF organizing and
propaganda. By late 1964, parts of the province were declared a
free-strike zone, and by early 1965, “revolutionary forces had gained
victory in nearly all the rural areas of Long An.”⁵⁸

The first units of the “North Vietnamese aggressors” entered the
province at the time of the 1968 Tet offensive. In fact, up to summer
1969, when the post-Tet accelerated pacification campaign had succeeded
in decimating the indigenous resistance, U.S. sources reported about
eight hundred North Vietnamese “against an estimated total of 49,000
Vietcong soldiers and support troops” in the entire Mekong Delta.⁵⁹

This picture and what it entails was essentially invisible to the
American public, and it is so remote from news coverage that sampling of
the record is beside the point. The same remains true today outside of
the specialist and dissident literature.

The context of McNamara’s observation cited earlier on the crucial U.S.
role in blocking the election and unification provisions after Geneva
was the “growth of antiwar and neutralist sentiment in the
Saigon-controlled areas” in 1964. This came at a time when virtually all
Vietnamese factions, along with international opinion generally, were
seeking a political solution among Vietnamese that would head off the
impending war to which the United States was committed because of its
recognition that it had no political base in South Vietnam.⁶⁰

The United States overturned the Diem regime in 1963 because of its
ineptitude in conducting the war, as well as because of fears that it
was moving toward a negotiated settlement with the NLF. There were few
illusions about popular support for the U.S. efforts to maintain and
extend the military struggle. As for the generals, who are “all we have
got,” as Ambassador Lodge recognized in January 1964, U.S. policy-makers
knew little about them. William Bundy, soon to become assistant
secretary of state for Far Eastern affairs, later commented that
“Actually no one on our side knew what the new people were thinking at
all.… Our requirements were really very simple—we wanted any government
which would continue to fight.” The generals, however, did not want to
continue to fight. Rather, along with the prime minister installed as a
civilian cover for the military regime, they “wanted to move as rapidly
as possible towards transferring the struggle for power in the South
from the military to the political level,” leading to “a negotiated
agreement among the Vietnamese parties themselves, without American
intervention.” They saw the NLF “as preponderantly noncommunist in
membership” and largely independent of Hanoi’s control, and regarded a
political settlement among South Vietnamese as feasible in essential
agreement with the official NLF program.⁶¹

But none of this was acceptable to the United States. President Johnson
explained to Ambassador Lodge that his mission was “knocking down the
idea of neutralization wherever it rears its ugly head,” because
neutralism, as Ambassador Maxwell Taylor observed, “appeared to mean
throwing the internal political situation open and thus inviting
Communist participation” in a democratic process, here—as
always—intolerable to the United States unless the right outcome is
first determined by establishing a proper distribution of force.⁶²
Ambassador Taylor feared as the worst outcome a government that would
“continue to seek a broadened consensus” and would thus “become
susceptible to an accommodation with the liberation front.” After the
war ended, senior Pentagon legal adviser Paul Warnke observed critically
in retrospect that “For the United States to ‘compromise’ and permit the
indigenous forces of Vietnam to work their own way would be to condone
the demise of the anti-Communist regime we had supported in Saigon for
twenty years.”

UN Secretary-General U Thant initiated a negotiation effort in the fall
of 1964, with the support of Moscow and Hanoi and in accord with the
consensus of Vietnamese as well as others, but it was rebuffed by
Washington. As for the media, “It was not until after the die had been
cast—not until March 9, 1965, after the United States had mounted its
sustained air war against the North and landed the first U.S. ground
forces in Vietnam—that _The New York Times_ reported U Thant’s 1964
efforts.”⁶³

The U.S. position throughout was that “after, _but only after_, we have
established a clear pattern of pressure,” could peaceful means be
considered (William Bundy, Aug. 11, 1964; his emphasis). First violence,
then—perhaps—recourse to the peaceful means required by international
law and the supreme law of the land. The elections provision of the
Geneva Accords had been officially described in a 1961 State Department
white paper as “a well-laid trap” that the United States had skillfully
evaded, and planners were in no mood to fall into such a “trap” in 1964,
until the use of violence had secured their objectives.⁶⁴ Increasingly,
U.S. planners turned to the policy of expanding the war to the North in
the hope that this would compensate for their political weakness.

No such conception of the evolving events, and their meaning, was ever
made accessible through the mainstream media, which kept to the official
line that the United States was pursuing limited measures “to strengthen
South Vietnam against attack by the Communists,” supporting South
Vietnam “against Communist aggression.”⁶⁵

In the _New York Times_ version, the United States was leading “the free
world’s fight to contain aggressive Communism” (Robert Trumbull),
defending South Vietnam “against the proxy armies of Soviet Russia—North
and South Vietnamese guerrillas” (Hanson Baldwin), just as the French
had fought “a seven-and-a-half-year struggle” against “foreign-inspired
and supplied Communists.” In early 1965, President Johnson decided “to
step up resistance to Vietcong infiltration in South Vietnam” (Tom
Wicker); the Vietcong “infiltrate” in their own country, while we
“resist” this aggression. Since the South Vietnamese guerrillas were
“trying to subvert this country” (David Halberstam), it was natural that
the _Times_ supported the strategic-hamlet program as necessary despite
the coercion and brutality; it was “conducted as humanely as possible”
to offer the peasants “better protection against the Communists”
(Halberstam, Homer Bigart). The peasant support for the South Vietnamese
“aggressors” and the reasons for it were ignored. Hallin comments that
in the entire _New York Times_ coverage from 1961 through September
1963, he found two “extremely brief” references to land tenure.⁶⁶

While the print media did on occasion reflect the perceptions and
opinions of American military officers in the field, arousing much irate
condemnation thereby for their anti-Americanism and “negative
reporting,” television was more obedient. Thus “the head of the
Pentagon’s public-affairs office was able to assure Kennedy that the
[NBC] network had been persuaded that it would be ‘against the interest
of the United States’ to show its coverage of ‘rough treatment by South
Vietnamese soldiers to Viet-Cong prisoners, with a U.S. Army captain
appearing in this sequence.’ NBC’s news director undertook to withhold
this film’s scheduled appearance on the Huntley-Brinkley show, and to
keep it on the shelf so far as any other programs were concerned.”⁶⁷

Until the expansion of the war in 1965 began to provoke some concern,
the NLF and DRV were “treated almost exclusively as an arm of
international Communism,” Hallin found in his analysis of the _Times’_s
coverage. “The term _civil war_ began to be used in 1965” and “the term
_aggression_ began to appear sometimes in quotation marks”—referring, of
course, to Vietnamese aggression in Vietnam, the concept of American
aggression being unimaginable, then or since. But concern over
Vietnamese “aggression” never abated, as when James Reston discussed
“the main point”: “How, then, is this aggression by subversion to be
stopped?”—referring to aggression by Vietnamese against the American
invaders and their clients. Similarly, on television, even more
conformist than the print media, Peter Jennings, showing Pentagon films
on U.S. air attacks, commented that “This is the shape of things to come
for Communist aggression in Vietnam,” while NBC’s Jack Perkins,
reporting an air-force attack that wiped out a “village unabashedly
advertising itself with signs and flags as a Vietcong village,”
justified the attack as necessary: “The whole village had turned on the
Americans, so the whole village was being destroyed.” It is taken for
granted that the Americans had every right to be marauding in a region
of Vietnam where “Everything in this area for years was Vietcong.” A
television report on Operation Attleboro described the fighting as
raging “once again to preserve democracy.”⁶⁸

Summarizing, from the late 1940s, the United States supported the French
war of conquest; overturned the political settlement arranged at Geneva
in 1954; established a terrorist client regime in the southern section
of the country divided by foreign (i.e., U.S.) force; moved on to open
aggression against South Vietnam by 1962 and worked desperately to
prevent the political settlement sought by Vietnamese on all sides; and
then invaded outright in 1965, initiating an air and ground war that
devastated Indochina. Throughout this period, the media presented the
U.S. intervention entirely within the framework predicted by a
propaganda model.

There are, of course, those who demand still higher standards of loyalty
to the state, and for them, the fact that critical perceptions of
American military officers in the field sometimes reached public
attention is an intolerable “adversarial stance” reflecting the
left-wing proclivities of “the culture.” Putting this interesting
perspective to the side, as far as this period is concerned we may
dismiss the conception that the media “lost the war,” although it would
be quite accurate to conclude that they encouraged the United States to
enter and pursue a war of aggression, which they later were to regard as
“a tragedy,” or “a blunder,” while never acknowledging their fundamental
contribution to rallying public support for the policies that they were
ultimately to deplore. Given the conformism and obedience of the media
during this crucial period, when the basis for U.S. aggression was
firmly and irrevocably laid, it is small wonder that public concern was
so slight, and that opposition was so negligible as to be entirely
without significance. Only the most ardent researcher could have
developed a moderately clear understanding of what was taking place in
Indochina.

Public attitudes after the bombing of North Vietnam in February 1965, in
“reprisal” for an attack on U.S. military installations by the “Viet
Cong,” are therefore hardly surprising. Asked “Who do you think is
behind the attacks by the Viet Cong?” 53 percent blamed the Chinese
Communists and 26 percent blamed North Vietnam, while 7 percent said,
“Civil war.”⁶⁹ In no identifiable sector of American opinion would it
have been possible even to ask the obvious question that would receive
an easy and accurate answer in the case of the Soviet invasion of
Afghanistan: “Why do you think the southern resistance is attacking U.S.
military installations in South Vietnam?” In fact, even at the peak of
peace-movement activities—or today, many years later, when it should be
possible to observe the plain facts with some detachment—it would be
quite impossible to raise this simple and obvious question, or to answer
it, within the mainstream media and most of “the culture.”

In this dismal record we see very clearly the consequences of mindless
media obedience in a state with enormous resources of violence.


5.4. REPORTING ON THE WAR

As the U.S. invasion mounted in scale and intensity, Indochina was
flooded with war correspondents, many of whom reported what they saw and
heard with honesty and courage. With rare exceptions, however, they gave
an account of the war as perceived by the U.S. military on the ground or
as offered in press briefings. In the home offices, Washington’s version
prevailed until elite divisions within the United States expanded the
range of tactical debate.

Reporters often did not conceal atrocities committed by the U.S.
military forces, although they did not appear to perceive them as
atrocities and surely did not express the horror and outrage that would
have been manifest if others were the perpetrators, and the United
States or its clients the victims.⁷⁰ Malcolm Browne quotes a U.S.
official who describes B-52 strikes in the South as “the most lucrative
raids made at any time during the war”:

Every single bomb crater is surrounded with bodies, wrecked equipment
and dazed and bleeding people. At one such hole there were 40 or 50 men,
all in green North Vietnamese uniforms but without their weapons, lying
around in an obvious state of shock. We sent in helicopter gunships,
which quickly put them out of their misery.⁷¹

The Geneva conventions require that “members of armed forces who have
laid down their arms and those placed _hors de combat_ by sickness,
wounds, detention, or any other cause, shall in all circumstances be
treated humanely”; and there are no limits to the horror expressed,
until today, over Communist treatment of U.S. pilots captured during the
air operations that leveled much of North Vietnam. But the victims that
the _New York Times_ is describing are Vietnamese carrying out
aggression against Americans in Vietnam, so no such scruples are in
order, and none were expressed.

Similarly, there was little reaction when B-52 raids in “the populous
[Mekong] delta” were reported in 1965, with unknown numbers of civilian
casualties and hordes of refugees fleeing to government-controlled areas
“because they could no longer bear the continuous bombings.”⁷² The
victims fell under the category of “the unfortunate accidental loss of
life incurred by the efforts of American military forces to help the
South Vietnamese repel the incursion of North Vietnam and its
partisans,” as explained by Sidney Hook while condemning Bertrand
Russell because he “plays up” these meritorious actions “as deliberate
American atrocities.”⁷³ No doubt one can find similar remarks today in
_Pravda_ in commentary on Afghanistan by other commissars who are much
admired as leading humanitarians because they courageously condemn the
crimes of the United States and its allies in Soviet journals.

Not only was there no reaction to these and subsequent atrocities, but
there was also no attempt to place them in the context of what had
immediately preceded—that is, to make them intelligible. Indeed, there
was little awareness of the background, because the media were so
closely wedded to U.S. government goals and perceptions that they never
sought to learn the facts. As the war progressed, ample evidence became
available from U.S. government sources to explain why the United States
had been forced to resort to violence in “the populous delta,” as
elsewhere, as we described in the preceding section. But such materials,
inconsistent with the preferred image of the United States defending
South Vietnam from Communist terror and aggression, had little impact on
news reporting or commentary, except for occasional illustration of the
difficulties faced by the United States in pursuing its noble cause.

The reason for the U.S. resort to violence was overwhelmingly clear by
the time of the outright U.S. invasion in 1965, and would have been no
less clear before had any serious effort been made to determine the
facts. As noted above, the United States was compelled by the political
and social successes of the southern Viet Minh (NLF, “Viet Cong”) to
shift the struggle away from the political arena, where it was weak, to
the arena of violence, where it was strong, a typical response to a
classic dilemma.

It is in this context that we can understand the resort to B-52 raids in
“the populous delta” and elsewhere to destroy the civilian base of the
indigenous enemy, expanding the failed efforts of the strategic-hamlet
program and earlier terror. The U.S. media continued to report the
subsequent atrocities, but from the standpoint of the aggressors. One
had to turn to the foreign press to find reports from zones held by the
South Vietnamese enemy—for example, those of the pro-Western
correspondent Katsuichi Honda, who reported in the Japanese press in the
fall of 1967 from the Mekong Delta, describing attacks against
undefended villages by gunboats in the Mekong River and helicopter
gunships “firing away at random at farmhouses,” “using the farmers for
targets as if in a hunting mood”: “They are hunting Asians.… This
whimsical firing would explain the reason why the surgical wards in
every hospital in the towns of the Mekong delta were full of wounded.”
His reports were available only to readers of antiwar literature, not
the “objective” media, which had no interest in how the war might appear
from the standpoint of the Vietnamese victims of the attack by the
United States and the local forces it established.⁷⁴

The media continued to observe and discuss atrocities blandly, not
considering them as controversial or as raising any moral issue—in fact,
not regarding them as atrocities at all, although we detect no such
reserve with regard to the violence of official enemies. The respected
columnist Joseph Harsch describes the frustrations of an American pilot
dropping bombs “into a leafy jungle” with “no visible result” and
without “the satisfaction of knowing what he achieved”:

A hit on a big hydroelectric dam is another matter. There is a huge
explosion visible from anywhere above. The dam can be seen to fall. The
water can be seen to pour through the breach and drown out huge areas of
farm land, and villages, in its path. The pilot who takes out a
hydroelectric dam gets back home with a feeling of accomplishment.
Novels are written and films are made of such exploits.… The bombing
which takes out the dam will flood villages, drown people, destroy
crops, and knock out some electric power.… Bombing the dam would hurt
people.⁷⁵

Nevertheless, it is better to bomb trucks, he concludes, although there
would plainly be no moral barrier to the much more satisfying
alternative rejected on tactical grounds.

In the South, bombing of dikes and virtually limitless destruction was
an uncontroversial tactic, as in the Batangan Peninsula, where 12,000
peasants (including, it appears, the remnants of the My Lai massacre)
were forced from their homes in an American ground sweep in January 1969
and shipped off to a waterless camp near Quang Ngai over which floated a
banner saying: “We thank you for liberating us from Communist terror.”
The _Times_ reported that the refugees had lived “in caves and bunkers
for many months” because “heavy American bombing and artillery and naval
shelling” had destroyed their homes, as well as a dike that was “blasted
by American jets to deprive the North Vietnamese [sic] of a food
supply.” It was left unrepaired, so that two years later “the salt water
of the South China Sea continues to submerge the fields where rice once
grew.” The reason, according to an American official, is that the people
“were written off as communists,” and for the same reason the region was
left in ruins: “the hills that overlook the flooded paddies, once
scattered with huts, are … filled with bomb fragments, mines and
unexploded artillery shells,” and “B-52 craters nearly 20 feet deep pock
the hills.”⁷⁶

Bombing of dikes in the North, occasionally reported,⁷⁷ _was_
controversial, as was the bombing of North Vietnam generally. The reason
is that the cost to the United States might be high because of a
potential Chinese or Soviet response, regarded as a serious and
dangerous possibility, or because of the impact on international
opinion.⁷⁸ But these questions did not arise in the case of U.S. terror
against the South Vietnamese, which therefore proceeded without notable
concern or, it seems, much in the way of planning. In the _Pentagon
Papers_, we find extensive discussion and debate over the escalation of
the bombing against the North, while there is virtually nothing about
the far more destructive bombing, defoliation, destruction of vast areas
by Rome plows, etc., in South Vietnam, where we were “saving” the
population from “aggression.” With regard to South Vietnam, the planning
record is limited to the question of deployment of U.S. troops, which
again raised potential costs to the United States.⁷⁹

The most notable exception to the easy tolerance of atrocities
perpetrated against South Vietnamese was the My Lai massacre, in March
1968, reported at once by the NLF among other massacres that are still
not acknowledged or discussed. Details were disclosed in Paris in June
1968, but neglected by the media until November 1969 despite extensive
efforts by helicopter gunner Ronald Ridenhour to publicize the story,
which finally broke through to the general public, thanks to the
persistence of Seymour Hersh, at the time of a massive demonstration in
Washington, when media attention was focused on antiwar protest. The
massacre was a footnote to the post-Tet accelerated pacification
campaign, and minor in context. More revealing was the massacre at
nearby My Khe, with ninety civilians reported dead, discovered by the
Peers Panel inquiry into the My Lai massacre; proceedings against the
officer in charge were dismissed on the grounds that this was merely a
normal operation in which a village was destroyed and its population
murdered or forcibly relocated, a decision that tells us all we need to
know about the American war in South Vietnam, but that passed without
comment.⁸⁰

While the nation agonized about the sentencing of Lieutenant William
Calley for his part in the My Lai massacre, a new ground sweep in the
same area drove some 16,000 peasants from their homes, and a year later
the camp where the My Lai remnants were relocated in this operation was
largely destroyed by air and artillery bombardment, the destruction
attributed to the Viet Cong.⁸¹ These events too passed with little
notice, and no calls for an inquiry—reasonably enough, since these too
were normal and routine operations.

Medical workers at the nearby Canadian-run hospital reported that they
knew of the My Lai massacre at once but gave it little attention because
it was not out of the ordinary in a province (Quang Ngai) that had been
virtually destroyed by U.S. military operations. The highest-ranking
officer to have faced court-martial charges for the massacre, Colonel
Oran Henderson, stated that “every unit of brigade size has its Mylai
hidden some place,” although “every unit doesn’t have a Riden-hour” to
expose what had happened.⁸² Knowledgeable elements of the peace movement
also gave the My Lai massacre no special notice, for the same reasons.

The reasons why this particular massacre became a cause célèbre were
explained by _Newsweek’_s Saigon bureau chief Kevin Buckley, referring
to Operation Wheeler Wallawa, with 10,000 enemy reported killed,
including the victims of My Lai, who were listed in the official body
count:

An examination of that whole operation would have revealed the incident
at My Lai to be a particularly gruesome application of a wider policy
which had the same effect in many places at many times. Of course, the
blame for that could not have been dumped on a stumblebum lieutenant.
Calley was an aberration, but “Wheeler Wallawa” was not.

The real issue concerning this operation, Buckley cabled to the U.S.
office of _Newsweek_, was not the “indiscriminate use of firepower,” as
is often alleged. Rather, “it is charges of quite discriminating use—as
a matter of policy, in populated areas,” as in this operation or many
others, among them Operation Speedy Express, with thousands of civilians
murdered and many others driven to refugee and prison camps by such
devices as B-52 raids targeted specifically on villages.

An experienced U.S. official, cited by Buckley, compared My Lai to the
exploits of the U.S. Ninth Infantry Division in a range of similar
operations:

The actions of the 9th Division in inflicting civilian casualties were
worse. The sum total of what the 9th did was overwhelming. In sum, the
horror was worse than My Lai. But with the 9th, the civilian casualties
came in dribbles and were pieced out over a long time. And most of them
were inflicted from the air and at night. Also, they were sanctioned by
the command’s insistence on high body counts.… The result was an
inevitable outcome of the unit’s command policy.⁸³

In short, the My Lai massacre was ignored when it occurred, and the
substantial attention given to it later is a more subtle form of
cover-up of atrocities. An honest accounting, inconceivable in the media
or “the culture” generally, would have placed the responsibility far
higher than Lieutenant Calley, but it was more convenient to focus
attention on the actions of semi-crazed GI’s in a gruesome combat
situation with every Vietnamese civilian a threatening enemy. My Lai did
not prompt the media generally—there were some individual exceptions—to
take a deeper look at the nature of the war, or to display an interest
in reports of similar events in nearby areas that suggested its
unexceptional character. This particular massacre was made exceptional
by an arbitrary cutoff of attention and refusal to investigate beyond
narrowly circumscribed limits. The limited but dramatized attention to
My Lai was even used to demonstrate the conscience of America, in the
face of enemy provocations. Thus a 1973 _New York Times_ report from My
Lai describes the “battered Batangan peninsula,” an area where the
inhabitants were “generally supporters of the Vietcong,” now demolished
by U.S. bombardment and ground operations: “big guns fire into the
peninsula as they have again and again over the eight years that
American, South Korean and South Vietnamese forces have been trying _to
make it safe_.” The report quotes villagers who accuse the Americans of
having killed many people here: “They are in no position to appreciate
what the name My Lai _means to Americans_,” the reporter adds
thoughtfully.⁸⁴

The standard critique of the media for having “lost the war” identifies
television as the major culprit. Television analyst Edward Jay Epstein
formulates the standard view as follows:

Over the past 10 years, almost nightly, Americans have witnessed the war
in Vietnam, on television. Never before in history has a nation allowed
its citizens to view uncensored scenes of combat, destruction and
atrocities in their living rooms, in living color. Since television has
become the principal—and most believed—source of news for most
Americans, it is generally assumed that the constant exposure of this
war on television was instrumental in shaping public opinion. It has
become almost a truism, and the standard rhetoric of television
executives, to say that television, by showing the terrible truth of the
war, caused the disillusionment of Americans with the war.… This has
also been the dominant view of those governing the Nation during the war
years.… Depending on whether the appraisal has come from hawk or dove,
television has thus been either blamed or applauded for the
disillusionment of the American public with the war.⁸⁵

There have been several studies of the matter, suggesting a rather
different picture. We will return to some of these issues in discussing
the coverage of the Tet offensive, but we should observe that there are
some rather serious questions about the standard formulations. Suppose
that some Soviet investigators were to conduct an inquiry into coverage
of the war in Afghanistan to determine whether _Pravda_ should be blamed
or applauded for the disillusionment of the Soviet public with the war?
Would we consider such an inquiry to be meaningful without consideration
of both the costs and the justice of the venture?

Epstein notes an obvious “logical problem” with the standard view: for
the first six years of television coverage, from 1962 and increasingly
through 1967, “the American public _did_ approve of the war in Vietnam”
according to polls. Furthermore, in a 1967 Harris poll for _Newsweek_,
“64 per cent of the nation wide sample said that television’s coverage
made them _more_ supportive of the American effort, and only 26 per cent
said that it had intensified their opposition,” leading the journal to
conclude that “TV has encouraged a decisive majority of viewers to
support the war.”

Epstein’s review of his and other surveys of television newscasts and
commentary during this period explains why this should have been the
case. “Up until 1965,” he writes, “the network anchor men seemed
unanimous in support of American objectives in Vietnam,” and most
described themselves as “hawks” until the end, while the most notable
“dove,” Walter Cronkite, applauded “the courageous decision that
Communism’s advance must be stopped in Asia” in 1965 and later endorsed
the initial U.S. commitment “to stop Communist aggression wherever it
raises its head.” In fact, at no time during the war or since has there
been any detectable departure from unqualified acceptance of the U.S.
government propaganda framework; as in the print media, controversy was
limited to tactical questions and the problem of costs, almost
exclusively the cost to the United States.

The network anchormen not only accepted the framework of interpretation
formulated by the state authorities, but also were optimistic about the
successes achieved in the U.S. war of defense against Vietnamese
aggression in Vietnam. Epstein cites work by George Baily, who
concludes: “The results in this study demonstrate the combat reports and
the government statements generally gave the impression that the
Americans were in control, on the offense and holding the initiative, at
least until Tet of 1968,” a picture accepted by the network anchormen.
Television “focused on [the] progress” of the American ground forces,
supporting this picture with “film, supplied by the Pentagon, that
showed the bombing of the North” and “suggesting that the Americans were
also rebuilding South Vietnam”—while they were systematically destroying
it, as could be deduced inferentially from scattered evidence for which
no context or interpretation was provided. NBC’s “Huntley-Brinkley
Report” described “the American forces in Vietnam as ‘builders’ rather
than destroyers,” a “central truth” that “needs underscoring.”

What made this especially deceptive and hypocritical was the fact, noted
earlier, that the most advanced and cruel forms of devastation and
killing—such as the free use of napalm, defoliants, and Rome plows—were
used with few constraints in the _South_, because its population was
voiceless, in contrast with the North, where international publicity and
political complications threatened, so that at least visible areas
around the major urban centers were spared.⁸⁶

As for news coverage, “all three networks had definite policies about
showing graphic film of wounded American soldiers or suffering
Vietnamese civilians,” Epstein observes. “Producers of the NBC and ABC
evening-news programs said that they ordered editors to delete
excessively grisly or detailed shots,” and CBS had similar policies,
which, according to former CBS News president Fred W. Friendly, “helped
shield the audience from the true horror of the war.” “The relative
bloodlessness of the war depicted on television helps to explain why
only a minority in the Lou Harris-Newsweek poll said that television
increased their dissatisfaction with the war”; such coverage yielded an
impression, Epstein adds, of “a clean, effective technological war,”
which was “rudely shaken at Tet in 1968.” As noted earlier, NBC withdrew
television clips showing harsh treatment of Viet Cong prisoners at the
request of the Kennedy administration.

Throughout this period, furthermore, “television coverage focused almost
exclusively on the American effort.” There were few interviews with GVN
military or civilian leaders, “and the Vietcong and North Vietnamese
were almost nonexistent on American television newscasts.”

There was one famous exception to the sanitizing of the war, an August
5, 1965, CBS report by Morley Safer showing U.S. Marines burning huts in
the village of Cam Ne with cigarette lighters, which elicited “a
semiofficial campaign” by the Pentagon “to discredit the television
story and vilify the correspondent as ‘unpatriotic.’ ” But surveys of
television newscasts by Epstein and Wisconsin Professor Lawrence Lichty
show that “instances shown on TV of American brutality toward the South
Vietnamese, such as Cam Ne, ‘could be counted on one hand’ [Lichty],”
“even though hundreds of South Vietnamese villages were destroyed during
this period.” “The Cam Ne story is famous for being the exception to the
rule.”

Returning soldiers told a different story, and it became increasingly
clear, although not through the medium of television, that the war was
bloody and brutal, leading to “disillusionment”—and among a large sector
of the general population, increasingly “out of control,” a much
stronger and more appropriate reaction.

But, Epstein continues, “the televised picture of gradual progress in
the war was abruptly shattered by the Communist [Tet] offensive” in
January-February 1968, when the military lost its “control over the
movements of the press,” who could step outside their hotels and find
“themselves willy-nilly in the midst of bloody fighting.” For this brief
moment, correspondents sent on-the-spot reports that were aired in place
of “the usual carefully edited view of an orderly, controlled war,” and
the policy of “shielding] American viewers from the grisly closeups of
wounded Americans, body bags and death” briefly collapsed, though
newscasts continued to be edited in home offices as “too strong,” in the
words of NBC producer Robert Northshield. This coverage convinced Walter
Cronkite that the war had become “a bloody stalemate,” in a
controversial report to which we will return.

The Tet offensive convinced U.S. elites that the war was becoming too
costly to the United States, and the government shifted toward the
policy of “Vietnamization,” large-scale massacre operations to destroy
the indigenous resistance and its civilian base, expansion of the war in
Laos and Cambodia, and the commencement of negotiations with North
Vietnam. “Accordingly, the networks again changed the focus of their
coverage, this time from the battlefields in Vietnam to the negotiation
tables in Paris.… The ‘story’ was now the negotiations, not the
fighting,” Northshield explained, adding that “combat stories seemed
like a contradiction and would confuse the audience.” “Similar decisions
were made at the other networks,” Epstein adds, as all “altered their
coverage in late 1969 from combat pieces to stories about the
‘Vietnamization’ of the war” and the negotiations in Paris. The post-Tet
accelerated pacification campaign, one of the most crucial and murderous
operations in the U.S. war against South Vietnam, received little
attention.

Epstein believes that “there is a marked difference between the coverage
of the formative years of the war (1962–1967) and the later years (when
the antiwar movement was at its height).” “Up until 1968, television
coverage was controlled to a large extent by the American military, and
generally it reflected a controlled American initiative which seemed to
be winning the countryside and decimating the Vietcong. The searchlight
rarely focused on related questions, such as the sufferings of
Vietnamese civilians.” During the Tet offensive, the focus changed to
Americans “shown on the defensive, endangered and helplessly
frustrated,” then to “the story of the American withdrawal” as
“negotiations began at the end of 1968.” The differences, however, are
misleading. Apart from the live coverage during the Tet offensive, there
is very little departure from the principle that the war must be viewed
from the standpoint determined by official Washington doctrine—a
standpoint that broadened in scope after Tet, as tactical disagreements
arose within elite circles.

In his survey of network newscasts from 1965 through the January 1973
peace treaty, Daniel Hallin reaches similar conclusions. Until the Tet
offensive, television coverage was “lopsidedly favorable to American
policy in Vietnam,” well beyond even the “remarkably docile” print
media. Like Epstein, he notes the “dramatic” change after Tet, “part of
a larger change, a response to as well as a cause of the unhappiness
with the war that was developing at many levels, from the halls of the
Pentagon, to Main Street, U.S.A. and the fire bases of Quang Tri
province”—and, much more crucially, the unhappiness that had become
quite significant by 1968 among business elites, leading to the changes
in U.S. government policy already discussed. “Before Tet, editorial
comments by television journalists ran nearly four to one in favor of
administration policy; after Tet, two to one against,” reflecting
divisions in the “establishment itself.” He quotes _New York Times_
editor Max Frankel, who said in an interview that “we’re an
establishment institution, and whenever your natural constituency
changes, then naturally you will too.” The same was true of television,
and it is hardly surprising—and quite in accord with the propaganda
model—that its fervent loyalty to the administration changed when “the
establishment bastards have bailed out,” as Lyndon Johnson put it
bitterly after the “Wise Men” advised him in March 1968 to abandon hope
of military victory and to de-escalate the conflict, in the wake of the
Tet offensive.⁸⁷

Television typically presented events in terms of “a kind of morality
play,… a dramatic contrast between good, represented by the American
peace offensive [in 1966], and evil, represented by Hanoi.” Reporting
was relatively bloodless, focusing on the successes of “the ‘good guys’:
American boys in action,” regularly depicted as “brave men,” “the
greatest men in the world,” “heroes,” exuding competence, humanity, and
high morale as they fight against “Communist aggression” in the “battle
for democracy,” and “win hearts and minds” by caring for sick and
injured civilians after a village “was burned and blasted to
death”—properly, because ammunition had been found there, which “was
enough proof of its being used by the Vietcong” (Greg Harris, NBC-TV,
Oct. 27, 1967). The issue of racism “was apparently too sensitive to
touch,” Hallin adds, noting that he found no “comment on the hostility
that many American soldiers felt towards all Vietnamese,… a prominent
theme in veterans’ recollections of the war.”

The focus of coverage was the Americans: soldiers bravely defending
Vietnam, medics caring for the wounded, pacification officials
rebuilding after the damage for which Communist terror bore
responsibility. “Our South Vietnamese” were virtually ignored, with
virtually nothing on political, economic, or social affairs, and “the
peasant figured in the news mainly as a victim and prize of the
conflict.” The political opposition in Vietnam was portrayed with
considerable hostility, “like the antiwar movement at home.” They were
“forces of anarchy … on the march” (Walter Cronkite, CBS-TV, Mar. 31,
1966). The utterly fraudulent elections were portrayed as a triumph as
democracy, courageously carried out in defiance of the disruptive
attacks of “Vietcong terrorists.”⁸⁸

Civilian casualties were downplayed, or regarded as unavoidable side
consequences of “a job that had to be done,” raising no moral question.
Observing an air strike on a village of “unabashed” Viet Cong supporters
after a column of American soldiers had drawn fire, NBC’s Jack Perkins
commented: “There was no discriminating one house from another. There
couldn’t be, and there did not need to be. The whole village had turned
on the Americans, so the whole village was being destroyed,” as is only
right and just. In a follow-up on the Cam Ne incident, Dan Rather offers
a comment that Hallin cites as an example of “a muckraking tone,” the
harshest he presents: the marines are holding Cam Ne

by force, not through the pacification program … [which] hasn’t taken
hold in Cam Ne. And until it does take hold here and a lot of other
places in South Vietnam, nobody can feel very good about this dirty
little war.

In short, as long as there is still resistance to American violence, we
cannot feel good about proceeding with our necessary chores; such
comments as these presumably account for Rather’s reputation among the
“doves” as a courageous opponent of the war, and among the “hawks” as a
dangerous leftist. Walter Cronkite reported “an urgent plea from the
Vietcong for medical and surgical supplies” to the International Red
Cross, “an indication that our bombing raids and infantry sweeps are
taking a heavy toll of all kinds of _Red equipment_.”⁸⁹

Reporting of civilian casualties rose from 1966 to a peak in early 1968,
then declined sharply as the United States turned to the murderous
accelerated pacification campaign, which Hallin does not discuss,
presumably because it was largely ignored by television, which had
shifted attention to the negotiating tables in Paris in accordance with
Washington priorities. The coverage rose again in 1972, when casualties
could be attributed to a North Vietnamese offensive and the U.S.
“response.” In a 1971 CBS documentary entitled “The Changing War in
Indochina,” Charles Collingwood reported the progress of the
pacification campaign in Kien Hoa Province in the Mekong Delta—“once an
NLF stronghold,” Hallin observes. This province had been the target of
Operation Speedy Express in early 1969, one of the most brutal American
operations of the war in an area that had been organized under NLF
control with no known North Vietnamese presence, conquered through the
“awesome firepower” of the Ninth Division. This included air strikes
using napalm, high explosives, and anti-personnel bombs, B-52 bombing,
and artillery shelling “around the clock” at a level that “it is
impossible to reckon,” with armed helicopters “scouring the landscape
from the air night and day” and accounting for “many and perhaps most of
the enemy kills”—about 11,000 according to the U.S. command, with 748
weapons captured, a fair indication of who was killed.⁹⁰ Collingwood was
pleased to observe progress in pacification, although there was still
“Indian country” beyond. “This is almost like St. Louis on the move into
the frontier,” his companion, a U.S. government adviser replied, in a
reference that is more accurate than he probably knew.⁹¹

In contrast to the heroic and humane image of the American soldiers
defending democracy, the NLF and North Vietnamese were portrayed in “an
almost perfectly one-dimensional image … as cruel, ruthless and
fanatical.” Of twelve positive comments by journalists that he found
throughout the war, Hallin remarks, “10 concerned the effectiveness of
enemy forces: this was the only element of television’s image of the
enemy that changed substantially” in the course of the post-Tet shift,
mirroring establishment qualms about the prospects for the success of
American arms. “What did not change was the dark picture of evil.” When
U.S. forces burned villages, this was a necessity because they provided
cover and support for the Viet Cong. The results of B-52 saturation
bombing were a “tragedy of war.” But when a North Vietnamese artillery
shell hit an orphanage in An Hoa in October 1970, ABC’s George Watson
commented with horror: “No one was prepared for the massacre, the
irrational murder that the North Vietnamese inflicted on An Hoa.”
Although civilian casualties were overwhelmingly the result of U.S.
firepower, attribution of responsibility by television was weighted by a
10 to 7 ratio to the account of the enemy; its “calculated _policy_ of
terror” contrasted with the unfortunate but legitimate side-effects of
U.S. operations. Even military operations of the enemy were “terrorism.”
Reporting on a Viet Cong ambush of an American patrol, ABC’s Peter
Jennings recounted “another of those small but [and here he paused a
moment for dramatic effect] harrowing VC butcheries” (October, 1965).
The North Vietnamese and Viet Cong were portrayed as “savage,” “brutal,”
“murderous,” “fanatical,” “suicidal,” “halfcrazed,” mere vermin in areas
that were “Communist infested” or “Vietcong infested,” and thus had to
be cleansed by the American liberators.⁹²

The style and technique are familiar in state propaganda of all
varieties.

Overall, Hallin concludes from his survey, television never veered from
the official interpretation of the war as “a struggle to defend
democracy against aggression.” In the early years, it was taken for
granted that

we would surely win, not only because we were more powerful but because
the right was clearly on our side. Television held this view strongly,
perhaps more strongly than the public itself. It didn’t work out that
way, and eventually television brought the bad news. But it never
explained _why_: it never reexamined the assumptions about the nature of
the war it had helped to propagate in the early years. So to the public,
the bad news must have seemed nearly as incomprehensible as an earlier
“American defeat” in Asia: the “loss” of China.

Attribution of the American failure by the public to “treason” or “lack
of American will” caused by the failure of the media to support our just
cause with sufficient fervor is, therefore, “hardly surprising.”⁹³

This may well explain why the public has apparently been willing to
accept the tales about media treachery. But among the educated elites,
the explanation may lie elsewhere: in a totalitarian cast of mind that
regards even the actual level of media subservience to the state as
inadequate and a threat to order and privilege by the “forces of
anarchy … on the march.”


5.5. SOME CRUCIAL EVENTS OF THE WAR

5.5.1. The Tonkin Gulf incident

By mid-1964, there was a growing consensus among Vietnamese in favor of
a negotiated political settlement, while the United States was
maneuvering with increasing desperation to evade what internal documents
describe as “premature negotiations.” The reason, as frankly explained,
was that the United States was politically isolated, in opposition to
the NLF, the non-Communist opposition, and even the generals. It was
therefore regarded as necessary to expand the war to the North to
“obtain [the DRV’s] cooperation in bringing an end to the Viet Cong
insurgency” and to “persuade or force the DRV to stop its aid to the
Viet Cong and use its directive powers to make the Viet Cong desist”
(Ambassador Maxwell Taylor). Intelligence, meanwhile, concluded that
“the basic elements of Communist strength in South Vietnam remain
indigenous.”⁹⁴

U.S.-run military operations against North Vietnam began on February 1,
1964 (OPLAN-34A), using South Vietnamese and “third-country”
mercenaries, “presumably mostly Nationalist Chinese,” according to
Kahin. These operations were officially “designed to result in
substantial destruction, economic loss, and harassment.”⁹⁵ On July
30–31, Saigon Navy vessels attacked North Vietnamese islands, eliciting
an official DRV protest to the International Control Commission on July
31. The U.S. destroyer _Maddox_, conducting an electronic espionage
operation in that general area, entered the twelve-mile zone regarded by
North Vietnam as its territorial waters on August 2. The _Maddox_ was
challenged by North Vietnamese patrol boats, fired “warning shots,” and
was hit by a single bullet in the ensuing battle, in which the patrol
boats were damaged or destroyed by the destroyer and U.S. aircraft. On
August 3, Secretary of State Dean Rusk sent a (secret) cable to
Ambassador Taylor, stating that “We believe that present Op Plan 34 A
activities are beginning to rattle Hanoi, and Maddox incident is
directly related to their efforts to resist these activities.” The
_Maddox_ was returned to the area along with the destroyer _Turner Joy_
on August 3, and on August 3 and 4 Saigon naval vessels bombarded North
Vietnamese coastal facilities, “quite possibly one that the destroyer’s
electronic surveillance had activated and located,” Kahin observes.
There was some indication that the U.S. destroyers might have come under
attack by North Vietnamese patrol boats on August 4, although Captain
John Herrick of the _Maddox_ was unsure, and radioed that reports
“appear very doubtful” and that there were “No actual sightings by
Maddox,” recommending “complete evaluation before any further action.”
Subsequent evidence indicates that almost certainly no attack took
place.⁹⁶

On August 5, President Johnson publicly denounced the “open aggression
on the high seas against the United States of America” by the North
Vietnamese, while the DRV and China stated that “the so-called second
Tonkin Gulf incident of 4 August never occurred” (Chinese government
statement). On August 5, U.S. planes bombed North Vietnamese
installations and destroyed North Vietnamese patrol boats. After
testimony by Defense Secretary Robert McNamara in which he falsely
claimed that the _Maddox_ “was operating in international waters, was
carrying out a routine patrol of the type we carry out all over the
world at all times,” Congress passed a resolution authorizing the
president to “take all necessary measures to repel any armed attack
against the forces of the United States and to prevent further
aggression” (416 to 0 in the House, Wayne Morse and Ernest Gruening
alone in opposition in the Senate). This August 7 resolution was
subsequently exploited as the basis for the escalation of the U.S.
attack against Vietnam.⁹⁷

“The Gulf of Tonkin incident,” Hallin observes, “was a classic of Cold
War news management.… On virtually every important point, the reporting
of the two Gulf of Tonkin incidents … was either misleading or simply
false”—and in accordance with the needs of the U.S. executive at that
crucial moment. The _New York Times_ had reported sabotage missions
against the North as recently as July 23, and reported Hanoi’s August 2
protest of an attack on North Vietnamese villages by Laotian Air Force
planes, but neither the _Times_ nor the _Washington Post_ mentioned
these facts “either at the time of the incidents or in the weeks that
followed, aside from inconspicuous sidebars on Hanoi’s ‘allegations’
[which were accurate, but dismissed] and a passing reference” in a
column by James Reston. The reporting was “objective” in that it
correctly reported U.S. government statements, raising no question about
them, presenting no relevant background, and marginally citing Communist
denials while proceeding to report the events as Washington wished them
to be perceived.⁹⁸

In subsequent weeks, the _Times_ published a number of brief references
to what was “charged” or “asserted” in the generally accurate reports
from North Vietnam, which were rejected and dismissed by reporters while
front-page stories and headlines presented the false Washington version
as fact, with much speculation about Hanoi’s motives in sending a few
patrol boats to attack the mighty U.S. Seventh Fleet. The relevant
background continued to be ignored or buried with marginal references in
back pages. The criticism by Senator Morse was barely mentioned, and
dismissed. There was no hint of administration doubts that the August 4
incident had even taken place.⁹⁹

The newsweeklies adhered still more rigidly to the government propaganda
line, even providing vivid and dramatic accounts of the August 4
incident, which apparently never took place. The accurate criticism by
Senators Gruening and Morse received a few lines, dismissed as
“predictable” responses by the “irascible” Morse. There was no interest
in their charge that the Tonkin Gulf resolution had been predated, also
dismissed by the _Times_ without inquiry. North Vietnamese and Chinese
reactions were dismissed as “bluster” by Communists who “boiled with
hatred and hostility toward the U.S.” (_Newsweek_) and “propaganda
blasts” (_U.S. News & World Report_). None of the weeklies considered
the possibility that U.S. actions might have provoked the August 2
incident, or that there were doubts in Washington about the August 4
attack, although some of the relevant facts had been briefly noted
(e.g., _Time_, July 31, noting missions inside North Vietnam by
parachuted sabotage teams). The U.S. government version was simply
adopted as unquestioned truth, with no further discussion or inquiry
necessary.¹⁰⁰

There were ample grounds at the time for suspicion about the U.S.
government version. The foreign press was able to see that serious
questions arose. _Le Monde_ presented public statements on all sides and
an analysis of what the public record indicated. “Neither the _Times_
nor the _Post_ made any such analysis of the record,” simply taking the
false Washington version to be correct and dismissing the accurate
Communist “allegations” with a bare mention.¹⁰¹ In London, the _New
Statesman_ covered the U.S. and Chinese versions, including the
(accurate) Chinese account of the U.S.-Saigon actions that preceded the
incidents and the charge that the first was provoked by Washington while
the second never occurred, and concluding that “the incidents in Vietnam
do not seem quite as simple as the initial headlines indicated” (a
substantial understatement). In the United States, the left-wing
_National Guardian_, with five major articles, and _I.F. Stone’s Weekly_
provided the most extensive, careful, and accurate account of the
events. In contrast to the fevered rhetoric of the mainstream
newsweeklies, the _National Guardian_ simply described the facts that
were available, asking whether the August 2 “skirmish” had been provoked
and whether the “alleged” August 4 incident had taken place. The
relevant background and Communist versions were accurately presented,
with appropriate questions raised. Wayne Morse’s commentary was given
ample coverage, as were South Vietnamese General Ky’s statements on
sabotage missions in North Vietnam. _I.F. Stone’s Weekly_ also reported
the facts accurately, adding relevant background ignored by the major
media.¹⁰²

In summary, the national media, overcome by jingoist passion, failed to
provide even minimally adequate coverage of this crucial event, although
appropriate skepticism would have been aroused in the mind of the reader
of the foreign or “alternative” media, or the reader with the
sophistication to treat the media as a disinformation system disguising
a reality that can perhaps be ascertained with sufficient energy and
dedication. The _Pentagon Papers_ analyst describes these events as “an
important firebreak,” noting that “the Tonkin Gulf Resolution set U.S.
public support for virtually any action.”¹⁰³

The willingness of the media to serve as a vehicle for government
propaganda helped impel the country toward what they were later to
regard as “the tragedy” of Vietnam. The reaction of Congress and the
public laid the basis for the outright invasion of early 1965, providing
support for the planners who were secretly concerned that the NLF was
continuing “to seek a political settlement favorable to the communists”
through the device of “neutralism” and “a coalition government” (Maxwell
Taylor, Aug. 10, 1964), and who warned about “Saigon and Vientiane hanky
panky with Reds” (John McNaughton, October 1964)—that is, moves toward a
political settlement—in accordance with the NLF program as described by
intelligence: “to seek victory through a ‘neutralist coalition’ rather
than by force of arms.”¹⁰⁴ When the United States extended the war in
early 1965 to try to salvage its position in the South, the media
continued to offer total support, in accordance with “the guiding
principle of American foreign policy since 1945” as outlined by the
distinguished liberal commentator of the _New York Times_ James Reston,

that no state shall use military force or the threat of military force
to achieve its political objectives. And the companion of this principle
has been that the United States would use its influence and its power,
when necessary and where it could be effective, against any state that
defied this principle,

which was “at stake in Vietnam,” where “the United States is now
challenging the Communist effort to seek power by the more cunning
technique of military subversion.”¹⁰⁵

In the Orwellian world of American journalism, the attempt to seek a
political settlement by peaceful means is the use of “military force,”
and the use of military force by the United States to block a political
settlement is a noble action in defense of the “guiding principle” that
the use of military force is illegitimate.

The United States then proceeded to fight a long and brutal war to try
to achieve its objectives in Vietnam, demolishing much of Indochina in
the process and leaving a legacy that may never be overcome. Finally, in
January 1973, the United States formally accepted a peace treaty that
was virtually identical with the Vietnamese consensus it overturned by
violence in 1964, except that by that time, the indigenous NLF had been
effectively demolished and little remained in Indochina outside of North
Vietnam, laying the basis for North Vietnamese domination of Indochina,
exactly as had been predicted, long before, by “the wild men in the
wings.” The media bear a major responsibility for these tragic events,
coverage of the Tonkin Gulf incident with its congressional “blank
check” for further aggression serving as a notable example.

5.5.2. The Tet offensive

Media coverage of the Tet offensive has been the centerpiece of the
critique of the media for “losing the war” by their incompetent
reporting and their anti-government bias reflecting their passion for
confronting authority. The authoritative “proof” of this contention was
provided in the two-volume Freedom House study by Peter Braestrup.
Conducted over a six-year period with a wide range of distinguished
participants and consultants, and support acknowledged from some two
dozen corporations and labor unions, this study was hailed as a
“monumental” work by Don Oberdorfer in a _Washington Post_ magazine
cover story on the tenth anniversary of the offensive, with the title:
“Tet: The Turning Point: How a ‘Big Event’ on Television Can Change Our
Minds.” Professor John P. Roche, of the Fletcher School of Law and
Diplomacy of Tufts University, “intellectual-in-residence” for the
Johnson administration, described the Freedom House study as “one of the
major pieces of investigative reporting and first-rate scholarship of
the past quarter century,” a “meticulous case-study of media
incompetence, if not malevolence.” In a relatively critical discussion
in the _Times’_s Sunday book review, Edwin Diamond praises this
“painstakingly thorough study of how the Vietnam war was presented to
the American public by its leading image makers,” a “highfalutin’
epistemological quest” by a “conscientious … reporter-analyst” that
raises profound questions about “how do we know what we know,” revealing
“the biases introduced by standard journalistic assumptions and
organizational practices” that contributed to undermining the U.S.
position in Vietnam among the general public and Congress. Similarly,
Charles Mohr reports that in a conference of “aging hawks and doves” on
the tenth anniversary of the Tet offensive at the University of North
Carolina, “Journalism came in for some strong criticism and only a
rather muted defense.” The criticism was by Braestrup, who “expounded
gently the theme of his recent book,” _Big Story_, and the hawks in
attendance, “while some of the reporters there demurred only softly.”
The study is regularly cited by historians, without qualification, as
the standard work on media reporting of the Tet offensive, “in some
respects as important as the battle itself,” here “analysed in depth”
(R. B. Smith).¹⁰⁶

Oberdorfer too accepts the conclusions of the study as proven: it was
the “ ‘Big Event’ on television” that changed our minds about the war.
The only commentary he cites, even obliquely, accepts this judgment
(Roche and others unnamed). Within the mainstream more generally, it is
assumed with little question that this remarkable scholarly contribution
made its case, though one may debate whether it revealed “malevolence”
or deeper problems of “standard journalistic assumptions and
organizational practices,” reflecting perhaps the “adversarial stance”
of the media with regard to established power.

Braestrup claims to have shown that the reporting of the Tet offensive
is “an extreme case” of the “unsatisfactory” performance of the media:
“Rarely has contemporary crisis-journalism turned out, in retrospect, to
have veered so widely from reality” by presenting “a portrait of defeat
for the allies”—“allies” being the term regularly used to refer to the
U.S. invaders, the local forces they organized, and the largely
mercenary forces they introduced to support U.S. military operations in
Indochina, and a term chosen to exploit the favorable connotations
provided by World War II, when “the allies” fought “the Axis.” “To have
portrayed such a setback for one side [them] as a defeat for the other
[us]—in a major crisis abroad—cannot be counted as a triumph for
American journalism,” which “shouted that the patient was dying, then
weeks later began to whisper that he somehow seemed to be
recovering—whispers apparently not heard amid the clamorous domestic
reaction to the initial shouts,” with television the worst offender. The
whispers began “about late February,” he asserts. These journalistic
failures, Braestrup concludes, reflect “the more volatile journalistic
style—spurred by managerial exhortation or complaisance—that has become
so popular since the late 1960s,” accompanied with “an often mindless
readiness to seek out conflict, to believe the worst of the government
or of authority in general, and on that basis to divide up the actors on
any issue into the ‘good’ and the ‘bad.’ ” The “bad actors” include the
U.S. forces in Vietnam, the “military-industrial complex,” and the CIA,
among others, while “the good” in the eyes of the media are presumably
the Communists, who, Braestrup argues sardonically throughout, were
consistently overpraised and protected. The prospect, he foresees, “is
for a continuation of the current volatile styles, always with the dark
possibility that, if the managers do not themselves take action, then
outsiders—the courts, the Federal Communications Commission, or
Congress—will seek to apply remedies of their own,” a proposal taken up
in Roche’s call for a congressional inquiry and the subsequent warnings
of the Trilateral Commission, cited earlier (_Big Story_, I, 705ff.)

The Braestrup-Freedom House thesis has two essential components: (1)
coverage of the Tet offensive illustrates media incompetence and their
“adversarial stance”; (2) by their portrayal of an American victory as a
defeat, the media bear responsibility for the loss of American resolve
and the subsequent American defeat in Vietnam. It is the second
component of the thesis that carries the dramatic impact, and that has
permitted it to set much of the agenda for subsequent discussion of the
fourth estate and the dangers that its new-found power and “sixties’
style” of “mindless” hatred of authority pose for the very survival of
free institutions and democracy.

The first component of the thesis is commonly accepted even by those who
deny the second. Thus, rejecting “the stab-in-the-back thesis,” George
Herring nevertheless observes: “That the media was hostile to the war
and to Johnson seems clear, and much of the reporting of Tet was
misleading”; these “distortions of the media” may have contributed to
“growing popular discontent” with the war and “public anxiety,” Herring
adds, but these were not the operative factors in Johnson’s decision to
de-escalate and seek negotiations after Tet.¹⁰⁷

An analysis of the facts and the argument demonstrates that neither
component of the Freedom House thesis is tenable. The second, as we
shall see, is conceded in the Freedom House study to be false with
regard to public opinion, and the straw at which they then grasp will
plainly not bear the weight. As for the first component, on the narrow
question of professional competence in reporting the facts available
under trying and confused circumstances, the performance of the media
was acceptable if not outstanding, and compares quite favorably to the
internal reporting of the American military authorities and U.S.
intelligence, insofar as these are available. But when we turn to
broader questions of the sort discussed earlier—that is, if we evaluate
the media by the standards that we would properly apply to reporting,
say, on the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan—we see that indeed they can
be faulted in precisely the terms anticipated by the propaganda model.
The very example selected as providing the strongest grounds for their
accusations by Freedom House and other critics from the jingoist right
wing of the political spectrum actually happens to demonstrate the
precise opposite of what is alleged—namely, it provides yet another
striking illustration of the subservience of the media to the state
propaganda system.¹⁰⁸

The Freedom House study itself provides ample documentation to establish
these conclusions, and to refute its own specific allegations point by
point. Given the major role that this study and the thesis it allegedly
established has played in recent ideology, we will give some attention
to the chasm that lies between its interpretation and summaries, on the
one hand, and the documentary record that it (in part) presents, on the
other.¹⁰⁹ The comments and summaries often seriously misrepresent the
contents of the documents described or are outright falsifications. The
analysis, laced with bitter sarcasm throughout, is thoroughly undermined
when compared with the actual documents. When the countless errors and
careless and inaccurate comments are corrected, nothing remains of the
Freedom House case. The sardonic reference to “straw man journalism,”
“CBS exclusives” and the like, referring to alleged misdeeds of the
media, is misplaced; case by case, we find, instead, “Freedom House
exclusives.”

Before proceeding to details, we should take careful note of the
background assumptions that guide this inquiry. As we noted, for
Braestrup and Freedom House, the “allies” are the United States, the
South Vietnamese client government, and the various South Korean, Thai,
Australian, Chinese Nationalist, and other forces (largely mercenary)
mobilized by the United States. The “South Vietnamese” include our
client government and the armed forces organized, supplied, trained, and
directed by the United States, but exclude the indigenous NLF and its
supporters, although the U.S. government never had the slightest doubt,
and its specialists do not hesitate to concede, that the client regime
had little support while its opponents in South Vietnam constituted so
powerful a _political_ force that any peaceful settlement was
unthinkable. That the United States has a right to conduct military
operations in South Vietnam to uproot the NLF and destroy the peasant
society in which it was based, that its goals are democracy and
self-determination, and that its forces “protect” and “bring security”
to South Vietnamese peasants are principles taken for granted in the
Braestrup-Freedom House version, where no patriotic assumption or cliché
is ever challenged—or even noticed, so deeply rooted are these
doctrines. Correspondingly, the fact that the media coverage surveyed is
framed entirely within these patriotic premises passes unnoticed. The
Freedom House inquiry cannot perceive fundamental bias favorable to the
state because all of the premises of state doctrine are taken as given.
There is “mindlessness” here, as Braestrup observes, although it is not
quite what he perceives; rather, we find that Braestrup “mindlessly”
adopts what we referred to in chapter 3 as a patriotic agenda, even more
so than the media he condemns. And as we described in chapter 1, the
function of such “flak machines” as Freedom House is to ensure that the
press stays within the bounds of this patriotic agenda.

The Tet offensive of January 1968 began on January 21 with a siege by
North Vietnamese (NVA) regulars of a U.S. military base at Khe Sanh,
near the 17th parallel. It was soon apparent that the purpose was to
draw U.S. forces away from populated centers, and the siege succeeded in
this aim, as General Westmoreland rushed combat forces to the northern
areas. On January 31, all major cities and thirty-six of forty-four
provincial capitals, along with numerous other towns, came under
simultaneous attack by southern NLF resistance forces (“Viet Cong”),
along with some NVA elements. The effects are succinctly summarized by
Wallace Thies in his scholarly study of the U.S. strategy of “coercing
Hanoi”:

 … although U.S. military commanders would later claim that the
offensive had been anticipated and that the heavy casualties suffered by
the attackers had resulted in a great victory for the Allies, the
offensive was in fact a military setback for the American side. To meet
the threat in the northern provinces and forestall a Dien Bien Phu-type
defeat at Khe Sanh, half of all U.S. maneuver battalions in South
Vietnam were deployed in I Corps [in the north]; the rest, along with
the bulk of the combat-ready ARVN [GVN, Government of (South) Vietnam]
units, were tied down defending the cities against the possibility of a
second wave of attacks. As a result, the countryside went by default to
the NLF, the pacification program was left in a shambles, and whatever
losses the DRV / VC [North Vietnamese / Viet Cong] forces did suffer in
the initial assaults were largely offset by the unimpeded recruiting
that they conducted in the rural areas in the weeks that followed.¹¹⁰

International Voluntary Services (IVS), which had a close familiarity
with the situation in rural areas, withdrew most of its field workers in
early 1968 because of “security conditions.” A volunteer reported in
February: “The number of locations at which we can safely place a
volunteer have significantly decreased in recent months”; another added
that “we all knew that security in the countryside was getting worse and
worse,” contrary to the optimistic evaluations of the U.S. high command
and Washington, which were relayed with little skepticism by the media
in the pre-Tet period. A South Vietnamese senator estimated that after
Tet, the government controlled “only one third of the country,” the
remaining two-thirds being in the hands of the NLF, an estimate
consistent with U.S. intelligence reports.¹¹¹

The Tet offensive left Washington in a state of “troubled confusion and
uncertainty,” Undersecretary of the Air Force Townsend Hoopes observed,
and “performed the curious service of fully revealing the doubters and
dissenters to each other, in a lightning flash,” within the Pentagon.
While General Westmoreland persisted with the optimistic assessments
that had been undermined by this dramatic demonstration that the NLF
remained firmly rooted in the South despite the devastating American
attack on the rural society, the reaction in official Washington circles
was quite different. Summarizing the impact in Washington, George
Herring observes that in private,

Johnson and his advisers were shocked by the suddenness and magnitude of
the offensive … and intelligence estimates were much more pessimistic
than Westmoreland.… An “air of gloom” hung over White House discussions,
[General Maxwell] Taylor later observed, and [Chairman of the Joint
Chiefs of Staff] General [Earle] Wheeler likened the mood to that
following the first Battle of Bull Run.¹¹²

General Wheeler reported that “to a large extent the VC now control the
countryside,” the situation being particularly bad in the Mekong Delta,
and the Pentagon systems-analysis group concluded that “our control of
the countryside and the defense of the urban areas is now essentially at
pre-August 1965 levels,” when the U.S. war was being lost, according to
General Westmoreland. A U.S. government military-historical summary of
the offensive in the Mekong Delta, completed in April 1968, concluded
that “The Tet offensive in IV Corps had a devastating effect on the
Revolutionary Development [pacification] Program.” As we shall see,
these internal assessments are considerably more “pessimistic” than
those of the media that are denounced for the crime of excessive
pessimism by Freedom House standards.

We might incidentally note that in IV Corps (including the Mekong
Delta), there were “no regular North Vietnam units” according to Defense
Secretary McNamara; the Freedom House study states that “In the
southernmost Delta, it was an ARVN-Vietcong [actually, U.S.-Vietcong]
guerrilla struggle,” and more generally, Hanoi “had yet to commit
sizable (multi-division) forces in sustained, concerted attacks”
anywhere in South Vietnam (I, 24).¹¹³ These assessments are what
motivated the mass-slaughter campaign carried out in the rural areas of
the delta and elsewhere in the post-Tet accelerated pacification
campaign, discussed earlier.

Even before the Tet offensive, Defense Secretary McNamara had privately
concluded that military victory was an unreasonable objective and that
the course of the war should be changed. Clark Clifford, who was brought
in to replace him after Tet, had long shared such doubts, and they were
reinforced by the evidence available to him and by the conclusions of
the “Wise Men” whom Johnson called in to assess the situation.¹¹⁴ Dean
Acheson, who headed this group of longtime hawks drawn from business and
political elites, agreed with Clifford’s pessimism and “advised Johnson
to scale down ground operations, reduce the bombing, and seek every
means of terminating hostilities without abandoning South Vietnam.” The
“Wise Men,” “after full briefings from diplomatic and military
officials, confirmed Acheson’s findings … the consensus, as summed up by
one of the participants, was that ‘there are no military conclusions in
this war—or any military end in the future,’ ” so that “Johnson should
therefore de-escalate the conflict.”¹¹⁵

Notice that at this point some rather serious problems arise concerning
the second component of the Freedom House thesis: that the misdeeds of
the media caused the public to oppose the war, undermining government
resolve and leading to U.S. failure in its (by definition, benevolent)
aims. To establish the “stab-in-the-back” component of the Freedom House
thesis, it is necessary to show that public opinion was swayed toward
opposition to the war by media coverage, and that the media and public
opinion were a significant factor in the shift of government policy.
Neither claim can be sustained.

With regard to the course of public opinion, the Freedom House study
decisively refutes its own thesis. It includes a chapter on public
opinion polls by Burns Roper, which demonstrates, as Braestrup concedes,
that “there is no available evidence of a direct relationship between
the dominant media themes in early 1968 and changes in American mass
public opinion vis-à-vis the Vietnam war itself,” but rather a
continuing “slow drift toward the dove side” after an initial wave of
support for the president and “frustration and anger at the foe” during
the Tet offensive. A closer examination of their own data undermines the
Freedom House thesis even more thoroughly. The early response to the Tet
offensive, during the period when media incompetence and unwarranted
pessimism were allegedly at their height, was “an increase in the
belligerency of the American public”; “the immediate reaction of the
U.S. public was to favor stiffened resistance [that is, U.S. resistance
to an attack by South Vietnamese in South Vietnam] and intensified U.S.
effort.” The major sentiment aroused was “Bomb the hell out of them.” In
later February and March, when the media, in the Freedom House version,
were beginning to “whisper” the true story of American victory, “there
developed a decided negative reaction to the President’s handling of the
war and the war itself, and a distinct opposition to more aggressive
U.S. military action.” In early February 1968, when the impact of the
alleged media “distortions” and “pessimism” reached its peak, public
opinion shifted toward the “hawks.” Public opinion returned to the
pre-Tet figures by late February, when the media were allegedly
correcting their earlier errors. By April, after the offensive had ended
and the “errors” had been overcome (albeit in a “whisper”), there was a
sharp shift toward the “doves.” By April-May-June, measurements had
returned to pre-Tet levels. “When looked at on this broader time scale,
the Tet offensive appears merely to have caused a minor ripple in a
steadily changing attitude toward our involvement in the war,” a shift
toward the position of the doves after an initial shift toward the hawks
during the period of media “pessimism.” Tet was just “one more incident”
that “reminded the public that the war was not going well—that the
confident predictions out of Washington had to be taken with a grain of
salt—and that helped move public opinion in the antiwar direction in
which it had been moving for nearly three years.…”¹¹⁶

Faced with this thorough refutation of one essential component of their
thesis, without which the thesis loses all significance even if the
residue were tenable, the Freedom House analysts retreat to the position
that although the public was unaffected by the perverse behavior of the
media, there was an effect “on the nation’s ‘leadership segment’ ”
(Burns)—a safer claim, since, as they concede, no data are available.
The director of the Freedom House study, Leonard Sussman, concludes that
“the Tet offensive, as portrayed in the media, appeared to have had a
far greater effect on political Washington and the Administration itself
than on the U.S. population’s sentiment on the war” (I, xxxiv). The
media failures, in short, left the public unaffected or even more
supportive of the war while they misled the government—along with
presidential adviser Clark Clifford, the “Wise Men” from the corporate,
political, and military elites including former top-level military
commanders, and such media addicts as Dean Acheson, Henry Cabot Lodge,
McGeorge Bundy, Douglas Dillon, Robert Murphy, etc. We are asked to
believe that their decision to move toward disengagement in a situation
that they perceived as one of stalemate was based not on military
briefings, intelligence reports, and all the information available at
the highest level to official Washington, but on watching the evening
news with Walter Cronkite.¹¹⁷

In short, we can dismiss out of hand the second component of the Freedom
House thesis, the component that had dramatic impact and continuing
influence within the post-Vietnam “right turn” among elites and that has
set the agenda for subsequent discussion about the “adversarial stance”
of the media and its grim consequences. We are left with the conclusion
that the media were either irrelevant, or that they continued to operate
within the general confines of the approved ideological system, thus
refuting the first component of the thesis as well. All that remains of
the Freedom House story is the possibility that the media were
incompetent (even malevolent), but ineffectual. Notice that the Freedom
House thesis here faces the same “logical problem” noted earlier with
regard to the charges concerning television: if television is as
influential as claimed, then the evidence shows that through 1967 it
“encouraged a decisive majority of viewers to support the war.”

To evaluate the remaining shreds of the Freedom House thesis, let us
continue with the record of the Tet offensive, now asking whether the
media did in fact distort it in their zealous—although utterly
ineffectual—efforts to undermine authority.

With lavish use of firepower, U.S. forces succeeded in regaining control
of the towns and cities. The city of Hué, which had been conquered from
its own population by GVN troops with American assistance several months
earlier in a desperate U.S. effort to prevent the growth of popular
movements calling for democracy and a negotiated political
settlement,¹¹⁸ was 80 percent destroyed by bombing and shelling, which
left 2,000 civilians buried in the “smashed ruins,” according to U.S.
Air Force Undersecretary Townsend Hoopes; the marines listed “Communist
losses” at over 5,000, while Hoopes states that a “sizable part” of the
Communist force of 1,000 men who captured the city escaped, allowing a
determination of who constituted the “Communist losses.” U.S. AID in May
estimated that some 4,000 civilians were left dead in the ruins of the
city, most of them victims of U.S. firepower.¹¹⁹

In the Mekong Delta, “Artillery and air strikes leveled half of My Tho,
a city of 80,000, and the provincial capital of Ben Tre [Kien Hoa
Province, later devastated in the post-Tet terror campaign; see p. 204],
with 140,000 inhabitants, was decimated with the justification, as an
American colonel put it in one of the most widely quoted statements of
the war, ‘We had to destroy the town to save it.’ ” ¹²⁰ The U.S. command
conceded that “the enemy” were overwhelmingly NLF, not North Vietnamese;
killed and captured outnumbered captured weapons by a factor of five, an
indication of who “the enemy” really were. Secretary of Defense McNamara
estimated NVA forces at 50,000 to 55,000 at the end of 1967, mostly in
northern regions, with some 10,000 troops placed in Viet Cong combat
units; the total roughly matches third-country forces, mostly Korean
mercenaries, mobilized by the United States as part of its invasion of
South Vietnam, and barely 10 percent of the U.S. forces of over half a
million men, even excluding the massive forces engaged in the attack
against Vietnam and Laos from the sea and from U.S. sanctuaries from
Thailand to the Philippines and Guam, employing means of destruction
that dwarfed all else in Indochina.¹²¹

As noted earlier, the Tet offensive not only reduced Washington to
gloomy despair and convinced U.S. elites that there was no realistic
hope of a military victory in Vietnam at a cost acceptable to the United
States, but also changed the character of media reporting and
commentary, which mirrored the changes in elite opinion. On the ground,
American correspondents were able to witness the war at first hand,
gaining a view rather different from the sanitized and edited version
presented under the control of the American military command. Media
commentary at home reflected elite opinion in recognizing that the
optimistic forecasts that had been relayed from Washington with little
skepticism were inaccurate, and that a long and bitter war lay ahead.

But on-the-scene reporting and domestic commentary never veered from the
framework of the state propaganda system. In reporting the fighting in
Ben Tre and My Tho in the Delta, for example, the press observed that
American infantry participated while the towns were blasted by American
bombers, helicopter gunships, navy patrol boats, and artillery to root
out the Viet Cong—that is, the South Vietnamese guerrillas who “were
probably living with the people,” according to an American officer
quoted by Bernard Weinraub. Nonetheless, the news reports speak of the
perceived need to “blast the city” with jets and helicopter gunships,
particularly the poorer and most crowded sections, “to save other
sections of the city and the lives of thousands of people …” (Lee
Lescaze)—people whose lives were threatened not by the southern NLF
guerrillas living among them but by the U.S. forces “defending” them
from the NLF. Because of Tet, Weinraub explains, “the protection of Ben
Tre was limited,” and it was necessary to bring in troops from the U.S.
Ninth Infantry Division by helicopter, and to carry out “bombing raids
and fire by helicopter gunships and artillery” to “protect” Ben Tre,
which “has long been a stronghold of the Vietcong” and is “sometimes
considered a Vietcong rest and recreation area,” while surrounding
hamlets “thought to be controlled by the Vietcong have been razed by
allied bombing and artillery attacks and fire from armed helicopters.”
In Ben Tre itself, “the market place is rubble and near the gutted homes
nearby women in shawls sit in the noon heat and mourn with loud groans,”
while “My Tho still smells of death,” with half the homes
destroyed—thanks to the effective “protection” the population received
from their American defenders.¹²²

Throughout, it is taken for granted that the forces armed, trained, and
supplied by the only foreign element in the delta are “the South
Vietnamese,” not the South Vietnamese guerrillas living among the
population in their “Vietcong strongholds,” from whom the United States
is “protecting” the population by ferocious bombardment of civilian
areas.

Recall that we are now evaluating the remaining component of the Freedom
House thesis: that the media were suppressing the American victory in
their antiestablishment zeal. In fact, they were reporting the story
accurately in a narrow sense, but completely within the framework of the
government propaganda system—never questioned, in a shameful display of
media servility. We may imagine what the reaction would be to a
comparable performance on the part of the Nazi or Soviet press.
Braestrup’s final comment that “a free society deserves better” of its
media (I, 728) is accurate enough, although not quite in the sense
intended in the Freedom House study.

As throughout the war, the standpoint of the media continued to reflect
the perceptions and attitudes of the American military; for example, an
American official who observed: “What the Vietcong did was occupy the
hamlets we pacified just for the purpose of having the allies move in
and bomb them. By their presence, the hamlets were destroyed.”¹²³ The
same _New York Times_ report from Binh Dinh Province—the “showcase”
province for pacification—indicates this had been going on, unreported,
well before the Tet offensive: “The enemy moves in December—which
several military men called a ‘softening up’ for the offensive—resulted
in a wave of allied air strikes on villages. Hundreds of homes were
destroyed.”

The U.S. military “resistance”—to borrow the Freedom House
terminology—took the same form elsewhere. Robert Shaplen reported from
the scene that in Saigon,

A dozen separate areas, comprising perhaps sixty or seventy blocks, had
been totally burned out. These were almost all residential areas.… Most
of the damage was the result of rocket attacks by American armed
helicopters or other planes, though some of it had been caused by
artillery or ground fighting.… A modern ten-million-dollar textile
plant, containing forty thousand spindles, was entirely destroyed by
bombs because it was suspected of being a Vietcong hideout.¹²⁴

_Le Monde_ correspondent Jean-Claude Pomonti observed that

in the popular suburbs, the Front [NLF] has proven that the only way to
eliminate its control is through systematic destruction. To dislodge it,
the air force had to level many residential areas. Fleeing the
bombardments, tens of thousands of refugees have poured into the center
of the city.¹²⁵

Charles Mohr, whom Freedom House singles out for “perhaps the
consistently best reporting from Vietnam,” reported that “in towns such
as Hué, Vinhlong, Bentre and Mytho appalling destruction was wrought
when encircled allied forces took the decision to destroy the attacking
Vietcong forces by destroying the places they had occupied.” He quotes
an American official in Saigon as stating: “The Government won the
recent battles, but it is important to consider how they won. At first
the Vietcong had won and held everything in some towns except the
American military compound and a South Vietnamese position.”¹²⁶ By “the
Government,” he means the reader to understand the GVN, who “won” thanks
to U.S. firepower and troops.

As in this example, the U.S. government claim that the Tet offensive was
a military defeat for the Communists was widely reported, although the
U.S. government official’s perception of an initial Viet Cong victory
goes well beyond the typical media accounts in the crime of “pessimism.”
“Journalists generally accepted the official claim that Tet was a
military defeat for the North Vietnamese and NLF,” Daniel Hallin
concludes in his review of the press and television; for example, Walter
Cronkite, who said at once over CBS—on February 14—that “first, and
simplest, the Vietcong suffered a military defeat.”¹²⁷ Clear and
forthright.

These facts do not comport well with what remains of the Freedom House
thesis: the charge that until late February, the media portrayed the
enemy’s defeat as “a defeat for the allies” in “clamourous shouts,” only
conceding from late February in a “whisper” that this was not quite
accurate, television being the worst offender, with Walter Cronkite the
arch-criminal.¹²⁸ It was this gross incompetence or malevolence that
illustrates most dramatically the “mindless readiness … to believe the
worst of the government or of authority in general.” In the real world,
the facts were quite the opposite, and the last remnants of the Freedom
House thesis thus disappear, apart from the charge, to be evaluated in
the appendix, that the reporting was technically incompetent.

Some would contend that the issue of “how they won,” which concerned the
American official cited earlier, is as important as “who won” in
evaluating the significance of the Tet offensive. This idea never
penetrated the minds of Braestrup or his Freedom House associates,
however, at the time or in their study. Consider political scientist
Milton Sacks, a specialist on Vietnam and a GVN adviser, thanked for
“providing historical perspective” for the Freedom House Study (I,
xxiii). In February 1968, he wrote, with no further comment:

In conventional terms, it now seems clear that the Communists have
suffered a military defeat in their Tet offensive. They have expended
the lives of thousands of their soldiers without securing a single
province or district town of significance.¹²⁹

U.S. officials, in contrast, were impressed with the fact that the NLF
and NVA occupied vast areas previously thought to be “controlled,”
wreaked havoc with the pacification program, and were dislodged only by
a further and still more violent U.S. attack on the civil society of
South Vietnam. It was feared that it might not be an easy task to
convince the populace that the Communists were to blame for the
slaughter and destruction by U.S. forces. The problem, as reported from
Hué by Marc Riboud of _Le Monde_ in April, was that the population
appeared to compare ARVN behavior unfavorably with that of the NVA or
NLF, while the deepest bitterness and resentment was directed against
the Americans, whose “blind and systematic bombardment” had turned Hué
into “an assassinated city”; this reaction may have also been in part a
residue of the deep bitterness and resentment left by the U.S.-backed
ARVN conquest of Hué a few months earlier.¹³⁰ An IVS worker quoted in
_Newsweek_ said: “As difficult as this may be to believe, not a single
Vietnamese I have met in Saigon or in the Delta blames the Viet Cong for
the events of the past two weeks,” and in its last issue of the Tet
period, _Newsweek_ reported from Hué, with the same surprise at this
inexplicable reaction, that

Curiously, moreover, few of [the population] point an accusing finger at
the North Vietnamese. “When the NVA were here,” said one student, “they
were polite and well-disciplined, totally different from the government
troops, the Americans, or even the Vietcong.”

“The hope is that the Vietnamese people will blame the communists rather
than the Americans for whatever damage is being done,” Don Webster
reported from Hué on February 12 in the midst of the reconquest of the
city by the U.S. Marines. Two days earlier, John Lengel of AP wrote that

It is still impossible to gauge the breadth of the damage.… But few
seasoned observers see the devastation of Hue backfiring on the
communists. They see as the greatest hope a massive and instant program
of restoration underlined by a careful psychological warfare program
pinning the blame on the communists.¹³¹

Braestrup places the word “devastation” in italics as an illustration of
the unfairness and anti-American bias of the media; comment seems
superfluous.

While the U.S. media rarely strayed from the framework of the state
propaganda system, others were unconstrained by these limits: for
example, the _Le Monde_ correspondents cited; or British
photo-journalist Philip Jones Griffiths, who concluded from his
observations on the scene that the thousands of civilian victims of the
reconquest of Hué “were killed by the most hysterical use of American
firepower ever seen,” and then designated “as the victims of a Communist
massacre.”¹³²

To comprehend fully the nature of the Freedom House charges, we may
imagine how the inquiry urged by John Roche might proceed. Who else is
implicated in the terrible misdeeds that Freedom House perceives?
General Westmoreland and the U.S. command in Saigon must surely be
placed on the docket because of their estimates of early VC successes
(see appendix 3 for further examples), along with William Bundy,
assistant secretary of state for Far Eastern affairs, given his extreme
pessimism. He thought that the Tet offensive was “shattering to the
South, especially in the area of pacification,” concluding for a time
that “the South Vietnamese were through,” “they’ve had it”—where “South
Vietnamese” excludes the South Vietnamese defending their country from a
U.S. invasion, as usual. These conclusions, which do conform to the
Freedom House parody of the media, were based not on the press but on
“reports from people in the field out in Vietnam,” so presumably they
too are implicated (1, 625). Similarly, Lyndon Johnson was guilty, since
he seemed “to some degree ‘psychologically defeated’ by the threat to
Khe Sanh and the onslaught on the cities of Vietnam,” so Braestrup
concludes (I, 626, 630). The same is true of Johnson’s civilian
advisers, given the “air of gloom” among them and the “Battle of Bull
Run” mood, and the author of the official U.S. government
military-historical summary, cited earlier; and Dean Acheson and other
“Wise Men” who urged a shift of course because of the same “undue
pessimism” for which the media are condemned by Freedom House. Also
Ambassador Ellsworth Bunker, who reported that the offensive had
“disrupted the pacification effort for the time being,” and the
pacification adviser who reported that in his “showcase” area,
“pacification does not exist” (II, 184–86).

Further candidates for investigation appear in the _Pentagon Papers—_for
example, General Wheeler, who summarized the situation in the following
terms to the president on February 27, just as Walter Cronkite was
speculating about “stalemate,” arousing Freedom House ire:

The enemy is operating with relative freedom in the countryside,
probably recruiting heavily and no doubt infiltrating NVA units and
personnel. His recovery is likely to be rapid; his supplies are
adequate; and he is trying to maintain the momentum of his winter-spring
offensive.… ARVN is now in a defensive posture around towns and cities
and there is concern about how well they will bear up under sustained
pressure. The initial attack nearly succeeded in a dozen places, and
defeat in these places was only averted by the timely reaction of US
forces. In short, it was a very near thing. There is no doubt that the
RD Program [pacification] has suffered a severe set back.… To a large
extent the VC now control the countryside.… MACV estimates that US
forces will be required in a number of places to assist and encourage
the Vietnamese Army to leave the cities and towns and reenter the
country. This is especially true in the Delta.

The media reports that Braestrup derides were rarely as “pessimistic” as
the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, whose summary of the
situation led the president to order “the initiation of a complete and
searching reassessment of the entire U.S. strategy and commitment in
South Vietnam,” the _Pentagon Papers_ analyst reports.¹³³

The CIA must also be investigated for contributing to the decline of
“free institutions” by its pessimism. A CIA paper of March 1, presumably
uninfluenced by Walter Cronkite, expressed grave doubts about the GVN
and ARVN and predicted that they might cease “effective functioning in
parts of the country,” so that “virtually the entire burden of the war
would fall on US forces.” Like Cronkite a few days earlier, they
expected “no better than a standoff” in the coming ten months. Pentagon
systems analysis concluded that the offensive “appears to have killed
the [pacification] program once and for all,” drawing the conclusion
that Braestrup falsely attributes to the media (see appendix 3), and
estimated that “our control of the countryside and the defense of the
urban areas is now at pre-August 1965 levels.” It was because of this
serious situation—not perceived American successes, as Braestrup
intimates—that they recommended what was later to be called
“Vietnamization.”

The civilian analysts in the Pentagon must be charged not only with
undue pessimism, but also with some of the other crimes of the press.
For example, they referred to the famous statement that we are
destroying South Vietnam in order to save it; citation of this statement
is the target of much Braestrup scorn. We must also include Colonel
Herbert Schandler, on whom Braestrup relies for his account of the
Wheeler-Westmoreland request for additional troops. He was, Braestrup
says, the anonymous author of the _Pentagon Papers_ section on this
material, and here he described as “a startlingly accurate account” a
_New York Times_ article by Neil Sheehan and Hedrick Smith which,
Braestrup claims, was a major example of “distorted and incomplete”
reporting (I, 581, 613). The authors of the “Epilogue” to the _Pentagon
Papers_ must also be included in the indictment, given their pessimistic
post-Tet assessment of “the price for military victory” and the
“illusory” nature of claimed progress.

The category of people who were _not_ threatening “free institutions” by
the standards of Freedom House is small indeed, a fact that some may
find suggestive.

It is significant that the major criticism of the media in the Freedom
House study is that they were too “pessimistic.” Strikingly absent is
the obvious standard of comparison: the internal reports from the field
and analysis by intelligence and official Washington—which were, if
anything, even more pessimistic. The logic of the Freedom House brief
against the media is highly revealing. In their view, the media in a
free society must not only accept without question the principles of the
state doctrinal system, as the media did throughout (a fact that Freedom
House never addresses, and apparently cannot perceive), but must do so
with a degree of enthusiasm and optimism that exceeds that of U.S.
intelligence, the military command, Johnson’s “Wise Men,” and other
leading figures in the military, political, and corporate world who draw
their information from a full range of government sources. It is an
interesting conception of a “free society.”

We might ask how the Freedom House conception of a free press in a free
society would be applied by Soviet commissars, let us say, to the case
of the mass circulation weekly _Ogonyok_, which published a series of
long articles that presented a “bleak picture” of the war in
Afghanistan, depicting it “in stark terms,” speaking of “poor morale and
desertion” among Afghan units and “tough fighting between elite Soviet
troops and Afghan guerrillas,” and implying that “large areas of
Afghanistan are under guerrilla control.” The articles also give “a
broad hint that drug use is common among Russian troops in Afghanistan,”
and they include extracts from a helicopter pilot’s journal describing
“the sight and smell of colleagues’ charred bodies” and implying that
“helicopter losses are high” after the receipt of sophisticated Western
weaponry by the guerrillas, terrorists who finance themselves by
producing drugs for the international market (charges verified by
Western observers, incidentally). But it would be inhumane for the USSR
simply to withdraw without guarantees for the population, because “a
Soviet withdrawal would lead to nationwide internecine warfare,” as
Afghans who are quoted anticipate. The article does not simply mimic
standard U.S. media fare, as these excerpts indicate. Thus it describes
an attack on Soviet villages by Afghan guerrillas; one can imagine the
U.S. reaction had there been a Viet Cong attack on villages in Texas.
But by Freedom House standards, it is plain that the editors merit
severe censure for their “adversarial stance,” “pessimism,” and
“volatile styles,” “always with the dark possibility that, if the
managers do not themselves take action, then outsiders [in the
government] will seek to apply remedies of their own.”¹³⁴ And, in fact,
in January 1988, General Dimitri T. Yakov, the Soviet defense minister,
applied Freedom House and Braestrup principles to the “adversarial”
Soviet press, sharply criticizing articles in _Ogonyok_ and
_Literaturnaya Gazeta_ for reporting on the Afghan war in ways that
undermined public confidence in the Soviet army and played into the
hands of the West.¹³⁵

In the light of the evidence presented in the Freedom House study, and
of much that is ignored, the following conclusions seem reasonable.
During the Tet offensive and its aftermath, media performance was
creditable, sometimes very highly so, in a narrow sense. More broadly,
this reporting was highly deceptive in that it was framed within the
unchallenged and unrecognized doctrines of the state propaganda system,
which impose a severe distortion. Media reports compare favorably in
accuracy with those available to official Washington at the highest
level from internal sources, although they were regularly less alarmist,
perhaps because the media tended to give credence to official statements
and were unaware of the internal assessments. The reports from the scene
led media commentators to draw approximately the same conclusions as
Johnson’s high-level advisers. The manner in which the media covered the
events had little effect on public opinion, except perhaps to enhance
its aggressiveness and, of course, to instill ever more deeply the basic
and unexamined tenets of the propaganda system.

As we shall see in appendix 3, a closer examination establishes these
conclusions still more firmly, while demonstrating further the utter
incompetence—to use the kindest term—of the Freedom House study that has
been so influential in the subsequent period.

We have now addressed the argument presented by critics of the media for
its alleged “adversarial stance” on their own chosen grounds, the
grounds that they select as the strongest for their case. The propaganda
model is once again confirmed, thus meeting the most severe test that
can be posed. The model is also vindicated by the manner in which
Freedom House fulfills its function as a flak machine, attempting to
bully the media into a still more thoroughgoing conformity with the
propaganda requirements of state policy by methods that are a travesty
of honest journalism (let alone scholarship)—all, of course, in the
interest of “freedom.”

5.5.3. The Paris Peace Agreements

The Tet offensive convinced large sectors of elite opinion that the
costs of the U.S. effort were too high. Lyndon Johnson stepped down. In
what was termed by the government a “bombing halt,” and reported as
such, the bombers were shifted from North Vietnamese targets to Laos,
where the defenseless rural society of scattered villages in the North
was demolished, and later Cambodia, where the same was true on an even
more horrendous scale. U.S. forces undertook the violent and destructive
post-Tet accelerated pacification campaign in the South, and bombing was
intensified to “_step up refugee programs deliberately aimed at
depriving the VC of a recruiting base_,” in accordance with the advice
of pacification director Robert Komer in April 1967.¹³⁶ The Phoenix
program was established to destroy the “infrastructure” of the NLF by
terror. The burden of ground fighting was shifted to Vietnamese forces
supplied and directed by the United States, and U.S. conscripts were
withdrawn, a more typical pattern for colonial wars that essentially
duplicated the earlier French effort to reconquer Indochina. And the
United States finally agreed to pursue the path of a negotiated
settlement, although still not relinquishing the aim of preventing the
unification of Vietnam and retaining Indochina, apart from North
Vietnam, within the U.S. global system.

This was not the maximal goal the United States had pursued; thus in the
late 1950s the U.S. government still hoped for unification of Vietnam
under anti-Communist leadership, and the U.S. client regime always
regarded itself as the government of all of Vietnam (GVN = Government of
Vietnam), and so declared in the first and unamendable article of its
constitution. But by the late 1960s, if not before, control over all
Indochina apart from North Vietnam was regarded as the maximum goal
attainable. As we have seen, opportunities for a peaceful diplomatic
settlement had long existed, but they had never been pursued because
they were regarded as inconsistent with the essential goal: preservation
of an “independent” South Vietnam that would be a U.S. client state.

By October 1972, the negotiators in Paris had reached the essential
terms of an agreement: the 9-Point Plan. President Nixon, however,
objected to the terms of the agreement, and the Thieu government in
Saigon was completely opposed to them. Nixon’s hope was to delay further
negotiations until after the November presidential elections, when he
would have more leverage.¹³⁷ The delay would also permit a vast shipment
of arms to the GVN, something that would surely be prohibited by the
agreements.

In an effort to pressure Nixon to sign the agreements, the DRV made the
terms public on October 26 in a radio broadcast. In a Washington press
conference, Kissinger stated that the Radio Hanoi broadcast gave “on the
whole a very fair account,” then offering the following paraphrase: “As
was pointed out by Radio Hanoi, the existing authorities with respect to
both internal and external politics would remain in office” in the
South. Thus Kissinger sought to insinuate that according to the accurate
account on Radio Hanoi, the GVN (“the existing authorities”) would
remain “in office” as the government of the South, and would somehow
deal with the other “party,” whose status remained mysterious. But “what
was pointed out by Radio Hanoi”—correctly, as Kissinger conceded—was
something quite different, namely, that “the two present administrations
in South Vietnam will remain in existence with their respective domestic
and external functions,” these being the GVN and the PRG (based upon the
NLF). Having reached agreement, these two parties were then to move
toward reunification, to be “carried out step by step through peaceful
means,” with no external—meaning U.S.—interference.

The differences are crucial. From its earliest days, the war was fought
over the question of whether “the South Vietnamese people shall decide
themselves the political future of South Vietnam,” as the October
9-Point Plan explicitly stipulated must be the case, or whether the
United States would enforce the rule of its client regime, the GVN, as
the sole legitimate government in the South, in accordance with
Kissinger’s version of the terms to which he had theoretically agreed, a
version that plainly departed radically from the text.¹³⁸

Kissinger’s announcement that “peace is at hand,” designed with the
upcoming U.S. presidential elections in mind, was also blatant
deception. As his distortion of the essential terms of the agreement
clearly revealed, the United States was backing away from the settlement
and refusing to implement it. Nixon later explained that “We had to use
[Kissinger’s press conference] to undercut the North Vietnamese
propaganda maneuver [namely, making public the terms of the agreement]
and to make sure that our version of the agreement was the one that had
great public impact.”¹³⁹ This result was substantially achieved; the
media characteristically accepted Kissinger’s version with no
recognition that it was diametrically opposed to the terms of the
9-Point Plan, though the facts were plain to anyone who troubled to look
at the readily available public record.

The United States then proceeded with a vast shipment of arms to the GVN
while demanding substantial changes in the October agreements. Hanoi, in
contrast, publicly insisted that the October agreements be signed. The
media adopted the version of events relayed regularly by Kissinger,
depicting him as caught between two irrational adversaries, Hanoi and
Saigon. The Christmas bombings of Hanoi and Haiphong followed, causing
great damage and also the loss of several dozen B-52S (the exact numbers
are contested, but the losses clearly shocked the Pentagon), as well as
a highly adverse world reaction, although the media continued to relay
the Washington interpretation of what had happened. Thus Stanley Karnow
wrote that “evidently” the primary aim of “Nixon’s bombings of Hanoi”
was “to compel the North Vietnamese to return to negotiations,” a
curious version of the readily available facts.¹⁴⁰ After the military
and political failures of the Christmas bombings, the U.S. government
then signed the January peace agreements, which were virtually identical
to the terms it had rejected the preceding October—and, still more
significant, were hardly different in essentials from the NLF proposals
of the early 1960s, which caused such dismay in Washington and compelled
the U.S. government to escalate the war so as to prevent a political
settlement, thus virtually destroying Indochina, with millions of
casualties and three countries utterly devastated—a fact considered of
little moment in the West.

The charade that took place in October was reenacted in January. As the
agreements were announced on January 24, the White House made an
official statement, and Kissinger had a lengthy press conference in
which he explained clearly that the United States was planning to reject
every essential provision of the accords the administration had been
compelled to sign, presenting a version that explicitly violated them at
every crucial point. In yet another astonishing demonstration of
servility, the media accepted the Kissinger-White House version
unquestioningly, thus guaranteeing that the Vietnamese enemy would
appear to be violating the agreements if it adhered to them.

Recall that all of this took place during the period when the media had
allegedly reached their peak level of militant opposition to state
authority. Let us now briefly inspect this remarkable record.

The Paris Agreements committed “the United States and all other
countries [to] respect the independence, sovereignty, unity and
territorial integrity of Vietnam as recognized by the 1954 Geneva
Agreements on Vietnam” (article 1). Pending reunification of Vietnam,
which is to “be carried out step by step through peaceful means … and
without foreign interference,” the “military demarcation line” at the
17th parallel is to be regarded as “only provisional and not a political
or territorial boundary” (article 15). In the South, there are two
parallel and equivalent “South Vietnamese parties,” the GVN and the PRG.
This is the central element of the agreements, which proceed to specify
in detail the responsibilities and commitments of the two “South
Vietnamese parties.” These are to achieve national reconciliation
through peaceful means, under conditions of full democratic freedoms,
while “Foreign countries shall not impose any political tendency or
personality on the South Vietnamese people” and “the United States will
not continue its military involvement or intervene in the internal
affairs of South Vietnam” (articles 9c, 4). “The two South Vietnamese
parties undertake to respect the cease-fire and maintain peace in South
Vietnam, settle all matters of contention through negotiations, and
avoid all armed conflict” (article 10). Furthermore, “the two South
Vietnamese parties” will proceed to “Achieve national reconciliation and
concord, end hatred and enmity, prohibit all acts of reprisal and
discrimination against individuals or organizations that have
collaborated with one side or the other,” and, in general, “ensure the
democratic liberties of the people,” which are outlined, along with
procedures to ensure the reconcilation undertaken by “the two South
Vietnamese parties” (articles 11, 12). The agreements committed “the two
South Vietnamese parties” not to “accept the introduction of troops,
military advisers, and military personnel including technical military
personnel, armaments, munitions, and war material into South Vietnam”
and called for a “total withdrawal” of all such personnel within sixty
days, while “the two South Vietnamese parties” will settle “The question
of Vietnamese armed forces in South Vietnam … without foreign
interference” (articles 5, 7, 13).

In his January 24 press conference, Kissinger made it clear that the
United States maintained the right to provide “civilian technicians
serving in certain of the military branches,” and as its forces were
withdrawn after the signing of the agreements, the United States
proceeded to keep or introduce 7,200 “contract civilians” to “handle
maintenance, logistics, and training jobs formerly performed by the U.S.
military,” many of them “retired military men,” under the supervision of
a U.S. major-general.¹⁴¹ The provisions concerning technical personnel
were thus at once nullified, along with the U.S. pledge to refrain from
any intervention “in the internal affairs of South Vietnam.”

In a speech of January 23, Nixon announced that the GVN would be
recognized as the “sole legitimate government in South Vietnam,”
nullifying articles 9c and 4 as well as the basic principle of the
agreements: that the two parallel and equivalent “South Vietnamese
parties” are to proceed toward a settlement with no U.S. interference or
effort to impose any “political tendency” on the people of South
Vietnam. In its “summary of basic elements of the Vietnam agreements” on
January 24, the White House announced that “the government of the
Republic of (South) Vietnam continues in existence, recognized by the
United States, its constitutional structure and leadership intact and
unchanged”—the reason for the parentheses being that this
“constitutional structure” identifies the GVN as the government of all
Vietnam. This “constitutional structure” also outlawed the second of the
two parallel and equivalent parties, along with “pro-communist
neutralism” and any form of expression “aimed at spreading Communist
policies, slogans and instructions”; and the GVN announced at once that
such “illegal” actions would be suppressed by force, while President
Thieu stated that “this is solely a ceasefire agreement, no more no
less.”¹⁴² With these declarations, the United States and its client
regime thus nullified the central principle of the Paris Agreements, and
flatly rejected the provisions for “the two South Vietnamese parties” to
achieve “national reconciliation and concord” by peaceful means without
forceful measures or repression.

In short, the United States announced at once, clearly and without
equivocation, that it intended to disregard every essential provision of
the scrap of paper it was compelled to sign in Paris.

Kissinger attempted to obfuscate the matter in his January 24 press
conference, reprinted in full in the _New York Times_.¹⁴³ He claimed,
falsely, that “we have achieved substantial changes” from the October
9-Point Plan, thus implicitly offering a justification for the Christmas
bombings. He stated that “what the civil war has been all about” is “who
is the legitimate ruler of South Vietnam” and “is there such a thing as
a South Vietnam even temporarily until unification,” claiming that the
United States had achieved its objectives on these points by virtue of
the “specific references to the sovereignty of South Vietnam” and “the
right of the South Vietnamese people to self-determination”; and he
claimed that the United States had also achieved its goal with regard to
the status of the demarcation line.

All of this was blatant deception. The wording of the agreements
reflected the DRV-PRG position in all the respects Kissinger mentioned,
while Kissinger’s insinuation that the agreements permitted the United
States to recognize the GVN as “the legitimate ruler of South Vietnam”
is in explicit contradiction to the agreements he had just signed, as is
his attempt to create the impression that the “civil war” is “between
North and South Vietnam.” The core provision of the Paris Agreements
establishes the GVN and the PRG as “the two South Vietnamese parties,”
parallel and equivalent, to move toward unification with the North,
abrogating the provisional demarcation line, which has no political
status. Kissinger was attempting to confuse “sovereignty _of_ South
Vietnam” with “sovereignty _within_ South Vietnam”; the latter is what
the war “was all about” from the outset, and the agreements simply
reiterated the position of “the enemy” that this was a matter to be
settled by the two South Vietnamese parties without external
interference, as in the October 9-Point Plan.¹⁴⁴

Just as in October, the purpose of this obfuscation was, in Nixon’s
words, “to make sure that our version of the agreement was the one that
had great public impact.” And again it succeeded. The media—without
exception, to our knowledge—accepted the Kissinger-White House version
as expressing the contents of the agreements, enabling them to interpret
the PRG-DRV insistence on the actual terms of the Paris Agreements as an
effort to disrupt them. Thus Joseph Kraft, a liberal dove on these
issues, wrote that “Much of the blame goes to the Communists” for the
subsequent breakdown of the cease-fire, because “Hanoi has never
abandoned the objective of unifying all of Vietnam”; that is, Hanoi has
never abandoned its objective of living up to the terms of the Geneva
Accords of 1954, now explicitly reiterated in the Paris Agreements of
January 1973.¹⁴⁵ As a dove, he also added that “just as much of the
blame goes to President Thieu”—but none, of course, can be assigned to
Washington. He cites Communist military actions in the South and
dispatch of equipment as the major reason for the breakdown of the
cease-fire, citing no evidence; as we shall see, the facts reveal quite
a different reason.

At the liberal extreme of U.S. opinion, Tom Wicker wrote that

American policy, which never accepted the Geneva agreement, came to
insist, instead, that South Vietnam was a legally constituted nation
being subverted and invaded by another power; and that view is implied
even in the documents that finally produced the cease-fire.¹⁴⁶

Wicker adopts Kissinger’s version, which is in explicit contradiction to
the actual documents; these simply reiterate the long-held position of
the NLF and Hanoi with regard to the status of South Vietnam.

In the _New Republic_, Stanley Karnow wrote that “the Vietcong considers
[the PRG] to be a parallel administration,” failing to observe that it
is not only “the Vietcong,” but also _the Paris Agreements just signed
by the United States government_ that assign to the PRG a status exactly
parallel to that of the GVN.¹⁴⁷ In _Newsweek_, Stewart Alsop proclaimed
that if the “marvelously elaborate” Nixon-Kissinger settlement “survives
more or less intact, we will have won the war”—which would be true,
under the Nixon-Kissinger interpretation, although under the evidently
irrelevant terms of the Paris Agreements, the United States had
abandoned its war aims and accepted the basic proposals of the
Vietnamese enemy. _Newsweek_ went on to explain in the same issue that
Hanoi has now

accepted the provision that north and south are divided by a sacrosanct
demarcation line, thus tacitly acknowledging the legitimacy of the
Saigon regime.… Equally vital to the Nixon Administration was specific
mention of the “sovereignty” of the Saigon government, and on this
point, too, the U.S. had its way. Hanoi finally conceded that, in
Kissinger’s words, “there is an entity called South Vietnam.” In one
important sense, the dispute over that question was what the war in
Vietnam was all about.¹⁴⁸

Again, utterly and transparently false in every respect, as a comparison
with the text just quoted immediately demonstrates, although in accord
with Kissinger’s deceptive version of the agreements, taken as
sacrosanct by the loyal media.

An honest and independent press would have announced the January
agreements with headlines reading: “U.S. Announces Intention to Violate
the Agreements Signed in Paris.” An informed press would have observed
further that the Paris Agreements incorporate the principles rejected by
the United States at Geneva twenty years earlier, as well as the
essential principles of the NLF program of the early 1960s, which were
similar to those advocated by Vietnamese quite generally and constituted
the crucial fact that impelled the United States to escalate the war so
as to block a political settlement among Vietnamese. The actual press
simply adopted Washington’s version of the agreements, never mentioning
that this version contradicted them in every essential respect and thus
guaranteed that the war would go on—as it did. Once again, the
contribution of the media was to help implement further violence and
suffering by adopting Washington’s version of events—in this case, in
the face of the fact that this version was, transparently, in flat
contradiction to the documents readily at hand. One would have to search
assiduously to discover a more blatant example of media subservience to
state power.

The aftermath was predictable, predicted in the “alternative press,” and
similar to earlier occasions when the same factors were operative. As
after Geneva 1954, the Communists, who had won a political victory (on
paper), attempted to pursue “political struggle,” while the United
States and its GVN client at once turned to military force to overturn
the terms of the Paris Agreements. These facts were reported by the more
serious journalists on the scene in Vietnam, notably Daniel Southerland,
who observed from his extensive investigations that “the Saigon
government has been guilty in by far the greatest number of cases of
launching offensive operations into territory held by the other side,”
assuming “that it has the right, despite the cease-fire,” to take back
territory which it lost in 1972,” and giving many examples, as did
others.¹⁴⁹ The U.S. government informed Congress cheerily that “the GVN
has fared well during the post-cease-fire maneuvering,” adding “770
hamlets to the list of those over which it has dominant control” after
the agreements—and in violation of them, a fact that passed without
notice. The GVN thus added one million people to the areas of its
control, while expending sixteen times as much ammunition as the enemy
and using the newly provided U.S. equipment, as intended, for massive
military operations, including extensive bombardment of PRG areas to
prevent refugees from returning to them as provided by the
agreements.¹⁵⁰ The media either blamed the Communists, or sometimes the
GVN as well, but not the United States, which had announced at once its
intention to disrupt the agreements and now publicly expressed its
pleasure in the military actions that successfully achieved this
objective.

When the North Vietnamese finally responded to U.S.-GVN violence, the
GVN quickly collapsed, leading to outrage in the U.S. government and
media—which still persists—over this dramatic demonstration of Communist
iniquity, which proves that their intentions all along were to destroy
the free and independent government of South Vietnam and to reduce its
people to Communist tyranny, thus further entrenching the principle that
“Communists cannot be trusted.”

This useful lesson, firmly established by media complicity in
transparent government deceit, has, not surprisingly, been applied in
subsequent efforts by the U.S. government to gain its ends by violence.
One dramatic example was featured in the media in August 1987, when the
Central American presidents confounded Washington strategy by adopting a
political settlement that undermined the familiar U.S. reliance on force
to compensate for its political weakness. As part of its immediate
efforts to sabotage this agreement, the State Department called the
Latin American ambassadors to Washington, where they were presented with
“a copy of the 1973 Paris peace agreement that was negotiated to end the
U.S. involvement in the Vietnam War,” the _Wall Street Journal_
reported, adding that “the agreement was subsequently ignored by North
Vietnam.” The _Journal_ explained that this unfortunate “Vietnam
experience,” which proved that agreements with Communists are not worth
the paper they are printed on, is one factor in administration
“skepticism” about the Central American agreement. Copies of the 1973
Paris Agreements were distributed to the envoys “as a case study of how
an agreement with ambiguous provisions could be exploited and even
ignored by a Communist government,” Neil Lewis reported in the lead
story in the _New York Times_, adding: “In violation of the 1973 accord,
North Vietnam overran South Vietnam and united the two parts of Vietnam
under its banner in 1975.”¹⁵¹ The utility of a carefully crafted
historical record, designed by the loyal media to serve the needs of
state power, is revealed here with much clarity.

Surveying these events, we reach essentially the same conclusions as
before, although once again the performance of the media—at the peak
period of their alleged “independence” and “adversarial stance”—goes
well beyond the predictions of the propaganda model, exceeding the
expected norm of obedience to the state authorities and reaching the
level that one finds in totalitarian states. As before, the servility of
the media made a significant contribution to ensuring that the slaughter
in Indochina would continue and that the U.S. government would be able
to exploit its “Vietnam experience,” as filtered through the media, for
later exercises in international terrorism. The remarkable performance
of the media also laid the basis for the postwar interpretation of “what
the war was all about” and why the United States failed to attain its
ends, a matter to which we turn in the next section.


5.6. THE VIETNAM WAR IN RETROSPECT

In April 1975, the war came to an end, and the thirty-year conflict
entered a new phase. Indochina faced the near-insoluble problems of
reconstruction in a land that had been reduced to ruin by foreign armies
after a century of colonial oppression. In the United States too, elite
groups faced a problem of reconstruction, but of a different kind. The
problem in the United States was the reconstruction of ideology, the
taming of the domestic population that had lost its faith in the
nobility of intent and the inspiring benevolence of the elites who
determine U.S. policy. It was necessary to overcome what Norman
Podhoretz, echoing Goebbels, calls “the sickly inhibitions against the
use of military force,” the dread “Vietnam syndrome,” finally cured by
the stirring triumph of U.S. arms in Grenada, so Podhoretz hoped.¹⁵²
This was part of a larger problem, the “crisis of democracy” perceived
by Western elites as the normally passive general population threatened
to participate in the political system, challenging established
privilege and power.¹⁵³ A further task was to prevent recovery in the
societies ravaged by the American assault, so that the partial victory
already achieved by their destruction could be sustained.

As we have seen, through the mid-sixties, the media loyally fulfilled
their function of service to state violence, and there was no
significant popular opposition to the U.S. attack on Indochina. True, in
1964, the population voted 2 to 1 in favor of the “peace candidate,” who
was assuring them that we want no wider war while laying the groundwork
for the rapid escalation planned for the postelection period, a
noteworthy illustration of the character of electoral politics in a
society lacking genuine opposition parties and a critical and
independent press. Nevertheless, the enthusiasm of the ideological
institutions for the rapid escalation of U.S. efforts to “defend South
Vietnam” from “internal aggression” helped keep the public in line as
the U.S. invading army rose to over half-a-million men on the ground and
appeared to be attaining some success in “grinding the enemy down by
sheer weight and mass,” although at “horrendous cost,” in the words of
pacification chief Robert (“Blowtorch”) Komer, later to become a
high-ranking official of the Human Rights Administration.¹⁵⁴

By 1967, the popular mood was shifting, and the public was beginning to
defy the hawk-dove consensus of elites for whom the issues were limited
to tactics and expedience, a matter of much government concern. Defense
Secretary McNamara warned the president, in secret, in May 1967 that
expansion of the American war might “polarize opinion to the extent that
‘doves’ in the US will get out of hand—massive refusals to serve, or to
fight, or to cooperate, or worse?”¹⁵⁵ At the time of the Tet offensive,
the Joint Chiefs of Staff were concerned with “our capacity to meet the
possibility of widespread civil disorder in the months ahead”; in
considering further troop deployments, they took care to ensure that
“sufficient forces are still available for civil disorder control,”
including “National Guard forces deployed under State or Federal
control” and U.S. Army troops. The Pentagon warned further that a
request for more troops might lead to “increased defiance of the draft
and growing unrest in the cities,” running the risk of “provoking a
domestic crisis of unprecedented proportions.” Earlier, the Pentagon
feared that escalation of the land war beyond South Vietnam might lead
to massive civil disobedience, particularly in view of opposition to the
war among young people, the underprivileged, women, and segments of the
intelligentsia. “The sight of thousands of peaceful demonstrators being
confronted by troops in battle gear” during “the massive anti-war
demonstration” and “massive march on the Pentagon” in October 1967 was
particularly disturbing, the _Pentagon Papers_ analyst observed.¹⁵⁶ The
gradual withdrawal of the increasingly demoralized U.S. military forces
led to a diminution of visible protest by the early 1970s, but the
“Vietnam syndrome” was never cured. As late as 1982, 72 percent of the
public (but far fewer “opinion makers” and, to judge by other evidence
cited earlier, virtually none of the “American intellectual elite”)
regarded the Vietnam War as “more than a mistake; it was fundamentally
wrong and immoral,” a disparity between the public and its “leaders”
that persists as of 1986.¹⁵⁷

The primary task facing the ideological institutions in the postwar
period was to convince the errant public that the war was “less a moral
crime than the thunderously stupid military blunder of throwing half a
million ground troops into an unwinnable war,” as the respected _New
York Times_ war correspondent Homer Bigart explained, while chastising
Gloria Emerson for her unwillingness to adopt this properly moderate
view.¹⁵⁸ The “purpose of the war” must be perceived as “preventing North
Vietnam from subjugating South Vietnam” (John Midgley), “the real enemy,
of course, [being] North Vietnam, supplied and sustained by the Soviet
Union and China” (Drew Middleton)¹⁵⁹—all in defiance of the plain facts.
The primary issue was the cost to the United States in its noble
endeavor; thus Robert Nisbet describes the “intellectual pleasure” he
derived from “a truly distinguished work of history” with a chapter
covering the 1960s, “with emphasis on the Vietnam War and its
devastating impact upon Americans,” obviously the only victims worthy of
concern.¹⁶⁰ To persuade elite opinion was never much of a problem, since
these were the reigning conceptions throughout, and clearly privilege,
along with media access, accrues to those who follow this path. But the
public has nevertheless remained corrupted.

An ancillary task has been to keep the devastation that the United
States left as its legacy in Indochina hidden from public view. Indeed,
one finds only scattered reference to this not entirely trivial matter
in the U.S. media—a remarkable achievement, given the agency of
destruction and its scale. Keeping just to Vietnam, the death toll may
have passed three million. In an article entitled “Studies Show Vietnam
Raids Failed,” Charles Mohr observes that the CIA estimated deaths from
bombing of the North at well over 30,000 a year by 1967, “heavily
weighted with civilians.”¹⁶¹ Crop-destruction programs from 1961 had a
devastating impact, including aerial destruction by chemicals, ground
operations to destroy orchards and dikes, and land clearing by giant
tractors (Rome plows) that “obliterated agricultural lands, often
including extensive systems of paddy dikes, and entire rural residential
areas and farming hamlets,” leaving the soil “bare, gray and lifeless,”
in the words of an official report cited by Arthur Westing, who compares
the operations to the “less efficient” destruction of Carthage during
the Punic Wars. “The combined ecological, economic, and social
consequences of the wartime defoliation operations have been vast and
will take several generations to reverse”; in the “empty landscapes” of
South Vietnam, recovery will be long delayed, if possible at all, and
there is no way to estimate the human effects of the chemical poison
dioxin at levels “300 to 400% greater than the average levels obtaining
among exposed groups in North America.”¹⁶²

In the South, 9,000 out of 15,000 hamlets were damaged or destroyed,
along with some twenty-five million acres of farmland and twelve million
acres of forest. One-and-a-half million cattle were killed, and the war
left a million widows and some 800,000 orphans. In the North, all six
industrial cities were damaged (three razed to the ground) along with
twenty-eight of thirty provincial towns (twelve completely destroyed),
ninety-six of 116 district towns, and 4,000 of some 5,800 communes. Four
hundred thousand cattle were killed and over a million acres of farmland
were damaged. Much of the land is a moonscape, where people live on the
edge of famine, with rice rations lower than those in Bangladesh.
Reviewing the environmental effects, the Swedish peace-research
institute SIPRI concludes that “the ecological debilitation from such
attack is likely to be of long duration.” The respected Swiss-based
environmental group IUCN (International Union for Conservation of Nature
and Natural Resources) concluded that the ecology is not only refusing
to heal but is worsening, so that a “catastrophe” may result unless
billions of dollars are spent to “reconstruct” the land that has been
destroyed, a “monumental” task that could be addressed only if the
United States were to offer substantial reparations, a possibility that
cannot be considered in a cultural climate of abysmal ignorance,
chauvinism, and the self-righteous pursuit of self-interest. Destruction
of forests has increased the frequency of floods and droughts and
aggravated the impact of typhoons, and war damage to dikes (some of
which, in the South, were completely destroyed by U.S. bombardment) and
other agricultural systems has yet to be repaired. The report notes that
“humanitarian and conservationist groups, particularly in the United
States, have encountered official resistance and red tape when
requesting their governments’ authorization to send assistance to
Vietnam”—naturally enough, since the United States remains committed to
ensure that its achievements are not threatened by recovery of the
countries it destroyed.¹⁶³

There is little hint of any of this, or of the similar Carthaginian
devastation in Laos and Cambodia, in mainstream U.S. media coverage.
Rather, with remarkable uniformity and self-righteousness, the problems
of reconstruction, hampered further by the natural catastrophes and
continuing war to which the United States has made what contribution it
can, are attributed solely to Communist brutality and ineptitude. The
sole remaining interest in postwar Vietnam in the U.S. media has been
the recovery of remains of U.S. personnel presumed to be killed in
action, the Vietnamese preoccupation with other matters serving as
further proof of their moral insensitivity.

In one of his sermons on human rights, President Carter explained that
we owe Vietnam no debt and have no responsibility to render it any
assistance because “the destruction was mutual,”¹⁶⁴ a statement that
elicited no comment, to our knowledge, apart from our own—a fact that
speaks volumes about the prevailing cultural climate. Some feel that
there may once have been a debt but that it has been amply repaid. Under
the headline “The Debt to the Indochinese Is Becoming a Fiscal Drain,”
Bernard Gwertzman quotes a State Department official who “said he
believed the United States has now paid its moral debt for its
involvement on the losing side in Indochina.” The remark, which also
passed without comment, is illuminating: we owe no debt for mass
slaughter and for leaving three countries in ruins, no debt to the
millions of maimed and orphaned, to the peasants who still die today
from exploding ordnance left from the U.S. assault. Rather, our moral
debt results only from the fact that we did not win. By this logic, if
the Russians win in Afghanistan, they will have no moral debt at all.
Proceeding further, how have we paid our moral debt for failing to win?
By resettling Vietnamese refugees fleeing the lands we ravaged, “one of
the largest, most dramatic humanitarian efforts in history” according to
Roger Winter, director of the U.S. Committee for Refugees. But “despite
the pride,” Gwertzman continues, “some voices in the Reagan
Administration and in Congress are once again asking whether the war
debt has now been paid.…”¹⁶⁵

The media are not satisfied with “mutual destruction” that effaces all
responsibility for some of the major war crimes of the modern era.
Rather, the perpetrator of the crimes must be seen as the injured party.
We find headlines reading: “Vietnam, Trying to Be Nicer, Still Has a
Long Way to Go.” “It’s about time the Vietnamese demonstrated some good
will,” said Charles Printz, of Human Rights Advocates International,
referring to negotiations about the Amerasian children who constitute a
tiny fraction of the victims of U.S. aggression in Indochina. Barbara
Crossette adds that the Vietnamese have also not been sufficiently
forthcoming on the matter of remains of American soldiers, although
their behavior may be improving: “There has been progress, albeit slow,
on the missing Americans.” The unresolved problem of the war is what
they did to us. Since we were simply defending ourselves from “internal
aggression” in Vietnam, it surely makes sense to consider ourselves the
victims of the Vietnamese.

In a derisive account of Vietnamese “laments” over the failure of the
United States to improve relations with them, Barbara Crossette reports
their “continuing exaggeration of Vietnam’s importance to Americans”
under the headline: “For Vietnamese, Realism Is in Short Supply.” The
Vietnamese do not comprehend their “irrelevance,” she explains with
proper imperial contempt. U.S. interest in Vietnam, she continues, is
limited to the natural American outrage over Hanoi’s invasion of
Cambodia (to overthrow our current ally Pol Pot), and its failure to be
sufficiently forthcoming “on the issue of American servicemen missing
since the end of the war.” She cites a Pentagon statement noting that
Vietnam “has agreed to return the remains of 20 more servicemen” and
expressing the hope that the Communists will proceed “to resolve this
long-standing humanitarian issue.” She quotes an “Asian official” as
saying that “We all know they have the bones somewhere.… If Hanoi’s
leaders are serious about building their country, the Vietnamese will
have to deal fairly with the United States.” When a Vietnamese official
suggested that the U.S. send food aid to regions where starving
villagers are being asked to spend their time and energy searching for
the remains of American pilots killed while destroying their country,
State Department spokeswoman Phyllis Oakley reacted with great anger:
“We are outraged at any suggestion of linking food assistance with the
return of remains,” she declaimed. So profound is the U.S. commitment to
humanitarian imperatives and moral values that it cannot permit these
lofty ideals to be tainted by associating them with such trivial
concerns and indecent requests.¹⁶⁶ It is difficult to know how to react
to a cultural climate in which such words can be spoken, evoking no
reaction.

According to standard state and media doctrine, South Vietnam (i.e., the
client regime that we established) lost the war to North Vietnam—the
official enemy, since the U.S. attack against the South cannot be
conceded. “North Vietnam, not the Vietcong, was always the enemy,” John
Corry proclaims in reporting the basic message of an NBC white paper on
the war,¹⁶⁷ a stance that is conventional in the mainstream. Corry is
indignant that anyone should question this higher truth. As proof of the
absurdity of such “liberal mythology,” he cites the battle of la Drang
Valley in November 1965:

It was clear then that North Vietnam was in the war. Nonetheless,
liberal mythology insisted that the war was being waged only by the
Vietcong, mostly righteous peasants.

Corry presents no example of liberals who described the Viet Cong as
“righteous peasants,” there being none, and no example of anyone who
denied that North Vietnamese troops had entered the South by November
1965, since, again, there were none. Furthermore, opponents of the war
at that time and for several years after included few representatives of
mainstream liberalism. Corry’s argument for North Vietnamese aggression,
however, is as impressive as any that have been presented.

The NBC white paper was one of a rash of retrospectives on the tenth
anniversary of the war’s end, devoted to “The War that Went Wrong, The
Lessons It Taught.”¹⁶⁸ These retrospective assessments provide
considerable insight into the prevailing intellectual culture. Their
most striking feature is what is missing: the American wars in
Indochina. It is a classic example of Hamlet without the Prince of
Denmark. Apart from a few scattered sentences, the rare allusions to the
war in these lengthy presentations—as in postwar commentary rather
generally, including cinema and literature as well as the media—are
devoted to the suffering of the American invaders. The _Wall Street
Journal_, for example, refers to “the $180 million in chemical
companies’ compensation to Agent Orange victims”—U.S. soldiers, not the
South Vietnamese victims whose suffering was and remains vastly
greater.¹⁶⁹ It is difficult to exaggerate the significance of these
startling facts.

There is an occasional glimpse of reality. _Time_ opens its inquiry by
recalling the trauma of the American soldiers, facing an enemy that

dissolved by day into the villages, into the other Vietnamese. They
maddened the Americans with the mystery of who they were—the unseen man
who shot from the tree line, or laid a wire across the trail with a
Claymore mine at the other end, the mama-san who did the wash, the child
concealing a grenade.

No doubt one could find similar complaints in the Nazi press about the
Balkans.

The meaning of these facts is almost never perceived. _Time_ goes so far
as to claim that the “subversion” was “orchestrated” by Moscow, so that
the United States had to send troops to “defend” South Vietnam, echoing
the fantasies concocted in scholarship—for example, by Walt Rostow, who
maintains that in his effort “to gain the balance of power in Eurasia,”
Stalin turned “to the East, to back Mao and to enflame the North Korean
and Indochinese Communists.”¹⁷⁰

Throughout the war, elite groups remained loyal to the cause, apart from
expressing qualms about the bombing of North Vietnam, which was regarded
as problematic since it might lead to a broader conflict, drawing in
China and the USSR, from which the United States might not be immune.
This was the “toughest” question, according to the McNamara memo cited
earlier, and the only serious question among “respectable” critics of
the war. The massacre of innocents is a problem only among emotional or
irresponsible types, or among the “aging adolescents on college
faculties who found it rejuvenating to play ‘revolution.’ ” ¹⁷¹ Decent
and respectable people remain silent and obedient, devoting themselves
to personal gain, concerned only that we too might ultimately face
unacceptable threat—a stance not without historical precedent. In
contrast to the war protestors, two commentators explain, “decent,
patriotic Americans demanded—and in the person of Ronald Reagan have
apparently achieved—a return to pride and patriotism, a reaffirmation of
the values and virtues that had been trampled upon by the
Vietnam-spawned counterculture”¹⁷²—most crucially, the virtues of
marching in parades chanting praises for their leaders as they conduct
their necessary chores, as in Indochina and El Salvador.

The extent of this servility is revealed throughout the
tenth-anniversary retrospectives, not only by the omission of the war
itself but also by the interpretation provided. The _New York Times_
writes sardonically of the “ignorance” of the American people, only 60
percent of whom are aware that the United States “sided with South
Vietnam”—as Nazi Germany sided with France, as the USSR now sides with
Afghanistan. Given that we were engaged in “a defense of freedom” in
South Vietnam (Charles Krauthammer), it must be that the critics of this
noble if flawed enterprise sided with Hanoi, and that is indeed what
standard doctrine maintains; the fact that opposition to American
aggression in South Vietnam, or even against the North, entails no such
support, just as opposition to Soviet aggression entails no support for
either the feudalist forces of the Afghan resistance or Pakistan or the
United States, is an elementary point that inevitably escapes the mind
of the well-indoctrinated intellectual. The _Times_ retrospective
alleges that North Vietnam was “portrayed by some American intellectuals
as the repository of moral rectitude.” No examples are given, nor is
evidence presented to support these charges, and the actual record is,
as always, scrupulously ignored. Critics of the peace movement are
quoted expounding on its “moral failure of terrifying proportions,” and
several “former peace activists who had leaped across the ideological
divide” and now “are taking their stand with conservative Christians” of
the Reaganite variety are quoted at length. But those who are allegedly
guilty of these “terrifying” crimes are given no opportunity to explain
the basis for their opposition to U.S. aggression and massacre. Nor are
they permitted to assign to their proper place in history those who
condemn the “moral failure” of opposing U.S. aggression or those who
praise themselves for their occasional twitters of protest when the cost
to us became too great. We read that the opponents of the war
“brandished moral principles and brushed aside complexity” but nothing
of what they had to say—as was the case throughout the war.¹⁷³ A current
pretense is that principled critics of the war had access to the
mainstream media during these years. In fact, they were almost entirely
excluded, and now we are regaled with accounts of their alleged crimes
but are almost never permitted to hear their actual words, exactly as
one would expect in a properly functioning system of indoctrination with
the task of preserving privilege and authority from critical analysis.

The _Times_ informs us that Vietnam “now stands exposed as the Prussia
of Southeast Asia,” because since 1975 they have “unleashed a series of
pitiless attacks against their neighbors,” referring to the Vietnamese
invasion that overthrew the Pol Pot regime (after two years of border
attacks from Cambodia), the regime that we now support despite pretenses
to the contrary. Although the _Times_ is outraged at the Prussian-style
aggression that overthrew our current Khmer Rouge ally, and at the
Vietnamese insistence that a political settlement must exclude Pol Pot,
the reader of its pages will find little factual material about any of
these matters. There are, incidentally, countries that have “unleashed a
series of pitiless attacks against their neighbors” in these years—for
example, Israel, with its invasions of Lebanon in 1978 and 1982—but as
an American client state, Israel inherits the right of aggression, so it
does not merit the bitter criticism Vietnam deserves for overthrowing
Pol Pot; and in any event, Israel’s invasion of Lebanon was a
“liberation,” as the _Times_ explained at the time, always carefully
excluding Lebanese opinion on the matter as obviously irrelevant.¹⁷⁴

The _Times_ recognizes that the United States did suffer “shame” during
its Indochina wars: “the shame of defeat.” Victory, we are to assume,
would not have been shameful, and the record of aggression and
atrocities generally supported by the _Times_ evokes no shame. Rather,
the United States thought it was “resisting” Communists “when it
intervened in Indochina”; how we “resist” the natives defending their
homes from our attack, the _Times_ does not explain.

That the United States lost the war in Indochina is “an inescapable
fact” (_Wall Street Journal_), repeated without question throughout the
retrospectives and in American commentary generally. The truth is more
complex, although to see why, it is necessary to escape the confines of
the propaganda system and to investigate the rich documentary record
that lays out the planning and motives for the American wars in
Indochina over thirty years. This record shows that a rather different
conclusion is in order, an important fact to understand.

The United States did not achieve its maximal goals in Indochina, but it
did gain a partial victory. Despite talk by Eisenhower and others about
Vietnamese raw materials, the primary U.S. concern was not Indochina but
rather the “domino effect,” the demonstration effect of independent
development that might cause “the rot to spread” to Thailand and beyond,
perhaps ultimately drawing Japan into a “New Order” from which the
United States would be excluded.¹⁷⁵ This threat was averted as the
United States proceeded to teach the lesson that a “ ‘war of
liberation’ … is costly, dangerous and doomed to failure” (Kennedy
adviser General Maxwell Taylor, testifying to Congress).¹⁷⁶ The
countries of Indochina will be lucky to survive; they will not endanger
global order by social and economic success in a framework that denies
the West the freedom to exploit, infecting regions beyond, as had been
feared. It might parenthetically be noted that although this
interpretation of the American aggression is supported by substantial
evidence,¹⁷⁷ there is no hint of its existence in the popular histories
or the retrospectives, for such ideas do not conform to the required
image of aggrieved benevolence. Again, we see here the operation of the
Orwellian principle that ignorance is strength.

While proceeding to extirpate the “rot” of successful independent
development in Indochina, the United States moved forcefully to buttress
the second line of defense. In 1965, the United States backed a military
coup in Indonesia (the most important “domino,” short of Japan), while
American liberals and Freedom House lauded the “dramatic changes” that
took place there—the most dramatic being the massacre of hundreds of
thousands of landless peasants and the destruction of the only
mass-based political party—as a proof that we were right to defend South
Vietnam by demolishing it, thus encouraging the Indonesian generals to
prevent any rot from spreading there. In 1972, the United States backed
the overthrow of Philippine democracy, thus averting the threat of
national capitalism there with a terror-and-torture state on the
preferred Latin American model. A move toward democracy in Thailand in
1973 evoked some concern, prompting a reduction in economic aid and
increase in military aid in preparation for the military coup that took
place with U.S. support in 1976. Thailand has had a particularly
important role in the U.S. regional system since 1954, when the National
Security Council laid out a plan for subversion and eventual aggression
throughout Southeast Asia, in response to the Geneva Accords, with
Thailand serving as its “focal point” and, subsequently, as a major base
for the U.S. attacks on Vietnam and Laos.¹⁷⁸ In his personal _Times_
retrospective, _Pentagon Papers_ director Leslie Gelb observes that ten
years after the war ended, “the position of the United States in Asia is
stronger” than at any time since World War II, despite “the defeat of
South Vietnam,” quoting “policy analysts” from government and
scholarship who observe that “Thailand and Indonesia … were able to get
themselves together politically, economically and militarily to beat
down Communist insurgencies,” in the manner just indicated, as were the
Philippines and South Korea, also graced with a U.S.-backed military
coup in 1972.¹⁷⁹ The business press had drawn the same conclusions years
earlier, during the latter stages of the war.¹⁸⁰

In short, the United States won a regional victory, and even a
substantial local victory in Indochina, left in ruins. The U.S. victory
was particularly significant within South Vietnam, where the
peasant-based revolutionary forces were decimated and the rural society
was demolished. “One hard-core revolutionary district just outside
Saigon, Cu Chi,” Paul Quinn-Judge observes, “sent 16,000 men and women
to fight for the National Liberation Front. Some 9,900 did not return.”
Much the same was true throughout the South. “The deaths left a major
political gap for the new regime,” he adds. “The south was stripped of
the trained, disciplined and presumably committed young cadres who would
have formed the backbone of the present administration. In many areas
the losses were near complete.… And the casualties put further strains
on the state’s limited financial and organisation capacities.”¹⁸¹ The
U.S. victory over the overwhelmingly rural society of South Vietnam,
always the primary enemy, laid the basis for the take-over by North
Vietnam (as anticipated years earlier in the much-derided peace-movement
literature),¹⁸² allowing American hypocrites to “prove” that this
predictable consequence of the war they supported shows that it was a
just “defense of South Vietnam” against northern aggressors. In the
cities, swollen with millions of refugees, the lucky and the more
corrupt survived on an American dole at a level that had no relation to
the now-demolished productive capacity of the country, leaving another
near-insoluble problem that can conveniently be blamed on the
Communists. The revolutionary forces had gained victory in many rural
areas by the time of the outright U.S. invasion, largely through their
appeal to the peasantry, as documented in the more serious scholarly
work from sources in or close to the U.S. government (“The Early
Stages,” p. 186). But “many of the conclusions [of this work] have been
invalidated by the events after Tet,” _New York Times_ Asia
correspondent Fox Butterfield observes, a coy reference to the fact that
this political success was overturned by the U.S. outburst of savagery
in the post-Tet mass murder operations.¹⁸³

That the United States suffered a “defeat” in Indochina is a natural
perception on the part of those of limitless ambition, who understand
“defeat” to mean the achievement only of major goals, while certain
minor ones remain beyond our grasp. The perception of an unqualified
U.S. “defeat” in the media retrospectives and similar commentary is
understandable in part in these terms, in part in terms of the alleged
goal of “defending freedom” developed in official propaganda and relayed
by the ideological institutions.

Postwar U.S. policy has been designed to ensure that the victory is
maintained by maximizing suffering and oppression in Indochina, which
then evokes further gloating here. Since “the destruction is mutual,” as
is readily demonstrated by a stroll through New York, Boston, Vinh,
Quang Ngai Province, and the Plain of Jars, we are entitled to deny
reparations, aid, and trade, and to block development funds. The extent
of U.S. sadism is noteworthy, as is the (null) reaction to it. In 1977,
when India tried to send a hundred buffalo to Vietnam to replenish the
herds destroyed by U.S. violence, the United States threatened to cancel
“food-for-peace” aid, while the press featured photographs of peasants
in Cambodia pulling plows as proof of Communist barbarity; the
photographs in this case were probable fabrications of Thai
intelligence, but authentic ones could, no doubt, have been obtained
throughout Indochina. The Carter administration even denied rice to Laos
(despite a cynical pretense to the contrary), where the agricultural
system was destroyed by U.S. terror bombing. Oxfam America was not
permitted to send ten solar pumps to Cambodia for irrigation in 1983; in
1981, the U.S. government sought to block a shipment of school supplies
and educational kits to Cambodia by the Mennonite Church.¹⁸⁴

A tiny report in the _Christian Science Monitor_ observes that the
United States is blocking international shipments of food to Vietnam
during a postwar famine, using the food weapon “to punish Vietnam for
its occupation of Cambodia,” according to diplomatic sources. Two days
later, _Times_ correspondent Henry Kamm concluded his tour of duty as
chief Asian diplomatic correspondent with a long article in which he
comments “sadly” on the “considerably reduced quality of life” in
Indochina, where in Vietnam “even working animals are rare,” for
unexplained reasons, in contrast to “the continuing rise, however uneven
in many aspects, of the standard of living” elsewhere in the region. In
thirty-five paragraphs, he manages to produce not one word on the
effects of the U.S. war or the postwar policy of “bleeding Vietnam,” as
the _Far Eastern Economic Review_ accurately terms it.¹⁸⁵

The major television retrospective on the war was the award-winning
thirteen-part PBS “Television History” of 1983, produced with the
cooperation of British and French television, followed by a “Vietnam
Op/Ed” in 1985 that included the Accuracy in Media critique and
discussion of the two documentaries by a group tilted heavily toward the
hawks.¹⁸⁶ The controversy had well-defined bounds. At one extreme, there
were those who defended the PBS series as fair and accurate; at the
other, critics who claimed that it presented “a war of the good
nationalists, represented by Ho Chi Minh, versus the evil imperialist
Americans who are trying to quash, sit on, the legitimate aspirations of
the South Vietnamese people” (AIM chairman Reed Irvine). The moderator,
“the man in the middle,” concluded the discussion by stressing the
importance of allowing “conflicting views about the Vietnam war to be
presented at a time when the nation as a whole is finally allowing
itself a close look at the only war we have ever lost.” We will not
review the AIM critique¹⁸⁷ or the “debate,” which reiterates many of the
charges we have already discussed (for example, Irvine’s sole example of
how “the enemy was able to use our free, uncontrolled media to achieve
their own objectives,” namely, via the media’s portrayal of the Tet
offensive “as a defeat for our side, even though it was actually a very
outstanding military victory”). More to the point here are the contents
of the PBS series itself, and the fact that it sets the bounds on
critical analysis of the “failed crusade” undertaken for motives that
were “noble,” although “illusory,” as the PBS companion volume describes
the U.S. effort “to defend South Vietnam’s independence.”¹⁸⁸

With regard to the American war, the PBS series makes a conscious effort
to be balanced, to present all sides, to take no side. The French, in
contrast, are treated far more harshly, as brutal colonialists, with no
pretense of balance. Peter Biskind comments:

Whereas the narrator referred to Ho Chi Minh and his followers as
“rebels,” “nationalists,” or “the Vietnamese resistance,” as long as
they were fighting the French, once the Americans arrive they are
invariably “Communists” or just “the enemy.” Whereas Bao Dai is the
“playboy emperor picked by the French,” Nguyen Cao Ky and Nguyen Van
Thieu are simply the “government.” Whereas French troops just released
from Japanese prison camps go “on a rampage, arresting and attacking
Vietnamese,” American troops engage in the was-it-or-wasn’t-it massacre
at Thuy Bo.

The effort to maintain balance is illustrated, for example, in the
narrator’s concluding words to episode 4, covering Johnson’s escalation
of the war in 1964–65 and the first appearance of North Vietnamese units
in the South in mid-1965. After presenting Lyndon Johnson and other U.S.
government spokesmen, the narrator states:

Johnson called it invasion. Hanoi called it liberation. In the fall of
1965, three North Vietnamese regiments massed in the Central Highlands.
Nearly two years had passed since Johnson renewed the U.S. commitment to
defend South Vietnam. Nearly two years had passed since Ho Chi Minh
renewed his commitment to liberate the South. Now their two armies
braced for battle.… For the first time, in the Battle of the la Drang
Valley, Americans fought the North Vietnamese—face to face. For the
first time, B-52S supported troops in the field. And for the first time,
to Americans, Vietnam meant a major new war.

Here we have “balance,” but of a special kind. One may believe, with
Johnson, that North Vietnam is invading the South, or, with Ho, that
North Vietnam is fighting to liberate the South. We may not believe,
however, that the United States is invading South Vietnam, which, we
learn two episodes later, it had been bombing since 1961. Rather, we
must assume, as a given fact not subject to debate, that the U.S.
commitment was “to defend South Vietnam.”

To evaluate this effort at “balance,” we may observe that during the
preceding summer (1965), five months after the United States began the
regular bombing of North Vietnam, the Pentagon estimated that the 60,000
U.S. troops then deployed faced an enemy combat force of 48,500, 97
percent of them South Vietnamese guerrillas (“Viet Cong”). A few months
after the la Drang Valley battle, in March 1966, the Pentagon reported
13,100 North Vietnamese forces in the South, along with 225,000 Viet
Cong, facing 216,400 U.S. troops and 23,000 third-country troops (mostly
South Korean), in addition to 690,000 ARVN troops.¹⁸⁹ Considering these
facts, and the earlier history, it would seem possible to imagine a
point of view that departs from the framework established here, one that
is, furthermore, plainly accurate: the United States was stepping up its
attack against South Vietnam. But that goes beyond “balance,” which is
construed similarly throughout, thus consigning the series to the
familiar system of state propaganda on the most crucial and essential
point. A position critical of foreign aggression (that is, the U.S.
aggression that was plainly the central element of the war) is excluded
as unthinkable, although it may be conceded that “To the Communists in
Hanoi, America’s presence in the South was yet another act of foreign
aggression” (episode 4). The NLF in the South is granted no opinion on
the matter, and the episode ends with a ringing declaration by LBJ.¹⁹⁰

It is not that the facts are entirely hidden. Thus episode 5 (“America
Takes Charge”) opens with a description by a GI of how “the ARVN and the
VC are the same people, the same race, the same culture, and yet one
side seems to be chicken and the other side seems to fight in the face
of overwhelming disadvantages” in what is clearly “their country.” A
U.S. major discusses the problem in Binh Dinh Province, which “had never
been really in friendly hands” _since 1946_ but rather “under VC
control” throughout, compelling the United States to resort to “awesome
fire power” that turns heavy jungle into a “moonscape.” But the plain
truth that such facts entail cannot be expressed, or perceived.

Balance is also preserved in an “account from both sides” of what
happened in the village of Thuy Bo, in January 1967, where British
producer Martin Smith had been shown the site of what villagers claimed
to be a My Lai-style massacre, one of many they alleged, with a hundred
women and children killed. Fox Butterfield reports that in contrast to
the “balanced” picture actually presented by PBS, the British
participants in the series argued that “the Marine attack on [Thuy Bo]
should be labeled a war crime.” This failure to maintain “balance” was
in keeping with what a filmmaker involved in the project termed their
“more moralistic stance, anxious to accentuate the aspects of the war
that were immoral at the expense of looking at it afresh,” which would
apparently exclude the “more moralistic stance.”¹⁹¹ In this episode, the
marines tell their story of an assault on a VC-defended village and then
the villagers (given thirty-five lines of the transcript, to ninety for
the marines) tell their conflicting version of a marine massacre of
wounded and captured civilians. The sequence ends with a marine
describing what took place as a “normal procedure,” with “burning them
hootches down and digging them Vietnamese people out of holes [with
grenades and rifle fire] and scattering animals, pigs and chickens
around like we normally do,” especially after three days in the field
under brutal conditions.

The account continues in the same vein. We hear that “American aircraft
dropped six times more bombs on South Vietnam than on the Communist
North,” and that “most of the enemy troops were native southerners”
(episode 8). But no conclusion is suggested, except that the purpose of
the U.S. bombing of Vietnam, distributed in this curious manner and at
“twice the tonnage dropped on Germany and Japan in World War II,” was to
try “to stop North Vietnam from sending soldiers and supplies to the
South.” Nevertheless, 140,000 made it through 1967 according to the U.S.
government (episode 7), about half the number of South Korean
mercenaries and a small fraction of the Americans who were destroying
South Vietnam.

The Phoenix program of political assassination is justified at length by
its director, William Colby, who denies that it was what it was, and,
for balance, some comments are added by critics in the military and by a
civilian aide worker, describing apparent random killing and torture.
The post-Tet military operations are passed over in total silence. After
Nixon’s election in 1968, when these wholesale U.S. massacres began in
full force, “the war continued,” we learn: “The weapons were Vietcong
rockets, the victims were Danang civilians” killed by the Viet Cong and
North Vietnamese.

After the breakdown of negotiations in October 1972, “The North was
again intransigent,” we learn—namely, in demanding that the agreements
be signed, a fact ignored; and “In South Vietnam, too, the agreement was
still unacceptable,” the familiar evasion of U.S. responsibility (see
“The Paris Peace Agreements, this page). The terms of the January 1973
agreement are given, but with no indication that the U.S. government
announced at once its intent to disregard them, as it did. Rather, we
hear that “to the North Vietnamese and Vietcong, the struggle had not
ended,” because “Vietnam was still divided.” The facts are quite
different, as we have seen. They are indeed more accurately stated,
although briefly, two episodes later (episode 12), although the U.S.
role is suppressed except by implication: “America was still committed
to South Vietnam,” the narrator says, without noting that this
commitment to the GVN, identified with South Vietnam by the U.S.
government and by PBS, is in explicit violation of the agreements signed
in Paris.

“Whatever their views of the war,” the narrator adds, “most Americans
now believed that the cost had been too great,” particularly the cost of
American lives; “They believed that no more Americans should die for
Vietnam.” The only other Americans are those who thought it proper that
“more Americans should die for Vietnam.” Americans were dying for
Vietnam in the same sense in which Russian boys are dying for
Afghanistan, but those who could perceive this fact, and who opposed the
war not merely because the cost was too great but because aggression is
wrong, are excluded from the category of Americans.

As in the media retrospectives, the antiwar movement is given short
shrift. A few activists are quoted, but permitted to discuss only
questions of tactics. Even Eugene McCarthy, plainly the favored antiwar
figure in this presentation, says nothing except that “I think the case
is rather clear about what’s wrong about our involvement”—which is fair
enough, since the media’s favorite dove had never been a serious critic
of the war and was to disappear quickly from the scene after failing to
gain political power, thus demonstrating again where his commitments
lay. James Fallows is permitted to describe “the spirit of the times”:
“to look for the painless way out, namely, a physical deferment.” In the
real world, this was a position that hardly defined “the spirit of the
times,” although it is a facet of this “spirit” that is far more
acceptable to mainstream opinion than the principled and courageous
resistance of many thousands of young people, an intolerable phenomenon
and therefore erased from the record. As Peter Biskind observes, for all
the attempt at “balance,” and “despite the preference of [the PBS
series] for doves over hawks, it is the right, not the left, that has
set this film’s political agenda,” in conformity to elite opinion.

Biskind concludes his review of the PBS series by stating: “The truth is
that the war was a crime, not a tragedy. The tragedy is that this film
lacks the conviction to say so.” The same may be said about the
retrospective commentary generally. The war was a “tragic error,” but
not “fundamentally wrong and immoral” (as the overwhelming majority of
the American people continue to believe), and surely not criminal
aggression—the judgment that would be reached at once on similar
evidence if the responsible agent were not the United States, or an ally
or client.

Our point is not that the retrospectives fail to draw what seem to us,
as to much of the population, the obvious conclusions; the more
significant and instructive point is that principled objection to the
war as “fundamentally wrong and immoral,” or as outright criminal
aggression—a war crime—is _inexpressible_. It is not part of the
spectrum of discussion. The background for such a principled critique
cannot be developed in the media, and the conclusions cannot be drawn.
It is not present even to be refuted. Rather, the idea is unthinkable.

All of this again reveals with great clarity how foreign to the
mobilized media is a conception of the media as a free system of
information and discussion, independent of state authority and elite
interests.



[]  _6_ THE INDOCHINA WARS (II): LAOS AND CAMBODIA



[]


THE GENEVA ACCORDS OF 1954 PROVIDED FOR A POLITICAL SETTLEMENT in Laos
and Cambodia. Both countries, however, were drawn into the U.S. attack
on Indochina, with devastating consequences. In both cases, the media
made a noteworthy contribution to this outcome.


6.1. LAOS

In Laos, as in Vietnam, the United States undertook to prevent a
political settlement, as described frankly in congressional hearings by
Ambassador Graham Parsons, who stated that “I struggled for 16 months to
prevent a coalition.” A U.S. military mission was established under
civilian cover in violation of the Geneva Accords, headed by a general
in civilian guise, and U.S. aid flowed in an effort to establish U.S.
control. A measure of its scale and purposes is given by the fact that
Laos was “the only country in the world where the United States supports
the military budget 100 percent.”¹

Nevertheless, a coalition government was established in 1958 after the
only elections worthy of the name in the history of Laos. Despite
extensive U.S. efforts, they were won handily by the left. Nine of the
thirteen candidates of the Pathet Lao guerrillas won seats in the
national assembly, along with four candidates of the left-leaning
neutralists (“fellow travelers,” as they were called by Ambassador
Parsons). Thus “Communists or fellow travelers” won thirteen of the
twenty-one seats contested. The largest vote went to the leader of the
Pathet Lao, Prince Souphanouvong, who was elected chairman of the
national assembly.

U.S. pressures—including, crucially, the withdrawal of aid—quickly led
to the overthrow of the government in a coup by a “pro-Western
neutralist” who pledged his allegiance to “the free world” and declared
his intention to disband the political party of the Pathet Lao (Neo Lao
Hak Sat, or NLHS), scrapping the agreements that had successfully
established the coalition. He was overthrown in turn by the CIA
favorite, the ultra-right-wing General Phoumi Nosavan. After U.S.
clients won the 1960 elections, rigged so crudely that even the most
pro-U.S. observers were appalled, civil war broke out, with the USSR and
China backing a coalition extending over virtually the entire political
spectrum apart from the extreme right, which was backed by the United
States. The U.S. government assessment was that “By the spring of 1961
the NLHS appeared to be in a position to take over the entire country,”
primarily because of its control of the countryside, where it had
“diligently built up an organization covering most of the country’s ten
thousand villages,” as noted ruefully by the bitterly anti-Communist
Australian journalist Denis Warner.² The problem was the familiar one:
the United States and its clients were militarily strong but politically
weak.

Recognizing that its policies were in a shambles, the United States
agreed to take part in a new Geneva conference, which proposed a new
settlement in 1962. This too quickly broke down, and the civil war
resumed with a different line-up and with increasing intervention by the
United States and its allies, and by North Vietnam, in the context of
the expanding war in Vietnam. U.S. clandestine military operations began
in 1961, and the regular U.S. bombing began in early 1964: Operation
Barrel Roll, directed against northern Laos, was initiated in December
1964, several months before the regular bombing of North Vietnam. The
bombing of northern Laos was intensified in 1966, reaching extraordinary
levels from 1968 with the “bombing halt” in North Vietnam—in reality, a
bombing redistribution, the planes being shifted to the destruction of
Laos.³

Media coverage of Laos during the earlier period was sometimes
extensive—over three times as great as of Vietnam in the _New York
Times_ in 1961, the _Pentagon Papers_ analyst observes. But its contents
were often absurd. For example, the aid cut-off that was the essential
factor in the U.S. subversion of the elected government of Laos in 1958
“was never even reported in the national press,” which barely mentioned
the events, and then with misleading commentary reflecting Washington
deceit.⁴ Bernard Fall gave a detailed and derisive exposure of some of
the more ludicrous incidents, including inflammatory fabrications that
helped create major crises and led to deeper U.S. involvement in
Thailand and Indochina. Joseph Alsop’s fevered reports of largely
invented Communist military actions were particularly noteworthy.⁵

As the Vietnam War escalated, Laos became “only the wart on the hog of
Vietnam,” as Dean Rusk put it, a “sideshow war,” in Walter Haney’s
phrase, as Cambodia was to be later on. Media coverage declined as the
“sideshow war” escalated. There were, in fact, three distinct U.S. wars:
the bombing of the Ho Chi Minh trail in the South; the bombing of the
peasant society of northern Laos, which the U.S. government conceded was
unrelated to the war in South Vietnam; and the “clandestine war” between
a CIA-run mercenary force based on mountain tribesmen and the Pathet
Lao, backed by North Vietnam apparently at about the level of the Thai
and other mercenaries introduced by the United States. The bombing of
southern Laos was reported; the clandestine war and the bombing of
northern Laos were not, apart from tales about North Vietnamese
aggression, often fanciful and subjected to no critical analysis.⁶

In July 1968, the Southeast Asia correspondent of _Le Monde_, Jacques
Decornoy, published lengthy eyewitness reports of the bombing of
northern Laos, which had become “… a world without noise, for the
surrounding villages have disappeared, the inhabitants themselves living
hidden in the mountains … it is dangerous to lean out at any time of the
night or day” because of the ceaseless bombardment that leads to “the
scientific destruction of the areas held by the enemy.” He describes
“the motionless ruins and deserted houses” of the capital of Sam Neua
district, first bombed by the U.S. Air Force in February 1965. Much of
this “population center” had been “razed to the ground” by bombing, and
as he arrived he observed the smoking ruins from recent raids with
phosphorus bombs, the “enormous craters” everywhere in the town, the
churches and houses “demolished,” the remnants of U.S. fragmentation
bombs dropped to maximize civilian casualties. From this town to a
distance of thirty kilometers, “no house in the villages and hamlets had
been spared. Bridges had been destroyed, fields up to the rivers were
holed with bomb craters.”⁷ After Decornoy’s reports, there could be no
doubt that the U.S. Air Force was directing murderous attacks against
the civilian society of northern Laos. These reports of terrible
destruction were repeatedly brought to the attention of the media, but
ignored or, more accurately, suppressed. Later described as “secret
bombings” in an “executive war,” the U.S. attack was indeed “secret,”
not simply because of government duplicity as charged but because of
press complicity.

Not only did the media fail to publish the information about the attack
against a defenseless civilian society or seek to investigate further
for themselves, but they proceeded to provide exculpatory accounts that
they knew to be inaccurate, on the rare occasions when the bombing was
mentioned at all. As the bombing of Laos began to be reported in 1969,
the claim was that it was targeted against North Vietnamese infiltration
routes to South Vietnam (the “Ho Chi Minh trail”), and, later, that U.S.
planes were providing tactical support to government forces fighting
North Vietnamese aggressors, a far cry from what Decornoy had witnessed
and reported, and a much more tolerable version of the unacceptable
facts.⁸

Keeping just to the _New York Times_, through 1968 there was no mention
of the bombing apart from tiny items reporting Pathet Lao complaints
(Dec. 22, 31, 1968). On May 18, 1969, the _Times_ reported U.S. bombing
in Laos, alleging that it was “directed against routes, including the
so-called Ho Chi Minh Trail, over which the North Vietnamese send men
and supplies to infiltrate South Vietnam.” A June 14 report states that
“American planes bomb targets all over Laos, especially along the Ho Chi
Minh Trail in an effort to harass the Pathet Lao, the Communist-led
rebel movement in Laos, and to stop the flow of enemy supplies to South
Vietnam.” Charles Mohr reported on July 16 that U.S. bombing “is
directed against infiltration routes from North Vietnam that pass
through Laos en route to the South.” There is a July 28 reference to
“200 American bombing sorties a day over northeastern Laos,” directed
against North Vietnamese forces, and Hedrick Smith adds from Washington
on August 2 that the United States “has been bombing North Vietnamese
concentrations” in Laos. T. D. Allman reported bombing sorties “in
tactical support” of government forces fighting the North Vietnamese and
“harassing attacks against Communist positions all over northeast Laos”
on August 25, the latter providing the first glimpse of something beyond
the approved version. Further reports of U.S. air power in tactical
support and “to cut North Vietnamese supply routes” appear on September
7, followed by Allman’s report of successes of a government offensive
with forces “stiffened by Thai soldiers,” supported by “the most intense
American bombing ever seen in Laos” (Sept. 18). Then followed reports
from Washington and Vientiane (Sept. 19, 20, 23, 24, 30) confirming that
the U.S. Air Force was providing tactical support for government combat
missions in addition to bombing North Vietnamese infiltration routes,
including a September 23 Agence-France-Presse dispatch reporting
“bombing of Pathet Lao areas by United States aircraft,” thus implying
that the bombing went well beyond infiltration routes and combat
operations, common knowledge in Paris and Vientiane but yet to be
reported here.

In short, the terror bombing of northern Laos, although known, remained
off the agenda, and reporting in general was slight and highly
misleading, to say the least. Elterman observes that the war in Laos and
Cambodia was virtually “invisible” in the media through 1969, apart from
the leftist _National Guardian_, which gave substantial coverage to what
was in fact happening.⁹

On October 1, 1969, the _New York Times_ finally ran an account by T. D.
Allman, whose valuable reporting throughout the war appeared primarily
overseas, concluding that “the rebel economy and social fabric” were
“the main United States targets now,” and that the American bombardment
had driven the population to caves and tunnels during the daylight
hours, making it difficult for the Pathet Lao “to fight a ‘people’s war’
with fewer and fewer people.” Control of territory was now of lesser
importance, he wrote, “with United States bombers able to destroy,
almost at will, any given town, bridge, road or concentration of enemy
soldiers or civilians.”¹⁰

This confirmation of what had long been known in restricted
peace-movement circles, and consciously suppressed in the mainstream
press, passed without particular notice. The CIA clandestine army had
swept through the Plain of Jars in the preceding months, evacuating all
remaining civilians to areas near Vientiane, where they and their
harrowing stories were largely ignored by the well-represented media,
although available elsewhere.¹¹

Walter Haney, a Lao-speaking American who compiled a detailed collection
of refugee interviews that was described as “serious and carefully
prepared” by U.S. Ambassador to Laos William Sullivan, quotes remarks by
a UN official in Laos as “the most concise account of the bombing”:

By 1968 the intensity of the bombings was such that no organized life
was possible in the villages. The villages moved to the outskirts and
then deeper and deeper into the forest as the bombing reached its peak
in 1969 when jet planes came daily and destroyed all stationary
structures. Nothing was left standing. The villagers lived in trenches
and holes or in caves. They only farmed at night. [Each] of the
informants, without any exception, had his village completely destroyed.
In the last phase, bombings were aimed at the systematic destruction of
the [material] basis of the civilian society.¹²

A staff study by a Kennedy subcommittee concluded that a main purpose of
the U.S. bombardment was “to destroy the physical and social
infrastructure” in areas held by the Pathet Lao, a conclusion well
supported by the factual record.¹³

There were also eyewitness reports of the destruction of northern Laos
by Western reporters, but published overseas. T. D. Allman flew over the
Plain of Jars in late 1971, reporting that “it is empty and ravaged” by
the napalm and B-52 saturation bombing being “used in an attempt to
extinguish all human life in the target area”; “All vegetation has been
destroyed and the craters, literally, are countless” and often
impossible to distinguish among the “endless patches of churned earth,
repeatedly bombed.” At the same time, the _Washington Post_ published
the statement of Air Force Secretary Robert Seamans, who reported from
northern Laos that “I have seen no evidence of indiscriminate bombing”;
it is the North Vietnamese who are “rough,” and the people are not
“against the United States—just the opposite.” The Lao-speaking
Australian reporter John Everingham traveled in 1970 “through dying
village after dying village” of the Hmong tribesmen who had been “naive
enough to trust the CIA” and were now being offered “a one-way ‘copter
ride to death’ ” in the CIA clandestine army, in the remains of a
country where bombing had “turned more than half the total area of Laos
to a land of charred ruins where people fear the sky” so that “nothing
be left standing or alive for the communists to inherit.” No U.S.
journal, apart from the tiny pacifist press, was interested enough to
run his story, although later the media were to bewail the plight of the
miserable remnants of the Hmong, put on display as “victims of
Communism.” In 1970, the _Bangkok World_ (Oct. 7) published an AP report
on U.S. bombing that was “wiping out” towns, and by 1972 such reports
sometimes appeared in the U.S. press.¹⁴ Later, Nayan Chanda visited the
Plain of Jars, reporting overseas that from the air it “resembles a
lunar landscape, pockmarked as it is with bomb craters that are a stark
testimony to the years of war that denuded the area of people and
buildings” during “six years of ‘secret’ bombing” by U.S. aircraft,
while “at ground level, the signs of death and destruction are even more
ubiquitous,” including the provincial capital, “completely razed,” as
had been reported earlier by refugees who were ignored. Following the
practice of American volunteers during the war, American relief workers
with long experience in Laos attempted to bring information about
postwar Laos to the media—with little effect—and inform us privately
that their accounts were seriously distorted by _New York Times_
reporters “by the device of omission and taking the negative side of
balanced statements we made” and similar means.¹⁵

The U.S. government officially denied all of this, continuing the
deception even after the facts were exposed and known in some detail to
those concerned enough to learn them. Many regarded the U.S. war in Laos
as “a success” (Senators Jacob Javits and Stuart Symington), or even “_A
spectacular success_” (a former CIA officer in Laos, Thomas McCoy).¹⁶

In scale and care, the extensive analysis of refugee reports by a few
young American volunteers in Laos compares very favorably to the
subsequent studies of refugees from Cambodia that received massive
publicity in the West after the Khmer Rouge takeover, and the story was
both gruesome and highly pertinent to ongoing U.S. operations. But there
was little interest, and published materials, which appeared primarily
outside of the mainstream, were virtually ignored and quickly forgotten;
the agency of terror was inappropriate for the needs of the doctrinal
system. Media failure to report the facts when they were readily
available, in 1968, and to investigate further when they were
undeniable, by late 1969, contributed to the successful deception of the
public, and to the continuing destruction.

When the war ended, ABC News commentator Harry Reasoner expressed his
hope that Laos and its “gentle folk” could return to peaceful ways after
“the clowning of the CIA and the vicious invasion of the North
Vietnamese.”¹⁷ The “clowning of the CIA” included the destruction of
“the rebel economy and social fabric” in northern Laos, with unknown
numbers killed in areas that may never recover, and the decimation of
the Hmong who were enlisted in the CIA cause and then abandoned when no
longer useful. Nothing remotely comparable may be attributed to “the
vicious invasion of the North Vietnamese”—which did, however, include
such atrocities as killing twelve U.S. Air Force men in March 1968 at a
U.S. radar base near the North Vietnamese border used to direct the
bombing of North Vietnam and operations in North Vietnam by U.S.-led
mercenaries.¹⁸

The _New York Times_ reviewed the war in Laos at the war’s end,
concluding that 350,000 people had been killed, over a tenth of the
population, with another tenth uprooted in this “fratricidal strife that
was increased to tragic proportions by warring outsiders.” The
“fratricidal strife” might well have been terminated by the 1958
coalition government had it not been for “outsiders,” with the United
States playing a decisive role throughout, a role completely ignored in
this purported historical analysis apart from a few misleading comments.
At this late date, the _Times_ continued to pretend that the U.S.
bombing was directed against North Vietnamese supply trails—nothing else
is mentioned. The crucial events of the actual history also disappear,
or are grossly misrepresented. Subsequent reporting also regularly
obliterated the U.S. role in creating the devastation and postwar
“problems” attributed to the Communists alone, a shameful evasion in the
light of the undisputed historical facts.¹⁹

Once again, the media record, less than glorious, is well explained
throughout by the propaganda model.


6.2. CAMBODIA

6.2.1. “The decade of the genocide”

Few countries have suffered more bitterly than did Cambodia during the
1970s. The “decade of the genocide,” as the period is termed by the
Finnish Inquiry Commission that attempted to assess what had taken
place,²⁰ consisted of three phases—now extending the time scale to the
present, which bears a heavy imprint of these terrible years:

Phase I: From 1969 through April 1975, U.S. bombing at a historically
unprecedented level and a civil war sustained by the United States left
the country in utter ruins. Though Congress legislated an end to the
bombing in August 1973, U.S. government participation in the ongoing
slaughter continued until the Khmer Rouge victory in April 1975.²¹

Phase II: From April 1975 through 1978 Cambodia was subjected to the
murderous rule of the Khmer Rouge (Democratic Kampuchea, DK), overthrown
by the Vietnamese invasion of Cambodia in December 1978.

Phase III: Vietnam installed the Heng Samrin regime in power in
Cambodia, but the Democratic Kampuchea (DK) coalition, based primarily
on the Khmer Rouge, maintained international recognition apart from the
Soviet bloc. Reconstructed with the aid of China and the United States
on the Thai-Cambodia border and in Thai bases, the Khmer Rouge
guerrillas, the only effective DK military force, continue to carry out
activities in Cambodia of a sort called “terrorist” when a friendly
government is the target.

We turn now to the travail of Cambodia during these grim years, and the
way it has been depicted, first with some preliminary observations and
then in further detail, phase by phase.

6.2.2. Problems of scale and responsibility

The three phases of the “decade of the genocide” have fared quite
differently in the media and general culture, and in a way that conforms
well to the expectations of a propaganda model. Phase I, for which the
United States bore primary responsibility, was little investigated at
the time, or since, and has never been described with anything like the
condemnatory terms applied to phase II. The vast number of Cambodians
killed, injured, and traumatized in this period were, in our
conceptualization of chapter 2, “unworthy” victims.

Phase II, the Pol Pot era, is the “holocaust” that was widely compared
to the worst atrocities of Hitler and Stalin, virtually from the outset,
with massive publicity and outrage at the suffering of these “worthy”
victims.

Phase III renewed the status of the people of Cambodia as worthy
victims, suffering under Vietnamese rule. The Vietnamese being official
enemies of the United States, they quickly became the villains of the
piece, responsible for unspeakable conditions within Cambodia and guilty
of unprovoked aggression. Meanwhile, the United States backed its ally
China as it conducted a punitive invasion of Vietnam in February 1979
and reconstructed the defeated Pol Pot forces.

In the early stages of phase III, it was alleged “that the Vietnamese
are now conducting a subtle ‘genocide’ in Cambodia,” a charge tacitly
endorsed in a CIA demographic study, which estimated a population drop
of 700,000 during “the first year of the Heng Samrin rule.”²² This new
“holocaust” was constructed on the basis of serious misinterpretation of
available evidence, as was demonstrated by Michael Vickery in a response
to William Shawcross’s warnings of “the end of Cambodia,”²³ but not
before it had left its mark on popular perceptions, and many distortions
and, indeed, contradictions persist. In his _Quality of Mercy_,
Shawcross agrees that, as Vickery had concluded, there was no
large-scale famine of the character initially reported,²⁴ but he later
wrote that the Heng Samrin regime “was responsible for creating many of
the conditions that caused the famine” in Cambodia. These conflicting
accounts were noted by Australian Cambodia scholar Ben Kiernan, who
suggested a partial explanation: “There _was_ a threat of famine, as the
Heng Samrin government proclaimed in mid-1979. But it was offset by the
small but crucial December-January harvest, which Shawcross hardly
mentions, _and_ by the massive international aid program, which he
regularly denigrates.”²⁵

The eagerness to uncover Vietnamese villainy in “ending Cambodia,” the
easy reliance on sources known to be unreliable,²⁶ and the subsequent
evasions after the accusations dissolve are readily explained by U.S.
(indeed, general Western-bloc) hostility to Vietnam, which led the
United States to align itself quietly with Pol Pot and to transform its
alleged concern over Cambodians to the victims of the Vietnamese
occupation.

Phase III also had a domestic U.S. aspect that is highly relevant to our
concerns. In an intriguing exercise, characteristic of system-supportive
propaganda campaigns, it was charged that the horrors of phase II were
passed over in “silence” at the time. This alleged fact, developed in
William Shawcross’s influential book _Quality of Mercy_, elicited much
commentary on “Holocaust and Modern Conscience,” the subtitle of
Shawcross’s book, and on the failure of civilized people to react
appropriately to ongoing atrocities. In “Phase III at home” (p. 288), we
will turn to the merits of this charge with regard to phase II. As for
phase I of “the decade of the genocide,” the charge of silence is
distinctly applicable, but it was never raised, then or now, nor is
phase I designated a period of “holocaust” or “genocide” in mainstream
literature. Phase I elicited no calls for international intervention or
trials for crimes against humanity, and it has since been largely
expunged from the record. In retrospect, the harshest critics within the
mainstream attribute “the destruction of Cambodian society” during phase
I to “years of warfare” and “careless policies of the White House,”
nothing more.²⁷ The issue of U.S. bombing of Cambodia did arise during
the Watergate hearings, but the primary concern there was the failure to
notify Congress.

Michael Vickery suggests an “interesting comparison which an
investigative journalist might make” if truly concerned about the
problems of the region—namely, between Cambodia, during phase III, and
Thailand, “where there has been no war, foreign invasion, carpet
bombing, nor revolution, and where foreign investment is massive and the
sympathy of the most advanced western powers is enjoyed,” but where
conditions in the peasant society were so terrible that “since 1980
substantial foreign ‘refugee’ aid near the border has been given to
‘Affected Thai Villagers,’ whose health and living standard, much to the
shock of foreign aid personnel, were found to be little better than the
condition of Cambodian refugees.”²⁸ No such comparison was undertaken,
nor was there even a flicker of concern over simultaneous reports,
buried in appropriate obscurity, about the tens of thousands of
children, many under ten years old, working as “virtual slaves” in Thai
factories resembling concentration camps,²⁹ nor over the normal
conditions of peasant life in the region, now exposed to the visitors
flocking to the border camps to witness the consequences of Communist
terror and express their compassion for its victims.

The actual scale of the slaughter and destruction during the two
authentic phases of large-scale killings during the “decade of the
genocide” (phases I and II) would be difficult to estimate at best, and
the problems have been compounded by a virtual orgy of falsification
serving political ends that are all too obvious.³⁰ The Finnish Inquiry
Commission estimates that about 600,000 people in a population of over
seven million died during phase I, while two million people became
refugees.³¹ For the second phase, they give 75,000 to 150,000 as a
“realistic estimate” for outright executions, and a figure of roughly
one million dead from killings, hunger, disease, and overwork. Vickery’s
analysis is the most careful attempt to sort out the confused facts to
date. He accepts as plausible a “war loss” of over 500,000 for the first
phase, calculated from the CIA estimates but lower than their
conclusions (see note 31), and about 750,000 “deaths in excess of normal
and due to the special conditions of DK,” with perhaps 200,000 to
300,000 executed and a total population decline for this period of about
400,000.³²

These estimates, the most careful currently available in print to our
knowledge, suggest that the toll under phase II of “the genocide” is
somewhat greater than that under phase I, although not radically
different in scale. But before accepting these figures at face value we
must bear in mind that part of the death toll under phase II must be
attributed to the conditions left by the U.S. war. As the war ended,
deaths from starvation in Phnom Penh alone were running at about 100,000
a year, and the U.S. airlift that kept the population alive was
immediately terminated. Sources close to the U.S. government predicted a
million deaths in Cambodia if U.S. aid were to cease. A Western doctor
working in Phnom Penh in 1974–75 reported that

This generation is going to be a lost generation of children.
Malnutrition is going to affect their numbers and their mental
capacities. So, as well as knocking off a generation of young men, the
war is knocking off a generation of children.

The U.S. embassy estimated that available rice in Phnom Penh would
suffice for at most a few weeks. The final U.S. AID report observed that
the country faced famine in 1975, with 75 percent of its draft animals
destroyed by the war, and that rice planting for the next harvest, eight
months hence, would have to be done “by the hard labor of seriously
malnourished people.” The report predicted “widespread starvation” and
“Slave labor and starvation rations for half the nation’s people” for
the coming year, and “general deprivation and suffering … over the next
two or three years before Cambodia can get back to rice
self-sufficiency.”³³

There is also the matter of the effect of the U.S. bombing on the Khmer
Rouge and the peasant society that provided their social base, a factor
noted by all serious analysts. Cambodia specialist Milton Osborne
concludes that Communist terror was “surely a reaction to the terrible
bombing of Communist-held regions” by the U.S. Air Force. Another
Cambodia scholar, David Chandler, comments that the bombing turned
“thousands of young Cambodians into participants in an anti-American
crusade,” as it “destroyed a good deal of the fabric of prewar Cambodian
society and provided the CPK [Khmer Rouge] with the psychological
ingredients of a violent, vengeful, and unrelenting social revolution,”
a “class warfare between the ‘base people,’ who had been bombed, and the
‘new people’ who had taken refuge from the bombing and thus had taken
sides, in CPK thinking, with the United States.” “French intransigence
had turned nationalists into Communists,” Philip Windsor observes, while
“American ruthlessness now turned Communists into totalitarian
fanatics.”³⁴ One may debate the weight that should be assigned to this
factor in determining Khmer Rouge policies, embittering the peasant
society of “base people,” and impelling them to force those they
perceived as collaborators in their destruction to endure the lives of
poor peasants or worse. But that it was a factor can hardly be doubted.

Assessing these various elements, it seems fair to describe the
responsibility of the United States and Pol Pot for atrocities during
“the decade of the genocide” as being roughly in the same range.

Little is known about phase I of “the genocide.” There was little
interest in ascertaining the facts, at the time or since. The Finnish
Inquiry Commission Report devotes three cursory pages to the topic,
because the information available is so meager. The second phase has
been far more intensively studied, and by now substantial evidence is
available about what took place. David Chandler and Ben Kiernan observe
that as a result of the intense interest in phase II, “we know a great
deal more about the texture of daily life in Democratic Kampuchea,
supposedly a ‘hermit’ regime, than we do about the ostensibly open
regimes of the Khmer Republic (1970–1975) or the Sihanouk era
(1954–1970) which preceded it.”³⁵ Despite this already large imbalance
in knowledge, the Cambodia Documentation Center in New York City
concentrates on phase II of the genocide. The dramatic difference in the
information available for the two phases, and the focus of the ongoing
research effort, are readily explicable in terms of a propaganda model.

Outside of marginal Maoist circles, there was virtually no doubt from
early on that the Khmer Rouge regime under the emerging leader Pol Pot
was responsible for gruesome atrocities. But there were differing
assessments of the scale and character of these crimes.

State Department Cambodia specialists were skeptical of the allegations
that had received wide publicity by 1977—rightly, so subsequent inquiry
revealed. The _Far Eastern Economic Review_ based its January 1979
conclusion that the population had actually risen during the Pol Pot
period on CIA sources, and its very knowledgeable correspondent Nayan
Chanda, discussing the background for the Vietnamese invasion, reported
that “some observers are convinced that had the Cambodian regime got a
year’s reprieve, its internal and international image would have been
improved enough to make any Vietnamese drive difficult if not
impossible.”³⁶

Differing assessments persisted even after the abundant evidence
provided by the flow of refugees to Thailand in 1979 and visits to
Cambodia, which also provided the first significant information about
the years 1977–78. At one extreme, Pol Pot continued to be described as
having forged new patterns of genocide comparable to the worst excesses
of Hitler and Stalin. At the other extreme, we have the postwar
evaluation by U.S. government specialist Douglas Pike, now head of the
University of California Indochina Archives, the “independent-minded”
scholar lauded by Freedom House and the exemplar of the new,
nonideological scholarship much admired by the _New York Times_. Pike
described Pol Pot in November 1979 as the “charismatic” leader of a
“bloody but successful peasant revolution with a substantial residue of
popular support,” under which “on a statistical basis, most of them
[peasants] … did not experience much in the way of brutality.”³⁷ The
1980 CIA demographic study assigns the Pol Pot-era executions to the
period ending in January 1977, and for 1977–78 merely says that “living
conditions most likely did not vary during these two years from the
conditions during 1976,” although as was known when the CIA study was
undertaken, these later years were the worst, by far, in the context of
internal purges and the escalating conflict with Vietnam at a time when
the United States was beginning its “tilt” toward China and Pol Pot. The
CIA concludes that among the “old people,” the “rural population” who
were “the foundation for the new Khmer Rouge revolutionary society,”
there was a slight increase in population through the DK period. A still
more muted assessment is provided by the close U.S. ally Deng Xiaoping,
who emerged as “party strongman” in China in December 1978 and soon
implemented his plan to “punish Vietnam,” and who remained the main
supporter of Pol Pot. He bitterly opposed attempts to remove the Khmer
Rouge from their leading role in the DK coalition in 1984, stating in a
rage that “I do not understand why some people want to remove Pol Pot.
It is true that he made some mistakes in the past but now he is leading
the fight against the Vietnamese aggressors.”³⁸ Deng has been backed in
this stance by the Reagan administration (see “Phase III in Indochina,”
p. 285).³⁸

In addition to such real examples of less harsh interpretations of the
Pol Pot period, there are also mythical ones to which we return.

6.2.3. The “not-so-gentle” land: some relevant history

Part of the illusory story constructed about Cambodia during the 1970s
and since is that this “gentle land” with its “smiling people” had known
little suffering before the country was drawn into the Indochina war and
then subjected to Pol Pot “autogenocide.” The reality is different.
Behind the famous “Khmer smile,” as Prince Sihanouk’s French adviser
Charles Meyer observed, lies ample bitterness and violence.³⁹ Vickery
observes that earlier chronicles “are filled with references to public
executions, ambushes, torture, village-burnings and forced emigration,”
with the destruction of villages and landscapes, torture, and killing a
matter of course, and few institutional restraints on terror. The
peasantry of inner Cambodia, largely unknown to Western scholarship or
to the urban population, appear to have lived under conditions of
extreme violence and hatred for the oppressors from outside the village.

During the French war of reconquest in the late 1940s, up to “perhaps
one million rural inhabitants … were forcibly ‘regrouped.’ ” The huge
flow of refugees to Phnom Penh during phase I of the “decade of the
genocide” was not the first massive dislocation in recent history,
Vickery continues, adding that it is, furthermore, “a strange kind of
history” that regards the displacement of people fleeing from U.S. bombs
and savage fighting “as somehow less abhorrent or more ‘normal’ than the
reverse movement of 1975,” the forcible evacuation when the peasant army
of the Khmer Rouge conquered the city. Leaders of the anti-French
resistance after World War II describe horrifying atrocities conducted
with obvious pleasure as a “normal” part of “Khmer mores.” In the same
years, government forces led by Lon Nol, who was to head the U.S.-backed
client government in the early 1970s, carried out wholesale massacres in
villages as the French withdrew, including such “individual tests of
strength” as “grasping infants by the legs and pulling them apart,”
actions that “had probably not been forgotten by the men of that area
who survived to become the Khmer Rouge troops” whose later atrocities in
this “gentle land” aroused such outrage in the West. “Thus for the rural
80–90 percent of the Cambodian people,” Vickery concludes, “arbitrary
justice, sudden violent death, political oppression, exploitative use of
religion and anti-religious reaction, both violent and quiescent, were
common facts of life long before the war and revolution of the 1970s.”
These conditions elicited no interest in the West. “The creations of Pol
Pot-ism were all there in embryo,” Vickery continues, to be “directed
first of all at the urban population” after a war which was in large
measure “a war between town and countryside in which the town’s battle
was increasingly for the sole purpose of preserving its privileges while
the rural areas suffered.”⁴⁰

It is superfluous to observe that the United States deployed its ample
means of violence in defense of urban privilege. But, in fact, these
tasks were only of secondary importance. For the United States, the
destruction of rural Cambodia was ancillary to the goal of maintaining
in power the client regime in South Vietnam.

Contrary to the arrangements in Laos and Vietnam, the Geneva Accords
afforded no recognition to the anti-French resistance in Cambodia, a
source of much bitterness. The country was ruled by Prince Sihanouk
until March 1970, when he was overthrown in a coup supported by the
United States.⁴¹ Throughout this period, Sihanouk attempted a difficult
balancing act both internally and externally. Within Cambodia, he
repressed the left and peasant uprisings and attempted to hold off the
right, although power largely remained in the hands of right-wing urban
elites throughout. Externally, he tried to preserve a measure of
neutrality against the background of the expanding Indochina war, which,
he expected, would end in a Communist victory.⁴²

Sihanouk’s neutralist efforts were unappreciated by the United States
and its allies. Diem’s troops attacked border regions from 1957, and
there were also Thai provocations. A coup attempt in 1959, probably
backed by the CIA, as generally assumed in Cambodia, was foiled; this
should be seen in the context of general U.S. subversion in the region
in the post-Geneva period, including a CIA-backed coup and invasion
aimed at overthrowing Sukarno in Indonesia in 1958, subversion of the
elected government of Laos in the same year, and the efforts to destroy
the anti-French resistance within South Vietnam and to consolidate the
Diem dictatorship while undermining the political arrangements at
Geneva. By 1963, CIA-backed Khmer Serei forces frequently attacked
Cambodia from South Vietnamese and Thai bases at a time when the United
States was intensifying its clandestine operations in Laos and
maneuvering, with increasing violence, to block a political settlement
in South Vietnam. By 1966, the Khmer Serei “declared war on Cambodia and
claimed responsibility for incursions across the border.”⁴³

Attacks by U.S. and Saigon army forces against border posts and villages
in Cambodia intensified from the early 1960s, causing hundreds of
casualties a year. Later, Vietnamese peasants and guerrillas fled for
refuge to border areas in Cambodia, particularly after the murderous
U.S. military operations in South Vietnam in early 1967, giving rise to
cynical charges from Washington, echoed in the media, about Communist
encroachment into neutral Cambodia. By the time of the 1970 coup that
overthrew Sihanouk, Vietnamese were scattered along border areas to a
maximum depth of about twenty-five kilometers, according to most
sources. The first evidence of Vietnamese encampments in Cambodia was
discovered in late 1967, close to the unmarked border. While there was
much outrage in the United States about “North Vietnamese aggression,”
the internal view in Washington was considerably more nuanced. From the
_Pentagon Papers_ we learn that as late as May 1967—well after the U.S.
operations that caused cross-border flight—high Pentagon officials
believed that Cambodia was “becoming more and more important as a supply
base—now of food and medicines, perhaps ammunition later.” A year
earlier, an American study team investigated specific charges by the
U.S. government on the scene and found them without substance although
they did come across the site of a recent U.S. helicopter-gunship attack
on a Cambodian village (one of many, according to the local population),
first denied by the U.S. government, then conceded, since American
eyewitnesses (including CBS-TV) were present—the usual pattern.

The Cambodian government reported many such incidents. Thus Cambodia
complained to the United Nations that on February 24, 1967, “a large
number of armed forces elements consisting of Americans, South
Vietnamese and South Koreans entered Cambodian territory and fired
heavily on the Khmer village of Chrak Kranh … [which] was then invaded
and burnt by the United States-South Vietnamese troops” who occupied the
village until March 3. By April 1969, rubber plantations were subjected
to defoliation by air attack. In January 1970, an official Cambodian
government White Paper reported thousands of such incidents with many
deaths, giving pictures, dates, and other details, and also noting that
not a single Viet Cong body had ever been found after U.S.-Saigon
bombardments or ground attacks.

Virtually none of this was ever reported in the United States—even the
official White Paper—although the information was readily available in
official documents and reputable foreign sources, and in easily ignored
peace-movement literature.⁴⁴ The agency of violence was once again the
wrong one.

The occasional media reaction to these incursions was instructive. On
March 25, 1964, _New York Times_ correspondent Max Frankel, now
executive editor, reported a Saigon army (ARVN) attack on the Cambodian
village of Chantrea with armored cars and bombers, leaving many
villagers killed and wounded. The ARVN forces were accompanied by U.S.
advisers, including a U.S. army pilot “dragged from the wreckage” of an
observer plane “shot down in the action.” Diplomats on the scene
confirmed that “at least one troop-carrying helicopter had landed at
Chantrea with three Americans on board.” Frankel was outraged—at
Cambodia, which had the gall to demand reparations, leaving Washington
“alarmed and saddened, but confused.” The headline reads: “Stomping on
U.S. Toes: Cambodia Typical of Many Small Nations Putting Strain on a
Policy of Patience.” Cambodia has “borrowed a leaf from Fidel Castro’s
book,” Frankel stormed, by requesting compensation for this U.S.
atrocity: “It is open season again for the weaker nations to stomp on
the toes of big ones.… Leading the pack in big-power baiting these days
is one of the smallest of nations, the Southeast Asian kingdom of
Cambodia” with its “clever, headstrong, erratic leader,” whom Washington
finds “lacking some of the talent and temperament for the job,” although
“the Administration’s instinct has been to try to save a wayward young
nation’s independence in spite of itself and, at times, despite its own
leaders.” Washington is also alarmed by “Cambodia’s current effort to
force the United States into a major conference that would embarrass its
Thai and Vietnamese friends,” Frankel continues, an effort that will “be
resisted”—referring to a conference that would settle border questions
and guarantee Cambodia’s neutrality at a time when the United States was
desperately seeking to undermine international efforts to neutralize
South Vietnam, Laos, and Cambodia so as to avert the major war toward
which the United States was driving because of its political weakness in
Indochina.

This classic of colonialist paternalism reflects quite accurately the
general mood of the day—as does the refusal to report such trivial
matters as the regular U.S.-ARVN attacks on Cambodia, which have largely
passed from history in the United States, apart from the dissident
literature.

6.2.4. Phase I: The U.S. destruction of Cambodia

On March 18, 1969, the notorious “secret bombings” began. One week
later, on March 26, the Cambodian government publicly condemned the
bombing and strafing of “the Cambodian population living in the border
regions … almost daily by U.S. aircraft,” with increasing killing and
destruction, alleging that these attacks were directed against “peaceful
Cambodian farmers” and demanding that “these criminal attacks must
immediately and definitively stop.…” Prince Sihanouk called a press
conference on March 28 in which he emphatically denied reports
circulating in the United States that he “would not oppose U.S. bombings
of communist targets within my frontiers.” “Unarmed and innocent people
have been victims of U.S. bombs,” including “the latest bombing, the
victims of which were Khmer peasants, women and children in particular.”
He then issued an appeal to the international press: “I appeal to you to
publicize abroad this very clear stand of Cambodia—that is, I will in
any case oppose all bombings on Cambodian territory under whatever
pretext.”⁴⁵

It will come as no surprise that his appeal went unanswered.
Furthermore, this material has been suppressed up to the present time,
apart from the dissident literature.⁴⁶ The standard position within the
mainstream, adopted by defenders of the bombing and critics as well, is
that “Sihanouk did not protest” (William Shawcross). When the “secret
bombings” became public knowledge in 1973, it was claimed that Sihanouk
had privately authorized bombing of Vietnamese bases near the border
areas. True or false, that is irrelevant to the suppression of
Sihanouk’s impassioned appeals, which referred to the bombing of _Khmer
peasants_. Furthermore, as we observed in earlier discussion, “while
commentators and media analysts may draw whatever conclusions they
please from the conflicting evidence available, this does not entitle
them to suppress what is, by any standards, crucial evidence, in this
case, Sihanouk’s attempt to arouse international protest over the U.S.
bombing of the civilian society.”⁴⁷

Reviewing this period in his _Cambodia Year Zero_, François Ponchaud
remarks that Sihanouk called the U.S. bombings of “Vietcong bases” a
“scandal and a crime over Radio Phnom Penh, but nobody was deceived.”
Ponchaud and his readers, however, are deceived: Sihanouk publicly
denounced the bombing and other attacks on _Khmer peasants_, and not
only over Radio Phnom Penh but in quite public documents and appeals to
the international press. In his _Sideshow_, Shawcross says only that
Cambodia “continued to denounce” American air and artillery attacks
through 1969, but “made no public protest that specifically mentioned
B-52 attacks” (p. 94)—true, but irrelevant for the reasons repeated in
the last paragraph.⁴⁸

In May 1969, William Beecher reported B-52 raids on “Vietcong and North
Vietnamese supply dumps and base camps in Cambodia,” citing U.S.
sources. Beecher stated that “Cambodia has not made any protest,”
disregarding Sihanouk’s appeals and his protest against the murder of
“Khmer peasants, women and children in particular,” not Vietnamese
military bases. Beecher also commented that “in the past, American and
South Vietnamese forces had occasionally fired across the border and
even called in fighters or helicopter gunships to counter fire they
received from enemy units there,” ignoring the somewhat more important
fact that U.S. aircraft and U.S.-ARVN-South Korean forces had been
attacking Cambodian villages, according to the “friendly” government of
Cambodia. The headline for his article states falsely: “Raids in
Cambodia by U.S. Unprotested.” Beecher’s article caused consternation in
Washington, setting off the first stage of what later became the
Watergate scandal. As we have commented elsewhere, “It is remarkable
that Beecher’s unique though quite inadequate account is now held up as
evidence that the press maintained its honor throughout this period,
despite the crimes of Richard Nixon.”⁴⁹

Once again, the U.S. escalation of the war against Cambodia in 1969
coincided with similar efforts in Laos and Vietnam. The general reaction
was similar throughout, and remains so. The post-Tet accelerated
pacification campaign, which thoroughly demolished the civilian base of
the NLF, was regarded as so uninteresting that it is passed over in
virtual silence in the popular retrospectives. As for the wars in Laos
and Cambodia, Elterman comments, after reviewing the major media
coverage, that apart from the “alternative press,” they were virtually
“invisible” in the press in 1969 when they were expanding to new heights
as the U.S. Air Force was shifted from North Vietnam to Laos and
Cambodia after the “bombing halt.”⁵⁰

In March 1970, Cambodia was drawn irrevocably into the carnage sweeping
Indochina. On March 18, Sihanouk was overthrown in “an upper-class coup,
not a revolution,” carried out for “interests of domestic and political
expedience,” and with at least “indirect U.S. support,” if not more.⁵¹
Two days later, ARVN ground and air operations began in Svay Rieng
Province, at the Vietnamese border, continuing through April and leading
to the U.S.-ARVN invasion on April 29, conducted with an extreme
brutality sometimes vividly depicted in the media, which were
particularly appalled by the behavior of the ARVN forces. Much of the
enormous civilian toll, however, resulted from air power, including U.S.
bombing strikes that leveled or severely damaged towns and villages.⁵²
One effect of the invasion was to drive the Vietnamese forces away from
the border and deeper into Cambodia, where they began to support the
growing peasant resistance against the coup leaders. A second effect, as
described by U.S. correspondent Richard Dudman, who witnessed these
events at first hand after his capture by the Cambodian resistance, was
that “the bombing and shooting was radicalizing the people of rural
Cambodia and was turning the countryside into a massive, dedicated, and
effective revolutionary base.”⁵³ Cambodia was now plunged into civil
war, with increasing savagery on both sides.

U.S. bombing continued at a high level after the withdrawal of U.S.
forces from Cambodia. By late 1971, an investigating team of the General
Accounting Office concluded that U.S. and Saigon army bombing is “a very
significant cause of refugees and civilian casualties,” estimating that
almost a third of the seven-million population may be refugees. U.S.
intelligence reported that “what the villagers feared most was the
possibility of indiscriminate artillery and air strikes,” and refugee
reports and other sources confirm that these were the major cause of
civilian casualties and the flight of refugees.⁵⁴

Information about what was happening in the peasant society of Cambodia
in the early 1970s was limited but not unavailable. There were, first of
all, many refugees with stories to tell, although the media were not
interested. There was also an eyewitness account by French Southeast
Asia specialist Serge Thion, who spent two weeks in regions controlled
by the Cambodian guerrillas. His reports were offered to the _Washington
Post_, but rejected.⁵⁵ They were of no more interest than the reports of
life under the bombing in Laos, or similar questions regarding Vietnam
throughout the war and in the retrospectives.

As in Laos, the escalating war remained largely “invisible” in the
media. Surveying a five-month period in early 1972 in the national
press, Elterman found that “In terms of war casualties, the focus in
_The New York Times_ and _Time_ was on military-related deaths and
almost always only those that occurred in Vietnam, ignoring also the
civilian deaths and refugees in that country too.… During the winter and
spring of 1972, the war in Cambodia and Laos was ignored more than
usually with most of the Indo-China news coverage given to the North
Vietnamese offensive into South Vietnam and the United States bombing of
Hanoi and Haiphong.… _Time_, in fact, had more coverage on civilian
casualties in Northern Ireland during the first half of 1972 than it did
on the Indo-China War.”⁵⁶

Meanwhile, Cambodia was being systematically demolished, and the Khmer
Rouge, hitherto a marginal element, were becoming a significant force
with substantial peasant support in inner Cambodia, increasingly
victimized by U.S. terror. As for the U.S.-backed Lon Nol regime,
Michael Vickery points out that their “client mentality” and subsequent
“dependency led them to acquiesce in, or even encourage, the devastation
of their own country by one of the worst aggressive onslaughts in modern
warfare, and therefore to appear as traitors to a victorious peasant
army which had broken with old patron-client relationships and had been
self-consciously organized and indoctrinated for individual, group, and
national self-reliance.”⁵⁷

In early 1973, U.S. bombing increased to a scale that might truly merit
the term “genocidal” used by the Finnish Inquiry Commission. In the
five-month period after the signing of the Paris peace accords, the
bombing matched the level of the preceding three years,⁵⁸ and it was to
continue at that level until Congress forced a halt in August—although
bombing and shelling of the countryside by armies of the U.S.-backed
regime were to continue on a substantial scale, with U.S. guidance and
supply, until the war’s end. Over a million refugees fled to Phnom Penh,
which became a horror chamber while the countryside was laid waste,
including B-52 bombing targeted “on the most heavily populated areas of
Cambodia,” where U.S. Air Force maps showed “thousands of square miles
of densely populated, fertile areas … marked black from the
inundation”—“the careless policies of the White House” criticized by
William Shawcross.⁵⁹ At just this time, Khmer Rouge programs became
extremely harsh, so available studies indicate, including a refugee
study by Kenneth Quinn, of the National Security Council staff, who
never considers a possible causal connection, however, between the
harshening of policy and the sharp increase in the program of saturation
bombing. Timothy Carney, the second of the three major U.S. government
specialists on Cambodia (Quinn, Carney, Charles Twining), also notes
that “sometime in 1973 the party apparently decided to accelerate its
program to alter Khmer society,” for no suggested reason.⁶⁰

6.2.5. Phase I in the media

During this period, there was extensive media coverage of Cambodia, and
there was no dearth of evidence on what was taking place in the regions
subjected to U.S. Air Force atrocities. It was not necessary to
undertake a difficult expedition to the Thai-Cambodia border to find
refugees who would tell what they knew, but the victims of phase I of
“the decade of the genocide” who were huddled in the slums of Phnom Penh
or other towns and villages to which they fled were of no more interest
than those in the miserable camps on the outskirts of Vientiane—unless
they had tales of terror by the Cambodian insurgents to recount (the
Vietnamese long having faded into the background).⁶¹ No books or
articles were written by Father Ponchaud, who lived among the peasants
and sympathized deeply with their plight, so he informed us when the
time came to expose atrocities of the Khmer Rouge. The same was true of
many others who were later to express their heartfelt concerns for
Cambodians suffering under Khmer Rouge terror, but who did not seek to
investigate and publicize the plight of the rural population during
phase I of the genocide, when such efforts might have had a crucial
impact on the policies that were destroying Cambodia, a fact that might
merit some thought.

The standard U.S. media picture of phase I is something like this.
“Until the turning point in 1973,… on the surface, Cambodians smiled and
were full of pleasantries,”⁶² but afterwards the mood of “Cambodians”
became one of “apathy” and “resignation” because “impoverished farmers,
refugees and soldiers” (most of whom were press-ganged into service from
among the poor and refugee communities) felt that their “leaders seem
powerless to defend them against human and natural adversities.”⁶³ There
is a “spirit of doom” as the government is “teetering on the wreckage of
the democratic republic it set out to create” with the coup that
overthrew Sihanouk.⁶⁴ The Americans try, but with little success, to
“give the Cambodians some sense of confidence in their leadership,” but,
nevertheless, “Cambodian morale has been sliding steadily for a long
time.” However, “Rather than any sense of urgency here [in Phnom Penh],
there is the grand fatalism that is so much a part of Cambodia’s
Hindu-influenced Buddhism,”⁶⁵ although it somehow does not seem to
affect “the enemy,” whose “determination” in the face of the awesome
firepower unleashed against them “baffles” the Americans. But there is
still “a feeling that the Americans will save the Cambodians at the last
minute because they cannot save themselves.” “Almost every conversation
with a Cambodian now is the same,” namely, fear that the “demoralized
army will collapse” when the American bombing terminates on August 15.
The impending bombing cutoff is “painful” to the “Cambodians” because of
“the recent steady successes of enemy troops” against overwhelming odds.
In his final summary report from Phnom Penh as the U.S. bombing ended,
Sydney Schanberg raised “the key unanswered question: How have the
insurgents—without any planes of their own, and without the extensive
artillery support the Government troops have, with only small arms and
mobile weapons …—been able not just to match the Government forces,
which are more than twice their size, but to push the Government forces
back and sustain the offensive for six months without any significant
lull?” “Since the insurgents are not superhuman, there must be other
explanations for their success.” Perhaps they are so “determined and
capable” because they “are less fatalistic than the Khmers on this side”
and “believe they can change their environment” (U.S. embassy official).
In this regard, “the enemy” are quite different from “the Cambodian
villager,” who “usually has no politics” and “is not interested in
taking sides, only to be left alone to farm and fish and feed his family
and once in a while to celebrate on a Buddhist holiday.”⁶⁶

The civil war, then, pits “the Cambodians” against “the enemy,”
Cambodian peasants who were surely not full of pleasantries during the
pre-1973 U.S. bombings. “The Cambodians,” fatalistic and resigned,
either want to be left alone (“the Cambodian villager”) or hope that the
United States will save them and their government, striving for
democracy (“the Cambodians” generally). The enemy struggle on
successfully against overwhelming odds, baffling the Americans—exactly
as Americans building “democracy” have been baffled by the same problem
in South Vietnam, Central America, and many other places. Since these
are the conclusions drawn from “almost every conversation with a
Cambodian,” they are surely realistic, at least as long as we understand
that “Cambodians” are those Cambodians who are not “the enemy” of the
objective press, just as “South Vietnamese” were South Vietnamese
collaborating with the U.S. aggressors.

The framework is the usual one, although perhaps a shade more egregious
in the light of what might have been passing through the minds of those
Cambodians who were not “Cambodians” during phase I of the genocide.

About that topic, we learn very little from the media. The refugees
flooding Phnom Penh and other areas where U.S. reporters traveled were
virtually ignored. To gain a measure of this remarkable fact, let us
review the reports during these months in the _New York Times_, most of
them by its Pulitzer Prize-winning correspondent Sydney Schanberg, who,
more than any other U.S. reporter, came to be regarded as the conscience
of the media with regard to Cambodia.

Schanberg arrived in Phnom Penh in May 1973, at the height of the
intensified bombing, which continued until the mid-August halt. During
this period, the _Times_ published twenty-seven of his reports from
Cambodia, many of them long and detailed, along with a column in which
he expressed his contempt for the “so-called international press corps”
who spend their time “interviewing each other” in the Hotel Le Phnom.⁶⁷

From the outset, Schanberg reports “refugees pouring into the city,” but
there are no interviews with refugees who relate the circumstances of
life under the bombs. We hear a “well to do Cambodian woman” who tells
us that “The bombing is terrible”; she is “not frightened, just
annoyed—because it wakes my baby up every night in the middle of the
night, and I have to get up” (May 3). But those villagers who want to be
left alone are not granted the opportunity to relay their accounts of
somewhat more serious concerns, apart from a few scattered phrases, and
there is not a word to suggest that refugees might have had any
attitude, apart from fear, with regard to those “determined” fighters
who “believe they can change their environment,” although plainly they
had a solid base in the peasant society that was being torn to shreds by
saturation bombing. As in Laos a few years earlier, the refugees simply
had the wrong tale to tell, and the kinds of stories that readily flow
if one is sufficiently interested to inquire are lacking here.

Running through the columns seriatim for relevant material, number 5
(May 11) quotes a Western European diplomat who says that “American men
in American planes are bombing the hell out of this place,” and notes
that the U.S. aircraft “do not always receive accurate answers” about
civilians in the targeted areas “from the Cambodian commanders” who
direct the jet fighter-bombers. The Cambodians, then, are to blame for
the civilian casualties that must result, although “no reliable figures
are available” and refugees are not asked to supplement with their
personal knowledge. The next two columns (May 24, 27) are the only ones
concerned directly with the effect of the bombing in the countryside.
The first reports “extensive” destruction from bombing that has wiped
out “a whole series of villages” along the main highway, with often not
even a piece of a house left standing for miles, while “a few people
wander forlornly through the rubble, stunned by what has happened,
skirting the craters, picking at the debris.” A group of villagers from
Svay Rieng Province, abutting Vietnam, report the destruction of seven
villages, with many killed. “The frightened villagers uprooted by the
bombing have a great deal to say,” Schanberg comments, but we do not
read it here. Rather, he explains that “There is no doubt that the
Seventh Air Force is making a marked effort to avoid civilian
casualties—at least outside the eastern third of the country, which is
solidly held by the enemy”; and if there are casualties it is the fault
of Cambodian military officials who request air strikes with “almost no
concern about civilian lives or property.” The second column informs us
that “the refugees frequently tell about the bombing,” which has
destroyed villages and “terrified all the rest of the villagers,” a
Western diplomat reports. But the refugees are granted only two phrases,
an “incongruously polite” request that “I would be very glad if the
Government would stop sending the planes to bomb,” and a plea from a
monk to ask the United States and other governments: “Don’t destroy
everything in Cambodia.”

We hear no more from the refugees until column 15 (July 26), a graphic
account of “a terror attack on the civilian population”—by Communist
forces who shelled the outskirts of Phnom Penh. A weeping child
describes how her little brother’s hand was cut off, and the
blood-stained road and doorsteps testify to Communist barbarity, as
distinct from the operations of the scrupulous American command. Column
19 (Aug. 5) tells of thousands of new refugees “fleeing from enemy
assaults,” and column 21 (Aug. 7) describes Cambodian soldiers looting a
recaptured village that “looked as if struck by a storm with a tongue of
fire,” with many houses “smashed in by shells,” but no word from the
victims, who had fled. Then follow three columns (Aug. 7, 9, 12)
describing in extensive detail the bombing of the village of Neak
Luong—in error—killing many government soldiers and their families. This
is the sole example of American bombing that was shown in the film _The
Killing Fields_, the only depiction there of phase I of the genocide, a
memory that is acceptable since it was plainly an error.

We located eighteen additional reports datelined Cambodia, from March 25
through August 18.⁶⁸ One quotes a villager who says “The bombers may
kill some Communists but they kill everyone else, too” (Browne, April
11), but we found no other examples of reactions by the victims,
although there is a picture of a Cambodian soldier weeping for his wife
and ten children killed in the bombing of Neak Luong by error (Aug. 10).

In forty-five columns, then, there are three in which victims of U.S.
bombing are granted a few phrases to describe what is happening in
Cambodia. Not a single column seeks to explore the reactions of the
refugees not far from the Hotel Le Phnom, or in Battambang, or in the
far more miserable refugee camps in the countryside nearby; or to
attempt to develop some sense of what must have been happening under the
frenzied bombing of these months. Recall that in Phnom Penh alone there
were almost 1.5 million refugees who had fled from the countryside,
some, surely, who must have had some information to relate about phase I
of the genocide at its peak. The reader could no doubt ascertain that
terrible things were happening in the Cambodian countryside, but what
they were remains obscure, and the Americans are explicitly exonerated,
apart from the error of bombing the wrong village.

The story remained much the same as phase I of the genocide continued.
The horrors in Phnom Penh itself were sometimes vividly described,
primarily abroad,⁶⁹ but there was little effort to determine what was
happening in the areas held by the enemy of the U.S. government—hence
the enemy of the U.S. press; virtually the entire country as “the
Cambodians” were confined to urban centers swelled by a huge flood of
refugees who remain as hidden from view as those in the teeming slums of
Saigon or the camps around Vientiane.

Western correspondents evacuated from Phnom Penh after the Khmer Rouge
victory were able to obtain a fleeting picture of what had taken place
in the countryside. British correspondent Jon Swain summarizes his
impressions as follows:

The United States has much to answer for here, not only in terms of
human lives and massive material destruction; the rigidity and nastiness
of the un-Cambodian like fellows in black who run this country now, or
what is left of it, are as much a product of this wholesale American
bombing which has hardened and honed their minds as they are a product
of Marx and Mao.… [The mass evacuation of the cities] does not
constitute a deliberate campaign of terror, rather it points to poor
organisation, lack of vision and the brutalisation of a people by a long
and savage war.… The war damage here [in the countryside], as everywhere
else we saw, is total. Not a bridge is standing, hardly a house. I am
told most villagers have spent the war years living semi-permanently
underground in earth bunkers to escape the bombing.… The entire
countryside has been churned up by American B-52 bomb craters, whole
towns and villages razed. So far I have not seen one intact pagoda.⁷⁰

The conditions are much like those reported in 1970 by refugees from the
Plain of Jars, in Laos; in both cases, these accounts were almost
entirely excluded from the mainstream media.

So ended phase I of the genocide. In later years, those who had
transmitted narrowly selected fragments of this tale of horror expressed
their bitterness that Cambodia had been “forgotten.” On the tenth
anniversary of the Khmer Rouge takeover, Sydney Schanberg wrote two
columns in the _New York Times_ entitled “Cambodia Forgotten.” The first
highlights the phrase: “Superpowers care as little today about
Cambodians as in 1970,” the second dismisses Richard Nixon’s 1985 claim
that there was no “indiscriminate terror bombing” but only “highly
accurate” strikes “against enemy military targets.” Schanberg comments
that “Anyone who visited the refugee camps in Cambodia and talked to the
civilian survivors of the bombing learned quickly about the substantial
casualties.” He recalls that “the Khmer Rouge were a meaningless force
when the war was brought to Cambodia in 1970.… In order to flourish and
grow, they needed a war to feed on. And the superpowers—including this
country, with the Nixon incursion of 1970 and the massive bombing that
followed—provided that war and that nurturing material.” He does not,
however, inform us about which superpower, apart from “this country,”
invaded Cambodia and subjected it to massive bombing. With comparable
even-handedness we might deplore the contribution of the superpowers,
including the USSR, to the destruction of Afghanistan, or the attitude
of the great powers, including Nazi Germany, toward the victims of the
death camps, whom Schanberg brings up in a later column the same month
entitled “Memory is the Answer.” He also does not comment on what the
reader of his columns might have learned about life in the Cambodian
countryside from his reporting during the peak period of the bombing.⁷¹

Others too stress that “memory is the answer.” Commenting on the
award-winning film _The Killing Fields_, Samuel Freedman writes that
“While Holocaust survivors have helped perpetuate the memory of Nazi
infamy, the Cambodian genocide is already being forgotten,” referring to
phase II of the genocide, phase I having passed into oblivion with no
concern.⁷² The _New York Times_ reminds us that “Cambodia remains
perhaps the most pitiful victim of the Indochina wars,” as it is caught
between the forces of Pol Pot and Hanoi, which used Pol Pot attacks
against Vietnamese villages as “a long-sought pretext to invade” and now
exploits “Pol Pot’s Khmer Rouge army of 30,000 inside Cambodia” (in
fact, mostly inside Thailand) as “the pretext for remaining in
Cambodia.” “Unimaginable slaughter, invasion, brutal occupation have
followed famine and pestilence,” all attributable to the Communists,
although the suffering has been “aggravated by the cynicism of big
powers,” not further differentiated. As for the United States, “When
Vietcong guerrillas used a neutral Cambodia as a sanctuary, it was
pounded by American bombs and drawn into a war it hoped to avoid,” but
that is all. In a later comment, the editors concede that “murderous
aerial bombing followed by brutal revolution, famine and civil war”
brought Cambodia to ruin, but of all of this, “what cannot be sponged
away are the Khmer Rouge’s butcheries” and the actions of Hanoi, which
has “subjugated and impoverished” Cambodia: phases II and III of “the
decade of the genocide.”⁷³

“Memory is the answer,” but only when focused on proper targets, far
from home.

6.2.6. The Pol Pot era

Phase II of “the decade of the genocide” began with the Khmer Rouge
takeover in April 1975. Within a few weeks, the Khmer Rouge were accused
in the national press of “barbarous cruelty” and “genocidal policies”
comparable to the “Soviet extermination of the Kulaks or with the Gulag
Archipelago.”⁷⁴ This was at a time when the death toll was perhaps in
the thousands; the half million or more killed during phase I of the
genocide never merited such comment, nor were these assessments of the
first days of phase II (or later ones, quite generally) accompanied by
reflection on the consequences of the American war that were anticipated
by U.S. officials and relief workers on the scene, reviewed earlier, or
by any recognition of a possible causal link between the horrors of
phase II and the American war against the rural society during phase I.

We will not document here the flood of rage and anger directed against
the Khmer Rouge from the outset and the evidence on which it was based,
having done so elsewhere in detail.⁷⁵ Several facts documented there
bear emphasis: (1) the outrage, which was instant and overwhelming,
peaked in early 1977 until the overthrow of Pol Pot, was based almost
exclusively on evidence through 1977, primarily 1975–76;⁷⁶ (2) apart
from a few knowledgeable journalists, the State Department’s Cambodia
experts, and probably the majority of the small group of Cambodia
scholars—that is, most of those with a basis for judgment—the most
extreme accusations were adopted and proclaimed with a great show of
indignation over Communist atrocities, the integrity of which can be
measured by comparison to the reaction to phase I of the genocide and
U.S. responsibility for it; (3) these skeptical assessments, almost
entirely suppressed in the media, proved fairly accurate for the period
in question; (4) the evidence that provided the crucial basis for the
denunciations of Communist genocide was of a kind that would have been
dismissed with derision had something of the sort been offered with
regard to phase I of the genocide or other U.S. atrocities, including
faked interviews and photographs and fabricated statements attributed to
Khmer Rouge officials, constantly repeated even after they had been
conceded to be frauds; fabricated casualty estimates based on misquoted
studies that became unquestionable doctrine even after they were
publicly withdrawn as inventions; and highly selective refugee reports
that ignored much refugee testimony, including detailed studies by
Cambodia scholars, that could not be exploited for what soon became a
propaganda campaign at a level of deceit of astonishing proportions.⁷⁷

As we also noted from the first paragraph of our earlier review of this
material, to which we will simply refer here for specifics, “there is no
difficulty in documenting major atrocities and oppression, primarily
from the reports of refugees”; there is little doubt that “the record of
atrocities in Cambodia is substantial and often gruesome” and represents
“a fearful toll”; “when the facts are in, it may turn out that the more
extreme condemnations were in fact correct,” although if so, “it will in
no way alter the conclusions we have reached on the central question
addressed here: how the available facts were selected, modified, or
sometimes invented to create a certain image offered to the general
population. The answer to this question seems clear, and it is
unaffected by whatever may yet be discovered about Cambodia in the
future.” As we repeatedly stressed, in this chapter of a two-volume
study on U.S. policy and ideology, our concern remained the United
States, not Indochina; our purpose was not to “establish the facts with
regard to postwar Indochina” on the basis of the evidence available, but
rather to examine the constructions developed on the basis of this
evidence, to analyze the way this evidence was refracted “through the
prism of Western ideology, a very different task.”⁷⁸ The conclusions
drawn there remain valid. To our knowledge, no error or even misleading
statement or omission has been found.⁷⁹

This review of an impressive propaganda exercise aroused great
outrage—not at all surprisingly: the response within Soviet domains is
similar, as are the reasons, when dissidents expose propaganda
fabrications with regard to the United States, Israel, and other
official enemies. Indignant commentators depicted us as “apologists for
Khmer Rouge crimes”⁸⁰—in a study that denounced Khmer Rouge atrocities
(a fact always suppressed) and then proceeded to demonstrate the
remarkable character of Western propaganda, our topic throughout the
two-volume study in which this chapter appeared. There was also a new
wave of falsification, often unanswerable when journals refused to
permit response. We will not review these further propaganda exercises
here, but merely note that they provide an intriguing expression of
what, in other contexts, is described as the totalitarian mentality: it
is not enough to denounce official enemies; it is also necessary to
guard with vigilance the right to lie in the service of power. The
reaction to our challenge to this sacred right again fits neatly within
the expectations of a propaganda model, standing alongside the Freedom
House attack on the media for failure to serve state policy with
sufficient vigor and optimism.

By early 1977, denunciations of the Khmer Rouge for having caused
unprecedented “murder in a gentle land” and “autogenocide” extended from
mass circulation journals such as _Reader’s Digest_ (with tens of
millions of readers) and _TV Guide_ (circulation nineteen million), to
the _New York Review of Books_ and the media generally, in addition to a
best-selling book by John Barron and Anthony Paul based on their
_Reader’s Digest_ article and the widely misquoted study by François
Ponchaud mentioned earlier. Similar material continued to flow in
abundance in the press and newsweeklies, the _New York Times Magazine_,
and elsewhere. Evidence about the 1977–78 period became available
primarily after the Vietnamese expulsion of the Khmer Rouge regime,
which brought phase II of the genocide to a close, eliciting new outrage
over the alleged “genocide” brought about by the “Prussians of Asia.”

The picture created by this chorus of denunciation, from the first days
of Democratic Kampuchea (DK) in 1975, is described sardonically by
Michael Vickery as “the standard total view” (STV). According to the
STV, prior to the Khmer Rouge victory in April 1975, Cambodia had been a
“gentle land” (Barron and Paul) of “gentle if emotional people” who
“wanted only to live in peace in their lush kingdom” (Jack Anderson), a
land in which hunger was “almost unknown” (Henry Kamm). But in 1975, the
“formerly fun-loving, easy-going Cambodians” were subjected to the
“harsh regime” of the Khmer Rouge, who ordered that all those not under
their rule before the victory can be “disposed of” because they are “no
longer required,” even if only one million Khmers remain (Donald Wise,
citing several of the frequently quoted Khmer Rouge statements that were
conceded to be fabrications).⁸¹

According to the STV, during the pre-1977 period on which the
conclusions were based, the Khmer Rouge leadership was engaged in a
policy of systematic extermination and destruction of all organized
social and cultural life apart from the Gulag run by the “nine men at
the top,” Paris-trained Communists, without local variation and with no
cause other than inexplicable sadism and Marxist-Leninist dogma. By
early 1977, it was alleged that they had “boasted” of having slaughtered
some two million people (Jean Lacouture in the _New York Review_). This
figure remained the standard even after Lacouture withdrew it a few
weeks later, acknowledging that he had misread his source (Ponchaud) and
that the actual figure might be in the thousands, but adding that he saw
little significance to a difference between thousands killed and a
“boast” of two million killed. This position expresses with some clarity
the general attitude toward fact during this period and since, as does
his further statement that it is hardly important to determine “exactly
which person uttered an inhuman phrase”—the case in question had to do
with inhuman phrases he attributed to Khmer Rouge officials but which
turned out to be mistranslations of phrases that had been fabricated
outright by his source (Ponchaud) or that had appeared not in a
Cambodian journal, as he asserted, but in a Thai journal mistranslated
by Ponchaud that expressed virtually the opposite of what was claimed.
The two-million figure was later upgraded to three million or more,
often citing Vietnamese wartime propaganda. The examples are quite
typical.

Not everyone joined in the chorus. The most striking exceptions were
those who had the best access to information from Cambodia, notably, the
State Department Cambodia specialists. Their view, based on what
evidence was then available (primarily from northwestern Cambodia), was
that deaths from all causes might have been in the “tens if not hundreds
of thousands,” largely from disease, malnutrition, and “brutal, rapid
change,” not “mass genocide.” These tentative conclusions were almost
entirely ignored by the media—we found one important exception in our
review—because they were simply not useful for the purpose at the time,
just as refugee testimony that did not conform to the STV was ignored.
Overseas, journalists who had special knowledge of Indochina also gave
rather nuanced accounts, notably, Nayan Chanda.⁸²

In his detailed, region-by-region study, Vickery shows that the STV was
a picture with little merit, and that the few skeptics had been
essentially accurate for the period in question, although in 1977–78,
something approaching the STV came to be correct in the context of
brutal inter-party purges and the expanding war with Vietnam. He also
makes the obvious logical point that “the evidence for 1977–78,” which
only became available after the Vietnamese conquest in 1979, “does not
retrospectively justify the STV,” which reigned on the basis of evidence
from the 1975–76 period; “and the Vietnamese adoption of some of the
worst Western propaganda stories as support for their case in 1979 does
not prove that those stories were valid.”⁸³ Recent work indicates that
the worst massacres, including those that left the mass graves and
horrifying heaps of skulls found by journalists who entered Cambodia
after the Vietnamese conquest, were in the eastern zone bordering
Vietnam in mid- to late 1978.⁸⁴

The nature of the Western agony over Cambodia during phase II of the
genocide, as a sociocultural phenomenon, becomes clarified further when
we compare it to the reaction to comparable and simultaneous atrocities
in Timor. There, as in phase I of the Cambodia genocide, the United
States bore primary responsibility and could have acted to reduce or
terminate the atrocities. In contrast, in Cambodia under DK rule, where
the blame could be placed on the official enemy, nothing at all could be
done, a point that was stressed by government experts when George
McGovern called for international intervention in August 1978, eliciting
much media ridicule.⁸⁵ Neither McGovern nor anyone else recommended such
intervention against the United States during phase I of the genocide,
or against Indonesia and the United States during the Timor atrocities,
to which the United States (and, to a much lesser extent, other powers)
lent material and diplomatic support, just as there has been no call for
intervention as the armies of El Salvador and Guatemala proceeded to
slaughter their own populations with enthusiastic U.S. support in the
early 1980s.

The comparison between Timor and phase II in Cambodia was particularly
striking, and was occasionally noted after the fact. The excuses now
produced for this refusal to report what was happening in Timor, or to
protest these atrocities or act to stop them, are instructive in the
present context. Thus, William Shawcross rejects the obvious
interpretation of the comparative response to Timor and Cambodia in
favor of a “more structurally serious explanation”: “a comparative lack
of sources” and lack of access to refugees.⁸⁶ Lisbon is a two-hour
flight from London, and even Australia is not notably harder to reach
than the Thai-Cambodia border, but the many Timorese refugees in Lisbon
and Australia were ignored by the media, which preferred “facts” offered
by the State Department and Indonesian generals. Similarly, the media
ignored readily available refugee studies from sources at least as
credible as those used as the basis for the ideologically serviceable
outrage over the Khmer Rouge, and disregarded highly credible witnesses
who reached New York and Washington along with additional evidence from
church sources and others. The coverage of Timor actually declined
sharply as massacres increased with mounting U.S. support. The real and
“structurally serious” reason for this difference in scope and character
of coverage is not difficult to discern (see chapter 1), although not
very comfortable for Western opinion, and becomes still more obvious
when a broader range of cases is considered that illustrate the same
conclusions.⁸⁷

6.2.7. Phase III in Indochina: Cambodia and the bleeding of Vietnam

As we write in 1987, Western moralists remain silent as their
governments provide the means for Indonesia to continue its campaign of
terror and repression in Timor. Meanwhile, the United States backs the
DK coalition, largely based on the Khmer Rouge, because of its
“continuity” with the Pol Pot regime, so the State Department informed
Congress in 1982. The reason for this differential reaction to the
Fretilin guerrillas resisting Indonesian aggression in Timor, and the
Khmer Rouge guerrillas attacking Cambodia from Thai bases, is also
explained by the State Department: the Khmer Rouge-based coalition is
“unquestionably” more representative of the people of Cambodia than
Fretilin is of the Timorese.⁸⁸ There is, therefore, no need to puzzle
over the apparent inconsistency during the late 1970s in U.S. attitudes
toward Pol Pot and the Indonesian generals: the former, the object of
hatred and contempt for the massacres in Cambodia under his rule during
phase II; the latter, our friends whom we cheerfully supplied and
supported as they conducted comparable massacres in Timor at the same
time. This apparent inconsistency, which briefly troubled even the
editors of the _Wall Street Journal_ in the early 1980s,⁸⁹ is now
happily resolved: we support _both_ the Khmer Rouge and the Indonesian
generals.

The current U.S. support for the Khmer Rouge merits little attention in
the media, just as little notice is given to the Vietnamese position: a
political settlement among Cambodians excluding Khmer Rouge leaders Pol
Pot and his close associate Ieng Sary.⁹⁰ As noted earlier, U.S. aid to
the Khmer Rouge is reported by congressional sources to be extensive.
Furthermore, the Reagan administration, following “Chinese rather than
Southeast Asian inclinations,” has refused to back the efforts of its
Southeast Asian allies “to dilute the strength of China’s ally, the
deposed Pol Pot regime, by giving greater weight to non-Communist
guerrillas and political groupings.”⁹¹ Nayan Chanda reported in 1984
that the United States had “more than doubled its financial assistance
to the resistance forces,” mainly through funds earmarked for
humanitarian assistance that permit U.S. allies to divert funds to arms
purchases, a familiar ploy.⁹² While it is claimed that the funds are
limited to the (generally ineffectual) non-Communist resistance, this is
a shallow pretense. “Both Sihanouk’s army and Son Sann’s KPNLF,” the two
components of the non-Communist resistance, “are completely discounted
in Phnom Penh,” James Pringle reports from Phnom Penh in the _Far
Eastern Economic Review_. “ ‘All they do is sit drinking coca-cola on
the border,’ said one well-informed Soviet bloc diplomat.” From the Thai
border areas, Barbara Crossette reports that “Trucks loaded with men and
boys, 150 or 200 at a time, pull away from settlements controlled by Pol
Pot’s Khmer Rouge and rumble into Cambodia,” where the supplies are
carried “into the Cambodian interior to stockpile supplies for the Khmer
Rouge,” in the expectation that they will be able to prevail by military
force and terror once the Vietnamese withdraw as demanded by the United
States. A spokesman for the Sihanoukist National Army in Bangkok
comments that “The main problem we now have is how to get the Vietnamese
to pull out without bringing back the Khmer Rouge,” the probable
consequence of U.S. policy. Former Assistant Secretary of State Richard
Holbrooke comments that the U.S. aid “will end up going to Pol Pot and
his people,” a fact noted also by several journalists. Sydney
Schanberg’s Cambodian associate Dith Pran, whose story of suffering
under DK terror was the basis for the widely publicized film _The
Killing Fields_ and much media commentary, found somewhat greater
difficulty in reaching the public with his view that “Giving U.S.
weapons [to the Khmer resistance] is like putting gasoline on a fire,”
and is the last thing Cambodia needs. David Hawk alleges that “it is
common knowledge that Reagan-administration political officers and
defence attachés from the US Embassy in Bangkok have visited Khmer Rouge
enclaves.”⁹³

The reasons for supporting the Thai-based DK coalition go beyond their
“continuity” with the Khmer Rouge regime. A more fundamental reason was
outlined by our ally Deng Xiaoping in 1979: “It is wise to force the
Vietnamese to stay in Kampuchea because that way they will suffer more
and more and will not be able to extend their hand to Thailand,
Malaysia, and Singapore.”⁹⁴ This motive of “bleeding Vietnam” to ensure
that it does not recover from its victimization at the hands of the West
has additional advantages. By acting in such a way as to enhance
suffering and repression in Indochina, we demonstrate retrospectively
the “benevolence” of our “noble crusade” of earlier years.

As we discussed earlier, the Cambodians were “worthy victims” when they
were being terrorized by the Khmer Rouge under phase II of the genocide,
and they achieved this status once again after the Vietnamese invasion
brought phase II of the genocide to an end, although with a change in
the cast of characters, as the United States joined China in support of
the Khmer Rouge. After early efforts to charge the Vietnamese with
“genocide,” the condemnation of the official enemy shifted to the
terrible acts of “the Prussians of Asia,” who have “subjugated and
impoverished” Cambodia since overthrowing Pol Pot, according to the
editors of the _New York Times_. Recall that of all the horrors of the
past years, including the atrocities of phase I, “what cannot be sponged
away” are “the Khmer Rouge’s butcheries”—evidently of lesser moment in
Washington now that the Pol Pot forces qualify as resistance forces
under the Reagan doctrine.

One would be hard put to find any serious observers of the current
Cambodian scene who believe that the Vietnamese have reduced Cambodia to
a level below that of the DK period, as these comments imply. Rather,
among people who are concerned about the people of Cambodia for
themselves and not merely because of their value for propaganda
exercises, few would question that “it is clear that life for the people
is far better now than under Democratic Kampuchea,”⁹⁵ and some Cambodia
specialists have suggested that the current regime compares favorably
with any of its predecessors. Consistent opponents of aggression would
have a moral basis for condemning the Vietnamese invasion, despite the
rapidly escalating atrocities of 1977–78 and the murderous raids against
Vietnam by Cambodian forces under Pol Pot’s rule.⁹⁶ It is a little
difficult to take this argument seriously, however, when it is put forth
by people who condemn the West for not having undertaken more vigorous
actions to “rescue” the Cambodians from Pol Pot—a “rescue” that would
have been no less self-serving in intent than the Vietnamese invasion,
as history makes clear. And we need not tarry over the argument when it
is offered by those who tolerate or applaud murderous aggression when it
suits their ends: the Indonesian invasion of Timor, the “liberation” of
Lebanon by Israeli forces in 1982 (as the _Times_ editors called it), or
the “defense of South Vietnam,” to mention a few obvious cases.

6.2.8. Phase III at home: the great silence and the hidden potency of the left

Turning to the home front, phase III illustrates the expectations of a
propaganda model in yet a different way. The truth about the response to
the Pol Pot atrocities in the media and “the culture” in general, and
the dramatic contrast to comparable examples where the United States
bears primary responsibility, is not pleasant to contemplate. Since the
facts are too overwhelming to refute, it is a better strategy simply to
dispatch them to the memory hole. This task having been achieved with
the customary alacrity, we may now observe with wonder that “The West
awoke to the suffering of Kampuchea in autumn, 1979” (William
Shawcross), and then go on to ruminate about the curious inability of
the West, always consumed with self-flagellation, to perceive the
atrocities of its enemies.⁹⁷ And so matters have proceeded in the latest
phase of the sad tale of Cambodia.

“There was silence in the mid-1970s during the mass murders by the Khmer
Rouge” (Floyd Abrams), and “The atrocity stories coming out of Cambodia
after 1975 quite simply were not believed” (David Hawk)—at a time when
accusations of genocide of the Hitler-Stalin variety were resounding
from the _New York Times_ and _Washington Post_ to the _Reader’s Digest_
and _TV Guide_ to the _New York Review of Books_, and the mass media
extensively. “The West woke up to the horror of what had happened only
after the Vietnamese invasion” (_Economist_), and “hardly anyone
outside, on Left or Right, had noticed [the horrors of the Pol Pot
regime] at the time they were actually going on (1975–1978)” (Conor
Cruise O’Brien)—that is, at the time when Jimmy Carter branded Pol Pot
“the world’s worst violator of human rights,” and a British Foreign
Office report condemned the regime for the death of “many hundreds of
thousands of people.”⁹⁸ One might imagine that such outlandish claims
could not pass without a raised eyebrow at least, but that is to
underestimate the ability of the ideological institutions to rally to a
worthy cause: in this case, the cause of suppressing the truth about the
Western response to “the decade of the genocide” and other atrocities.

That there was “silence” over Pol Pot atrocities was also an insistent
claim right at the peak of the bitter outrage over Pol Pot genocide.
_Time_ magazine published a major article by David Aikman on July 31,
1978, claiming that the Khmer Rouge “experiment in genocide” was being
ignored, and adding a new twist that was also taken up with enthusiasm
in the subsequent reconstruction of history: “there are intellectuals in
the West so committed to the twin Molochs of our day—‘liberation’ and
‘revolution’—that they can actually defend what has happened in
Cambodia”; “some political theorists have defended it, as George Bernard
Shaw and other Western intellectuals defended the brutal social
engineering in the Soviet Union during the 1930s.” No one was mentioned,
for the simple reason that no one could be found to fit the bill,
although _Time_ did vainly attempt to elicit positive statements about
the Pol Pot regime from antiwar activists to buttress this useful
thesis.

Each of these themes—the “silence” of the West, the defense of Pol Pot
by Western intellectuals—is unequivocally refuted by massive evidence
that is well known, although ignored, by the mobilized intellectual
culture. But this level of misrepresentation in the service of a noble
cause still does not suffice. The two themes were combined by William
Shawcross in an inspired agitprop achievement that carried the farce a
step further.⁹⁹ This new contribution evoked much enthusiasm; several of
the comments just cited are from reviews of his book, or are obviously
inspired by it.

In his study of “Cambodia, Holocaust and Modern Conscience,” Shawcross
muses on the relative “silence” of the West in the face of Khmer Rouge
atrocities. The facts are radically different, but the idea that the
West ignores Communist atrocities while agonizing over its own is far
more appealing to the Western conscience. Shawcross then proceeds to
adopt Aikman’s second thesis, applying it in an ingenious way to explain
the mechanism that lies behind this unwillingness of the West to face up
to Communist atrocities, so notable a feature of Western life. The
silence over phase II of the genocide, he argues, resulted from “the
skepticism (to use a mild term) displayed by the Western left toward the
stories coming out of Democratic Kampuchea. That skepticism was most
fervently and frequently expressed by Noam Chomsky …, [who] asserted
that from the moment of the Khmer Rouge victory in 1975 the Western
press colluded with Western and anti-Communist Asian governments,
notably Thailand, to produce a ‘vast and unprecedented’ campaign of
propaganda against the Khmer Rouge.”¹⁰⁰

To buttress this claim, Shawcross provides what purports to be a
quote—but without citing an identifiable source, for two good reasons.
First, the quote does not exist,¹⁰¹ although even his version undermines
his basic claim, with its reference to “the grim reality” of Cambodia
under Khmer Rouge rule. Second, the source of the manufactured quote is
a work published in November 1979, almost a year after the fall of the
Pol Pot regime. To cite the date would have raised the question of how
this “fervent and frequent” expression of skepticism could have
intimidated governments and the media from 1975 through 1978.
Furthermore, we made it crystal clear that the record of atrocities was
“gruesome,” perhaps even at the level of the most outlandish
fabrications.

Note that Shawcross could have cited real examples of “skepticism”; for
example, the skepticism of State Department analysts at the height of
the furor over Cambodia, or the retrospective comments of Douglas Pike
and others cited earlier (pp. 265–66), or the comments of journalists
during phase II who were willing to conclude only that refugee accounts
“suggest that the Khmer Rouge is finding it hard to govern the country
except by coercion” and “even suggest that terror is being employed as a
system of government,” noting that refugees “did not appear to be in a
sorry condition” and that if the Khmer Rouge are perpetrating an
“atrocity,” as claimed, then “the atrocity did not begin in April
[1975]—it simply entered its sixth year” (William Shawcross).¹⁰² But the
truth plainly would not have served the purposes of this exercise.¹⁰³

Perhaps there was some other example of this “fervent and frequent”
expression of skepticism that silenced the West. Shawcross is wise to
avoid examples, because as he knows well, his primary source, Ponchaud,
went out of his way to praise Chomsky for “the responsible attitude and
precision of thought” shown in what he had written on Cambodia,
referring to our 1977 review of his book cited earlier and unpublished
correspondence he had seen, which exhausts anything relevant that
appears during the DK period.¹⁰⁴ So Shawcross would have us believe that
a single 1977 article in _The Nation_ silenced the West, an article in
which, furthermore, we praised the book written by his primary source,
Ponchaud, as “serious and worth reading,” with its “grisly account of
what refugees have reported to him about the barbarity of their
treatment at the hands of the Khmer Rouge,” and stated that we are in no
position to draw any conclusion about the actual extent of the
atrocities, in conformity to State Department specialists and other
informed sources at the time.

To be clear, in our one article, to which Ponchaud alludes, we did
express some “skepticism,” not only about claims that had already been
withdrawn as fabrications but also about others that remained to be
assessed. Thus in reviewing Ponchaud, we expressed skepticism about his
estimate of casualties caused by American bombing, which appeared to us
excessive and possibly based on misinterpretation of figures he cited;
and we raised questions about some of the quotes attributed to the Khmer
Rouge on which he (and later others) crucially relied, but which he had
presented in very different forms on different occasions—and which he
later conceded to have no basis whatsoever.¹⁰⁵ It is noteworthy that our
skepticism about charges against the United States, although based
merely on suspicion, has elicited no comment, while our skepticism about
charges against the Khmer Rouge, which was based on textual evidence
and, as it later turned out, was much understated, has aroused great
fury in what Vickery describes as “incompetent, even dishonest” and
“often scurrilous” commentary.¹⁰⁶ The differential reaction is easily
explained. It is taken for granted that U.S. actions must be recounted
with scrupulous care and in nuanced manner, so our insistence on this is
simply what is to be expected, meriting no comment. (We agree.) In
contrast, the acts of official enemies merit no such scruples, and it is
an unforgivable crime to question propaganda exercises undertaken in the
service of power.

Notice that even had the “skepticism” of “the Western left” to which
Shawcross alludes existed to any significant degree, the idea that this
could have the consequences he describes, coming from people
systematically barred from the media and mainstream discussion, is a
construction of such audacity that one must admire its creator.
Shawcross argues further that this alleged “left-wing skepticism” not
only silenced Western media and governments but also prevented any
meaningful Western response to Khmer Rouge atrocities. This thesis is
too ludicrous to merit comment, and we can assess Shawcross’s
seriousness in advancing it by turning to his own proposals at the time
as to what could be done, recalling that he had easy access to the
mainstream media throughout. We find not a word suggesting what might be
done¹⁰⁷—for the simple reason that neither he nor anyone else could
think of anything useful. The situation was, of course, quite different
during phase I of the genocide, or with regard to Timor during phase II
and since, and in innumerable other cases where Shawcross’s charge would
indeed be valid. We learn a good deal about “holocaust and the modern
conscience” by observing this exercise and the reaction it elicited.

Shawcross attributes this “left-wing skepticism,” which had such awesome
consequences because of the influence of the left on Western
institutions, in part to Vietnamese propaganda. Vietnam’s “spokesmen had
undercut the refugee stories about Khmer Rouge conduct,” he writes,
“thus adding to disbelief in them, particularly on the Western left,”¹⁰⁸
which naturally takes its cues from Hanoi and closely parrots its
doctrines, according to approved dogma—although it is interesting that
Shawcross also insinuates that the influence of Hanoi extended beyond
its acolytes. And why not? If we have reached the point of claiming that
the Western left silenced the media and governments, why not proceed to
maintain that even outside these dangerous circles, Vietnamese
propaganda is a powerful force in shaping opinion? Naturally Shawcross
does not make even a pretense of providing any evidence for what he
knows perfectly well to be the sheerest fantasy, from beginning to end.

We may place this outlandish explanation of the “silence” of the West
alongside the similar claims that State Department Communists lost
China, that the media are threatening the foundations of democracy with
their “adversarial stance,” etc. The reaction, however, was not
ridicule, but rather great enthusiasm. To cite just one typical example,
David Hawk observes that Shawcross “attributes the world’s indifference”
to “the influence of antiwar academics and activists on the American
left who obfuscated Khmer Rouge behavior, denigrated the post-1975
refugee reports and denounced the journalists who got those stories.”¹⁰⁹
He accepts this thesis as valid but cites no evidence either for the
“indifference” to the atrocities, which were being denounced worldwide
as genocidal, or for the alleged behavior of the American left, nor does
he explain the mechanisms whereby this behavior, had it existed, could
have controlled the mainstream media, or even marginally influenced
them. Convenient mythologies require neither evidence nor logic. Nor do
they require any attention to Hawk’s own performance at the time, as an
Amnesty International official and specialist on Southeast Asia. The AI
Annual Report for 1977 noted that the number of alleged executions in
Cambodia was “fewer than during the preceding year,” and while it
summarizes a number of reports of executions and disappearances, its
account is restrained. The 1978 Annual Report, while stronger in its
allegations of violence, pointed out that refugee reports, on which it
was necessary to rely heavily, “are often imprecise or conflicting,”
thus leaving AI and Hawk in the Shawcross-Hawk category of those who
“denigrated the post-1975 refugee reports.” It is so easy to moralize in
retrospect.

Shawcross develops his thesis further in interesting ways.¹¹⁰ To show
that Western commentators refused to recognize that “the Khmer Rouge was
a Marxist-Leninist government,” he states that British journalist John
Pilger “constantly compared” the Khmer Rouge with the Nazis, suppressing
the fact that he explicitly compared their actions with “Stalin’s
terror,” as Pilger noted in a response to one of the many reviews that
repeated Shawcross’s inventions.¹¹¹ Shawcross claims further that the
present authors “were to believe for years” that “the refugees were
unreliable, that the CIA was cooking up a bloodbath to say, ‘We told you
so.’ ” He cites our one article (_The Nation_, 1977), in which there is
no hint of any such thesis, as there is none elsewhere. In that article
we were clear and explicit, as also subsequently, that refugee reports
left no doubt that the record of Khmer Rouge atrocities was “substantial
and often gruesome,” and that “in the case of Cambodia, there is no
difficulty in documenting major atrocities and oppression, primarily
from the reports of refugees.”¹¹² To support his contention with regard
to our alleged denial of the reliability of refugees, Shawcross cites
our comment on the need to exercise care in analyzing refugee reports,
carefully suppressing the fact that we are quoting Ponchaud, his primary
source, and that the comment he cites is a familiar truism. His
reference to the CIA cooking up a bloodbath is pure fantasy, although we
might add that by the time he wrote, although after our book appeared,
Michael Vickery did present evidence that the Barron-Paul _Reader’s
Digest_ account was in part a CIA disinformation effort.¹¹³ Shawcross
states further his view, “contrary to Chomsky and Herman,” that the U.S.
government was “remarkably inactive” in anti-Khmer Rouge propaganda. We
proposed no U.S. government role whatsoever in orchestrating the deceit
we documented, by William Shawcross and others, and in fact endorsed
State Department reports as the most plausible then available. And so
on, throughout.

But Shawcross and others who are deeply offended by our challenge to the
right to lie in the service of one’s favored state understand very well
that charges against dissident opinion require no evidence and that
ideologically useful accusations will stand merely on the basis of
endless repetition, however ludicrous they may be—even the claim that
the American left silenced the entire West during the Pol Pot period.

Shawcross’s charges against other enemies follow the same
pattern—another factor, presumably, in the appeal of his message. Thus
in pursuit of his fashionable quest to attribute primary responsibility
for the continuing tragedy of Cambodia to Vietnam, not to those who were
responsible for phase I of the genocide with their “careless” policies
and who are now supporting Pol Pot, Shawcross rationalizes the current
support for Pol Pot as a natural response to Vietnamese actions. Given
Hanoi’s invasion of Cambodia and subsequent conduct, he explains, China
and the ASEAN countries of Southeast Asia (not to speak of their
“Western partners”) were bound “to seek to apply all possible forms of
pressure upon Hanoi” to renounce its intentions, and “the Vietnamese
could have predicted that such pressures would include support for the
Khmer Rouge.” Thus the Vietnamese are to blame if China and the United
States support Pol Pot, along with such dedicated advocates of human
rights and the strict reliance on peaceful means as Indonesia and
Thailand. Such analysis is, however, not extended to the Vietnamese, who
are always carrying out cold-blooded strategies in a world without
threats from China or the United States, threats that might allow us to
“predict” (and thus implicitly exonerate) these strategies. According to
Shawcross, “Vietnam’s conduct since its invasion of Cambodia rarely
suggested that it wished to see a compromise in which the Khmer Rouge
were removed as a viable force in Cambodia—which was what the ASEAN
countries and their Western partners insisted was their aim.” “It is
impossible to predict whether any such suggestion [from Hanoi] would
have been accepted by the Chinese or the ASEAN countries, but the point
is that it was never made,” Shawcross asserts without qualification.¹¹⁴
Hanoi has repeatedly offered to withdraw in favor of an indigenous
regime, the only condition being the exclusion of the top Khmer Rouge
leadership. Whether these offers were serious or not, we do not know, as
they have been dismissed by the Deng-Reagan alliance and, with more
vacillation, the ASEAN countries. These rejections, in favor of
continued support for Pol Pot, have not been featured in the media,
which would hardly surprise a rational observer. But these facts are
hardly supportive of Shawcross’s analysis, to say the least.

In a further effort to cast the blame on the approved enemy, Shawcross
asserts that the Vietnamese “placed more confidence in the torturers
than in their victims, that many of those people were actually being
promoted by the new order into positions of new authority over them.” As
his sole evidence, he cites a story, told twice in his book, about an
old woman he met in Cambodia “who described with great passion how the
Khmer Rouge murderer of her son was living, unpunished, in the
neighboring village.” He repeated the same story in the _New York Review
of Books_, eliciting a letter from Ben Kiernan, who accompanied him when
this alleged incident took place (and was his interpreter). Kiernan
cited the tape of the woman’s statement, which reveals that she had
simply said that the murderer had “run away” to a neighboring
“district,” suggesting, as Kiernan notes, that he feared punishment, but
not that he had been “promoted” to “new authority.” Confronted with this
evidence, Shawcross maintained his position while retreating to the
claim that some officials he met “seemed rather unpleasant,” which
suffices to prove the point, according to his logic.¹¹⁵ These examples
are quite typical.¹¹⁶

6.2.9. Summary

Summarizing, prior to “the decade of the genocide,” media treatment of
Cambodia was as predicted by the propaganda model, and the same is true,
quite dramatically, during the two phases of this terrible period and
since. During phase I, refugee testimony was considered uninteresting,
and little is known today apart from the fact that there was obviously
vast slaughter and destruction; this phase does not enter the record as
a “holocaust” or exercise in “genocide,” and the source is forgotten.
During phase II, the myth of the “gentle land” was extended through
1975, and the U.S. role and responsibility for what then took place was
also quite commonly effaced, although some did not sink to this level of
vulgarity. Refugee testimony was eagerly sought, although only if it
lent support to the STV, and evaluations by State Department specialists
and other knowledgeable commentators that gave a more nuanced (and in
retrospect, essentially accurate) picture were dismissed as lacking
utility. There was massive outrage, reaching its peak in early 1977 when
the death toll was still well below that of phase I, with a record of
deception that is highly illuminating.¹¹⁷ As something like the STV came
to be realized in 1977–78, its horrors were downplayed in official
government circles, and subsequent U.S. support for Pol Pot arouses
little notice.

Phase III proceeded along a dual course. In a fanciful reconstruction
that maintains the level of integrity shown throughout, it is alleged
that “left-wing skepticism” so dominated Western opinion and governments
that there was “silence” throughout the DK period; the wide acceptance
of this thesis, despite the quality of the evidence provided and its
manifest absurdity, counts as yet another example of how readily the
most implausible contentions can become doctrine, as long as they are
serviceable. In Indochina, a new phase of Western concern about the
victimization of Cambodia began, with outrage now directed not against
Pol Pot but against the new oppressors who overthrew him. The United
States took a leading role in orchestrating the new concern, which
combined Chinese and U.S. interest in “bleeding Vietnam” with a renewed
exhibition of the Western conscience, properly bounded to exclude phase
I and its long-term effects, and bypassing the U.S. role in support of
Pol Pot—in part via its Chinese allies, who have been admirably frank in
explaining their stand. This carefully channeled benevolence succeeded
in the goal of keeping the Pol Pot forces active and injuring Vietnam
and also, incidentally, the suffering people of Cambodia who are the
objects of our profound concern. The relief effort in 1979–80 did
succeed in aiding Cambodians in distress, but it has also sustained the
Pol Pot forces and thereby impeded Cambodia’s recovery and, perhaps, its
independence, although about this we can only speculate.

Putting aside the undoubtedly sincere reactions of many people who were
exposed to evidence of properly selected atrocities that passed through
the media filter, the only rational conclusion from this illuminating
record is that the West was consumed with horror over Khmer Rouge
atrocities during phase II not because of a sudden passion for the fate
of the suffering people of Cambodia—as the record during phase I, and
elsewhere, makes sufficiently clear—but because the Khmer Rouge had a
useful role to play: namely, to permit a retrospective justification for
earlier French and American crimes in Indochina, and to facilitate the
reconstruction of Western ideology after the Vietnam trauma, so as to
overcome the dread “Vietnam syndrome” and prepare the ground for a
“resurgent America” pursuing its historical vocation of defending
freedom and justice. The actual facts were, and remain, of little
interest, for the same reason.



[]  _7_ CONCLUSIONS



[]


DEFENDING THE MEDIA AGAINST THE CHARGE THAT THEY HAVE become too
independent and too powerful for the public good, Anthony Lewis of the
_New York Times_ writes that

The press is protected [by the First Amendment] not for its own sake but
to enable a free political system to operate. In the end, the concern is
not for the reporter or the editor but for the citizen-critic of
government.

What is at stake when we speak about freedom of the press “is the
freedom to perform a function on behalf of the polity.”¹ Lewis cites
Supreme Court Justice Powell, who observed: “no individual can obtain
for himself the information needed for the intelligent discharge of his
political responsibilities.… By enabling the public to assert meaningful
control over the political process, the press performs a crucial
function in effecting the societal purpose of the First Amendment.”
Therefore, as Judge Gurfein ruled in supporting the right of the _New
York Times _to publish the _Pentagon Papers_ after the government had
failed to show any threat of a breach of security but only the
possibility of embarrassment: “a cantankerous press, an obstinate press,
a ubiquitous press must be suffered by those in authority in order to
preserve the even greater values of freedom of expression and the right
of the people to know.”

We do not accept the view that freedom of expression must be defended in
instrumental terms, by virtue of its contribution to some higher good;
rather, it is a value in itself. But that apart, these ringing
declarations express valid aspirations, and beyond that, they surely
express the self-image of the American media. Our concern in this book
has been to inquire into the relation between this image and the
reality. In contrast to the standard conception of the media as
cantankerous, obstinate, and ubiquitous in their search for truth and
their independence of authority, we have spelled out and applied a
propaganda model that indeed sees the media as serving a “societal
purpose,” but not that of enabling the public to assert meaningful
control over the political process by providing them with the
information needed for the intelligent discharge of political
responsibilities. On the contrary, a propaganda model suggests that the
“societal purpose” of the media is to inculcate and defend the economic,
social, and political agenda of privileged groups that dominate the
domestic society and the state. The media serve this purpose in many
ways: through selection of topics, distribution of concerns, framing of
issues, filtering of information, emphasis and tone, and by keeping
debate within the bounds of acceptable premises. We have sought to show
that the expectations of this model are realized, and often considerably
surpassed, in the actual practice of the media in a range of crucial
cases. We quite agree with Chief Justice Hughes, whom Lewis also cites,
on “the primary need of a vigilant and courageous press” if democratic
processes are to function in a meaningful way. But the evidence we have
reviewed indicates that this need is not met or even weakly approximated
in actual practice.

It is frequently asserted that the media were not always as independent,
vigilant, and defiant of authority as they allegedly are today; rather,
the experiences of the past generation are held to have taught the media
to exercise “the power to root about in our national life, exposing what
they deem right for exposure,” without regard to external pressures or
the dictates of authority (Lewis). It is this period, then, that poses a
challenge to a propaganda model, and we have therefore taken it as the
focus of our inquiry. Many of the examples we discuss are from the past
decade, when the liberal media were allegedly in confrontation with a
“conservative” administration that they would have been expected to
oppose vigorously. In a further effort to ensure that we are not
selecting exceptional cases, we have cast the net widely. We have
selected for close examination cases that pose the most severe challenge
to our model, namely, those put forth by critics as demonstrating that
the media have gone too far in their exuberant independence and
challenge to authority, so far that they must be curbed if democracy is
to survive: for example, the coverage of the Tet offensive, the prime
illustration of alleged excesses of the media offered in the 1970s and
1980s. Even these cases demonstrate the subordination of the media to
the requirements of the state propaganda system. At the peak of alleged
media independence, as the Vietnam War entered its final period and the
media were threatening Nixon’s presidency, the subordination to these
demands never flagged, as illustrated by the media coverage of the Paris
peace treaty of 1973, one of the most flagrant examples of media
misrepresentation based on an uncritical reiteration of official claims
and adherence to the political agenda of the state.

We may illustrate the point in yet another case, chosen by those who
defend the standard version of the media as their strongest ground: the
Watergate affair. To many critics of the media, this incident
illustrates their irresponsible excesses; to those who proudly defend
the media, it illustrates their independence of higher authority and
commitment to the values of professional journalism. What, then, are the
lessons of Watergate?

The major scandal of Watergate as portrayed in the mainstream press was
that the Nixon administration sent a collection of petty criminals to
break into the Democratic party headquarters, for reasons that remain
obscure. The Democratic party represents powerful domestic interests,
solidly based in the business community. Nixon’s actions were therefore
a scandal. The Socialist Workers party, a legal political party,
represents no powerful interests. Therefore, there was no scandal when
it was revealed, just as passions over Watergate reached their zenith,
that the FBI had been disrupting its activities by illegal break-ins and
other measures for a decade, a violation of democratic principle far
more extensive and serious than anything charged during the Watergate
hearings. What is more, these actions of the national political police
were only one element of government programs extending over many
administrations to deter independent political action, stir up violence
in the ghettos, and undermine the popular movements that were beginning
to engage sectors of the generally marginalized public in the arena of
decision-making.² These covert and illegal programs were revealed in
court cases and elsewhere during the Watergate period, but they never
entered the congressional proceedings and received only limited media
attention. Even the complicity of the FBI in the police assassination of
a Black Panther organizer in Chicago was not a scandal, in marked
contrast to Nixon’s “enemies list,” which identified powerful people who
were denigrated in private but suffered no consequences. As we have
noted, the U.S. role in initiating and carrying out the first phase of
“the decade of the genocide” in Cambodia entered the Watergate
proceedings only marginally: not because hundreds of thousands of
Cambodians were slaughtered in the course of a major war crime, but
because Congress was not properly notified, so that its privileges were
infringed, and even this was considered too slight an infraction to
enter the final charges. What was true of Congress was also true of the
media and their investigative reporting that “helped force a President
from office” (Lewis) in what is held to be a most remarkable display of
media independence, or arrogance, depending on one’s point of view.

History has been kind enough to contrive for us a “controlled
experiment” to determine just what was at stake during the Watergate
period, when the confrontational stance of the media reached its peak.
The answer is clear and precise: powerful groups are capable of
defending themselves, not surprisingly; and by media standards, it is a
scandal when their position and rights are threatened. By contrast, as
long as illegalities and violations of democratic substance are confined
to marginal groups or distant victims of U.S. military attack, or result
in a diffused cost imposed on the general population, media opposition
is muted or absent altogether.³ This is why Nixon could go so far,
lulled into a false sense of security precisely because the watchdog
only barked when he began to threaten the privileged.

Exactly the same lessons were taught by the Iran-contra scandals and the
media reaction to them.⁴ It was a scandal when the Reagan administration
was found to have violated congressional prerogatives during the
Iran-contra affair, but not when it dismissed with contempt the judgment
of the International Court of Justice that the United States was engaged
in the “unlawful use of force” and violation of treaties—that is,
violation of the supreme law of the land and customary international
law—in its attack against Nicaragua. The sponsorship and support of
state terror that cost some 200,000 lives in Central America in the
preceding decade was not the subject of congressional inquiries or media
concern. These actions were conducted in accord with an elite consensus,
and they received steady media support, as we have seen in reviewing the
fate of worthy and unworthy victims and the treatment of elections in
client and errant states.⁵

In the case of the Vietnam War as well, as we showed in chapter 5, even
those who condemn the media for their alleged adversarial stance
acknowledge that they were almost universally supportive of U.S. policy
until _after_ large numbers of U.S. troops had been engaged in the
“intervention” in South Vietnam, heavy casualties had been taken, huge
dollar sums had been spent, and elite protest had surfaced on grounds of
threats to elite interests. Only then did elements of the media
undertake qualified reassessments of the “cost-benefit” trade-off. But
during the period of growing involvement that eventually made
extrication difficult, the watchdog actually encouraged the burglar to
make himself at home in a distant land, and to bomb and destroy it with
abandon.

In short, the very examples offered in praise of the media for their
independence, or criticism of their excessive zeal, illustrate exactly
the opposite. Contrary to the usual image of an “adversary press” boldly
attacking a pitiful executive giant, the media’s lack of interest,
investigative zeal, and basic news reporting on the accumulating
illegalities of the executive branch have regularly permitted and even
_encouraged_ ever larger violations of law, whose ultimate exposure when
elite interests were threatened is offered as a demonstration of media
service “on behalf of the polity.” These observations reinforce the
conclusions that we have documented throughout.

The existing level of media subordination to state authority is often
deemed unsatisfactory by critics. We have discussed several examples.
Thus, Freedom House and others who are concerned to protect state
authority from an intrusive public condemn the media for lack of
sufficient enthusiasm in supporting official crusades, and even the
limited challenge to established authority during the Vietnam War and
the Watergate period aroused concerns over the excessive power of the
media. Quite commonly, the slight opening occasionally granted to
dissent is considered far too dangerous to permit. This perception
sometimes even takes the form of a paranoid vision of left-wing power
that sweeps all in its path: for example, the plea of Claire Sterling
and others who dominated media coverage of the Bulgarian Connection that
they could barely be heard above the din of Soviet propaganda. A still
more striking case is the Aikman-Shawcross fantasy, eagerly echoed by
many others, about the “silencing” of the international media and
governments by the left during the Pol Pot era. In reality, there was a
huge chorus of protest over Khmer Rouge atrocities, which reached an
extraordinary level of fabrication and deceit. The significance of these
facts, and of the pretense of left-imposed “silence,” is highlighted by
the contrast with the real silence over comparable atrocities in Timor
at the same time, and the evasions and suppressions during the first
phase of “the decade of the genocide,” to mention two cases where the
United States was the responsible agent and protest could have been
effective in diminishing or terminating large-scale atrocities.

A propaganda model provides a ready explanation for this quite typical
dichotomous treatment. Atrocities by the Khmer Rouge could be attributed
to the Communist enemy and valuable propaganda points could be scored,
although nothing useful could be done, or was even proposed, for the
Cambodian victims. The image of Communist monsters would also be useful
for subsequent U.S. participation in terror and violence, as in its
crusades in Central America shortly after. In El Salvador, the United
States backed the murderous junta in its struggle against what was
depicted as “the Pol Pot left,” while Jeane Kirkpatrick mused darkly
about the threat to El Salvador of “well-armed guerrillas whose
fanaticism and violence remind some observers of Pol Pot”—shortly after
the archbishop had denounced her junta friends for conducting a “war of
extermination and genocide against a defenseless civilian population.”⁶
Some are more circumspect—for example, William Buckley, who observes
that “the Sandinistas have given their people genocide” and are clearly
heading in the direction of Pol Pot, although they have not quite
reached that level yet.⁷ The utility of the show of outrage over Pol Pot
atrocities is evident from the way the fate of these worthy victims was
immediately exploited to justify U.S. organization of atrocities that,
in fact, do merit comparison to Pol Pot.

Atrocities in East Timor, however, have no such utilitarian function;
quite the opposite. These atrocities were carried out by our Indonesian
client, so that the United States could readily have acted to reduce or
terminate them. But attention to the Indonesian invasion would have
embarrassed a loyal ally and quickly disclosed the crucial role of the
United States in providing military aid and diplomatic support for
aggression and slaughter. Plainly, news about East Timor would not have
been useful, and would, in fact, have discomfited important domestic
power groups. The mass media—and the intellectual community
generally—therefore channeled their benevolent impulses elsewhere: to
Cambodia, not Timor.

As we have stressed throughout this book, the U.S. media do not function
in the manner of the propaganda system of a totalitarian state. Rather,
they permit—indeed, encourage—spirited debate, criticism, and dissent,
as long as these remain faithfully within the system of presuppositions
and principles that constitute an elite consensus, a system so powerful
as to be internalized largely without awareness. No one instructed the
media to focus on Cambodia and ignore East Timor. They gravitated
naturally to the Khmer Rouge and discussed them freely⁸—just as they
naturally suppressed information on Indonesian atrocities in East Timor
and U.S. responsibility for the aggression and massacres. In the
process, the media provided neither facts nor analyses that would have
enabled the public to understand the issues or the bases of government
policies toward Cambodia and Timor, and they thereby assured that the
public could not exert any meaningful influence on the decisions that
were made. This is quite typical of the _actual_ “societal purpose” of
the media on matters that are of significance for established power; not
“enabling the public to assert meaningful control over the political
process,” but rather averting any such danger. In these cases, as in
numerous others, the public was managed and mobilized from above, by
means of the media’s highly selective messages and evasions. As noted by
media analyst W. Lance Bennett,

The public is exposed to powerful persuasive messages from above and is
unable to communicate meaningfully through the media in response to
these messages.… Leaders have usurped enormous amounts of political
power and reduced popular control over the political system by using the
media to generate support, compliance, and just plain confusion among
the public.⁹

More significantly for our particular concerns here, the media typically
provide their own independent contribution even without being “used,” in
the manner and for the reasons that we have discussed. Another media
analyst, Ben Bagdikian, observes that the institutional bias of the
private mass media “does not merely protect the corporate system. It
robs the public of a chance to understand the real world.”¹⁰ That
conclusion is well supported by the evidence we have reviewed.

A propaganda model has a certain initial plausibility on guided
free-market assumptions that are not particularly controversial. In
essence, the private media are major corporations selling a product
(readers and audiences) to other businesses (advertisers). The national
media typically target and serve elite opinion, groups that, on the one
hand, provide an optimal “profile” for advertising purposes, and, on the
other, play a role in decision-making in the private and public spheres.
The national media would be failing to meet their elite audience’s needs
if they did not present a tolerably realistic portrayal of the world.
But their “societal purpose” also requires that the media’s
interpretation of the world reflect the interests and concerns of the
sellers, the buyers, and the governmental and private institutions
dominated by these groups.

A propaganda model also helps us to understand how media personnel
adapt, and are adapted, to systemic demands. Given the imperatives of
corporate organization and the workings of the various filters,
conformity to the needs and interests of privileged sectors is essential
to success. In the media, as in other major institutions, those who do
not display the requisite values and perspectives will be regarded as
“irresponsible,” “ideological,” or otherwise aberrant, and will tend to
fall by the wayside. While there may be a small number of exceptions,
the pattern is pervasive, and expected. Those who adapt, perhaps quite
honestly, will then be free to express themselves with little managerial
control, and they will be able to assert, accurately, that they perceive
no pressures to conform. The media are indeed free—for those who adopt
the principles required for their “societal purpose.” There may be some
who are simply corrupt, and who serve as “errand boys” for state and
other authority, but this is not the norm.¹¹ We know from personal
experience that many journalists are quite aware of the way the system
operates, and utilize the occasional openings it affords to provide
information and analysis that departs in some measure from the elite
consensus, carefully shaping it so as to accommodate to required norms
in a general way. But this degree of insight is surely not common.
Rather, the norm is a belief that freedom prevails, which is true for
those who have internalized the required values and perspectives.

These matters are of some importance. We can readily understand why
Guatemalan reporters do not report the atrocities of the 1980s; some
fifty corpses dramatically illustrate the costs of deviance from
authority on the part of independent journalists. To explain why
American reporters avoid such topics, and even go so far as to describe
Guatemala as a model for Nicaragua (see this page), requires further
explanation, and the same is true in innumerable other similar cases,
some of which we have analyzed in detail. A propaganda model provides a
basis for understanding this pervasive phenomenon.

No simple model will suffice, however, to account for every detail of
such a complex matter as the working of the national mass media. A
propaganda model, we believe, captures essential features of the
process, but it leaves many nuances and secondary effects unanalyzed.
There are other factors that should be recognized. Some of these
conflict with the “societal purpose” of the media as described by the
propaganda model; some support it. In the former category, the humanity
and professional integrity of journalists often leads them in directions
that are unacceptable in the ideological institutions, and one should
not underestimate the psychological burden of suppressing obvious truths
and maintaining the required doctrines of benevolence (possibly gone
awry), inexplicable error, good intentions, injured innocence, and so
on, in the face of overwhelming evidence incompatible with these
patriotic premises. The resulting tensions sometimes find limited
expression, but more often they are suppressed either consciously or
unconsciously, with the help of belief systems that permit the pursuit
of narrow interest, whatever the facts.

In the category of supportive factors, we find, first of all, elemental
patriotism, the overwhelming wish to think well of ourselves, our
institutions, and our leaders. We see ourselves as basically good and
decent in personal life, so it must be that our institutions function in
accordance with the same benevolent intent, an argument that is often
persuasive even though it is a transparent _non sequitur_. The patriotic
premise is reinforced by the belief that “we the people” rule, a central
principle of the system of indoctrination from early childhood, but also
one with little merit, as an analysis of the social and political system
will quickly reveal. There are also real advantages in conformity beyond
the rewards and privilege that it yields. If one chooses to denounce
Qaddafi, or the Sandinistas, or the PLO, or the Soviet Union, no
credible evidence is required. The same is true if one repeats
conventional doctrines about our own society and its behavior—say, that
the U.S. government is dedicated to our traditional noble commitment to
democracy and human rights. But a critical analysis of American
institutions, the way they function domestically and their international
operations, must meet far higher standards; in fact, standards are often
imposed that can barely be met in the natural sciences. One has to work
hard, to produce evidence that is credible, to construct serious
arguments, to present extensive documentation—all tasks that are
superfluous as long as one remains within the presuppositional framework
of the doctrinal consensus. It is small wonder that few are willing to
undertake the effort, quite apart from the rewards that accrue to
conformity and the costs of honest dissidence.

There are other considerations that tend to induce obedience. A
journalist or commentator who does not want to have to work too hard can
survive, even gain respectability, by publishing information (official
or leaks) from standard sources;¹² these opportunities may well be
denied to those who are not content to relay the constructions of state
propaganda as fact. The technical structure of the media virtually
compels adherence to conventional thoughts; nothing else can be
expressed between two commercials, or in seven hundred words, without
the appearance of absurdity that is difficult to avoid when one is
challenging familiar doctrine with no opportunity to develop facts or
argument. In this respect, the U.S. media are rather different from
those in most other industrial democracies, and the consequences are
noticeable in the narrowness of articulated opinion and analysis. The
critic must also be prepared to face a defamation apparatus against
which there is little recourse, an inhibiting factor that is not
insubstantial. Many such factors exist, related to the essential
structural features brought to light by a propaganda model but
nevertheless worthy of detailed examination in themselves. The result is
a powerful system of induced conformity to the needs of privilege and
power.

In sum, the mass media of the United States are effective and powerful
ideological institutions that carry out a system-supportive propaganda
function by reliance on market forces, internalized assumptions, and
self-censorship, and without significant overt coercion. This propaganda
system has become even more efficient in recent decades with the rise of
the national television networks, greater mass-media concentration,
right-wing pressures on public radio and television, and the growth in
scope and sophistication of public relations and news management.

This system is not all-powerful, however. Government and elite
domination of the media have not succeeded in overcoming the Vietnam
syndrome and public hostility to direct U.S. involvement in the
destabilization and overthrow of foreign governments. A massive
Reagan-era disinformation and propaganda effort, reflecting in large
measure an elite consensus, did succeed in its major aims of mobilizing
support for the U.S. terror states (the “fledgling democracies”), while
demonizing the Sandinistas and eliminating from Congress and the mass
media all controversy beyond tactical debate over the means that should
be employed to return Nicaragua to the “Central American mode” and
“contain” its “aggressiveness” in attempting to defend itself from a
murderous and destructive U.S. assault on all fronts. But it failed to
win public support even for proxy army warfare against Nicaragua, and as
the costs to the U.S. mounted, and the proxy war accompanied by embargo
and other pressures succeeded in restoring the “Central American mode”
of misery and suffering in Nicaragua and aborting the highly successful
reforms and prospects for development of the early years after the
overthrow of Washington’s ally Somoza, elite opinion too shifted—quite
dramatically, in fact—toward resort to other, more cost-effective means
to attain shared ends.¹³ The partial failures of the very well organized
and extensive state propaganda effort, and the simultaneous rise of an
active grass-roots oppositional movement with very limited media access,
was crucial in making an outright U.S. invasion of Nicaragua unfeasible
and driving the state underground, to illegal clandestine operations
that could be better concealed from the domestic population—with, in
fact, considerable media complicity.¹⁴

Furthermore, while there have been important structural changes
centralizing and strengthening the propaganda system, there have been
counterforces at work with a potential for broader access. The rise of
cable and satellite communications, while initially captured and
dominated by commercial interests, has weakened the power of the network
oligopoly and retains a potential for enhanced local-group access. There
are already some 3,000 public-access channels in use in the United
States, offering 20,000 hours of locally produced programs per week, and
there are even national producers and distributors of programs for
access channels through satellites (e.g., Deep-Dish Television), as well
as hundreds of local suppliers, although all of them must struggle for
funding. Grass-roots and public-interest organizations need to recognize
and try to avail themselves of these media (and organizational)
opportunities.¹⁵ Local nonprofit radio and television stations also
provide an opportunity for direct media access that has been
underutilized in the United States. In France, many local groups have
their own radio stations. In a notable case, the progressive cooperative
Longo Mai, in Upper Provence, has its own 24-hour-a-day Radio Zinzine,
which has become an important community institution that has helped
inform and activate many previously isolated farmers. The potential
value of noncommercial radio can be perceived in sections of the country
where stations such as Pacifica Radio offer a view of the world, depth
of coverage, and scope of discussion and debate that is generally
excluded from the major media. Public radio and television, despite
having suffered serious damage during the Reagan years, also represent
an alternative media channel whose resuscitation and improvement should
be of serious concern to those interested in contesting the propaganda
system.¹⁶ The steady commercialization of the publicly owned air waves
should be vigorously opposed. In the long run, a democratic political
order requires far wider control of and access to the media. Serious
discussion of how this can be done, and the incorporation of fundamental
media reform into political programs, should be high on progressive
agendas.¹⁷

The organization and self-education of groups in the community and
workplace, and their networking and activism, continue to be the
fundamental elements in steps toward the democratization of our social
life and any meaningful social change. Only to the extent that such
developments succeed can we hope to see media that are free and
independent.



[]  APPENDIX 1



[]


THE U.S. OFFICIAL OBSERVERS IN GUATEMALA, JULY 1–2, 1984

For the July 1, 1984, elections in Guatemala, the Reagan administration
sent an observer team, headed by Republican Congressman Ralph Regula,
that also included Congressmen Jack Hightower (Democrat, Texas) and
Mickey Edwards (Republican, Oklahoma); Secretaries of State Jack Brier,
of Kansas, and Ed Simcox, of Indiana; Father Kenneth Baker, editor of
_Homiletic and Pastoral Review_, New York City; John Carbaugh, a
Washington attorney; Jesse Friedman, of the American Institute of Free
Labor Development; Tom Kahn, of the AFL-CIO; Max Singer, of the Potomac
Organization; and Howard Penniman, the election specialist of the
American Enterprise Institute.¹ This group, in Guatemala for a very
brief stay, was transported around the country to “observe” on election
day by helicopter, and made a brief statement and held a press
conference on July 2. That statement and the press conference
proceedings were released by the U.S. embassy in Guatemala City on July
18, 1984, and form the basis for the discussion below.

Although Guatemala had been assailed by human-rights organizations for
years for political murder on a vast scale and record-breaking numbers
of “disappeared,” the words “murder” and “disappeared” do not appear in
the remarks of any of the ten observers who spoke at the press
conference. Other words or phrases never uttered were: “National
Security Doctrine,” “Law of Illicit Association,” “state terrorism,”
“death squad,” “massacre,” “torture,” “forced relocations,”
“civil-defense patrols,” “freedom of the press,” or “voting
requirement.” None of the observers doubted the authenticity of
“positive” responses by Guatemalan peasants to questions by
non-Spanish-speaking foreigners flown in by helicopter in a country
subject to military occupation. All of the observers felt quite capable
of assessing the true feelings of the Guatemalan people on the basis of
long lines, facial expressions, and a handful of responses to visitors
under official protection. There was no dissent among the observers from
the conclusion that the election was fair, inspiring, a testimonial to
the eagerness of the Guatemalan people to participate and express their
patriotic sentiments, and a first step toward democracy. No
demonstration-election cliché was omitted—history was blacked out, and
no basic condition of a free election was examined by the observers.

Let us sample a few of the clichés offered by these Guatemalan election
observers:

1. _PEOPLE FULL OF HOPE—VERY POSITIVE START_. This was a “dynamic
beginning,… a first step,” according to delegation head Ralph Regula.
Father Kenneth Baker found a “great sense of hope for the future … the
spirit of hopefulness.” Jack Brier also observed “a spirit of
hopefulness about the future, but not necessarily confidence in whatever
actions may come about as a result of the elections.” (This is a very
nuanced distinction that Brier was able to make on the basis of
translated brief answers by a few voters.) Tom Kahn claimed that “many
of the workers whom we spoke to on the voting lines told us that they
had great hope, that this was a first step.” Kahn was asked during the
press conference whether he had visited any of the embattled Coca-Cola
workers. He hadn’t. Neither Kahn nor his AIFLD colleague, Jesse
Friedman, mentioned the enormous decline in union membership or the
decimation of union leadership by murder.

2. _LONG LINES, PATIENT VOTERS_. The observers were deeply impressed
with “the way the people patiently waited” to vote (Regula). Howard
Penniman noted “the extraordinary patience of the people voting.” Ed
Simcox pointed out that the voters “did go out, they formed lines very
early in the morning, they waited in some instances two, three, four
hours to go up and vote.” According to Congressman Hightower, “The thing
that impressed us instantly was the long lines.” Tom Kahn was impressed
with the “calm and order which prevailed around the voting tables.”

Long lines and patient voters are quite compatible with voting by a
terrorized population desiring mainly to survive. The official
observers, who never once mention the record of spectacular state terror
in Guatemala, merely _postulate_ that voters who get in line and wait
patiently do so for reasons that are benign.

3. _THE PATRIOTIC IMPERATIVE_. The main theme of this observer team is
that the voters are eager to vote as good patriots, loyal to the
militarized terrorist state that Ronald Reagan and the State Department
find acceptable. Max Singer says that “I did sense that Guatemalans feel
that voting is important to them.” (This is correct, but Singer was not
contemplating the possibility that its importance to them might lie in
fear and a desire to avoid retribution by the omnipresent army.) Regula
said that the people were patiently waiting “for an opportunity to share
in the process of choosing the constituent assembly.” According to
Simcox, “They know that this was the patriotic thing to do, that this
was important for their country.” Tom Kahn found that the people he
talked to in voting lines “expressed a great sense of national pride.”

4. _ABSENCE OF ANY SIGN OF COERCION_. Father Kenneth Baker stated that
“there seemed to be a general atmosphere of no intimidation.” Baker
didn’t say how he sensed this atmosphere, and whether it was assuredly
reliable in a foreign country observed for a day under military guard.
Baker referred to the bishops having urged people to vote, but he failed
to note their extended observations suggesting that a meaningful
election couldn’t be held in an environment of disappearances, terror,
and catastrophic socioeconomic conditions. Jack Brier saw “absolutely no
violence. I saw no evidence of direct military involvement.” A problem
that Brier doesn’t discuss is that if pacification is thorough, no
violence or substantial military presence will be necessary to confirm
military choices. There is absolutely no violence or evidence of direct
military involvement in elections in the Soviet Union. Brier plays dumb,
pretending that violence on election day is really relevant, and
ignoring the long-term violence that strips away institutional
protections and produces a terrorized population.² Congressman Mickey
Edwards did find a military presence in Guatemala, but it was not
“oppressive”: “We did not find anything to indicate that the people in
those areas were under any pressure or intimidation.” How hard Edwards
looked must remain in doubt.³

5. _AMAZING TURNOUT_. Jack Brier referred to the “surprisingly large
turnout,” and Ed Simcox found the 60–70 percent turnout “really an
incredibly positive statistic.” Even the U.S. embassy noted that voting
in Guatemala is compulsory (although it tried to discount this by citing
a Guatemalan official who said that the law was only rarely enforced).
The official observers, however, never mentioned this small matter of a
legal requirement, or the need to get an ID card stamped, let alone the
army warnings and the background of mass killings and disappearances.

6. _HUMAN RIGHTS IMPROVING_. Congressman Mickey Edwards found that “by
all objective observations, the human-rights record in this country has
improved tremendously over the last two or three years.” He does not say
what objective observations he is referring to. Max Singer also found
that “the human-rights record is improving in Guatemala, as near as I
can tell,” partly because the guerrilla movement has weakened, and that
movement has been a serious threat to the human rights of the Guatemalan
people. Singer was asked in the press conference how he determined this
improvement. His answer was “From the statements of people living in the
countryside.”

7. _REASON FOR THE BLANK AND SPOILED VOTES_. Some 26 percent of the
ballots cast in the Guatemalan election, far exceeding the total for any
party, were blank or spoiled. This would seem to compromise the notion
that the Guatemalan people had gotten into long lines out of patriotic
enthusiasm. Howard Penniman explained, however, that this was a result
of illiteracy. Other possibilities are unmentioned. Why the illiteracy
rates were so high thirty years after the United States saved Guatemala
for freedom is also not discussed.

8. _THE CASE FOR FURTHER AID_. The observers showed their objectivity,
and the labor representatives Kahn and Friedman demonstrated their
commitment to liberal principles, by acknowledging that this election
was only a “first step,” and that a full-fledged democracy such as that
just established in El Salvador (Regula) was still to come. Some of the
observers would sanction additional aid immediately, Mickey Edwards
urging that the Guatemalan army would benefit from being “exposed to
American values and to American training.”⁴ The others were more
noncommittal, but agreed that the election was fair, meaningful, and
deserving of U.S. recognition and support.

In sum, this was a caricature of observation, but a fairly typical
performance of U.S. “official observers.” The report of this group was
cited by Stephen Kinzer in the _New York Times_ and elsewhere in the
U.S. press as a serious source of information on the Guatemalan
election. The official report of the Latin American Studies Association
on the Nicaraguan election, written by specialists in the region after
an intensive eight-day investigation, Kinzer and his mass-media
colleagues never mentioned.



[]   APPENDIX 2



[]


TAGLIABUE’S FINALE ON THE BULGARIAN CONNECTION:

A Case Study in Bias

To show in another way the propagandistic quality of the mass media’s
coverage of the Bulgarian Connection, we will examine in detail the
article by John Tagliabue, “Verdict on Papal Plot, But No Answer,”
published in the _New York Times_ on March 31, 1986. This piece, which
provides a final wrap-up that enters “history” as the mature judgment of
the veteran _Times_ newsman assigned to the Rome trial, is a model
illustration of the systematic bias that we believe characterized
mass-media reporting of the Bulgarian Connection, with only minor
exceptions. A close examination shows how Tagliabue incorporates all of
the elements of the Sterling-Henze-Kalb (SHK) model of the connection,
selects facts in accordance with the requirements of that model, and
bypasses conflicting facts and interpretations.¹

The Framing of the Issue: The Case Still “Unresolved”

The court dismissal of the case against the Bulgarians in Rome
confronted the _Times_ with a problem of framing. The _Times_ had
presented the case as plausible for years, and now had to confront the
rejection of the case in a court decision. The solution was to latch on
to the peculiar feature of the Italian judicial system whereby a party
found not guilty can be declared positively innocent or not guilty for
reason of lack of evidence. Thus, as the title of Tagliabue’s article
suggests, there was a verdict, but “no answer,” and Tagliabue’s first
paragraph focuses on the “unresolved” nature of the case. It would have
been possible to stress the fact that the Bulgarians were found _not
guilty_ for lack of evidence, and to emphasize that Western law requires
positive proof of guilt. But the _Times_ was not about to acknowledge
defeat after five years of finding the Bulgarians guilty.

Tagliabue also downplays the court decision by making it an unsurprising
event. “Few people were surprised by the verdict,” states Tagliabue. But
the failure to find the Bulgarians guilty should have been quite
surprising, given the earlier assurances by Sterling and associates that
the Bulgarians were clearly behind the plot, and that, as Paul Henze
stated, the “evidence” has “steadily accumulated to the point where
little real doubt is now possible.”²

An alternative frame would have been as follows: After a three-year
investigation and lengthy trial, backed by the resources of the Italian
state, and despite the powerful interests in Italy and the West with a
stake in finding the Bulgarians guilty, the prosecution still failed to
persuade an Italian jury of Bulgarian guilt. These vested interests and
their propaganda vehicles were given a bone to chew on, however, in the
form of a decision to dismiss the charge for “lack of evidence,” rather
than complete exoneration. This then allowed the propaganda agencies to
frame the case in the Tagliabue manner.

Protection of the Italian Judicial Process

Throughout the history of the case, the U.S. mass media blacked out
evidence of the compromised quality of the Italian institutions involved
in pursuing the connection. Investigating Judge Martella was always
treated as a model of probity, and conflicting facts were ignored.³
Operating in this tradition, Tagliabue wastes space on a gratuitous and
irrelevant accolade to Martella (which is also given a subheading for
emphasis). His statement that “Few people stood up to assail the
magistrate” is absurd, as the trial witnesses were asked to give
concrete evidence on the facts of the case; they were not in a position
to assail the pretrial investigating magistrate, and any such attempts
would have been impermissible in the courtroom. Only the Bulgarian
defense was well qualified and able to assail Martella, and they did so,
in effective statements on March 4–8, 1986, that were unreported in the
_Times_ and the rest of the mass media. Tagliabue points out that
although the trial was supposed merely to verify the findings of the
preliminary investigation, in fact the prosecution did a great deal of
new investigative work. This suggests that the trial court may have
found Martella’s investigation sadly lacking, but Tagliabue never
addresses the point.

Agca’s Desertion of the Case

An important part of the apologetic framework is the claim that Agca,
who had presented an allegedly coherent version of a connection up to
the trial, suddenly did an about face and refused to testify altogether.
Tagliabue devotes several paragraphs to this theme, eventually
suggesting that Agca’s increasingly erratic behavior “may have been
designed to torpedo the efforts of the court.” He suggests that the
prosecutor couldn’t overcome this difficulty, so that the loss of the
case is lodged in Agca’s behavior rather than in any inherent
deficiencies in the prosecution’s case.

In reality, Agca’s claims emerged very slowly and contradictorily, with
dozens of retractions that, taken together, are best explained by
coaching, outside information, and guesses by Agca as to what Martella
and the press would like to hear. There is no reason to believe that
Agca ever offered or settled upon a coherent version of a Bulgarian
connection. On the contrary, it appears that his version changed
continually, and that the final result in Martella’s report was
Martella’s own arbitrary synthesis.⁴

The claim that Agca became more erratic during the trial is also not
based on evidence. Agca’s persistently erratic behavior was obscured by
the secrecy of his earlier testimony, but it is clear from the Martella
report that he was already claiming to be Jesus and displaying other
symptoms of irrationality. Furthermore, Tagliabue’s statement that Agca
refused to cooperate during the trial is false—Agca periodically
withdrew from the proceedings when his testimony became too incoherent,
but he always returned to the stand, and he answered a vast number of
questions. One hypothesis that Tagliabue never entertains is that if
Agca’s claims were based on coaching and/or imagination, in an open
court he would be vulnerable and quickly pushed to the wall.

Tagliabue also never asks this further question: Even if Agca had
clammed up (which was not true), given the extensive Martella
investigation and report, why would the court not be able to follow the
already established leads to a successful outcome? Why was not a single
witness produced to confirm Agca’s allegations of numerous meetings and
trips with Bulgarians in Rome? Why was the car allegedly rented by the
Bulgarians never found? Where is the money supposedly given to Agca?
Tagliabue fails to address these questions.

“Partial Confirmation” of Agca’s Tale

Tagliabue describes some alleged partial confirmations of Agca’s claims.
The first is that “Mr. Ozbey said the Bulgarians had indeed wanted to
use Mr. Agca to shoot the Pope, but did not trust him.” But this is not
a partial confirmation if the net result was that the Bulgarians failed
to hire Agca. Furthermore, another reporter present when Ozbey testified
in Rome claims that Ozbey did _not_ tell the court that the Bulgarians
“wanted to use” Agca. According to Wolfgang Achtner, of ABC-TV News, in
Rome, the only thing Ozbey said was that the Bulgarians “listened with
interest, but behaved with indifference” (the translation by the Turkish
interpreter in court), or “listened with interest but didn’t take it
seriously” (Achtner’s own translation). In short, it would appear that
Tagliabue has doctored the evidence.

The other “partial confirmation” is that “Catli hinted at obscure secret
service contacts with West German intelligence, and of payments for
unspecified purposes to Turks involved in the investigations.” This
vague statement does not even mention the plot against the pope and is
partial confirmation of nothing. The most important Catli evidence
bearing on this point was his description of the attempt by the West
German police to bribe Agca’s supposed co-conspirator Oral Celik to come
to West Germany and confirm Agca’s claims. This supports the coaching
hypothesis: accordingly, Tagliabue blacks it out. The only other
testimony by Catli mentioning the secret services involved Gray Wolves
leader Ali Batman, who told Catli he had heard from the German secret
police that at a meeting in Romania, the Warsaw Pact powers had decided
to kill the pope. This was apparently a leak of the forged SISMI
document of May 19, 1981, which had made this claim. Thus the hearsay
recounting of the substance of a forgery is Tagliabue’s “partial
confirmation” of Agca’s claims of a plot.

We should also note that while he cites these alleged “partial
confirmations,” nowhere does Tagliabue list the contentions of Agca that
remained unconfirmed.

The Soviet - Bulgarian Motive

Two of Tagliabue’s thirty-two paragraphs were devoted to expounding the
Soviet motive in allegedly sponsoring Agca’s assassination attempt: “to
crack religiously inspired resistance to Communist rule in Poland.”
Tagliabue here follows a long-standing _Times_ tradition of absolutely
refusing to allow a counterargument to be voiced on this issue. Even if
they covered their tracks well, a Soviet-inspired murder of the pope
would have been blamed on the Soviets, solidified Polish hostility, and
had enormously damaging effects on Soviet relations with Western Europe.
Thus it would have been risky without any offsetting benefits.⁵

Who gained and who lost from the plot? Were there any possible Western
motives that might bear on the case? Tagliabue follows the SHK line in
failing to raise these questions. But once Agca was imprisoned in Italy,
cold warriors of the West had much to gain and little to lose by
manipulating Agca to pin the assassination attempt on the East.
Tagliabue mentions that the charges of a Bulgarian Connection surfaced
“at the nadir” of U.S.-Soviet relations. While he notes how this added
to the credibility of the plot in the West, he never hints at the
possibility that its serviceability to the new Cold War might _explain_
Agca’s belated confession.

Agca’s Stay in Bulgaria

This has always been critical in the Sterling-_Times_ scenarios, and
Tagliabue drags it in. It is given further emphasis with the heading
“Spent 2 Months in Bulgaria.” Tagliabue does not mention that Agca
stopped in eleven other countries. He fails to note here, and the
_Times_ suppressed throughout, Catli’s testimony in Rome that the Gray
Wolves liked to go through Bulgaria to reach Western Europe because the
heavy Turkish traffic made it easy to hide. Tagliabue fails to mention
that bringing Agca for a long stay in Sofia would have been a violation
of the rule of plausible deniability. Even more so would be using
Bulgarians to help Agca in Rome. Tagliabue does not discuss the question
of plausible deniability. He also fails to note that if Agca had stayed
in Sofia for a while, this would allow a prima facie case to be made by
a Western propagandist that the East was behind the shooting, and could
provide the basic materials for working Agca over for the desired
confession.

Bulgarian Involvement in Turkey

Tagliabue asserts that the Bulgarians were “purportedly” supporting both
the extreme left and right in Turkey “to promote instability” in a
conflict “that pitted violent leftist terrorists against their
counterparts on the right.” This is a Sterling myth, with Tagliabue
hiding behind “purportedly” to allow him to pass off myth as purported
evidence. The equating of left and right in the Turkish violence of the
1970s is false: the great majority of violent attacks were launched by
the Gray Wolves, under the protection of the police and military.
Tagliabue also fails to discuss the fact that the extreme right actually
participated in the government in 1977 and had extensive links to the
army and intelligence services. The claim of Bulgarian support for both
the right and left has never been supported by evidence. Tagliabue never
mentions that the United States had more than “purported” links with the
Turkish army, the secret services, and the Fascist Nationalist Action
party, and that the terrorist events of the late 1970s eventually served
U.S. interests well.

Key Question: How Agca Knew So Much

The “key question” for Tagliabue is “how Agca knew what he knew and when
he knew it.” This is an important issue, but there are others that he
might have raised if he had worked outside the SHK format. Why did it
take Agca so long to name Bulgarians? Was he subject to any coercion or
offered any positive inducements to make him talk. Why did he have to
make major retractions? Is it not suspicious that when Agca finally
talked, he said just what his interrogators wanted him to say? How are
we to evaluate a judicial process where the witness (Agca) was in
regular contact with outside sources of information, and where he could
lie and retract evidence without penalty?

“Even the Attorneys for the Bulgarians.…”

In assessing how Agca knew so much, Tagliabue allocates only one
paragraph to the possibility that Agca was coached. On the other hand,
he goes to great pains to stress that Agca knew an awful lot—telephone
numbers, personal habits, nicknames. Tagliabue gives as the “simplest
explanation” of Agca’s knowledge that he had access to books,
newspapers, magazines, and other materials from the outside.
Interestingly, he fails to mention the numerous prison contacts between
Agca and secret service, Mafia, and Vatican agents and emissaries. Agca
even wrote a letter to the Vatican complaining of the pressure from its
representative in prison (also linked to the Mafia), a fact long blacked
out by the _Times_. These visits would point to the ease with which Agca
could have been fed information while in prison. Tagliabue will not
admit facts that get into this dangerous territory.

A major question is how Agca knew details about Antonov’s apartment
_when he later admitted to Martella that he had never been there_. The
Bulgarians and Antonov’s defense went to great pains to prove that the
information Agca provided about Antonov’s apartment had never been
divulged in the media before Agca enumerated the details. This implied
coaching, as did a mistake in identification where Agca described a
characteristic of Antonov’s apartment that fitted other apartments in
the building, but not Antonov’s. Tagliabue says that “Even the attorneys
for the Bulgarians acknowledge” that Agca named things not available
through reading the papers, as if they were conceding a point, not
making a devastating case for coaching. Newspaper work couldn’t be more
dishonest than this.

“The More Sinister View”

In a single, late paragraph devoted to the possibility of coaching,
Tagliabue merely asserts it as a claim, without providing a single
supportive point of evidence, although there are many.⁶ He uses a double
propagandist’s put-down—ironically designating the coaching hypothesis
as “the more sinister view,” and stating that it is “espoused by critics
of the case on the political left, including Soviet bloc governments.”
Even Tagliabue, in his earlier news reports, had mentioned Mafia
official Giovanni Pandico’s statement in Italy outlining a scenario of
coaching at which he claimed to be present, but Tagliabue doesn’t even
cite this or any other documents or facts that lend support to the
coaching hypothesis. He sticks to the ingredients that fit the SHK
format—good Martella, Agca the betrayer of the case, the Soviet motive,
Agca’s visit to Bulgaria, and his knowledge of details. All other
materials are designated “sinister” or blacked out to enhance the
credibility of the party line.

Agca Helped the Bulgarians

Tagliabue closes his article with a quote from Agca’s attorney that the
Bulgarians “should be thankful” to Agca. This reiterates one of
Tagliabue’s preferred themes—that Agca deliberately blew the case. This
is derived from Sterling’s theory that Agca’s vacillations were really
“signals” to the Bulgarians, alternately threatening and rewarding them,
but aiming at getting them to help him out of jail. In his earlier
articles Tagliabue followed this line, and it is implicit in this
summing-up article, although it is a wholly unproven Sterling gimmick.⁷
What was Agca bargaining for in the trial? Did he expect the Bulgarians
to spring him? To admit their own involvement in the case by arranging a
deal for his release? And if he was sabotaging the case in order to win
favor with the Bulgarians, and since the Bulgarians obviously refused to
respond, why did he not finally decide to do them injury? Tagliabue
never addresses these points.

In sum, this is a model case of propaganda under the guise of “news” or
“news analysis.” In this instance there are a number of lies, but these
are less important than the other systematic distortions. Tagliabue and
the _Times_ frame the issue in terms of probable Bulgarian guilt and the
factors that caused the case to be lost—exclusive of those suggesting
that there was no case to begin with. They refuse to discuss the failure
to obtain confirmation of any factual claims of meetings or deals with
Bulgarians. They fail to discuss—or even to mention—problems of
plausible deniability. They reiterate the elements of the preferred SHK
model without noting the illogic or the incompatible facts. They ignore
evidence that would support the coaching model. They use invidious
language only for the disfavored line of argument and spokespersons,
manipulating words and bending evidence to the desired end. This article
should be perfect for classroom use in courses on propaganda, media
bias, and related subjects.



[]   APPENDIX 3



[]


BRAESTRUP’S _BIG STORY:_

Some “Freedom House Exclusives”

In “The Tet offensive” (p. 211), we considered the example that has
regularly been put forth to substantiate the charge that the media adopt
an “adversarial stance” with regard to established power—coverage of the
Tet offensive—and the Freedom House study on which this charge is based.
As we saw, in this case too the behavior of the media conforms to the
expectations of the propaganda model, and the major theses advanced in
the Freedom House study are refuted even by their own evidence. What
remains of their charge is the possibility that media coverage of the
Tet offensive was technically incompetent, although subordinated to
elite requirements. Turning to a closer examination of this charge, we
find that the shoe is on the other foot: when “Freedom House exclusives”
are corrected, the performance of the media appears quite creditable,
while the incompetence of the Freedom House study is seen to transcend
even the level already demonstrated. That this study has been taken
seriously, and permitted to set much of the agenda for subsequent
discussion, is a most intriguing fact.

According to Freedom House, television commentary and _Newsweek_ are the
worst offenders in this “extreme case” of journalistic incompetence, so
let us begin by reviewing some of their sins. One example to which
Braestrup reverts several times is Walter Cronkite’s “much publicized
half-hour CBS ‘special’ on the war” on February 27 (_Big Story_, I,
158). According to Braestrup, Cronkite’s “assessment” here is “that U.S.
troops would have to garrison the countryside” (I, 645). In his
foreword, Leonard Sussman properly observes that “We do not expect the
reader to accept on faith our various analyses or judgments,” and so
“the complete texts of many of the reports discussed” are presented,
primarily in volume II (I, x). Following his advice, we turn to volume
II, where we find the complete text of Cronkite’s “special” (180ff.).
There is not even a remote hint of the “assessment” that Braestrup
attributes to him.

In this important “special,” Braestrup claims, “In effect, Cronkite
seemed to say, the ruins, the refugees, the disruption of pacification
that came at Tet added up to a defeat for the allies that would force
President Johnson to the negotiating table” (I,158). Cronkite says
nothing of the kind. He reports that “there are doubts about the measure
of success or setback,” noting accurately that “the experts do not agree
on the objectives or on the amount of success the communists had in
achieving them.” They “failed” in many of their aims, but in a third
phase the enemy might “recoup there what he lost in the first two
phases.” In what he calls a “speculative, personal, subjective”
judgment, Cronkite states that he is “not sure … who won and who lost,”
or to what extent. He concludes that the United States is probably
“mired in stalemate,” and that historians may conclude that the Tet
battle was “a draw”; “To suggest we are on the edge of defeat is to
yield to unreasonable pessimism.” He does not say that Johnson will be
“forced” to the negotiating table by a “defeat,” but rather that if
indeed there is a “stalemate,” then “the only rational way out then will
be to negotiate, not as victors, but as an honorable people who lived up
to their pledge to defend democracy, and did the best they could.” Note
the typical reiteration of government propaganda concerning American
aims, unsullied by the factual record—enormous in scale, by this time—of
U.S. government efforts to undermine democracy and to destroy all
popular forces—the NLF, the Buddhist “third force,” etc.—in South
Vietnam, on the assumption, openly admitted, that the forces placed in
power by U.S. violence could not survive political competition. Recall
also that in these comments that Freedom House derides, Cronkite reaches
essentially the same conclusion as did the chairman of the Joint Chiefs
of Staff, General Wheeler, in his summary to the president on the same
day as Cronkite’s broadcast, and the president’s advisers a month later.

We may note also that two weeks earlier, Cronkite had “assessed” the
impact of the Communist offensive, on the basis of U.S. and Vietnamese
sources, reporting that “first, and simplest, the Vietcong suffered a
military defeat” (I,158). Similarly, on an NBC-TV special of March 10
that Braestrup repeatedly condemns, Howard Tuckner stated that
“Militarily the allies won” (I, 159), as did others repeatedly.

Cronkite’s “special” is exhibit A in the Freedom House indictment. The
example is typical of the relation between their conclusions and the
evidence they cite.

Braestrup refers to a television comment by Robert Schakne on February
28 for which he gives the following paraphrase: “In short, the United
States would now have to take over the whole war, including the
permanently damaged pacification program, because of Saigon’s failures”
(I, 562–63). Braestrup claims further that Schackne attributed “this
argument” to Robert Komer. This he calls “a CBS exclusive,” his standard
term of derision. In fact, “this argument” is yet another “Freedom House
exclusive.” What Schackne said, according to Braestrup, is that it was
“likely” that Komer was in Washington with General Wheeler to ask for
more troops “to help get the Vietnam pacification program back on the
road.” The preceding day, Wheeler had requested that the troop level be
raised from 525,000 to 731, 756, one primary concern being that “There
is no doubt that the RD Program [pacification] has suffered a severe set
back,” that “To a large extent the VC now control the countryside,” and
that “US forces will be required in a number of places to assist and
encourage the Vietnamese Army to leave the cities and towns and reenter
the country.”¹ While Braestrup’s version of Schackne’s “argument” has
little resemblance to the actual words he attributes to Schackne, these
words were, if anything, understated.

Braestrup then goes on to claim that Cronkite “used the same argument
almost verbatim, but with an even stronger conclusion” in a February 28
radio broadcast. There is no hint in the actual broadcast of Braestrup’s
“argument.” The closest Cronkite came to this “argument” is his
statement that “_presumably, Ambassador Komer told a sad tale to
President Johnson_” (Braestrup’s emphasis). Cronkite then repeated
accurately the basic facts presented by Komer in a briefing four days
earlier. He concluded that “it seems likely that today Ambassador Komer
asked President Johnson for more American troops so that we can
permanently occupy the hamlets and fulfill the promise of security [sic]
to their residents, a promise the Vietnamese alone apparently cannot
honor,” the NLF not being Vietnamese, as usual. Apart from the tacit
assumption of the propaganda system that the villagers yearn for the
fulfillment of this “promise of security” from the NLF, Cronkite’s
speculation that U.S. troops would have to fulfill a promise that ARVN
_alone_ apparently could not honor hardly seems unreasonable, three days
after General Westmoreland had stated that “additional U.S. forces would
probably be required” (II, 159), and that with them “we could more
effectively deny the enemy his objectives”; four days after Komer had
described the Tet offensive as a “considerable setback” to pacification;
a day after Cronkite had presented a television interview with Captain
Donald Jones, deputy pacification adviser for the district regarded as
“the bowl of pacification,” who said that “for most of the District,
pacification does not exist,” and travel there is impossible (CBS-TV
“special” of February 27, cited above); and one day after General
Wheeler had asked for a huge troop increase justified in part by the
need to overcome the fact that “To a large extent the VC now control the
countryside.”

Television and radio are not alone in being subjected to “Freedom House
exclusives.” Here are a few examples.

Exuding contempt and derision, the study informs us that “no one” except
for George McArthur (AP) and Don Oberdorfer (Knight) “reported … on what
happened to Hue’s civilians under Vietcong rule” (I, 299). Again
demonstrating his considerable gift for self-refutation, Braestrup cites
reports on Vietcong executions, kidnappings, burial of executed
civilians in mass graves, etc., in Hué under Viet Cong rule by
_Newsweek_, UPI, _Washington Post_, William Ryan, Reuters, _New York
Times, Time, London Times_, and the NBC “Today” show (I, 277, 281–84,
472). On page 283, Braestrup writes that “The television networks, as
far as our records show, made no mention of the executions at all”; on
page 472, he refutes this claim, noting that on February 28, in an
“aftermath film report from Hue … at battle’s end,” the NBC “Today” show
“hinted at the Hue massacre with this statement: ‘Hundreds of government
workers were killed and thrown into temporary graves.’ ” A rather broad
“hint,” it would seem. The example is typical of the Freedom House style
of handling evidence.

In this connection, we should observe that the numerous stories on the
Hué massacre cited by Braestrup in self-refutation referred to the
official allegations that 300 to 400 government officials were killed in
Hué, a considerable massacre but “only one-tenth of the civilian toll in
the fighting,” so that “it did not seem like a major story,” Gareth
Porter comments; he adds that “What made the ‘Hue massacre’ a major
story was the publicizing by U.S. embassy propagandist Douglas Pike, who
wrote a pamphlet on the subject in late 1969 at the request of the
American ambassador to Saigon, Ellsworth Bunker.” Pike’s account was
given wide coverage when it appeared and has become the basis for the
standard versions since, despite the dubious source: “given the fact
that Pike was relying on the Saigon political warfare department for
most of his data, which was otherwise unverified, one might have asked
for more skepticism and reserve from the press,” Porter observes—rather
plausibly, it would seem. Porter adds that the documents made available
by the U.S. mission in 1971 “contradicted Pike on every major point.”
According to former CIA analyst Frank Snepp, “The whole idea of a
bloodbath was conjured out of thin air,” and the stories were planted in
the press by American officials “to generate sympathy for the South
Vietnamese abroad”—in short, the “careful psychological warfare program
pinning the blame on the communists” urged by “seasoned observers,” as
John Lengel of AP reported from Hué.²

Presenting no evidence or argument, Braestrup accepts Pike’s analysis
and the U.S. government position as correct. In a footnote, he remarks
that “Pike’s account was challenged by D. Gareth Porter, a Cornell
University graduate student, admirer of the National Liberation Front,
and, briefly, a Saigon resident,” but dismisses this as part of “a minor
point of political contention” (I, 285–86). He describes Pike, in
contrast, as “the independent-minded USIA specialist on the Vietcong”
(I, 196),³ and makes no reference to the detailed analysis of Pike’s
allegations that had been presented by Porter, one of the few American
scholars concerned with Vietnam. Similarly, Leonard Sussman takes it as
obvious, without argument, that the government position must be correct,
and that “the war’s largest systematic execution of civilians” is the
responsibility of the Viet Cong—thus excluding the systematic slaughter
of thousands of civilians in Hué by U.S. firepower, possibly including
many of those attributed to the Viet Cong massacre.⁴ Also unmentioned
here is the curious timing of the exposures that have since become the
standard version of the Hué massacre, a few days after the belated
exposure of the My Lai massacre in late November 1969, when

Army officers in Saigon made available “newly found” captured Viet Cong
documents showing that Communist troops killed nearly 2,900 Vietnamese
during the Hue offensive in February, 1968. Officers said the documents
went unnoticed in U.S. military files for nineteen months until a
correspondent’s questions about Hue brought them to light. “I know it
sounds incredible, but that’s the truth,” one official said.⁵

We will not attempt to explore in this review what is not so much as
attempted in the Freedom House study, but merely note, once again, that
we have here not a work of scholarship but rather a government
propaganda tract.

Max Frankel commented in the _New York Times_ (Feb. 11, 1968) that
pressures at home and in Vietnam “are thought to have raised once again
the temptation of further military escalation” (I, 584, italicized by
Braestrup for emphasis as an example of raising “straw men”). Frankel
was quite accurate in this measured statement. As Braestrup points out,
“Wheeler and Westmoreland agreed that it was also a good time to urge a
bolder Vietnam strategy, with more troops to gain quicker results: i.e.,
forays into Laos, Cambodia, and possibly that part of North Vietnam just
above the DMZ.” Why then the “straw man” charge? Because, Braestrup
objects, escalation “was hardly a _tempting_ prospect for Johnson” (his
emphasis), hardly Frankel’s point. Braestrup claims further that
Frankel, in this article, suggested “that escalation—notably a reserve
call-up—was probable” (I, 586). Frankel’s article does not appear in the
accompanying volume of documents; turning to it, we discover that
Braestrup’s claim is another Freedom House exclusive, suggested nowhere
in Frankel’s article, which is noteworthy only for its standard
reiteration of government propaganda about the goal of bringing
“security” to “the people of South Vietnam”—by B-52 bombing of villages,
the exploits of Task Force Barker at and around My Lai at just that time
as part of the general ravaging of Quang Ngai Province, etc.

After television, _Newsweek_ is the worst offender. Let us therefore
inquire further into its misdeeds. In what Braestrup describes as
_“Newsweek’_s major statement on the Thieu-Ky regime,” a March 18
feature entitled “Vietnam: A Reappraisal,” the journal commented
accurately in an editorial entitled “The Political Morass” that “land
reform, a vital element in any effort to win the loyalty of the
peasantry, has not been tackled seriously” (I, 534–36), a truism
familiar to everyone from the American high command to officials in
Washington. Braestrup comments: “It is difficult, once again, to fathom
_Newsweek’_s logic. Surely, neither _Newsweek_ nor the Vietnamese
peasant expected the regime to tackle land reform seriously in the
aftermath of Tet.” It is perfectly obvious that in this “reappraisal,”
_Newsweek_ is referring to the general picture, not specifically to the
post-Tet period of one month.

According to Braestrup, “_Newsweek_, throughout the February-March 1968
period, was to refer, in passing, to the ‘wily’ Giap, ‘tough’ North
Vietnamese regulars, ‘ominous’ enemy activity, and in general, to a foe
without setbacks or flaws” (I, 229). Turning to the facts, on March 11,
_Newsweek_ presented an analysis in which it reported that the
Communists “were still plagued by the confusion that is characteristic
of all military operations.” The report (II, 216f.) goes on to describe
“inexplicable” failure to blow up a crucial bridge, failure to use main
forces adequately to maintain momentum, misassessment of popular moods
and U.S.-ARVN tactics, inadequate preparation of troops, etc.,
concluding that “the communists did not achieve most of their
objectives.” The following week’s article on Khe Sanh reports a marine
view that “Charlie missed his golden opportunity” by bad tactics.
_Newsweek_’s picture of “a foe without setbacks or flaws” is another
Freedom House exclusive.

What of the other sins? As for the reference to the “wily” Giap, compare
_Newsweek_ with what Braestrup regards as the outstanding analysis by
Douglas Pike, who describes Giap as a “master tactician,” “one of the
best tactical commanders of the 20th century,” etc. (1, 196f.). On the
“toughness” of the North Vietnamese and their “ominous” activity, see
the regular reports of the U.S. military command, and an extensive
literature by Vietnam veterans.

Braestrup claims that “one searches in vain through most of the media
descriptions of the foe, even well into March 1968, for indications that
the enemy’s planning, tactics, execution, zeal, and weaponry were less
than flawless”; “there were few hints in _Times_ analyses or battlefield
reporting that the foe was anything but shrewd, tenacious, ascetic,
infallible and menacing, and in this case the paper had plenty of
company” (I, 186, 216). Apart from “flawless” and “infallible,” further
Freedom House exclusives, the adjectives can be taken from the military
reports and seem unexceptionable. The claim that the media regarded the
enemy as infallible is defended through pages 186 to 231, along with
typical Freedom House self-refutation: example after example to the
contrary is cited, in addition to those just mentioned. The media
reported that the VC “undoubtedly” alienated the population, as they
caused “indiscriminate slaughter” and “totally misjudged the mood of the
South Vietnamese.” They may be suffering “a severe manpower problem” and
“hurting badly.”⁶ They “failed to achieve their main objectives.”
Captured VC got lost in Saigon and were falsely told that they would be
welcomed. (This appears under Braestrup’s heading “Television: in praise
of the VC.”) They did not “get—or heed” important information. And so
on. All in all, hardly the picture of an “infallible” and “flawless”
enemy.

Note also the Freedom House assumption that a free press, militantly
guarding its objectivity, should not only consider those who are
resisting the U.S. attack as “the enemy,” “the foe,” etc., but must also
refrain from accurately describing “the enemy” as tough, resolute, and
courageous. To play its proper role in a free society by Freedom House
standards, the media should never veer a moment from the kind of service
to the state demanded and secured by force in totalitarian states, so it
appears.

The impact of the Freedom House study comes from the impression of
massive documentation and the huge resources that were employed to
obtain and analyze it. Case by case, the examples collapse on
inspection. Here are a few more examples, far from exhaustive.⁷

On pacification, “TV and radio commentators went far beyond the
available information to imply the dramatic worst.” Three examples are
cited to prove the point (1, 565). Howard Tuckner, of NBC-TV, reported
from New York the views of “U.S. intelligence officials” and “Some U.S.
officials in Vietnam”—correctly, as Braestrup concedes in a footnote,
adding that these were the views of “CIA in _Washington_” and
“Disheartened junior CORDS officials in Vietnam.” By Freedom House
standards, it is improper to cite such sources accurately. The second
example is a CBS radio report criticized only for being “depressed”—as
were pacification officials on the ground. The third example is from an
NBC-TV “special,” in which Dean Brelis says that we don’t know what is
happening in the rural areas but “can only imagine,” and that “the
cities are no longer secure; perhaps they never were.”⁸ Hardly
remarkable, and far from the fevered conclusion drawn in Braestrup’s
paraphrase.

Examples of what Braestrup calls “straw man journalism” abound in his
own presentation. Thus he faults the media for claiming that the
pacification program had been destroyed, whereas his own conclusion is
that “pacification, although hit hard, was not ‘dead’ … it was a mixed
picture, but clearly neither a military nor a psychological ‘disaster’ ”
(1, 716). The media regularly reported that pacification was hit hard,
not dead, as his own evidence clearly shows—in contrast to the Pentagon,
which took a more pessimistic view, as we shall see directly.
Braestrup’s “straw man journalism” may impress careless readers skimming
the text for dramatic conclusions, but it presents no evidence and
amounts to no argument.

Braestrup refers sarcastically to “insights into Vietnamese psychology,”
as when Morley Safer, watching marines burning down huts in Cam Ne,
concluded that a peasant whose home was destroyed would find it hard to
believe “that we are on his side” (I, 43). How does Safer know? Perhaps
the peasant enjoyed watching the flames. Not all such “psychoanalyzing”
is derided, however, as when General Westmoreland explains that “the
people in the cities are largely indignant at the Vietcong for violating
the sanctity of the Tet period and for their tactics which brought about
damage to the cities” (II, 164), or when he expounds on the peasant
“state of mind” (I, 78). Note that Safer is not criticized for accepting
the tacit assumption that the press is an agency of the invading army
(“_we_ are on his side”).

Braestrup states that “the embassy fight became the _whole_ Tet
offensive on TV and in the newspapers during that offensive’s second
day” (his emphasis; 1, 126); this illustration of the incompetence of
the media is thoroughly refuted by his story index. He also claims that
the media exaggerated VC success in the early confusion by claiming that
the embassy had been entered—failing, however, to compare these accounts
with the reports by military police that they were taking fire from
inside the embassy, or the message log of the 716th MP Battalion, which
reads: “General Westmoreland calls; orders first priority effort to
_recapture_ U.S. Embassy” (I, 92; our emphasis). It is intriguing to
read Braestrup’s outrage over quite accurate press reporting of what was
said by Westmoreland, military police involved in the fight, and others,
and in particular over the fact that the press did not simply rely on
Westmoreland’s later account (his apparent belief that the embassy had
been “captured” goes beyond any reporter’s error that Braestrup cites).
A careful reading shows that media reports were surprisingly accurate,
given the confusion of the moment, although one cannot fault Braestrup’s
profound conclusion that “first reports are always partly wrong,” which
will come as a startling insight to the working journalist.

Repeatedly, the study claims that the media were “vengeful” or bent on
“retribution” in reacting skeptically to government claims. An
alternative possibility is that this reaction reflected a newfound
realism. Braestrup agrees, for example, that “Westmoreland was wrong in
publicly underestimating (in November [1967]) the enemy” (I, 69), and
cites many other false and misleading optimistic statements, among them
Robert Komer’s prediction of “steady progress in pacification” a week
before the Tet offensive (I, 72; Braestrup’s paraphrase). In fact, part
of the shock of the Tet offensive resulted from the faith of the media
in previous government assessments, undermined by the Tet offensive, as
the U.S. military and official Washington were well aware.

Furthermore, General Westmoreland’s accounts were hardly persuasive
during the offensive. Thus he claimed that “all 11 of the Vietnamese
division commanders … commanded their units effectively,” whereas, as a
journalist learned, one “had gone into a state of shock during the Tet
attacks” (I, 454–55). Or consider Westmoreland’s claim that allegations
about inaccuracy and inflation of body counts were “one of the great
distortions of the war” by the media—there were at most “relatively
small inaccuracies” (II, 163). His own generals had a rather different
view. In his study of the opinions of the generals, General Douglas
Kinnard reports that 61 percent of those responding describe the body
count as “often inflated,” and only 26 percent “within reason accurate.”
The responses include: “a fake—totally worthless,” “often blatant lies,”
“a blot on the honor of the Army,” and “grossly exaggerated by many
units primarily because of the incredible interest shown by people like
McNamara and Westmoreland.” Perhaps journalists had some reason for
skepticism, apart from “vengefulness.”⁹

To demonstrate the absurd extent of press efforts to find shock value,
Braestrup cites a story in _Time_ on enemy tunneling at Khe Sanh, “_as
occurred around Dienbienphu_” (I, 435; his emphasis), in general
ridiculing the analogy—but forgetting to ridicule the remark by Marine
Commander General Cushman, who said that “He is digging trenches and
doing other tricks of the trade which he learned to do at Dienbienphu”
(I, 403).

“All Vietnam, it appeared on film at home, was in flames or being
battered into ruins, and all Vietnamese civilians were homeless
refugees,” Braestrup alleges (I, 234), in typically fanciful rhetoric,
adding that “there were virtually no films shown or photographs
published during this period of _undamaged_ portions of Saigon, Hue, or
other cities” (his emphasis). This shows that coverage was unbalanced,
supportive of the enemy. One wonders how many films and photographs of
peaceful English villages or Hawaiian towns appeared on the days that
Coventry and Pearl Harbor were bombed, to balance the picture.

Braestrup seeks the causes for the “exoneration of the Vietcong” for
“killing noncombatants or causing the exodus of refugees” (I, 234),
overlooking the fact that before seeking the cause of x it is necessary
to show that x is true. In this case, it is not. The accounts he cites
regularly blame the Viet Cong for civilian suffering and emphasize Viet
Cong atrocities. In fact, he himself points out that “both _Time_ and
_Newsweek_ put the onus on the Vietcong” in Saigon (I, 246)—as
elsewhere. _Newsweek_ titled an article “The VC’s Week of Terror” (Feb.
12) and described VC terror squads executing civilians in Saigon (I,
490). Typically, the media blamed the Viet Cong for having “brought
bullets and bombs into the very midst of heavily populated areas,
causing indiscriminate slaughter of civilians caught in the cross fire
and making homeless twice over the refugees who had fled to the cities
for safety …” (_Time_, [I, 246]), adopting the position of U.S.
government propaganda that the enemy is to blame if the United States
kills and destroys, and failing to add that the refugees had fled to the
cities for safety from massive U.S. violence and that such refugee
generation was explicit policy.¹⁰ In the _New York Times_, Charles Mohr
wrote that “In one sense the Vietcong have been responsible for civilian
deaths by launching the urban attacks,” citing American officials who
are “sure that the population will be bitter about the guerrillas
because of their ‘callous disregard for human life’ ” (I, 243).
Meanwhile, AP, the _Washington Post_, NBC, and others reported Viet Cong
causing destruction, using civilians as shields, preventing civilians
from fleeing attack, murdering civilians, etc., often on the basis of
flimsy evidence that would elicit much Freedom House derision if used to
support accounts of American atrocities. In a typical misrepresentation,
Braestrup claims that NBC-TV “attributed Saigon’s losses _solely_ to an
allied military decision to ‘kill or maim some of the people’ to protect
the rest” (our emphasis), citing Howard Tuckner’s statement that there
was a decision “that in order to protect most of the … people, they had
to kill or maim some of the people”—a statement that is quite different
from the paraphrase and is noteworthy only for its standard reference to
“protecting” the victims (I, 249).

In general, far from “exonerating the Vietcong,” the media bent over
backwards to blame them for the casualties and destruction caused by the
U.S. forces who were “protecting” and “defending” South Vietnam and its
population, according to unquestioned dogma. While the reporting was
generally accurate in a narrow sense, the framework and the general
picture presented are outlandish, and conform closely to the demands of
the state propaganda system. It is, once again, highly revealing that
Freedom House regards such service to the state as unremarkable—indeed,
insufficient, by its standards.

The more general summaries in the Freedom House study leave the evidence
presented far behind. Thus the ruins and destruction “were presented as
symbolic evidence of a stunning ‘defeat’ (variously implied or defined)
for allied forces” (I, 621). “The Americans, by their heavy use of
firepower in a few cities, were implicitly depicted as callously
destroying all Vietnam …, while the Vietcong’s indiscriminate use of
their own firepower, as well as the Hue killings, were largely
overlooked” (I, 286). The dominant themes in the media “added up to a
portrait of defeat for the allies” (I, 705). “At Tet, the press shouted
that the patient was dying” (I, 714). And so on.

We have already cited enough to show how much merit there is in these
characterizations. Furthermore, as already indicated, the media reports
generally conformed to those of the U.S. military, although they were
often less extreme in suggesting enemy success, as we have seen.
Braestrup is not unaware of this. He writes, for example, that “MACV
spokesmen in Saigon themselves contributed in February to a general
journalistic perception that no logistics, organizational, or manpower
limitations inhibited the NVA’s capacity, even after the ‘first wave,’
to strike anywhere at will (‘No place was safe any more’)” (I, 190).
Furthermore, “most eyewitness combat reporting, rare and restricted as
it was, showed up better in February than the MACV communiqués or the
communiqué rewrites in Saigon” (I, 334). In fact, the military briefings
cited are closely similar to media commentary in basic content, e.g.,
Brigadier General John Chaisson, February 3, who described “a real
battle,” “a very successful offensive in its initial phases,”
“surprisingly well coordinated,” “surprisingly intensive,” conducted
with “a surprising amount of audacity”—for example, in Hué, where “the
VC had the town,” etc. Naturally the media varied more widely in content
and style, but characterizations of the sort cited above must simply be
dismissed as hysteria, even apart from the numerous misrepresentations
and sheer fabrications.

If this is one of the great achievements of contemporary scholarship, as
John Roche claims, then scholarship is in a bad way indeed.



[]   NOTES



[]


Preface

1. We use the term “special interests” in its commonsense meaning, not
in the Orwellian usage of the Reagan era, where it designates workers,
farmers, women, youth, blacks, the aged and infirm, the unemployed—in
short, the population at large. Only one group did not merit this
appellation: corporations, and their owners and managers. They are not
“special interests,” they represent the “national interest.” This
terminology represents the reality of domination and the operational
usage of “national interest” for the two major political parties. For a
similar view, with evidence of the relevance of this usage to both major
political parties, see Thomas Ferguson and Joel Rogers, _Right Turn: The
Decline of the Democrats and the Future of American Politics_ (New York:
Hill and Wang, 1986), pp. 37–39 and passim.

2. Herbert Gans, for example, states that “The beliefs that actually
make it into the news are _professional_ values that are intrinsic to
national journalism and that journalists learn on the job.… The rules of
news judgment call for ignoring story implications …” (“Are U.S.
Journalists Dangerously Liberal?” _Columbia Journalism Review_
[Nov.–Dec. 1985], pp. 32–33). In his book _Deciding What’s News_ (New
York: Vintage, 1980), Gans contends that media reporters are by and
large “objective,” but within a framework of beliefs in a set of
“enduring values” that include “ethnocentrism” and “responsible
capitalism,” among others. We would submit that if reporters for
_Pravda_ were found to operate within the constraints of belief in the
essential justice of the Soviet state and “responsible communism,” this
would be found to make any further discussion of “objectivity”
pointless. Furthermore, as we shall document below, Gans greatly
understates the extent to which media reporters work within a limiting
framework of assumptions.

3. Neoconservative critiques of the mass media commonly portray them as
bastions of liberal, antiestablishment attacks on the system. They
ignore the fact that the mass media are large business corporations
controlled by very wealthy individuals or other corporations, and that
the members of what the neoconservatives describe as the “liberal
culture” of the media are hired employees. They also disregard the fact
that the members of this liberal culture generally accept the basic
premises of the system and differ with other members of the
establishment largely on the tactics appropriate to achieving common
ends. The neoconservatives are simply not prepared to allow deviations
from their own views. In our analysis in chapter 1, we describe them as
playing the important role of “enforcers,” attempting to browbeat the
media into excluding from a hearing even the limited dissent now
tolerated. For an analysis of the neoconservative view of the media, see
Edward S. Herman and Frank Brodhead, “Ledeen on the Media,” in _The Rise
and Fall of the Bulgarian Connection_ (New York: Sheridan Square
Publications, 1986), pp. 166–70; George Gerbner, “Television: The
Mainstreaming of America,” in _Business and the Media_, Conference
Report, Yankelovich, Skelly and White, November 19, 1981; Gans, “Are
U.S. Journalists Dangerously Liberal?”

4. See Walter Lippmann, _Public Opinion_ (1921; reprint, London: Allen &
Unwin, 1932); Harold Lasswell, “Propaganda,” in _Encyclopedia of the
Social Sciences_ (New York: Macmillan, 1933); Edward Bernays,
_Propaganda_ (New York: H. Liveright, 1928); M. J. Crozier, S. P.
Huntington, and J. Watanuki, _The Crisis of Democracy: Report on the
Governability of Democracies to the Trilateral Commission_ (New York:
New York University Press, 1975). For further discussion, see Noam
Chomsky, _Towards a New Cold War_ (New York: Pantheon, 1982), chapter 1.
and references cited, particularly, Alex Carey, “Reshaping the Truth:
Pragmatists and Propagandists in America,” _Meanjin Quarterly_
(Australia), vol. 35, no. 4 (1976).

5. _Public Opinion_, p. 248. Lippmann did not find this objectionable,
as “the common interests very largely elude public opinion entirely, and
can be managed only by a specialized class whose personal interests
reach beyond the locality” (p. 310). He was distressed that the
incorrigible bias of the press might mislead the “specialized class” as
well as the public. The problem, therefore, was how to get adequate
information to the decision-making elites (pp. 31–32). This, he
believed, might be accomplished by development of a body of independent
experts who could give the leadership unbiased advice. Lippmann raised
no question about possible personal or class interests of the
“specialized class” or the “experts” on whom they might choose to rely,
on their ability, or their right, to articulate “the common interest.”

6. For example, Claire Sterling and the experts of the Georgetown Center
for Strategic and International Studies—Walter Laqueur, Michael Ledeen,
and Robert Kupperman—have been established as the authorities on
terrorism by the mass media; on the Sterling and Paul Henze role in
working up the Bulgarian Connection in the plot against the pope, see
chapter 4. In the case of Latin America, the media have been compelled
to avoid the usual resort to the academic profession for expression of
approved opinion, as the profession largely rejects the framework of
state propaganda in this instance. It has therefore been necessary to
create a new cadre of “experts” (Robert Leiken, Ronald Radosh, Mark
Falcoff, Susan Kaufman Purcell, etc.) to whom they can turn to satisfy
doctrinal needs. See Noam Chomsky, _The Culture of Terrorism_ (Boston:
South End Press, 1988), for examples. On the process of creating experts
to meet system demands, see our chapter 1 under “Sourcing Mass-Media
News.”

7. Like other terms of political discourse, the word “democracy” has a
technical Orwellian sense when used in rhetorical flights, or in regular
“news reporting,” to refer to U.S. efforts to establish “democracy.” The
term refers to systems in which control over resources and the means of
violence ensures the rule of elements that will serve the needs of U.S.
power. Thus the terror states of El Salvador and Guatemala are
“democratic,” as is Honduras under the rule of the military and
oligarchy, and the collection of wealthy businessmen, bankers, etc.,
organized by the United States as a front for the Somocista-led
mercenary army created by the United States is entitled “the democratic
resistance.” See further, chapter 3.

8. In the eighty-five opinion columns on Nicaragua that appeared in the
_New York Times_ and the _Washington Post_ in the first three months of
1986, during the “national debate” preceding the congressional votes on
contra aid, not a single one mentioned this elementary fact. For a
detailed review, see Noam Chomsky, “Introduction,” in Morris Morley and
James Petras, _The Reagan Administration and Nicaragua_, Monograph 1
(New York: Institute for Media Analysis, 1987).

9. Only two phrases in the eighty-five opinion columns cited in the
previous footnote mentioned that the Nicaraguan government had carried
out reforms; none of them compared Nicaragua with El Salvador and
Guatemala on this important question.

10 See Dianna Melrose, _Nicaragua: The Threat of a Good Example?_
(Oxford: Oxfam, 1985); see also chapters 3, 5, and 7, below.

11 In an article highly critical of the Reagan “peace plan” for
Nicaragua in August 1987, Tom Wicker says, “Whatever his doctrine, the
United States has no historic or God-given right to bring democracy to
other nations; nor does such a purpose justify the overthrow of
governments it does not like” (“That Dog Won’t Hunt,” _New York Times_,
Aug. 6, 1987). Wicker does not contest the claim that Reagan seeks
democracy in Nicaragua; it is just that his means are dubious and his
plan won’t work. We should note that Wicker is at the outer limits of
expressible dissident opinion in the U.S. mass media. See further,
chapter 3. For additional references and discussion, see Chomsky,
_Culture of Terrorism_.

12 For example, in response to the Guatemala peace accords of August
1987, the United States immediately escalated the supply flights
required to keep its forces in Nicaragua in the field to the phenomenal
level of two to three per day. The purpose was to undermine the accords
by intensifying the fighting, and to prevent Nicaragua from relaxing its
guard so that it could be accused of failing to comply with the accords.
These U.S. initiatives were by far the most serious violations of the
accords, but they were virtually unmentioned in the media. For a
detailed review, see Noam Chomsky, “Is Peace at Hand?” Z magazine
(January 1988).

13 Jacques Ellul, _Propaganda_ (New York: Knopf, 1965), pp. 58–59.

14 A careful reader of the Soviet press could learn facts about the war
in Afghanistan that controvert the government line—see chapter 5, pp.
226–27—but these inconvenient facts would not be considered in the West
to demonstrate the objectivity of the Soviet press and the adequacy of
its coverage of this issue.

Chapter 1: A Propaganda Model

1. See note 4 of the preface.

2. Media representatives claim that what the government says is
“newsworthy” in its own right. If, however, the government’s assertions
are transmitted without context or evaluation, and without regard to the
government’s possible manipulative intent, the media have set themselves
up to be “managed.” Their objectivity is “nominal,” not substantive.

In early October 1986, memos were leaked to the press indicating that
the Reagan administration had carried out a deliberate campaign of
disinformation to influence events in Libya. The mass media, which had
passed along this material without question, expressed a great deal of
righteous indignation that they had been misled. To compound the
absurdity, five years earlier the press had reported a CIA-run
“disinformation program designed to embarrass Qaddafi and his
government,” along with terrorist operations to overthrow Quaddafi and
perhaps assassinate him _(Newsweek_, Aug. 3, 1981; P. Edward Haley,
_Qaddafi and the United States since 1969_ [New York: Praeger, 1984], p.
272). But no lessons were learned. In fact, the mass media are gulled on
an almost daily basis, but rarely have to suffer the indignity of
government _documents_ revealing their gullibility. With regard to
Libya, the media have fallen into line for each propaganda ploy, from
the 1981 “hit squads” through the Berlin discotheque bombing, swallowing
each implausible claim, failing to admit error in retrospect, and
apparently unable to learn from successive entrapment—which suggests
willing error. See Noam Chomsky, _Pirates & Emperors_ (New York:
Claremont, 1986), chapter 3. As we show throughout the present book, a
series of lies by the government, successively exposed, never seems to
arouse skepticism in the media regarding the next government claim.

3. For a description of the government’s strategy of deflecting
attention away from the Nicaraguan election by the fabricated MIG story,
and the media’s service in this government program, see chapter 3, under
“The MIG Crisis Staged during the Nicaraguan Election Week.”

4. James Curran and Jean Seaton, _Power Without Responsibility: The
Press and Broadcasting in Britain_, 2d ed. (London: Methuen, 1985), p.
24.

5. Quoted in ibid., p. 23.

6. Ibid., p. 34.

7. Ibid., pp. 38–39.

8. Alfred McClung Lee, _The Daily Newspaper in America_ (New York:
Macmillan, 1937), pp. 166, 173.

9. Earl Vance, “Freedom of the Press for Whom,” _Virginia Quarterly
Review_ (Summer 1945), quoted in _Survival of a Free, Competitive Press:
The Small Newspaper: Democracy’s Grass Roots_, Report of the Chairman,
Senate Small Business Committee, 80th Cong., 1st session, 1947, p. 54.

10. Note that we are speaking of media with substantial outreach—mass
media. It has always been possible to start small-circulation journals
and to produce mimeographed or photocopied news letters sent around to a
tiny audience. But even small journals in the United States today
typically survive only by virtue of contributions from wealthy financial
angels.

11. In 1987, the Times-Mirror Company, for example, owned newspapers in
Los Angeles, Baltimore, Denver, and Hartford, Connecticut, had book
publishing and magazine subsidiaries, and owned cable systems and seven
television stations.

12. Ben Bagdikian, _The Media Monopoly_, 2nd ed. (Boston: Beacon Press,
1987), p. xvi.

13. David L. Paletz and Robert M. Entman, _Media. Power. Politics_ (New
York: Free Press, 1981), p. 7; Stephen Hess, _The Government/Press
Connection: Press Officers and Their Offices_ (Washington: Brookings,
1984), pp. 99–100.

14. The four major Western wire services—Associated Press, United Press
International, Reuters, and Agence-France-Presse—account for some 80
percent of the international news circulating in the world today. AP is
owned by member newspapers; UPI is privately owned; Reuters was owned
mainly by the British media until it went public in 1984, but control
was retained by the original owners by giving lesser voting rights to
the new stockholders; Agence-France-Presse is heavily subsidized by the
French government. As is pointed out by Jonathan Fenby, the wire
services “exist to serve markets,” and their prime concern, accordingly,
“is with the rich media markets of the United States, Western Europe,
and Japan, and increasingly with the business community.…” They compete
fiercely, but AP and UPI “are really U.S. enterprises that operate on an
international scale.… Without their domestic base, the AP and UPI could
not operate as international agencies. With it, they must be American
organizations, subject to American pressures and requirements” _(The
International News Services_ [New York: Schocken, 1986], pp. 7, 9,
73–74). See also Anthony Smith, _The Geopolitics of Information: How
Western Culture Dominates the World_ (New York: Oxford University Press,
1980), chapter 3.

15. The fourteenth annual Roper survey, “Public Attitudes toward
Television and Other Media in a Time of Change” (May 1985), indicates
that in 1984, 64 percent of the sample mentioned television as the place
“where you usually get most of your news about what’s going on in the
world today …” (p. 3). It has often been noted that the television
networks themselves depend heavily on the prestige newspapers, wire
services, and government for their choices of news. Their autonomy as
newsmakers can be easily exaggerated.

16. The members of the very top tier qualify by audience outreach,
importance as setters of news standards, and asset and profit totals.
The last half dozen or so in our twenty-four involve a certain amount of
arbitrariness of choice, although audience size is still our primary
criterion. McGraw-Hill is included because of its joint strength in
trade books and magazines of political content and outreach.

17. As noted in table 1-1, note 7, Storer came under the temporary
control of the securities firm Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. in 1985. As
its ultimate fate was unclear at the time of writing, and as financial
data were no longer available after 1984, we have kept Storer on the
table and list it here, despite its uncertain status.

18. John Kluge, having taken the Metromedia system private in a
leveraged buyout in 1984 worth $1.1 billion, sold off various parts of
this system in 1985–86 for $5.5 billion, at a personal profit of some $3
billion (Gary Hector, “Are Shareholders Cheated by LBOs?” _Fortune_,
Jan. 17, 1987, p. 100). Station KDLA-TV, in Los Angeles, which had been
bought by a management-outsider group in a leveraged buyout in 1983 for
$245 million, was sold to the Tribune Company for $510 million two years
later (Richard Stevenson, “Tribune in TV Deal for $510 Million,” _New
York Times_, May 7, 1985). See also “The Media Magnates: Why Huge
Fortunes Roll Off the Presses,” _Fortune_, October 12, 1987.

19. A split among the the heirs of James E. Scripps eventually resulted
in the sale of the _Detroit Evening News_. According to one news
article, “Daniel Marentette, a Scripps family member and a self
described ‘angry shareholder,’ says family members want a better return
on their money. ‘We get better yields investing in a New York checking
account,’ says Mr. Marentette, who sells race horses” (Damon Darlin,
“Takeover Rumors Hit Detroit News Parent,” _Wall Street Journal_, July
18, 1985). The Bingham family division on these matters led to the sale
of the _Louisville Courier-Journal_; the New Haven papers of the Jackson
family were sold after years of squabbling, and “the sale price [of the
New Haven papers], $185 million, has only served to publicize the
potential value of family holdings of family newspapers elsewhere”
(Geraldine Fabrikant, “Newspaper Properties, Hotter Than Ever,” _New
York Times_, Aug. 17, 1986).

20. The Reagan administration strengthened the control of existing
holders of television-station licenses by increasing their term from
three to five years, and its FCC made renewals essentially automatic.
The FCC also greatly facilitated speculation and trading in television
properties by a rule change reducing the required holding period before
sale of a newly acquired property from three years to one year.

The Reagan era FCC and Department of Justice also refused to challenge
mergers and takeover bids that would significantly increase the
concentration of power (GE-RCA) or media concentration (Capital
Cities-ABC). Furthermore, beginning April 2, 1985, media owners could
own as many as twelve television stations, as long as their total
audience didn’t exceed 25 percent of the nation’s television households;
and they could also hold twelve AM and twelve FM stations, as the 1953
“7–7–7 rule” was replaced with a “12–12–12 rule.” See Herbert H. Howard,
“Group and Cross-Media Ownership of Television Stations: 1985”
(Washington: National Association of Broadcasters, 1985).

21. This was justified by Reagan-era FCC chairman Mark Fowler on the
grounds that market options are opening up and that the public should be
free to choose. Criticized by Fred Friendly for doing away with the
law’s public-interest standard, Fowler replied that Friendly “distrusts
the ability of the viewing public to make decisions on its own through
the marketplace mechanism. I do not” (Jeanne Saddler, “Clear Channel:
Broadcast Takeovers Meet Less FCC Static, and Critics Are Upset,” _Wall
Street Journal_, June 11, 1985). Among other problems, Fowler ignores
the fact that true freedom of choice involves the ability to select
options that may not be offered by an oligopoly selling audiences to
advertisers.

22. CBS increased its debt by about $1 billion in 1985 to finance the
purchase of 21 percent of its own stock, in order to fend off a takeover
attempt by Ted Turner. The _Wall Street Journal_ noted that “With debt
now standing at 60% of capital, it needs to keep advertising revenue up
to repay borrowings and interest” (Peter Barnes, “CBS Profit Hinges on
Better TV Ratings,” June 6, 1986). With the slowed-up growth of
advertising revenues, CBS embarked on an employment cutback of as many
as six hundred broadcast division employees, the most extensive for CBS
since the loss of cigarette advertising in 1971 (Peter Barnes, “CBS Will
Cut up to 600 Posts in Broadcasting,” _Wall Street Journal_, July 1,
1986). In June 1986, Time, Inc., embarked on a program to buy back as
much as 10 million shares, or 16 percent of its common stock, at an
expected cost of some $900 million, again to reduce the threat of a
hostile takeover (Laura Landro, “Time Will Buy as Much as 16% of Its
Common,” _Wall Street Journal_, June 20, 1986).

23. In response to the Jesse Helms and Turner threats to CBS, Laurence
Tisch, of Loews Corporation, was encouraged to increase his holdings in
CBS stock, already at 11.7 percent. In August 1986, the Loews interest
was raised to 24.9 percent, and Tisch obtained a position of virtual
control. In combination with William Paley, who owned 8.1 percent of the
shares, the chief executive officer of CBS was removed and Tisch took
over that role himself, on a temporary basis (Peter Barnes, “Loews
Increases Its Stake in CBS to Almost 25%,” _Wall Street Journal_, Aug.
12, 1986).

24. The number would be eight if we included the estate of Lila Wallace,
who died in 1984, leaving the controlling stock interest in _Reader’s
Digest_ to the care of trustees.

25. As we noted in the preface, the neoconservatives speak regularly of
“liberal” domination of the media, assuming or pretending that the
underlings call the shots, not the people who own or control the media.
These data, showing the wealth position of media owners, are
understandably something they prefer to ignore. Sometimes, however, the
neoconservatives go “populist,” and—while financed by Mobil Oil
Corporation and Richard Mellon Scaife—pretend to be speaking for the
“masses” in opposition to a monied elite dominating the media. For
further discussion, see Edward S. Herman’s review of _The Spirit of
Democratic Capitalism_, “Michael Novak’s Promised Land: Unfettered
Corporate Capitalism,” _Monthly Review_ (October 1983), and the works
cited in the preface, note 3.

26. Similar results are found in Peter Dreier, “The Position of the
Press in the U.S. Power Structure,” _Social Problems_ (February 1982),
pp. 298–310.

27. Benjamin Compaine et al., _Anatomy of the Communications Industry:
Who Owns the Media?_ (White Plains, N.Y.: Knowledge Industry
Publications, 1982), p. 463.

28. Ibid., pp. 458–60.

29. See Edward S. Herman, _Corporate Control, Corporate Power_ (New
York: Cambridge University Press, 1981), pp. 26–54.

30. For the interests of fifteen major newspaper companies in other
media fields, and a checklist of other fields entered by leading firms
in a variety of media industries, see Compaine, _Anatomy of the
Communications Industry_, tables 2.19 and 8.1, pp. 11 and 452–53.

31. The merger had been sanctioned by the FCC but was stymied by
intervention of the Department of Justice. See “A broken engagement for
ITT and ABC,” _Business Week_, January 6, 1967.

32. Ibid.

33. On the enormous and effective lobbying operations of GE, see Thomas
B. Edsall, “Bringing Good Things to GE: Firm’s Political Savvy Scores in
Washington,” _Washington Post_, April 13, 1985.

34. The widely quoted joke by A. J. Liebling—that if you don’t like what
your newspaper says you are perfectly free to start or buy one of your
own—stressed the impotence of the individual. In a favorable political
climate such as that provided by the Reagan administration, however, a
giant corporation not liking media performance _can_ buy its own, as
exemplified by GE.

35. Allan Sloan, “Understanding Murdoch—The Numbers Aren’t What Really
Matters,” _Forbes_, March 10, 1986, pp. II4ff.

36. On the Nixon-Agnew campaign to bully the media by publicity attacks
and threats, see Marilyn Lashner, _The Chilling Effect in TV News_ (New
York: Praeger, 1984). Lashner concluded that the Nixon White House’s
attempt to quiet the media “succeeded handily, at least as far as
television is concerned …” (p. 167). See also Fred Powledge, _The
Engineering of Restraint: The Nixon Administration and the Press_
(Washington: Public Affairs Press, 1971), and William E. Porter,
_Assault on the Media: The Nixon Years_ (Ann Arbor: University of
Michigan Press, 1976).

37. Of the 290 directors in his sample of large newspapers, 36 had
high-level positions—past or present—in the federal government (Dreier,
“The Position of the Press,” p. 303).

38. One study showed that of sixty-five FCC commissioners and high-level
staff personnel who left the FCC between 1945 and 1970, twelve had come
out of the private-communications sector before their FCC service, and
thirty-four went into private-firm service after leaving the commission
(Roger Noll et al., _Economic Aspects of Television Regulation_
[Washington: Brookings, 1973], p. 123).

39. “The symbiotic growth of American television and global enterprise
has made them so interrelated that they cannot be thought of as
separate. They are essentially the same phenomenon. Preceded far and
wide by military advisers, lobbyists, equipment salesmen, advertising
specialists, merchandising experts, and telefilm salesmen as advance
agents, the enterprise penetrates much of the non-socialist world.
Television is simply its most visible portion” (Erik Barnouw, _The
Sponsor_ [New York: Oxford University Press, 1978], p. 158). For a
broader picture, see Herbert I. Schiller, _Communication and Cultural
Domination_ (White Plains, N.Y.: International Arts and Sciences Press,
1976), especially chapters 3–4.

40. Is it not possible that if the populace “demands” program content
greatly disliked by the owners, competition and the quest for profits
will cause them to offer such programming? There is some truth in this,
and it, along with the limited autonomy of media personnel, may help
explain the “surprises” that crop up occasionally in the mass media. One
limit to the force of public demand, however, is that the millions of
customers have no means of registering their demand for products that
are not offered to them. A further problem is that the owners’ class
interests are reinforced by a variety of other filters that we discuss
below.

41. Quoted in Curran and Seaton, _Power Without Responsibility_, p. 31.

42. Ibid., p. 41.

43. “…  producers presenting patrons [advertisers] with the greatest
opportunities to make a profit through their publics will receive
support while those that cannot compete on this score will not survive”
(Joseph Turow, _Media Industries: The Production of News and
Entertainment_ [New York: Longman, 1984], p. 52).

44. Noncommercial television is also at a huge disadvantage for the same
reason, and will require a public subsidy to be able to compete. Because
public television does not have the built-in constraints of ownership by
the wealthy, and the need to appease advertisers, it poses a threat to a
narrow elite control of mass communications. This is why conservatives
struggle to keep public television on a short leash, with annual funding
decisions, and funding at a low level (see Barnouw, _The Sponsor_, pp.
179–82). Another option pursued in the Carter-Reagan era has been to
force it into the commercial nexus by sharp defunding.

45. Bagdikian, _Media Monopoly_, pp. 118–26. “ ‘The dominant paper
ultimately thrives,’ Gannett Chairman Allen H. Neuharth says. ‘The
weaker paper ultimately dies’ ” (Joseph B. White, “Knight-Ridder’s
No-Lose Plan Backfires,” _Wall Street Journal_, Jan. 4, 1988).

46. Quoted in Curran and Seaton, _Power Without Responsibility_, p. 43.

47. “Advertising and the Press,” in James Curran, ed., _The British
Press: A Manifesto_ (London: Macmillan, 1978), pp. 252–55.

48. Ibid., p. 254.

49. _1984 CBS Annual Report_, p. 13. This is a further refinement in the
measurement of “efficiency” in “delivering an audience.” In the magazine
business, the standard measure is CPM, or “costs per thousand,” to an
advertiser to reach buyers through a full-page, black-and-white ad.
Recent developments, like CBS’s CAP, have been in the direction of
identifying the special characteristics of the audience delivered. In
selling itself to advertisers, the _Soap Opera Digest_ says: “But you
probably want to know about our first milestone: today _Soap Opera
Digest_ delivers more women in the 18–49 category at the lowest CPM than
any other women’s magazine” (quoted in Turow, _Media Industries_, p.
55).

50. William Evan, _Organization Theory_ (New York: Wiley, 1976), p. 123.

51. Turow asserts that “The continual interaction of producers and
primary patrons plays a dominant part in setting the general boundary
conditions for day-to-day production activity” (_Media Industries_, p.
51).

52. Quoted in Todd Gitlin, _Inside Prime Time_ (New York: Pantheon,
1983), p. 253.

53. Pat Aufderheide, “What Makes Public TV Public?” _The Progressive_
(January 1988).

54. “Castor oil or Camelot?” December 5, 1987. For further materials on
such interventions, see Harry Hammitt, “Advertising Pressures on Media,”
Freedom of Information Center Report no. 367 (School of Journalism,
University of Missouri at Columbia, February 1977). See also James
Aronson, _Deadline for the Media_ (New York: Bobbs-Merrill, 1972), pp.
261–63.

55. According to Procter & Gamble’s instructions to their ad agency,
“There will be no material on any of our programs which could in any way
further the concept of business as cold, ruthless, and lacking in all
sentiment or spiritual motivation.” The manager of corporate
communications for General Electric has said: “We insist on a program
environment that reinforces our corporate messages” (quoted in
Bagdikian, _Media Monopoly_, p. 160). We may recall that GE now owns
NBC-TV.

56. Barnouw, _The Sponsor_, p. 135.

57. Advertisers may also be offended by attacks on themselves or their
products. On the tendency of the media to avoid criticism of advertised
products even when very important to consumer welfare [e.g., the effects
of smoking], see Bagdikian, _Media Monopoly_, pp. 168–73.

58. This is hard to prove statistically, given the poor data made
available by the FCC over the years. The long-term trend in advertising
time/programming time is dramatically revealed by the fact that in 1929
the National Association of Broadcasting adopted as a standard of
commercial practice on radio the following: “Commercial
announcements … shall not be broadcast between 7 and 11 P.M.” William
Paley testified before the Senate Commerce Committee in 1930 that only
22 percent of CBS’s time was allocated to commercially sponsored
programs, with the other 78 percent sustaining; and he noted that
advertising took up only “seven-tenths of 1 percent of all our time”
(quoted in _Public Service Responsibility of Broadcast Licensees_, FCC
[Washington: GPO, Mar. 7, 1946], p. 42). Frank Wolf states in reference
to public-affairs programming: “That such programs were even shown at
all on commercial television may have been the result of FCC regulation”
(_Television Programming for News and Public Affairs_ [New York:
Praeger, 1972], p. 138; see also pp. 99–139).

59. Barnouw, _The Sponsor_, p. 134.

60. For Alcoa’s post-antitrust-suit sponsorship of Edward R. Murrow, and
ITT’s post-early-1970s-scandals sponsorship of “The Big Blue Marble,”
see Barnouw, _The Sponsor_, ibid., pp. 51–52, 84–86. Barnouw shows that
network news coverage of ITT was sharply constrained during the period
of ITT program sponsorship.

61. Barnouw, _The Sponsor_, p. 150.

62. Mark Fishman, _Manufacturing the News_ (Austin: University of Texas
Press, 1980), p. 143.

63. Ibid., pp. 144–45.

64. Gaye Tuchman, “Objectivity as Strategic Ritual: An Examination of
Newsmen’s Notions of Objectivity,” _American Journal of Sociology_ 77,
no. 2 (1972), pp. 662–64.

65. United States Air Force, “Fact Sheet: The United States Air Force
Information Program” (March 1979); “News Releases: 600,000 in a Year,”
_Air Force Times_, April 28, 1980.

66. J. W. Fulbright, _The Pentagon Propaganda Machine_ (New York: H.
Live-right, 1970), p. 88.

67. Ibid., p. 90.

68. An Associated Press report on “Newspapers Mustered as Air Force
Defends B1B,” published in the _Washington Post_, April 3, 1987,
indicates that the U.S. Air Force had 277 newspapers in 1987, as
compared with 140 in 1979.

69. “DOD Kills 205 Periodicals; Still Publishes 1,203 Others,” _Armed
Forces Journal International_ (August 1982), p. 16.

70. Its nine regional offices also had some public-information
operations, but personnel and funding are not readily allocable to this
function. They are smaller than the central office aggregate.

The AFSC aggregate public-information budget is about the same size as
the contract given by the State Department to International Business
Communications (IBC) for lobbying on behalf of the contras ($419,000).
This was only one of twenty-five contracts investigated by the GAO that
“the Latin American Public Diplomacy office awarded to individuals for
research and papers on Central America, said a GAO official involved in
the investigation” (Rita Beamish, “Pro-contra Contracts are Probed,”
_Philadelphia Inquirer_, July 22, 1987, p. 4A).

71. The NCC’s news services are concentrated in the Office of
Information, but it has some dispersed staff in communications functions
elsewhere in the organization that produce a few newsletters, magazines,
and some videotapes and filmstrips.

72. In 1980, Mobil Oil had a public-relations budget of $21 million and
a public-relations staff of seventy-three. Between 1976 and 1981 it
produced at least a dozen televised special reports on such issues as
gasoline prices, with a hired television journalist interviewing Mobil
executives and other experts, that are shown frequently on television,
often without indication of Mobil sponsorship. See A. Kent MacDougall,
_Ninety Seconds To Tell It All_ (Home-wood, Ill.: Dow Jones-Irwin,
1981), pp. 117–20.

73. John S. Saloma III, _Ominous Politics: The New Conservative
Labyrinth_ (New York: Hill & Wang, 1984), p. 79.

74. MacDougall, _Ninety Seconds_, pp. 116–17.

75. Thomas B. Edsall, _The New Politics of Inequality_ (New York:
Norton, 1984), p. 110.

76. Peggy Dardenne, “Corporate Advertising,” _Public Relations Journal_
(November 1982), p. 36.

77. S. Prakash Sethi, _Handbook of Advocacy Advertising: Strategies and
Applications_ (Cambridge, Mass.: Ballinger, 1987), p. 22. See also
Edsall, _New Politics_, chapter 3, “The Politicization of the Business
Community”; and Saloma, _Ominous Politics_, chapter 6, “The
Corporations: Making Our Voices Heard.”

78. The April 14, 1986, U.S. bombing of Libya was the first military
action timed to preempt attention on 7 P.M. prime-time television news.
See Chomsky, _Pirates & Emperors_, p. 147.

79. For the masterful way the Reagan administration used these to
manipulate the press, see “Standups,” _The New Yorker_, December 2,
1985, pp. 81ff.

80. Fishman, Manufacturing the News, p. 153.

81. See note 70.

82. On January 16, 1986, the American Friends Service Committee issued a
news release, based on extended Freedom of Information Act inquiries,
which showed that there had been 381 navy nuclear-weapons accidents and
“incidents” in the period 1965–77, a figure far higher than that
previously claimed. The mass media did not cover this hot story directly
but through the filter of the navy’s reply, which downplayed the
significance of the new findings and eliminated or relegated to the
background the AFSC’s full range of facts and interpretation of the
meaning of what they had uncovered. A typical heading: “Navy Lists
Nuclear Mishaps: None of 630 Imperilled Public, Service Says,”
_Washington Post_, January 16, 1986.

83. The Harvard professor in charge of the program, Harvey Mansfield,
stated that the invitation to White had been a mistake anyway, as he “is
a representative of the far left,” whereas the forum was intended to
involve a debate “between liberals and conservatives” _(Harvard
Crimson_, May 14, 1986).

84. See Edward S. Herman and Frank Brodhead, _The Rise and Fall of the
Bulgarian Connection_ (New York: Sheridan Square Publications, 1986),
pp. 123–24.

85. Mark Hertsgaard, “How Reagan Seduced Us: Inside the President’s
Propaganda Factory,” _Village Voice_, September 18, 1984; see also
“Standups,” cited in note 79 above.

86. Stephen L. Vaughn, _Holding Fast the Inner Lines_ (Chapel Hill:
University of North Carolina Press, 1980), p. 194.

87. Bruce Owen and Ronald Braeutigam, _The Regulation Game: Strategic
Use of the Administrative Process_ (Cambridge, Mass.: Ballinger, 1978),
p. 7.

88. See Edward S. Herman, “The Institutionalization of Bias in
Economics,” _Media, Culture and Society_ (July 1982), pp. 275–91.

89. Henry Kissinger, _American Foreign Policy_ (New York: Norton, 1969),
p. 28.

90. Quoted in Alex Carey, “Managing Public Opinion: The Corporate
Offensive” (University of New South Wales, 1986, mimeographed), p. 32.

91. Ibid., pp. 46–47, quoting Feulner papers given in 1978 and 1985.

92. For a good discussion of many of these organizations and their
purpose, funding, networking, and outreach programs, see Saloma,
_Ominous Politics_, chapters 4, 6, and 9.

93. See Herman and Brodhead, _Bulgarian Connection_, p. 259; Fred
Landis, “Georgetown’s Ivory Tower for Old Spooks,” _Inquiry_, September
30, 1979, pp. 7–9.

94. The CSIS’s expert on terrorism, Robert Kupperman, was probably the
most widely used participant on radio and television talk shows on
terrorism in the last several years.

95. On Sterling’s qualifications as an expert, see Herman and Brodhead,
_Bulgarian Connection_, pp. 125–46; on Shevchenko, see Edward J.
Epstein, “The Invention of Arkady Shevchenko, Supermole: The Spy Who
Came In to Be Sold,” _New Republic_, July 15–22, 1985.

96. See David Caute, _The Great Fear: The Anti-Communist Purge under
Truman and Eisenhower_ (New York: Simon & Schuster, 1978), pp. 114–38,
who stresses the importance of the _lying_ informer. This McCarthyite
pathology was replicated in Robert Leiken’s 1982 book on “Soviet
hegemonism”—the standard Maoist phrase—which conjures up a Soviet
strategy of taking over the Western Hemisphere by means of Cuba and the
Sandinistas, and guerrilla movements elsewhere (Leiken, _Soviet Strategy
in Latin America_ [New York: Praeger, 1982]).

97. Then and now, former dissidents are portrayed as especially valuable
experts for the seeming authenticity they can bring to the mistakes of
their former associates. The fact that their claims are often fraudulent
is not a problem because the mass media refuse to point this out. Thus
Jean Lacouture lent credence to his criticisms of the Khmer Rouge by
claiming to have been a former sympathizer—not only a falsehood, as he
was pro-Sihanouk, but an absurdity, as nothing had been known about the
Khmer Rouge. David Horowitz added to his value as a born-again patriot
by claiming that along with protesters against the Vietnam War
generally, he came “to acquire a new appreciation for foreign tyrants
like Kim Il Sung of North Korea” (Peter Collier and David Horowitz,
“Confessions of Two New-Left Radicals: Why We Voted for Reagan,”
_Washington Post National Weekly Edition_, April 8, 1985). Robert Leiken
became more potent as a critic of the Sandinistas as an alleged former
peace-movement activist and early supporter of the Sandinistas. Each of
these claims was a fabrication, but this fact went unmentioned in the
mass media. On Leiken’s claims, and the “special force” his
anti-Sandinista writings gained by his alleged conversion from “fan of
the Sandinistas,” see Michael Massing, “Contra Aides,” _Mother Jones_
(October 1987). While dismissing this pretense, Massing credits Leiken’s
claim that he “was active in the antiwar movement,” but that is highly
misleading. Activists in the Boston area, where he claims to have been
an antiwar organizer, recall no participation by Leiken until about
1970—at which time McGeorge Bundy could also have been described as an
activist leader.

98. See above, note 55.

99. See “The Business Campaign Against ‘Trial by TV,’ ” _Business Week_,
June 22, 1980, pp. 77–79; William H. Miller, “Fighting TV Hatchet Jobs,”
_Industry Week_, January 12, 1981, pp. 61–64.

100. See Walter Schneir and Miriam Schneir, “Beyond Westmoreland: The
Right’s Attack on the Press,” _The Nation_, March 30, 1985.

101. An ad widely distributed by United Technologies Corporation, titled
“Crooks and Clowns on TV,” is based on the Media Institute’s study
entitled _Crooks, Conmen and Clowns: Businessmen in TV Entertainment_,
which contends that businessmen are treated badly in television
entertainment programs.

102. John Corry, _TV News and the Dominant Culture_ (Washington: Media
Institute), 1986.

103. See S. Robert Lichter, Stanley Rothman, and Linda Lichter, _The
Media Elite_ (Bethesda, Md.: Adler & Adler, 1986). For a good discussion
of the Lichters’ new center, see Alexander Cockburn, “Ashes and
Diamonds,” _In These Times_, July 8–21, 1987.

104. Louis Wolf, “Accuracy in Media Rewrites News and History,” _Covert
Action Information Bulletin_ (Spring 1984), pp. 26–29.

105. AIM’s impact is hard to gauge, but it must be recognized as only a
part of a larger corporate-right-wing campaign of attack. It has common
funding sources with such components of the conservative labyrinth as
AEI, Hoover, the Institute for Contemporary Studies, and others (see
Saloma, _Ominous Politics_, esp. chapters 2, 3, and 6), and has its own
special role to play. AIM’s head, Reed Irvine, is a frequent participant
in television talk shows, and his letters to the editor and commentary
are regularly published in the mass media. The media feel obligated to
provide careful responses to his detailed attacks on their news and
documentaries, and the Corporation for Public Broadcasting even helped
fund his group’s reply to the PBS series on Vietnam. His ability to get
the publisher of the _New York Times_ to meet with him personally once a
year—a first objective of any lobbyist—is impressive testimony to
influence. On his contribution to the departure of Raymond Bonner from
the _Times_, see Wolf, “Accuracy in Media Rewrites News and History,”
pp. 32–33.

106. For an analysis of the bias of the Freedom House observers, see
Edward S. Herman and Frank Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections:
U.S.-Staged Elections in the Dominican Republic, Vietnam, and El
Salvador_ (Boston: South End Press, 1984), appendix 1, “Freedom House
Observers in Zimbabwe Rhodesia and El Salvador.”

107. R. Bruce McColm, “El Salvador: Peaceful Revolution or Armed
Struggle?” _Perspectives on Freedom_ 1 (New York: Freedom House, 1982);
James Nelson Goodsell, “Freedom House Labels US Reports on Salvador
Biased,” _Christian Science Monitor_, February 3, 1982.

108. For a discussion of Ledeen’s views on the media, see Herman and
Brodhead, _Bulgarian Connection_, pp. 166–70.

109. Among the contributors to AIM have been the Reader’s Digest
Association and the DeWitt Wallace Fund, Walter Annenberg, Sir James
Goldsmith (owner of the French _L’Express_), and E. W. Scripps II, board
chairman of a newspaper-television-radio system.

110. George Skelton, White House correspondent for the _Los Angeles
Times_, noted that in reference to Reagan’s errors of fact, “You write
the stories once, twice, and you get a lot of mail saying, ‘You’re
picking on the guy, you guys in the press make mistakes too.’ And
editors respond to that, so after a while the stories don’t run anymore.
We’re intimidated” (quoted in Hertsgaard, “How Reagan Seduced Us”).

111. Piero Gleijeses, _The Dominican Crisis_ (Baltimore: Johns Hopkins
University Press, 1978), pp. 95–99.

112. Jan K. Black, _United States Penetration of Brazil_ (Philadelphia:
University of Pennsylvania Press, 1977), pp. 39–56.

113. See above, pp. 24–25; below, pp. 157–61.

114. “The Stalinists of Anti-Communism,” in Ralph Miliband, John
Saville, and Marcel Liebman, _Socialist Register, 1984: The Uses of
Anticommunism_ (London: Merlin Press, 1984), p. 337.

115. Daix, in 1949, referred to the Stalin concentration camps as “one
of the Soviet Union’s most glorious achievements,” displaying “the
complete suppression of man’s exploitation of man” (quoted in Miliband
et al., _Socialist Register_, p. 337). Kriegel, formerly a hard-line
Communist party functionary, was the author of a 1982 book explaining
that the KGB organized the Sabra-Shatila massacres, employing German
terrorists associated with the PLO and with the tacit cooperation of the
CIA, in order to defame Israel as part of the Soviet program of
international terrorism. For more on this profound study, and its
influence, see Noam Chomsky, _Fateful Triangle_ (Boston: South End
Press, 1983), pp. 291–92, 374–75.

116. _Socialist Register_, p. 345.

117. Where dissidents are prepared to denounce official enemies, of
course, they can pass through the mass-media filtering system, in the
manner of the ex-Communist experts described in “Anticommunism as a
Control Mechanism” (p. 29).

118. See chapter 2, “Worthy and Unworthy Victims.” Of interest in the
Turkish case is the Western press’s refusal to publicize the Turkish
government’s attacks on the press, including the U.S. press’s own
reporters in that country. UPI’s reporter Ismet Imset, beaten up by the
Turkish police and imprisoned under trumped-up charges, was warned by
UPI not to publicize the charges against him, and UPI eventually fired
him for criticizing their badly compromised handling of his case. See
Chris Christiansen, “Keeping In With The Generals,” _New Statesman_,
January 4, 1985.

119. We believe that the same dichotomization applies in the domestic
sphere. For example, both British and American analysts have noted the
periodic intense focus on—and indignation over—“welfare chiselers” by
the mass media, and the parallel de-emphasis of and benign attitudes
toward the far more important fraud and tax abuses of business and the
affluent. There is also a deep-seated reluctance on the part of the mass
media to examine the structural causes of inequality and poverty. Peter
Golding and Sue Middleton, after an extensive discussion of the
long-standing “criminalization of poverty” and incessant attacks on
welfare scroungers in Britain, point out that tax evasion, by contrast,
is “acceptable, even laudable,” in the press, that the tax evader “is
not merely a victim but a hero.” They note, also, that “The supreme
achievement of welfare capitalism” has been to render the causes and
condition of poverty almost invisible _(Images of Welfare: Press and
Public Attitudes to Poverty_ [Oxford: Martin Robertson, 1982], pp.
66–67, 98–100, 186, 193).

In a chapter entitled “The Deserving Rich,” A. J. Liebling pointed out
that in the United States as well, “The crusade against the destitute is
the favorite crusade of the newspaper publisher,” and that “There is no
concept more generally cherished by publishers than that of the
Undeserving Poor” _(The Press_ [New York: Ballantine, 1964], pp. 78–79).
Liebling went into great detail on various efforts of the media to keep
welfare expenses and taxes down “by saying that they [the poor] have
concealed assets, or bad character, or both” (p. 79). These strategies
not only divert, they also help split the employed working class from
the unemployed and marginalized, and make these all exceedingly
uncomfortable about participating in a degraded system of scrounging.
See Peter Golding and Sue Middleton, “Attitudes to Claimants: A Culture
of Contempt,” in _Images of Welfare_, pp. 169ff. President Reagan’s
fabricated anecdotes about welfare chiselers, and his complete silence
on the large-scale chiseling of his corporate sponsors, have fitted into
a long tradition of cynical and heartless greed.

120. For a full discussion of this dichotomized treatment, see Edward S.
Herman, “Gatekeeper versus Propaganda Models: A Critical American
Perspective,” in Peter Golding, Graham Murdock and Philip Schlesinger,
eds., _Communicating Politics_ (New York: Holmes & Meier, 1986), pp.
182–94.

121. Editorial, March 1, 1973. The Soviets apparently didn’t know that
they were shooting down a civilian plane, but this was covered up by
U.S. officials, and the false allegation of a knowing destruction of a
civilian aircraft provided the basis for extremely harsh criticism of
the Soviets for barbaric behavior. The Israelis openly admitted knowing
that they were shooting down a civilian plane, but this point was of no
interest in the West in this particular case.

122. The _New York Times Index_, for example, has seven full pages of
citations to the KAL 007 incident for September 1983 alone.

123. Patriotic orgies, such as the 1984 Olympic Games in Los Angeles,
the space-shuttle flights, and “Liberty Weekend,” perform a similar
function in “bringing us all together.” See Elayne Rapping, _The Looking
Glass World of Nonfiction TV_ (Boston: South End Press, 1987), chapter
5, “National Rituals.”

124. See below, chapter 6.

125. On issues where the elite is seriously divided, there will be
dissenting voices allowed in the mass media, and the inflation of claims
and suspension of critical judgment will be subject to some constraint.
See the discussion of this point in the preface, pp. xii-xiii, and
examples in the case studies that follow.

126. The role of the government in these cases cannot be entirely
discounted, given the close ties of the _Reader’s Digest_ to the CIA and
the fact that Paul Henze, one of the primary sources and movers in the
Bulgarian Connection campaign, was a longtime CIA official. On the
CIA–_Reader’s Digest_ connection, see Epstein, “The Invention of Arkady
Shevchenko,” pp. 40–41. On Henze, see below, chapter 4. On the strong
likelihood that an influential _Reader’s Digest_ best-seller on Cambodia
was in part a CIA disinformation effort, see below chapter 6, p. 293,
and sources cited.

127. We provide many illustrations of these points in the chapters that
follow. Watergate and, more recently, the late-Reagan-era exposures of
Iran-Contragate, which are put forward as counterexamples, are discussed
in chapter 7, below.

128. These points apply clearly to the case of the alleged Bulgarian
Connection in the plot to assassinate the pope. See below, chapter 4.

129. We have noted elsewhere that the _New York Times_ regularly relied
upon Indonesian officials in “presenting the facts” about East Timor,
which was being invaded by Indonesia, and ignored refugees, church
sources, etc. In contrast, refugees, not state officials, were the prime
source in the _Times’_s reporting on postwar events in Vietnam and
Cambodia (_The Washington Connection and Third World Fascism_ [Boston:
South End Press, 1979], pp. 151–52, 169–76, 184–87). On attempts to
evade the obvious implications, see chapter 6, under “The Pol Pot Era”
(pp. 284–85).

130. Thus when the CIA directs Nicaraguan contras to attack such “soft
targets” as farming cooperatives, with explicit State Department
approval, the media commentators, including doves, either applaud or
offer philosophical disquisitions on whether such targets are
legitimate, given that they are defended by lightly armed militia.
Terrorist attacks on Israeli kibbutzim, also defended by armed settlers,
are regarded somewhat differently. For details, see Noam Chomsky, _The
Culture of Terrorism_ (Boston: South End Press, 1988).

131. The variable use of agendas and frameworks can be seen with great
clarity in the treatment of Third World elections supported and opposed
by the United States, as described in chapter 3.

132. Classic in their audacity are Michael Ledeen’s assertions that: (1)
Qaddafi’s word is given more credence in the mass media than that of the
U.S. government; and (2) “Relatively minor human rights transgressions
in a friendly country (especially if ruled by an authoritarian
government of the Right) are given far more attention and more intense
criticism than far graver sins of countries hostile to us …” (_Grave New
World_ [New York: Oxford University Press, 1985], p. 131; Qaddafi’s
superior credence is described on pp. 132–33). See chapter 2 of this
book for documentation on the reality of mass-media treatment of abuses
by clients and enemy states.

Chapter 2: Worthy and Unworthy Victims

1. In a speech of July 19, 1986, Nicaraguan President Daniel Ortega, in
answering charges of religious persecution, asserted that of 138
religious persons murdered and 278 kidnapped or disappeared in Central
America since 1979 (a figure that includes Lay Delegates of the Word),
none had been victimized by the Nicaraguan government. (_Central America
News Update_, Aug. 4, 1986). Many had been killed by the contras,
however, in an ongoing tradition of Somocista violence. See Andrew
Reding, “The Church in Nicaragua,” _Monthly Review_ (July-August 1987),
pp. 34–36. The large majority were murdered by the army and security
forces of U.S. client states, or the death squads affiliated with them.

2. In _The Real Terror Network_ (Boston: South End Press, 1982), Edward
Herman shows that in the years 1976–81, the only massive coverage of the
victimization of individuals abroad by the _New York Times_ was of
Soviet dissidents, most notably Sharansky and Sakharov (pp. 196–99),
although there were numerous cases of comparable or far worse treatment
within U.S. domains.

3. Computed by dividing the number of articles and CBS News reports (or
column inches) devoted to Popieluszko by the number dealing with the one
hundred religious victims and multiplying by 100.

4. Anthony Lewis says that the Soviet dissidents “are enough like us so
that we identify with them” (“A Craving for Rights,” _New York Times_,
Jan. 31, 1977), a partially valid point, as the vast majority of victims
of U.S. foreign policy are Third World peasants, but invalid in that
victims in U.S. client states as much “like us” as Soviet dissidents do
not get comparable attention, as shown in the cases mentioned and the
reference in note 2.

5. It is not coincidental that the U.S. secretary of state, Alexander
Haig, and the U.S. ambassador to the United Nations, Jeane Kirkpatrick,
actually _defended_ the assassinations of the American women, as
described below.

6. Apart from the details by the _New York Times_ shown in table 2-2,
there were at least four other _Times_ articles that repeated such
information, and similar detail was given in _Time_ and _Newsweek_ and
on CBS News. To give a sample of one of many in _Time_, an article
entitled “Grim Tale: Details of a Martyr’s Death” (Nov. 19, 1984), reads
as follows: “Church officials who viewed the martyred priest’s body
reported that he had been savagely beaten. A rope had been tied around
his neck, wrists and ankles so that he would strangle himself if he
struggled to get free. Three fingers of Popieluszko’s left hand were
sliced through to the bone, and there were deep gouges on his arms. His
lungs contained enough water to indicate that he was still breathing,
even if unconscious, when he was tossed, bound hand and foot, into a
reservoir.” _Time_ repeats these details and others with obvious relish
at every opportunity. As we will see, _Time_ is less lavish in details
on unworthy victims.

7. _Time’s_ account entitled “Memories of Father Jerzy” (Nov. 12, 1984)
has no counterpart in the articles on the deaths of the unworthy victims
discussed below.

8. “A Polish General is Tied to Death of Warsaw Priest,” November 3,
1984; “Pole in Killing Tells of Hints of Top-Level Backup,” January 9,
1985; “Pole on Trial Names 2 Generals,” January 5, 1985; “Second
Abductor of Polish Priest Says Order Came ‘From the Top,’ ” January 3,
1985.

9. See chapter 4, below.

10. On May 6, 1986, Laura Pinto, a member of the Salvadoran “Mothers of
the Disappeared,” was picked up by three armed men, beaten, raped, and
left on the street. On May 29 she was again abducted and tortured, and
shortly thereafter twelve members of her group were detained by the
police. The British _New Statesman_ expressed surprise that this kind of
terror could take place, given the fact that Laura Pinto had previously
traveled to Europe and made Western Europeans aware of her existence
(Jane Dibblin, “El Salvador’s Death Squads Defy European Opinion,” June
13, 1986). Western Europeans did, in fact, protest these abuses. What
made this terror feasible, however, was the fact that the power directly
involved in El Salvador, the United States, has media well attuned to
state policy. The two assaults on Laura Pinto and the detention of the
twelve members of the Mothers were totally suppressed by the _New York
Times_ and its confreres. There was not a word in the quality papers
when a member of the “Mothers of the Disappeared” who had herself been a
victim of the atrocities of Duarte’s security forces was denied entry to
the United States in March 1987, to visit several small towns where she
had been invited to speak on the occasion of International Women’s Day.
See Noam Chomsky, _The Culture of Terrorism_ (Boston: South End Press,
1988). The attention that the _Times_ mentions as a constraint on Polish
violence was not available to protect an unworthy victim.

11. For a review of _Times_ editorials on El Salvador in the 1980s,
exculpating the state terrorists throughout, see Noam Chomsky, “U.S.
Polity and Society,” in Thomas Walker, ed., _Reagan versus the
Sandinistas_ (Boulder, Colo.: West-view, 1987), pp. 295–96.

12. The press may also have been constrained by the fact that reporters
who dig deeply and provide accounts unfavorable to the military regimes
in Latin America may be barred from the country, or even murdered.
Western reporters are very rarely physically threatened—let alone
murdered—in Poland, the Soviet Union, Cuba, or Nicaragua. They are often
threatened and sometimes murdered in El Salvador, Guatemala, and other
U.S. clients in Latin America. This irony is not commented upon in the
free press, nor are the effects of this potential and actual violence
against dissident reporters on the possibilities of honest reporting.
This point is discussed further in chapter 3, pp. 97–98.

13. Penny Lernoux, _Cry of the People_ (New York: Doubleday, 1980), p.
73.

14. James R. Brockman, _The Word Remains: A Life of Oscar Romero_
(Maryknoll, N.Y.: Orbis, 1982), p. 11.

15. We discuss this link later in this section.

16. Carter sent former New York mayor Robert Wagner to persuade the pope
to rein in Romero, which the pope then tried to do. See Raymond Bonner,
_Weakness and Deceit_ (New York: Times Books, 1984), p. 176. The
provincial of the Jesuit order in Central America, Father César Jerez,
was called to Rome shortly after to explain the Romero letter. Father
Jerez, who had fled from Guatemala after the military had threatened his
life, was very close to Archbishop Romero. Subsequently he was forced to
flee El Salvador as well and is now a refugee in Nicaragua, where he is
rector of the Universidad Centroamericana, unable to return to the two
“fledgling democracies” except for brief (and dangerous) visits.

17. Quoted in Bonner, _Weakness and Deceit_, p. 172.

18. On September 27, 1981, Alan Riding wrote in the _New York Times_
that “under the Carter administration, United States officials said
security forces were responsible for 90 percent of the atrocities,” not
“uncontrollable right-wing bands.” In short, not only was Bushnell
lying, but the media knew it, and failed to use that information. Riding
had an article on March 23, 1980, entitled “El Salvador’s Junta Unable
to Halt the Killing.” On media coverage of El Salvador during 1980,
including gross falsification and cover-up of even congressional
reports, see Noam Chomsky, _Towards A New Cold War_, pp. 35ff.,
reprinted in James Peck, ed., _The Chomsky Reader_ (New York: Pantheon,
1987).

19. Church estimates were that the government was responsible for some
nine hundred civilian deaths in the first three months of 1980,
exceeding the total for all of 1979; a report of Amnesty International
dated March 21, 1980, contains seven pages of incidents in which
security forces, army units, or paramilitary groups under general
military control or guidance killed unarmed civilians, usually peasants
(quoted in Bonner, _Weakness and Deceit_, p. 172).

20. This is a point that was conceded by Duarte himself, who admitted in
an interview with Raymond Bonner that the army ruled El Salvador, but
that he hoped to do so _in the future_ (see _New York Times_, Mar. 1,
1982).

21. _Weakness and Deceit_, p. 146.

22. See chapter 3, pp. 101–102.

23. One proof of the fact that the paramilitary forces kill under
official protection is that, year after year, paramilitary murders never
resulted in arrests (see Herman, _Real Terror Network_, pp. 115–19). As
for the regular forces, through 1986, “there were no known instances of
military officers or soldiers who were criminally punished for human
rights abuses against Salvadoran civilians” _(The Reagan
Administration’s Record on Human Rights in 1986_ [New York: The Watch
Committees and Lawyers Committee for Human Rights, February 1987], p.
46).

24. Laurie Becklund, “Death Squads: Deadly ‘Other War,’ ” _Los Angeles
Times_, December 18, 1983.

25. Michael McClintock, _The American Connection_, vol. 1 (London: Zed,
1985), p. 221.

26. Bonner, _Weakness and Deceit_, p. 162.

27. “United States Network News Coverage of El Salvador: The Law and
Order Frame” (manuscript, 1986), pp. 17–18. Andersen provides many
illustrations of how the networks continued to label the junta
“moderate” throughout 1980, as atrocities mounted to what Archbishop
Romero’s successor, Bishop Rivera y Damas, described in October 1980 as
the armed forces’ “war of extermination and genocide against a
defenseless civilian population” (Bonner, _Weakness and Deceit_, p.
207).

28. “23 Die in El Salvador As Clashes Continue; 3 Officials Step Down,”
_New York Times_, March 29, 1980.

29. Quoted in Robert Armstrong and Janet Shenk, _El Salvador: The Face
of Revolution_ (Boston: South End Press, 1982), p. 146.

30. From White’s cable to the State Department, quoted in Bonner,
_Weakness and Deceit_, p. 184.

31. This statement is quoted in Armstrong and Shenk, _El Salvador_, p.
152. Others present claim that troops were on the scene, contradicting
Duarte, junta, and Treaster assertions to the contrary. Phillip
Berryman, who was at the funeral, told the authors that he saw quite
clearly two truckloads of troops in the vicinity. Treaster is cagey,
though—he speaks only of troops _in the plaza_, not near the plaza, or
in the national palace and other buildings.

32. The view expressed in Ambassador White’s cables was that the
leftists acted to provoke a response by the security forces, a
self-destructive tactic not supported by any evidence.

33. Quoted in Brockman, _The Word Remains_, p. 212.

34. See note 18. _Time_ magazine did the same kind of misrepresenting as
Treaster, but with a little more finesse: “From his pulpit, he regularly
condemned the tyranny and terrorism that have torn tiny, impoverished El
Salvador apart and brought it to the verge of civil war” (Apr. 7, 1980).

35. “Church in Salvador Now Follows the Middle Path,” _New York Times_,
March 22, 1981.

36. For a more detailed discussion of Schumacher’s manipulation of the
archbishop’s cautious remarks for an apologetic purpose, see Herman,
_Real Terror Network_, pp. 178–79.

37. It is possible that this failure was based on an honest lack of
knowledge of the event. Lack of knowledge, however, reflects in part a
lack of concern, and a distorting perspective that removes certain
questions from the focus of investigation.

38. Actually, this may be true. The killer may have been a contra
assassin hired by the Salvadoran security forces.

39. For the numerous _acknowledged_ attempts to murder Fidel Castro, and
the CIA-organized murder of Patrice Lumumba, see _Alleged Assassination
Plots Involving Foreign Leaders_, Senate Select Committee to Study
Government Operations, 94th Cong., 1st sess., November 20, 1975, S. Rep.
94–465, pp. 13–180.

40. Graham Hovey, “Salvador Prelate’s Death Heightens Fear of War,” _New
York Times_, March 26, 1980.

41. See Craig Pyes, “Who Killed Archbishop Romero?” _The Nation_,
October 13, 1984.

42. _Bonner, Weakness and Deceit_, p. 178.

43. Stephen Kinzer, “Ex-Aide in Salvador Accuses Colleagues on Death
Squads,” _New York Times_, March 3, 1984.

44. Craig Pyes, “Dirty War in the Name of Freedom,” _Albuquerque
Journal_, December 18, 1983. In November 1987, Duarte announced new (and
rather flimsy) evidence implicating D’Aubuisson, but no one associated
with the reigning security forces, in the assassination. The
announcement was a transparent effort to maintain his image as a
“moderate,” holding the middle ground between extremists of right and
left. It was carefully timed to coincide with a daring visit to El
Salvador by two actual “moderates,” FDR leaders Rubén Zamora and
Guillermo Ungo, who have lived in exile under threat of assassination in
this terror state.

45. Noam Chomsky, _Turning the Tide_ (Boston: South End Press, 1985), p.
103.

46. Armstrong and Shenk, _El Salvador_, pp. 160–61.

47. In an article of February 11, 1982, datelined San Salvador, the
Mexican paper _El Día_ quoted D’Aubuisson telling two European
reporters, one a German, that “You Germans are very intelligent; you
realized that the Jews were responsible for the spread of communism and
you began to kill them.” While the U.S. press played up the fabricated
claims of Sandinista anti-Semitism, this statement of approval of the
Holocaust was not picked up by the elite media.

48. “Peace Is Still a Long Shot in El Salvador,” _New York Times_,
September 27, 1987, Week in Review.

49. This statement was left out of the edition of the report finally
released to the public.

50. Report, p. 8.

51. Ana Carrigan, _Salvador Witness_ (New York: Simon & Schuster, 1984),
p. 271.

52. _Foreign Assistance Legislation for Fiscal Year 1982_, part 1,
Hearings before the House Committee on Foreign Affairs, 97th Cong., 1st
sess., March 1981, p. 163. Letter from David E. Simcox, State
Department, to William P. Ford, dated April 16, 1981. At the time Haig
made his statement, the evidence was quite clear that the women had been
raped, and killed by close-range shots from behind. Haig himself never
apologized for this insulting lie, nor did he suffer any serious attack
for this in the mass media, with the honorable exception of Anthony
Lewis. This episode also appears to have had no noticeable effect on
Haig’s reputation.

53. “We ought to be a little more clear about this than we actually are
[sic]. They were political activists on behalf of the Frente and
somebody who is using violence to oppose the Frente killed these women”
(interview in _Tampa Tribune_, Dec. 16, 1980, quoted in Carrigan,
_Salvador Witness_, p. 279.) Former ambassador Robert White pointed out
that remarks like these by Kirkpatrick, in the context of El Salvador,
were “an incitement to murder” (T. D. Allman, _Unmanifest Destiny_ [New
York: Doubleday, 1984], p. 17).

Jean Donovan asked Ambassador Robert White, “What do you do when even to
help the poor, to take care of the orphans, is considered an act of
subversion by the government?” (quoted in Allman, p. 3). Helping orphans
in the Salvadoran countryside was also regarded as an act of subversion
by officials of the Reagan administration.

54. The _New York Times’_s version, shown on table 2-2, gives a succinct
and inaccurate version of the use of the underwear.

55. “Statement by Revolutionary Governing Junta,” December 8, 1980. The
statement also notes that “the Revolutionary Government repudiates and
condemns violence and the irrational crimes it generates”!

56. Juan de Onis, December 24. The question does not arise for the
_Times_ of why the security forces would want to conceal the bodies if
they were uninvolved in the murders.

57. We discussed this myth in “Archbishop Oscar Romero” (p. 48).

58. Juan de Onis, “Rightist Terror Stirs Argentina,” _New York Times_,
August 29, 1976.

59. See below, note 67.

60. John Dinges, “Evidence Indicates Military Planned Missionaries’
Deaths,” _National Catholic Reporter_, July 17, 1981.

61. Stephen Kinzer, “Ex-Aide in Salvador Accuses Colleagues on Death
Squads,” March 3, 1984. Note the “soft” headline. An option forgone by
the _Times_ was a headline like: “Duarte and Defense Minister Casanova
Accused of Cover-up of Murder of Four American Women.” Santivánez was
paid $50,000 to give his evidence, a sum he requested on the ground of
the risk he was taking and the probability that he would be income-short
in the future as a result of his confession. This payment was given
unusual publicity as suggesting a compromising quality to his testimony,
and the _New York Times_ squelched a second installment of his evidence
on this principled ground—which they never apply to Soviet defectors,
who are less in need of protection. The revelation that the “leading
democrats” who were formed into a civilian front for the contras by the
CIA have been receiving over $80,000, tax-free, annually from the CIA
for years has never compromised their integrity as media sources.
Nicaraguan defector Miranda got $800,000 for his services without being
discredited.

62. Excellent accounts were produced by Michael Posner and the Lawyers’
Committee for International Human Rights in a series of investigatory
reports, dated September 1981, July 20, 1982, and February 1, 1983,
which contain detailed and crushing evidence of a completely broken-down
judicial process and an official cover-up. Once again, as with the
Dinges report, these documents were essentially ignored in the U.S. mass
media and their facts and leads suppressed. News coverage of the
lawyers’ committee documents was negligible. Michael Posner and Scott
Greathead did succeed in placing an Op-Ed article in the _Times_ on
December 6, 1983, entitled “3 Years after Killings, No Justice in
Salvador.”

63. Both _Time_ and _Newsweek_ had articles featuring stonewalling in
February 1981—_Time’_s article was entitled “Stonewalling” (Feb. 23)—but
although the stonewalling continued for years, this was the end of the
news magazines’ interest in the matter.

64. Lawyers’ Committee for International Human Rights, _Update: Justice
in El Salvador: A Case Study_, February 1, 1983, p. 17.

65. _Bonner, Weakness and Deceit_, p. 80.

66. Larry Rohter, “Salvador Defense Lawyer Charges Cover-Up in Slaying
of U.S. Nuns,” _New York Times_, May 6, 1985.

67. In the same month that Hinton was asserting with assurance that the
low-level guardsmen were acting on their own, internal State Department
memos were stating that “Reading the documents provoked several
questions which we think should have occurred to an investigator whose
real aim was to determine who committed the crime” (quoted in _Update_,
p. 31).

68. Quoted in _Update_, pp. 30–31.

69. On the Tyler investigation, see Bonner, _Weakness and Deceit_, pp.
78–80.

70. Stephen Kinzer, “Ex-Aide in Salvador Accuses Colleagues on Death
Squads,” _New York Times_, March 3, 1984.

71. Carrigan, _Salvador Witness_, p. 265.

72. See Stephen Schlesinger and Stephen Kinzer, _Bitter Fruit_ (New
York: Doubleday, 1982), pp. 32–47, 54–63.

73. Virtually all independent observers were of the view that land
reform was also highly desirable for both equity and efficiency. See,
especially, José M. Aybar de Soto, _Dependency and Intervention: The
Case of Guatemala in 1954_ (Boulder: Westview, 1978), chapter 6.

74. Ibid. See also Richard H. Immerman, _The CIA in Guatemala_ (Austin:
University of Texas Press, 1982).

75. See Blanche Wiesen Cook, _The Declassified Eisenhower_ (New York:
Doubleday, 1981), p. 222.

76. Piero Gleijeses, “Guatemala: Crisis and Response,” in Richard B.
Fagen and Olga Pellicer, _The Future of Central America: Policy Choices
for the U.S. and Mexico_ (Stanford, Calif.: Stanford University Press,
1983), p. 188.

77. Ibid., pp. 191–92.

78. Ibid., p. 192.

79. U.S. officials have often pressed for purely formal democratic
reforms and reductions in rates of murder, but they have consistently
supported and helped organize the _framework_ that eroded the democratic
reforms and _increased_ rates of murder. In Guatemala (and elsewhere),
the reasons for the regular backing of antidemocratic institutions have
been the fear of the left and the chronic hostility of U.S. officials
and businessmen to popular organizations (unions, peasant organizations,
mass political parties), for both economic and political reasons. Thus
the periodic support for liberal _forms_ has been rendered nugatory by
the systematic bolstering up of institutions that regularly undermine
the _substance_ of liberalism. As Lars Schoultz points out, the function
of “military authoritarianism,” beginning with the U.S.-backed Brazilian
coup of 1964 and widely prevalent in Latin America and elsewhere within
the U.S. sphere of influence, has been “to destroy permanently a
perceived threat to the existing structure of socioeconomic privilege by
eliminating the participation of the numerical majority, …” _(Human
Rights and United States Policy toward Latin America_ [Princeton:
Princeton University Press, 1981], p. 7). We may let them “participate,”
however, with elections held after extended periods of military
pacification and the dismantling of popular organizations. See chapter
3.

80. See “Counterrevolution and the ‘Shakedown States,’ ” in Noam Chomsky
and Edward S. Herman, _The Washington Connection and Third World
Fascism_ (Boston: South End Press, 1979), pp. 61–66.

81. From 1977, Guatemala turned for aid to Israel, which has provided
similar services regularly for the U.S. government. For details, see
Bishara Bahbah, _Israel and Latin America: The Military Connection_ (New
York: St. Martin’s, 1986); Benjamin Beit-Hallahmi, _The Israeli
Connection_ (New York: Pantheon, 1987); and Jane Hunter, _Israeli
Foreign Policy_ (Boston: South End Press, 1987). On the continued flow
of arms from the United States to Guatemala during the Carter years, see
Lars Schoultz, “Guatemala,” in Martin Diskin, ed., _Trouble in our
Backyard_ (New York: Pantheon, 1983), pp. 187ff.

82. Piero Gleijeses estimates that “the Guatemalan army has killed close
to 100,000” since 1979 (“The Reagan Doctrine and Latin America,”
_Current History_ [December 1986]).

83. See, for example, Amnesty International, _Guatemala: A Government
Program of Political Murder_ (London: AI, 1981); Parliamentary Human
Rights Group, “Bitter and Cruel …,” Report of a Mission to Guatemala by
the British Parliamentary Human Rights Group, October 1984; Americas
Watch, _Civil Patrols in Guatemala_ (New York: AW, 1986).

84. Amnesty International, _Guatemala: Massive Extrajudicial Executions
in Rural Areas under the Government of General Efraín Ríos Montt_,
October 11, 1982.

85. According to State Department testimony of July 20, 1981, “We need
to try a new, constructive policy approach to Guatemala …” (quoted in
Americas Watch, _Guatemala Revisited: How the Reagan Administration
Finds “Improvements” in Human Rights in Guatemala_ [New York: AW, 1985],
p. 4).

86. Quoted in Americas Watch, _Guatemala Revisited_, p. 5.

87. See Amnesty International, _Guatemala: A Government Program of
Political Murder_, p. 8.

88. Americas Watch, _Guatemala Revisited_, p. 6.

89. State Department 1984 Human Rights Country Report, quoted in
Americas Watch, _Guatemala Revisited_, p. 15.

90. _Guatemala: A Government Program of Political Murder_, p. 5.

91. While this is true almost without exception for news articles, there
were perhaps a dozen Op-Ed columns in the _New York Times_ and the
_Washington Post_, and some letters, in the period 1980–86, that
criticized Guatemalan state terrorism; some of these were harshly
critical of U.S. policy.

92. A few of the opinion pieces cited in the previous note did discuss
the U.S. role.

93. “Requiem for a Missionary,” August 10, 1981.

94. The documents include the following four put out by Amnesty
International: _Guatemala: A Government Program of Political Murder_,
February 1981; “_Disappearances”: A Workbook, 1981; Guatemala: Massive
Extrajudicial Executions in Rural Areas under the Government of General
Efraín Ríos Montt, October 1982; “Disappearances” in Guatemala under the
Government of General Oscar Humberto Mejía Víctores_, March 1985. We
also included six studies by Americas Watch: _Human Rights in Guatemala:
No Neutrals Allowed, November 1982; Guatemala Revisited: How the Reagan
Administration Finds “Improvements” in Human Rights in Guatemala,
September 1985; Little Hope: Human Rights in Guatemala, January
1984–January 1985_, February 1985; _Guatemala: The Group for Mutual
Support, 1985; Civil Patrols in Guatemala_, August 1986; _Human Rights
in Guatemala during President Cerezo’s First Year_, 1987.

95. This letter is reproduced in Americas Watch, _Human Rights in
Guatemala: No Neutrals Allowed_, November 1982.

96. For a full discussion of the last of these murders, that of
Marianela García Villas, on March 15, 1983, see Edward S. Herman and
Frank Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections: U.S.-Staged Elections in the
Dominican Republic, Vietnam, and El Salvador_ (Boston: South End Press,
1984), pp. x–xi.

97. Quoted in Americas Watch, _Guatemala: The Group for Mutual Support,
1984–1985_, p. 2 (hereafter, AW, _Mutual Support_).

98. Council on Hemispheric Affairs, _News and Analysis_, April 26, 1986,
p. 222.

99. McClintock, _American Connection_, vol. 2, p. 83.

100. AW, _Mutual Support_, p. 3.

101. “Bitter and Cruel,” British Parliamentary Human Rights Group,
October 1984.

102. AW, _Mutual Support_, p. 8.

103. Ibid., p. 7.

104. An open letter of November 15, 1984, quoted in AW, _Mutual
Support_, p. 24.

105. AW, _Mutual Support_, pp. 24–25.

106. Ibid., p. 36. This was, of course, a complete fabrication. What
Mejía Víctores is referring to is an investigative body that he
established, manned entirely by government personnel, including the
deputy minister of defense, and that, predictably, gave the government a
clean bill of health.

107. Ibid., p. 38.

108. Ibid., p. 41.

109. Two very terse exceptions should be noted: On April 13, an article
on the case mentions that Gómez was tortured; and one on April 19 notes
that his tongue was cut out. No details whatsoever were provided about
the murders of Godoy de Cuevas and her brother and son.

110. As we will see in the next chapter, the new civilian government did
nothing to stem the army assault on the civilian population; but as we
might also expect, the optimism of the press on the promise of the new
civilian administration was not followed up with reports on what
actually happened.

111. As we pointed out earlier, the U.S. press entirely ignored the
administration’s refusal to allow one of the El Salvador “Mothers of the
Disappeared” to come to speak in the United States. See note 10, above.

112. This press release was featured in an “Urgent Action” memo of the
Guatemala Human Rights Commission/USA, dated October 3, 1986.

Chapter 3: Legitimizing versus Meaningless Third World Elections

1. See Edward S. Herman and Frank Brodhead, Demonstration Elections:
U.S.-Staged Elections in the Dominican Republic, Vietnam, and El
Salvador (Boston: South End Press, 1984), passim.

2. In the case of the Salvadoran elections of 1982 and 1984, the
government relied on the media to play down not only this plan, but also
the fact that the rebels were driven into rebellion by decades of
refusal of the army to allow any democratic option, and that the rebels
could not have participated in the election anyway because they would
run heavy risks of being murdered—the five leaders of the political
opposition in El Salvador were tortured, murdered, and mutilated in San
Salvador in November 1980.

3. As we pointed out in chapter 1, the government and other power groups
try to monopolize media attention not only by flooding the media with
their own propaganda, but also by providing authentic and reliable
“experts” to validate this propaganda.

4. For a model illustration of observer bias and foolishness, see
appendix 1 on the findings of a U.S. official-observer team at the
Guatemalan election of July 1, 1984.

5. “The observer delegation’s mission was a simple one: to assess the
fairness, honesty and propriety of the voting, the counting of ballots
and the reporting of final results in the Salvadoran elections” (Senator
Nancy Kassenbaum, _Report of the U.S. Official Observer Mission to the
El Salvador Constituent Assembly Elections of March 28, 1982_, Report to
the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, 97th Cong., 2d sess., p. 2. This
agenda does not include consideration of any of the basic framework
conditions—like free speech and the absence of state terror—that
determine in advance whether an election can be meaningful. See the text
below.

6. The _New York Times_ even allowed the right-wing Freedom House
observers to dominate its reports on the election staged by Ian Smith in
Rhodesia in 1979 (articles of April 22 and May 11, 1979). Although a
brutal civil war raged and the rebel black groups were off the ballot,
Freedom House found the election fair. In a rerun held a year later
under British government auspices, the black candidate sponsored by Ian
Smith who had received 65 percent in the “fair” election got only 8
percent of the vote, whereas the previously excluded black rebels
received a commanding majority. Freedom House found the second election
doubtful! See Herman and Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections_, appendix
1, “Freedom House Observers in Zimbabwe Rhodesia and El Salvador.”

7. Herman and Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections_, pp. 71–72.

8. Philip Taubman, “Shultz Criticizes Nicaragua Delay,” _New York
Times_, February 6, 1984; _Security and Development Assistance_,
Hearings before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, 98th Cong., 2d
sess., February 22, 1984, p. 83.

9. George Orwell, _1984_ (New York: Signet, 1950), p. 163.

10. “The Electoral Process in Nicaragua: Domestic and International
Influences,” Report of the LASA Delegation to Observe the Nicaraguan
General Election of November 4, 1984, Latin American Studies Association
(Nov. 19, 1984), p. 32 (hereafter, LASA, Report).

11. The U.S. media quite properly condemned in advance the January 1947
elections held in Poland, under Soviet control and with security forces
omnipresent in the country, although not killing on anywhere near the
scale seen in El Salvador and Guatemala, 1979–87. See Herman and
Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections_, pp. 173–80.

12. LASA, Report, p. 5.

13. _Nicaragua: The Threat of a Good Example?_ (Oxford: Oxfam, 1986), p.
14. Oxfam’s U.S. affiliate also has warm words for the Sandinista
effort, stating that

Among the four countries in the region where Oxfam works [Guatemala, El
Salvador, Honduras, and Nicaragua], only in Nicaragua has a substantial
effort been made to address inequities in land ownership and to extend
health, educational, and agricultural services to poor peasant families.
(_Oxfam America Special Report: Central America_, Fall 1985).

14. See below, under “Free speech and assembly” (p. 93) and “Freedom of
the press” (p. 97).

15. See Herman and Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections_, pp. 119–20.

16. See Amnesty International, _Guatemala: A Government Program of
Political Murder_ (London: AI, 1981); Michael McClintock, _The American
Connection_, vol. 2 (London: Zed, 1985).

17. UN General Assembly, _Report of the Economic and Social Council:
Situation of Human Rights in Guatemala_, November 13, 1985, p. 15. On
Viscount Colville’s apologetics, see Americas Watch, _Colville for the
Defense: A Critique of the Reports of the U.N. Special Rapporteur for
Guatemala_ (February 1986).

18. Guatemala Human Rights Commission, “Report for the 39th General
Assembly of the United Nations on the Human Rights Situation in
Guatemala” (New York, 1984), p. 18 (Hereafter, HRC, Report).

19. Ibid., p. 23.

20. “Bitter and Cruel …,” Report of a Mission to Guatemala by the
British Parliamentary Human Rights Group, October 1984, p. 21.

21. Bishop Maurice Taylor and Bishop James O’Brien, “Brief Report on
Visit to Guatemala,” October 27-November 3, 1984, quoted in Americas
Watch, _Little Hope: Human Rights in Guatemala, January 1984–1985_ (New
York: AW, 1985), p. 25.

22. InterAmerican Commission on Human Rights, _Civil and Legal Rights in
Guatemala_ (1985), p. 156. Development Poles are organizational units
established by the army, nominally to foster “development,” actually
mere convenient units for control and surveillance.

23. International Human Rights Law Group, _The 1985 Guatemalan
Elections: Will the Military Relinquish Power?_ (Washington: December
1985), p. 56 (hereafter, IHRLG, Report).

24. Ibid., p. 61.

25. LASA, Report, p. 27.

26. Ibid., p. 25.

27. See further, Herman and Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections_, pp.
120–21.

28. “Journalists Killed and Disappeared since 1976,” Committee to
Protect Journalists (December 1986), pp. 6–8.

29. Council on Hemispheric Affairs and the Newspaper Guild, “A Survey of
Press Freedom in Latin America, 1984–85” (Washington: 1985), p. 38.

30. See IHRLG, Report, pp. 59–60.

31. Howard H. Frederick, “Electronic Penetration,” in Thomas S. Walker,
ed., _Reagan versus the Sandinistas_ (Boulder: Westview, 1987), pp.
123fr.

32. For a full account of media conditions, see John Spicer Nichols,
“The Media,” in Thomas S. Walker, ed., _Nicaragua: The First Five Years_
(New York: Praeger, 1985), pp. 183–99.

33. Ibid., pp. 191–92. For comparison of media conditions in Nicaragua
with those of the United States in wartime and its leading client state,
Israel, see Noam Chomsky, “U.S. Polity and Society: The Lessons of
Nicaragua,” in Walker, ed., _Reagan versus the Sandinistas_.

34. For a discussion of this decimation process and a tabulation of
murders by group, see Herman and Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections_,
pp. 121–26.

35. “The Grass Roots Organizations,” in Walker, ed., _Nicaragua_, p. 79.

36. Ibid., p. 88.

37. It has often been observed by serious students of American democracy
that the relative weakness of intermediate organizations (unions,
political clubs, media not under corporate control, etc.) is a severe
impediment to meaningful political democracy in the United States—one
reason, no doubt, why voter participation is so low and cynicism about
its significance so high.

38. Raymond Bonner, _Weakness and Deceit_ (New York: Times Books, 1984),
pp. 278–79.

39. Herman and Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections_, pp. 122–24.

40. Enrique A. Baloyra, who argues that there was a real choice, says
that people voted “primarily because they wanted to make use of this
massive action to urge an end to violence and civil war.” But Baloyra
nowhere discusses Duarte’s and D’Aubuisson’s views on a negotiated
settlement of the war, which allows him to convey the erroneous
impression that one of them supported a nonmilitary route to ending the
violence and civil war _(El Salvador in Transition_ [Chapel Hill:
University of North Carolina Press, 1982], p. 175).

41. See Dennis Hans, “Duarte: The Man and the Myth,” _Covert Action
Information Bulletin 26_ (Summer 1986), pp. 42–47; Noam Chomsky,
_Turning the Tide_ (Boston: South End Press, 1985), pp. 109ff.

42. _Weakness and Deceit_, p. 205.

43. The top leadership of the Social Democratic party had been murdered
in 1980, and its remaining officials fled the country. Only a portion of
this exiled leadership returned for the 1985 election.

44. The guerrilla position was that with the army having set up a
national control system, military domination had been institutionalized
and elections would have no meaning. See “Guerrillas’ View of Elections:
Army Will Hold Power Despite Polls,” _Latin America Weekly Report_,
October 25, 1985, p. 11.

45. HRC, Report, p. 7.

46. Americas Watch, _Civil Patrols in Guatemala_ (New York: AW, 1986),
p. 2.

47. “El Señor Presidente?” An interview of Cerezo by George Black in
October 1985, _NACLA Report on the Americas_ (November-December 1985),
p. 24.

48. “In a meeting several months ago with the ultra-rightist
organization Amigos del Pais, which allegedly has strong death squad
connections, PDCG deputies to the Constituent Assembly pledged that if
the party came to power, they would refrain from agrarian and banking
reforms, investigation into human rights abuses by the armed forces, and
any interference in the counterinsurgency program” (“Guatemala Votes,”
_Washington Report on the Hemisphere_, Nov. 27, 1985). Stephen Kinzer
also reports on a private meeting between Cerezo and right-wing
landowners, in which “he said we all needed each other at this moment …”
(“When a Landslide Is Not a Mandate,” _New York Times_, Dec. 15, 1985).

49. Allen Nairn and Jean-Marie Simon, in their “The Bureaucracy of
Death,” _New Republic_, (June 30, 1986), describe the “tactical
alliance” between Cerezo and the army, which protected them against any
accountability for past actions, in exchange for which the army would
allow Cerezo to occupy office.

50. See “Cerezo Adapts to Counterinsurgency,” _Guatemala_, Guatemala
News and Information Bureau (May-June 1986).

51. American Watch, _Human Rights in Guatemala during President Cerezo’s
First Year_, February 1987. Cerezo argued for not prosecuting the
military for old crimes on the ground that everyone wanted to start
afresh. But Americas Watch points out that if terrible crimes of the
past are exempt from the rule of law, it suggests that Cerezo doesn’t
have the power to stop further military crimes. “It is a sign that the
rule of law has not been established in Guatemala, and that it cannot be
established” (p. 4). This point is supported by Cerezo’s inaction in the
face of a hundred violent deaths a month—many of them political murders
by the army—after he assumed office.

52. See Michael Parenti, “Is Nicaragua More Democratic Than the United
States?” _Covert Action Information Bulletin_ 26 (Summer 1986), pp.
48–52.

53. Wayne S. Smith, “Lies About Nicaragua,” _Foreign Policy_ (Summer
1987), p. 93. Smith states that Cruz “now says that he regrets not
taking part and that his failure to participate in the 1984 elections
was one of his major political mistakes.”

54. See LASA, Report, pp. 24–25, 29–31. We discuss this point, and the
likelihood that Cruz’s withdrawal was part of a public-relations
strategy, in our treatment below of the media’s handling of the
Nicaraguan election.

55. LASA, Report, p. 23.

56. Doherty’s statement appears in _U.S. Policy toward El Salvador_,
Hearings before the Subcommittee on Inter-American Affairs of the House
Committee on Foreign Affairs, 97th Cong., 1st sess., 1981, p. 290;
Gomez’s statement is in _Presidential Certification of El Salvador_,
House Committee on Foreign Affairs, 97th Cong., 2d sess., 1982, vol. 1,
p. 330.

57. AW, _Little Hope_, p. 1.

58. IHRLG, Report, p. 4.

59. They were being murdered on a regular basis by U.S.-sponsored
terrorists entering Nicaragua from Honduras and Costa Rica, however.

60. Rev. Daniel Long and seven other ecumenical group observers, “March
25, 1984, Elections in El Salvador” (1984, mimeographed), p. 4.

61. Based on conversations with voters, the Long group states that “most
people waited these long hours because of their desire to have their
_cedula_ stamped and their finger inked to avoid fines for not voting
and/or possible reprisals from the government and military.…” They note
that at many places voting officials stamped the _cedulas_ of those
unable to vote because of crowding just so they could leave (ibid., p.
6).

62. In the July 1, 1984, election for a constituent assembly, null and
blank votes exceeded those of any party and were a staggering 26 percent
of the total.

63. IHRLG, Report, p. 54.

64. This procedure was put into the rules at the request of several
opposition parties (LASA, Report, p. 15).

65. The media generally suppressed the fact that the number of voting
booths was sharply restricted in 1982, allegedly for security reasons
but making for longer lines.

66. “Media Coverage of El Salvador’s Election,” _Socialist Review_
(April 1983), p. 29.

67. “Salvadorans Jam Polling Stations; Rebels Close Some,” _New York
Times_, March 29, 1982.

68. See further, Herman and Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections_, pp.
164–67.

69. Warren Hoge did quote García, but only to suggest an open election:
“Without any lies, you can see here what it is that the people want …”
(“Salvadorans Jam Polling Stations,” _New York Times_, Mar. 29, 1982).

70. Eleven days before the 1982 election, four Dutch journalists were
murdered by the Salvadoran security forces. The foreign press corps was
trooped into the morgue to see the bodies, whose ripped genitals were
exposed to media view. This episode—described in the 1984 documentary
film _In the Name of Democracy_—was suppressed in the U.S. mass media,
led to no large outcries and generalizations about the qualities of the
Salvadoran government, and may have contributed to the remarkable
silence of journalists in El Salvador on the unfavorable media (as well
as other) conditions in the incipient democracy.

71. “Salvador Vote: Uncertainty Remains,” April 3, 1982.

72. The _Times_ devoted an entire article to the Salvadoran chief of
staff’s promises that “his troops would provide adequate security for
the election of March 25” (1984); Blandon is quoted as saying “I’m
giving you the assurance that there will be secure elections for all of
the country” (Lydia Chavez, “Salvadoran Promises Safe Election,” _New
York Times_, Mar. 14, 1984).

73. _Time_, July 16, 1984. “Moderation” is a favorite media word in
descriptions of demonstration elections. _Newsweek_’s article of May 7,
1984, on Duarte and the Salvadoran election of May 1984 is entitled “El
Salvador: A Miracle of Moderation.” For a discussion of some of the ways
in which the media use the word “moderate,” see Noam Chomsky, _The
Culture of Terrorism_, (Boston: South End Press, 1988), chapter 2.8.

74. The Guatemalan extreme right-wing leader, Mario Sandoval Alarcón,
often described as the godfather of the death squads in Central America,
was present at Reagan’s first inauguration, met with his defense and
foreign-policy advisers, and claimed that “verbal agreements” were
entered into at that time to cut back on criticism of Guatemalan
human-rights abuses and to renew military aid. See Marlise Simons,
“Guatemala: The Coming Danger,” _Foreign Policy_ (Summer 1981), p. 101;
Scott Anderson and John Lee Anderson, _Inside the League: The Shocking
Exposé of How Terrorists, Nazis, and Latin American Death Squads Have
Infiltrated the Anti-Communist League_ (New York: Dodd, Mead, 1986), p.
175; and Alan Nairn, “Controversial Reagan Campaign Links with
Guatemalan Government and Private Sector Leaders,” Research Memo for
Council on Hemispheric Affairs, October 30, 1980, p. 11.

75. The Polish election of January 1947 was so designated by the U.S.
mass media, although Polish state terrorism was much less severe than
that of Guatemala in 1984–85. See Herman and Brodhead, _Demonstration
Elections_, pp. 173–80.

76. Council on Hemispheric Affairs, _News and Analysis_, February 6,
1987.

77. We may be quite certain that _Time_ will not assert that “Much of
the killing in Afghanistan is linked to General Zakov’s success against
the insurgents.”

78. For evidence of the complete servility and dishonesty of _Time_ in
its coverage of the elections in the Dominican Republic and Vietnam in
the 1960s, see Herman and Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections_, pp. 45,
46, 51–52, 83–86.

79. A summary of this document was given in Enfoprensa News Agency,
“Information on Guatemala,” June 22, 1984. This excellent weekly
bulletin of news on Guatemala reports a continuing flow of seemingly
newsworthy items—regrettably, however, on unworthy victims, and
therefore not of interest to the mass media.

80. This statement, dated October 1985, is reproduced in IHRLG, Report.

81. The two stories that follow were discussed in Enfoprensa,
“Information on Guatemala.”

82. “A New Chance in Guatemala,” December 12, 1985. The _Times_ never
found that the Sandinistas had “honored” a promise in 1984, but then
neither did the Reagan administration. Nor did the editorial consider
the meaning of the fact that the ruling generals had declared an
amnesty—for themselves—before allowing the electoral “project” to
proceed.

83. The _Times’_s editorial of December 12, 1985, congratulates Cerezo
for pledging to “take charge without vengeance against the military for
its murderous rule.” Translated from the propaganda format, this means
Cerezo is too weak to promise minimal justice for terrible crimes, which
raises serious doubts about whether he has any real power. The newspaper
of record makes this exoneration of mass murderers a virtue, and
pretends that it is just an act of mercy on Cerezo’s part! The _Times_
also does not speculate on what would happen to President Cerezo if he
chose to wreak “vengeance against the military,” or how exactly he might
proceed with this mission under conditions of effective military rule.

84. Stephen Schlesinger and Stephen Kinzer, _Bitter Fruit_ (New York:
Doubleday, 1982).

85. Of course, there was an even deeper hypocrisy in failing to call
attention to the administration’s devotion to a free election in
Nicaragua but not in Chile, Indonesia, Namibia, or South Korea, among
many others, and its pretense that the elections in the terror states of
El Salvador and Guatemala are free and have anything to do with
democracy.

86. The _New York Times_ had an article on the numerous observers in
Nicaragua, but _before_ the election (“Election Draws Many U.S.
Observers,” Nov. 4, 1984). The thrust of the article was to suggest
observer bias favorable to the Sandinistas, a subject the _Times_ never
addresses in regard to official observers. In later discussion of the
elections, the 450 observers, including even the professional society of
Latin American scholars, were entirely ignored by the _Times_. An
excellent study by Lucinda Broadbent, “Nicaragua’s Elections: A Cruz
Around the Issues; Comparative Analysis of Media Coverage of the 1984
Elections,” as yet unpublished, parallels our findings in detail, based
on an analysis of a wide sample, including U.S. network TV and the
British as well as U.S. press. Broadbent points out that in her sample,
the opposition to the Nicaraguan government is given more than twice the
space accorded the government, “an unusual priority for media usually so
wedded to ‘official sources’ in whichever country they find themselves”
(p. 77). Broadbent stresses, as we do, the domination of the Reaganite
frame, even in Britain and in the liberal press, and the massive
distortion of reality that resulted from this biased framing. She notes
also that the media _never_ addressed the programs of the contesting
parties in Nicaragua, which allowed Reaganite clichés about Sandinista
intentions and policies to prevail. The media portrayals were “roughly
the opposite of what was witnessed by international observers of the
election” (p. 99), which is why, in our view, these observers had to be
ignored.

87. For further details, see Noam Chomsky, “Introduction,” in Morris
Morley and James Petras, _The Reagan Administration and Nicaragua_,
Institute for Media Analysis, Monograph 1 (New York: 1987), note 32,
which also discusses the distortion of the Dutch observers’ report by
Robert Leiken in the _New York Review of Books_, December 5, 1985.
Leiken dismisses the LASA report without comment as pro-Sandinista,
i.e., as coming to the wrong conclusions.

88. LASA, Report, p. 2.

89. This was partially true, as the Sandinistas were trying to alter
their image. But the same was true in El Salvador, with the added
problem that the election was held in an environment of ongoing state
terror. _Time_ never used the word “theatre” to describe either of the
two Salvadoran elections.

90. As in 1982, the FMLN carried out no military operations directed at
the election-day process, and made no threats against Salvadoran voters.
But as in 1982, this has no impact on _Time_ reporting. The real
threats, broadcast to voters in Nicaragua by contra radio, and the
several contra killings of poll watchers, were never reported by _Time_.

As we have noted, the stress on superficialities like long lines is part
of the propaganda agenda for a demonstration election. So is blacking
out the fact that the length of the lines might be a function of the
restricted number of voting booths, as was the case in El Salvador.
_Time_ provides both the emphasis on long lines and the suppression of
relevant evidence on why the lines were so long. See Herman and
Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections_, pp. 126–27.

91. Cruz was mentioned by Kinzer in eleven, and quoted, usually at some
length, in five, of the fourteen articles he wrote on the Nicaraguan
election; disruption and harassment are mentioned or featured in seven
of the articles.

92. See particularly his “Sandinista Is Favored but Runs Hard” (Oct. 30,
1984), “Going Through the Motions in Nicaragua” (Nov. 4), and
“Sandinistas Hold Their First Elections” (Nov. 5).

93. We will see below that _Time_ even tries to make out a coercive
threat that produced the vote in Nicaragua.

94. See the quotation from Warren Hoge given above, on p. 108.

95. These points were discussed in the LASA report, as we note below,
but for Kinzer and the rest of the mass media, they were off the agenda.

96. Note that the exact opposite is true in the United States,
reflecting the recognition on the part of the general public in both
societies of who stands to gain through the electoral process.

97. The rate was, in fact, far higher than in the 1984 U.S. presidential
election, in which just over half the electorate participated.

98. “Sandinistas Hold Their First Election,” _New York Times_, November
5, 1984.

99. Duarte is quoted to this effect by Edward Schumacher in the _New
York Times_, February 21, 1981.

100. On April 23, 1985, the _Wall Street Journal_ revealed that Cruz was
on the CIA payroll. Oliver North then took over his financing, hoping
that this might divert attention from the fact that Cruz had been funded
by the CIA during the period when the U.S. government was trying to
discredit the Nicaraguan elections. See Stephen Engelberg, _New York
Times_, July 15, 1987.

101. Stephen Kinzer, “Ex-Contra Looks Back Finding Much to Regret,” _New
York Times_, January 8, 1988. Cruz now expresses the belief that the
anti-Sandinista coalition (the Coordinadora) that nominated him “was
dominated by people who never intended to go through with an election
campaign,” and “sought to embarrass the Sandinistas by withdrawing.”

102. See note 91, above, and tables 3-2 and 3-3, below.

103. Philip Taubman, “U.S. Role in Nicaragua Vote Disputed,” _New York
Times_, October 21, 1984. Robert McCartney, in the _Washington Post_ of
June 30, 1984, stated that “Opposition leaders admitted in interviews
that they never seriously considered running in the Nov. 4 election but
debated only whether to campaign for two months and then withdraw from
the race on grounds that the Sandinistas had stacked the electoral deck
against them.”

104. Lord Chitnis, a veteran British election observer who attended the
Salvadoran election on behalf of the British Parliamentary Human Rights
Group, noted that “First, and crucial to the whole standing of the
exercise, was the fact that no politicians to the left of the Christian
Democrats [PDC], and not all of them, were free to contest the
election.… [Exclusion of the FDR made the election] a contest of vague
promises and inferences by two candidates who already bore a heavy
responsibility for the situation in which El Salvador finds itself
today.” The 1984 elections in El Salvador, he continued, were held in an
“atmosphere of terror and despair, of macabre rumour and grisly reality”
(Pratap C. Chitnis, “Observing El Salvador: The 1984 Elections,” _Third
World Quarterly_ [October 1984], pp. 971–73). Chitnis was never cited as
a source anywhere in the U.S. mass media.

105. Stephen Kinzer, “Ortega: Can He Be Trusted?” _New York Times
Magazine_, January 10, 1988; Kinzer, “Ex-Contra Looks Back” _New York
Times_, January 8, 1988. On the realities of the peace accords, and the
media contribution to effacing them in serving the government’s agenda,
see Chomsky, _Culture of Terrorism_, and articles updating the record in
Z magazine (January 1988, March 1988).

106. There is also an elaborate media pretense that _La Prensa_ is the
journal that courageously opposed Somoza, and whose editor was a victim
of this U.S.-backed gangster. But the media are surely well aware that
the relation of the two journals is barely more than that of a shared
name. The editor left in 1980, after a conflict with the owners, to form
the new journal _El Nuevo Diario_, and was joined by 80 percent of the
staff. It is this journal, if any, that can fairly claim to be the
descendant of the old _La Prensa_ (Council on Hemispheric Affairs,
_Washington Report on the Hemisphere_, July 23, 1986).

107. The leading church opponent of the state in El Salvador, Archbishop
Oscar Romero, was murdered, and his murderers have never been
apprehended. In Nicaragua, the leading church opponent of the state,
Cardinal Obando, continues to live and speak out without fear. This
difference is never pointed out in the free press.

108. For a more detailed discussion of the _Times’_s articles on these
subjects, see Edward S. Herman, “ ‘Objective’ News as Systematic
Propaganda: The New York Times on the 1984 Salvadoran and Nicaraguan
Elections,” _Covert Action Information Bulletin_ 21 (Spring, 1984).

109. In a larger framework, too, Nicaragua is playing the dangerous game
of trying to defend itself against external attack, resisting the
demands of the godfather. The absurdity of the claim that Nicaragua
would become a military “threat” to its neighbors with added MIGs, when
the Reagan administration has been looking for an excuse to attack
Nicaragua and would welcome any such Nicaraguan move as an opportunity
to intervene directly, never strikes the U.S. mass media. The
possibility that the administration wants to constrain Nicaraguan arms
imports to reduce its capacity to defend itself against ongoing
aggression against it also never arises for the press. Note that unlike
guerrilla forces, the contras can survive only with regular airdrops,
reaching the level of thirty to forty a month by mid-1987, and two or
three times that amount after August, as the U.S. sought to undermine
the Guatemala accords. Hence Nicaragua would have good reason to obtain
vintage 1950s jet planes to defend itself from the U.S. proxy army.

110. For an account of the performance of U.S. official and
semi-official observers in the Dominican Republic, Vietnam, El Salvador,
and Zimbabwe, see Herman and Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections_.
Appendix 1 provides a summary of the views of an official U.S. observer
team to Guatemala in July 1984. All of these fully confirm the statement
made in the text.

111. LASA, Report, p. 5.

Chapter 4: The KGB - Bulgarian Plot to Kill the Pope

1. Some qualification is required by the fact that the three principal
sources hired by and/or relied upon by the private media—Claire
Sterling, Paul Henze, and Michael Ledeen—all had long-standing relations
with the government, and that various Italian government organizations
such as the intelligence agency SISMI played a role in the genesis and
propagandizing of the charges, as described in the text below.

2. The limited exceptions to these generalizations will be noted below.

3. See further, Edward S. Herman and Frank Brodhead, _The Rise and Fall
of the Bulgarian Connection_ (New York: Sheridan Square Publications,
1986), pp. 66–71; also Philip Pauli, “International Terrorism: The
Propaganda War” (M.A. thesis in international relations, San Francisco
State University, June 1982).

4. The reasons why this was important to Begin are discussed in the
works cited in the previous footnote.

5. Tying the assassination attempt to the Soviet Union and KGB was
especially helpful in discrediting the Soviet leadership in 1982 and
early 1983, as Yuri Andropov, who had just succeeded Brezhnev as head of
state, was at one time head of the KGB. The Bulgarian, Sergei Antonov,
was arrested in Italy within three weeks of Andropov’s assuming power.

6. See Herman and Brodhead, _Bulgarian Connection_, pp. 102–3, 206–7.

7. For an analysis of these NBC-TV programs, see Edward S. Herman and
Frank Brodhead, “The KGB Plot to Assassinate the Pope: A Case Study in
Free World Disinformation,” _Covert Action Information Bulletin_ 19
(Spring-Summer 1983), pp. 13–24.

8. Both Sterling and Henze asserted this many times, without providing
any evidence and without attempting to explain how destabilization would
serve Soviet interests, given the likelihood—eventually realized, in
fact—that instability and internal disorder in Turkey would bring into
power a military regime even more closely aligned with the United
States. Sterling and Henze were fortunate that they were never called
upon to explain these things to Western audiences.

9. Marvin Kalb expounded this precise sequence, without the benefit of a
single piece of evidence beyond the fact that Agca had had a brief stay
in Bulgaria—among twelve countries—asserting that “it seems safe to
conclude that he had been drawn into the clandestine network of the
Bulgarian secret police and, by extension, the KGB—perhaps without his
even being aware of their possible plans for him” (transcript of the
Sept. 21, 1982, show, pp. 44–45).

10. See how Sterling handles the problem of Agca’s gun, in the text
below.

11. SHK regularly assume that the Soviet leadership is wild, and
regularly engages in “Dr. No”-type plots, and the mass media do not
challenge this image. On the conservative reality, see George Kennan,
_The Nuclear Delusion: Soviet-American Relations in the Nuclear Age_
(New York: Pantheon, 1982); John Lowenhardt, _Decision-Making in Soviet
Politics_ (New York: St. Martin’s, 1981); and Jerry Hough and Merle
Fainsod, _How the Soviet Union Is Governed_ (Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard
University Press, 1979).

12. NBC-TV stressed an alleged note sent by the pope to Brezhnev
threatening that in case of a Soviet invasion, the pope would give up
his papal crown and return to Poland to lead the Polish resistance. Thus
the assassination attempt was to get the pope out of the way to clear
the ground for a prospective invasion. This note has never been
produced, and the Vatican has denied its authenticity. See page 162. For
a further discussion of these issues, see Herman and Brodhead,
_Bulgarian Connection_, pp. 14–15, 200.

13. _Papa, Mafya, Agca_ (Istanbul: Tekin Yayinevi, 1984), pp. 213–20.
Mumcu also wrote a substantial volume on Agca and his record, _Agca
Dosyasi_ (Ankara: Tekin Yayinevi, 1984).

14. After Agca decided to “confess,” he explained to the Italian
magistrates that he was a killer for hire by anyone who wanted a
reliable “international terrorist.” He sounded just as Claire Sterling
said he ought to sound. This was taken quite seriously by the Italian
judiciary and Western press. See Herman and Brodhead, _Bulgarian
Connection_, pp. 113–14.

15. For a full analysis of this theory, see Herman and Brodhead,
_Bulgarian Connection_, pp. 138–40.

16. Michael Dobbs, “Child of Turkish Slums …,” _Washington Post_,
October 14, 1984. Agca’s shooting of the pope may have been motivated in
part by his quest for notoriety.

17. For a full account of this strategy and the other matters dealt with
in this paragraph, see Herman and Brodhead, _Bulgarian Connection_, pp.
71–98.

18. Criminal Court of Rome, _Judgment in the Matter of Francesco
Pazienza, et al._, July 29, 1985, signed by Francesco Amato, president
of the court.

19. Diana Johnstone, “Latest Scandal Leads to Reagan Administration,”
_In These Times_, December 5–11, 1984.

20. Tana de Zulueta and Peter Godwin, “Face to Face with the Colonel
Accused of Plotting to Kill the Pope,” _Sunday Times_, May 26, 1983, p.
50.

21. “Behind the Scenes of the ‘Agca Investigation,’ ” _Milliyet_,
November 1984. This excellent two-part series by _Milliyet’_s
correspondent in West Germany describes the Italian investigation then
in process as an extremely biased and incompetently managed exercise.
Its many inconvenient but highly relevant facts may also have
contributed to it being entirely ignored in the Western press.

22. For a discussion of the various suspicious aspects of this photo
identification, see Herman and Brodhead, _Bulgarian Connection_, pp.
110–11.

23. De Zulueta and Godwin, “Face to Face with the Colonel …,” p. 50.
Even during the investigative phase of the case, it was disclosed that
Agca’s sensational knowledge of the telephone numbers of the Bulgarian
embassy in Rome was slightly compromised by the disclosure that he had
“inadvertently” been left alone with a copy of the Rome phone directory.
For other illustrations, see Herman and Brodhead, _Bulgarian
Connection_, pp. 112, 118–19.

24. The first significant departure in the mass media from the SHK
model, even though no alternative was offered, did not occur till May
12, 1983, on ABC-TV’s “20/20.” On the pattern of deviations here and
later, see note 26 below.

25. Late in this long article, _Newsweek_ does state in passing that “It
is difficult to believe that the Soviets would expect the murder of the
pope to solve their Polish problem. To some, it seems odd that the
Soviets would put their fate in the hands of Bulgarians and Turks,
depriving themselves of the control that is so essential to a ticklish
intelligence operation.” These sentences, unusual in the mass media for
raising such questions, sit alone and undeveloped, after a lengthy
discourse that accepts the SHK analysis as valid.

26. The _only_ programs on national television that challenged the
propaganda frame were on ABC: one, and the only program in five years of
television coverage that showed the slightest degree of network
enterprise, critical capability, and honesty, was a program “To Kill the
Pope,” aired on “20/20” on May 12, 1983. Subsequently, ABC also had a
program in which Sterling debated with Alexander Cockburn, although this
was arranged unbeknownst to Sterling, who was enraged at having to have
her views contested. (See Herman and Brodhead, _Bulgarian Connection_,
pp. 123–24, for the story of this encounter.) Among the newspapers, a
propaganda conformity prevailed until the time that prosecutor Albano’s
report was made public in June 1984, when Michael Dobbs, of the
_Washington Post_, began to take a more critical view, along with Don
Schanche, of the _Los Angeles Times_. While skeptical of Agca’s claims
over the next several years, Dobbs remained equally skeptical of the
idea that Agca was coached, which he referred to as “the Bulgarian
view.” Dobbs never seriously explored the coaching hypothesis. See
Herman and Brodhead, _Bulgarian Connection_, “The Small Voices of
Dissent,” pp. 199–202.

27. Martella visited Washington, D.C., in October 1982, during which
time he benefited not only from the insights of Arnauld de Borchgrave,
but was also given a special viewing of the NBC-TV special on “The Man
Who Shot the Pope” (see Herman and Brodhead, _Bulgarian Connection_, pp.
24–27). Ledeen may have had a more direct involvement in the initiation
of the case in Italy, a charge made by Francesco Pazienza. See Diana
Johnstone, “Bulgarian Connection: Finger-pointing in the Pontiff Plot
Labyrinth,” _In These Times_, January 29-February 4, 1986.

28. For a statistical tabulation of the extent of this bias, see table
7-1, “Sterling-Henze-Ledeen Dominance of Media Coverage of the Bulgarian
Connection, September 1982–May 1985,” in Herman and Brodhead, _Bulgarian
Connection_, pp. 182–83.

29. Their coercive tactics were effective because their preestablished
prominence and drawing power made them important to program organizers,
which gave them leverage. This is the basis for “tying agreements,”
outlawed under section 3 of the Clayton Act.

30. This Sterling theme and the ends sought by these conferees also
reflected an elite consensus in the United States; otherwise the mass
media would not have accepted her views so readily.

31. See Herman and Brodhead, _Bulgarian Connection_, chapter 6, “The
Disinformationists.”

32. In a characteristic lie, Sterling says in her _Terror Network_ ([New
York: Holt, Rinehart & Winston/Reader’s Digest Press, 1984], p. 290)
that Sejna got out of Czechoslovakia “a jump ahead of the invading
Soviet army,” when in fact Sejna defected in the middle of the Czech
Spring, long before the Soviet invasion, and in the midst of a
corruption scandal in which Sejna was a principal. See Leslie Gelb,
“Soviet-Terror Ties Called Outdated,” _New York Times_, October 18,
1981. In his book _Veil_, Bob Woodward notes that CIA analysts had at
once dismissed Sterling’s concoctions as “preposterous,” giving some
examples, including her reliance on Italian press stories that had been
planted in CIA disinformation operations ([New York: Simon & Schuster,
1987], pp. 124–29). For detailed refutation, see Edward S. Herman, _The
Real Terror Network_ (Boston: South End Press, 1982).

33. Sejna, of course, failed this test by “recognizing” the forged
document, which had slipped his mind, and used it in later years for its
spectacular disclosures. See Lars-Erik Nelson, “The Deep Terror Plot: A
Thickening of Silence,” _New York Daily News_, June 24, 1984; Alexander
Cockburn, “Beat the Devil,” _The Nation_, August 17–24, 1985. Sterling
was introduced to this Sejna information windfall by Michael Ledeen.
(see Sterling, _Terror Network_ p. 34).

34. See also “Why Is the West Covering Up for Agca? An Exclusive
Interview with Claire Sterling,” _Human Events_, April 21, 1984.

35. This quotation and line of thought was presented by Sterling in her
speech given at the Conference on Disinformation, in Paris, December 5,
1984, sponsored by Internationale de la Resistance, a coalition of
right-wing resistance/“liberation” organizations and support groups. We
quote from page 2 of the copy of her speech distributed by the sponsor
organization. The booklet by Andronov to which she attributes such great
influence was, to our knowledge, never mentioned in the U.S. mass media
except by Sterling and Henze.

36. Even Michael Dobbs failed to deal with the fact that the Bulgarian
defense claimed that no publicly available sources—i.e., newspapers, or
radio and television programs—had ever had details on Antonov’s
apartment _before_ Agca provided those details to the investigating
magistrate. This would seem to imply that Agca got the details by some
form of coaching while in prison. Dobbs dismisses coaching as the
“Bulgarian view,” but never explains what other view could account for
Agca’s knowledge of places he had never visited.

37. _Panorama_, May 26, 1985, p. 107.

38. Ugur Mumcu’s books, cited earlier, are a running commentary on what
Mumcu repeatedly and explicitly calls Henze’s “lies.”

39. “…  I believe we are past the point where it serves the interests of
any party except the Soviets to adopt the minimalist, legalistic
approach which argues that if there is no ‘documentary evidence’ or some
other form of incontrovertible proof that the Government of the U.S.S.R.
is behind something, we must assume that it is not” (Paul Henze, “The
Long Effort to Destabilize Turkey,” _Atlantic Community_ [Winter
1981–82], p. 468).

40. Ledeen had three Op-Ed articles in the _New York Times_ in the years
1984–87.

41. _New York Times Book Review_, May 19, 1985. For an analysis of
Ledeen’s neoconservative theory of the media, see Herman and Brodhead,
_Bulgarian Connection_, pp. 166–70.

42. For documentation and sources, see Herman and Brodhead, _Bulgarian
Connection_, pp. 93–98, 160–61; see also Jonathan Kwitny, “Tale of
Intrigue: Why an Italian Spy Got Closely Involved in the Billygate
Affair,” _Wall Street Journal_, August 8, 1985.

43. The comprehensiveness of the _Times’s_ protection of its
disinformation sources was shown amusingly in February 1987 when Charles
Babcock, of the _Washington Post_, revealed that Ledeen had very
possibly been dismissed from Washington University in St. Louis in 1972
for plagiarism. On the very same day, an article by Stephen Engelberg in
the _Times_, on Ledeen, describes Ledeen’s history as follows: “After
being denied tenure at Washington University in St. Louis in 1972, Mr.
Ledeen became.…” This was all the news fit to print about a useful
asset.

44. “McNeil-Lehrer News Hour,” program of May 27, 1985.

45. See our reference earlier to its wholly uncritical presentation in
the _Newsweek_ article of January 3, 1983.

46. For a discussion of the compromised character of the photo
identification of the Bulgarians on November 9, 1982, as well as the
general conduct of the case by Investigating Judge Martella, see Herman
and Brodhead, _Bulgarian Connection_, chapter 5.

47. On the likelihood that this Antonov photo had been “manufactured” as
an instrument of disinformation, see Howard Friel, “The Antonov Photo
and the ‘Bulgarian Connection,’ ” _Covert Action Information Bulletin
21_ (Spring-Summer 1984), pp. 20–21.

48. This was treated outstandingly in the ABC “20/20” program of May 12,
1983; and Agca’s shifting testimony was also discussed well by Michael
Dobbs in the _Washington Post_, beginning in June 1984. These were
exceptional, however, as pointed out in note 26 above.

49. Dobbs is an honorable exception, although he remained very cautious
in generalizing about Martella’s handling of the case, and, as noted, he
failed to take seriously the obvious alternative model.

50. Initially, Sterling suggested obliquely that any retracted claims
had already been “corroborated”—a falsehood. Later, Sterling followed
Italian prosecutor Albano’s solution to the problem: that Agca really
_was_ in Antonov’s apartment but was denying it to signal the Bulgarians
that they had better break him out of jail.

Chapter 5: The Indochina Wars (I)

1. Among these, the most comprehensive, to our knowledge, are
unpublished studies by Howard Elterman: _The State, The Mass Media and
Ideological Hegemony: United States Policy Decisions in Indochina,
1945–75—Historical Record, Government Pronouncements and Press Coverage_
(Ph.D. diss., New York University, 1978); and _The Circle of Deception:
The United States Government, the National Press and the Indochina War,
1934–1984_ (ms., n.d.). See also Daniel C. Hallin, _The_ “_Uncensored
War_”_: The Media and Vietnam_ (New York: Oxford University Press,
1986). The latter is based on a complete coverage of the _New York
Times_ from 1961 through mid-1965, and an extensive sample of television
network news from August 1965 through January 1973. Elterman’s work
covers the _New York Times_ and the newsweeklies, contrasting their
coverage with that of the “alternative press.” The most extensive
analysis of a particular incident is Peter Braestrup, _Big Story_, 2
vols. (Boulder: Westview, 1977), on the Tet offensive, published in
cooperation with Freedom House. For detailed examination of this highly
influential study, to which we return in “The Tet Offensive,” pp.
211–228, and appendix 3, see Noam Chomsky, “The U.S. Media and the Tet
Offensive,” _Race & Class_ (London) XX, 1 (1978), and an excerpted
version in the journalism review _More_ (June 1978); also Gareth Porter,
“Who Lost Vietnam?” _Inquiry_, February 20, 1978.

2. _Inside Story Special Edition: Vietnam Op/ED_, Press and the Public
Project, Inc. (1985), transcript of the AIM critique with discussion;
Robert Elegant, cited from _Encounter_ by narrator Charlton Heston, on
camera. Transcripts of the PBS series _Vietnam: A Television History_
are published by WGBH Transcripts (Boston: 1983). See also the
“companion book” by the chief correspondent for the PBS series, Stanley
Karnow, _Vietnam: A History_ (New York: Viking, 1983).

3. Samuel Huntington, in M. P. Crozier, S. J. Huntington, and J.
Watanuki, _The Crisis of Democracy: Report on the Governability of
Democracies to the Trilateral Commission_ (New York: New York University
Press, 1975), pp. 98, 102, 106, 113. The final remarks are from the
summary of discussion by commission members, appendix I, 4.

4. “Introduction” to Braestrup, _Big Story_, p. xviii; the latter phrase
is the title of a 1967 Freedom House pamphlet inspired in part by
Vietnam War coverage; see also p. vii.

5. John P. Roche, _Washington Star_, October 26, 1977, commenting on
Braestrup’s study.

6. John Corry, “Is TV Unpatriotic or Simply Unmindful?” _New York
Times_, May 12, 1985. Corry alleges that this is true with regard not
only to Vietnam but also to Central America—and, in fact, generally.

7. General Kinnard, now a military historian, was field commander for
the 1970 Cambodia invasion. One of the commentators is the French
historian Philippe Devillers, elsewhere a critic of the war but
appearing here only in endorsement of one element of the AIM critique.

8. In Braestrup, _Big Story_, 1, xix.

9. Bernard Fall, “Vietnam Blitz,” _New Republic_, October 9, 1965. A
French military historian and journalist, Fall was one of the few
genuine experts on Vietnam writing in the United States at that time. He
was also an extreme hawk, although he turned against the war when he saw
that it was simply destroying the country and society of Vietnam.

10. Hallin, “_Uncensored War_,” pp. 192ff.

11. Editorial, _New York Times_, May 7, 1972.

12. “An Irony of History,” _Newsweek_, April 28, 1975; final document in
William Appleman Williams, Thomas McCormick, Lloyd Gardner, and Walter
LaFeber, _America in Vietnam: A Documentary History_ (New York: Anchor,
1985).

13. Lewis, _New York Times_, April 21, 24, 1975; December 27, 1979. For
these and similar comments by perhaps the most outspoken critic of the
war in the mainstream media, see Noam Chomsky, _Towards a New Cold War_
(New York: Pantheon, 1982), pp. 28, 144f. and 417n.

14. Karnow, _Vietnam_, pp. 9, 439, 650.

15. John King Fairbank, “Assignment for the ’70’s,” _American Historical
Review_ 74.3 (February 1969); Irving Howe, _Dissent_ (Fall 1979);
Stanley Hoffmann, _International Security_ (Summer 1981).

16. David Fromkin and James Chace, “What _Are_ the Lessons of Vietnam?”
in “Vietnam: The Retrospect,” _Foreign Affairs_ (Spring 1985).

17. McGeorge Bundy, _Foreign Affairs_ (January 1967); secret memorandum
of February 7, 1965, in _Pentagon Papers_, Senator Gravel edition
(Boston: Beacon Press, 1972), III, 309; henceforth _PP_.

18. The notion that the United States seeks American-style democracy in
areas of intervention persists in liberal thought despite obvious and
durable U.S. satisfaction with regimes such as those of Somoza,
Pinochet, or Mobutu, and despite regular intervention to overthrow or
bar democratic regimes, as in Guatemala in 1954 and since, among many
other examples, some discussed earlier. To postulate otherwise would be
to acknowledge something other than benevolent ends. This would be
intolerable.

19. For extensive references, see Chomsky, _Towards a New Cold War_,
particularly chapter 4.

20. Lawrence Lifschultz, _Far Eastern Economic Review_, January 30,
1981.

21. “Don’t Forget Afghanistan,” _Economist_, October 25, 1980.

22. See Noam Chomsky, _At War with Asia_ (New York: Pantheon, 1970;
hereafter, _AWWA_), pp. 213–14, noting also an exception: D. S.
Greenway, _Life_, April 3, 1970. See also pp. 214ff. and Chomsky, _For
Reasons of State_ (New York: Pantheon, 1973; hereafter, _FRS_), 179, for
a review of official data readily available to journalists, had they
been interested to ascertain the facts. See also Fred Branfman,
“Presidential War in Laos,” in Nina S. Adams and Alfred W. McCoy, eds.,
_Laos: War and Revolution_ (New York: Harper & Row, 1970).

23. See Hallin, “_Uncensored War_,” pp. 39f., for discussion.

24. Hallin, “_Uncensored War,_” p. 53. In 1962, the USIA announced a
contest in Saigon to find a term more effective than “Vietcong” in
inspiring “contempt,” or “disgust,” or “ridicule” among the country’s
illiterate masses (AP, _New York Times_, June 4, 1962). Apparently, no
more effective term of abuse could be devised.

25. E. W. Kenworthy, _New York Times_, May 10, 1961; David Halberstam,
_New York Times_, January 20, 1963; _New York Times_, May 13, 1961;
cited in Hallin, “_Uncensored War_,” 53–54.

26. “Where Washington Reporting Failed,” _Columbia Journalism Review_
(Winter 1970–71), cited by James Aronson, “The Media and the Message,”
in Noam Chomsky and Howard Zinn, eds., _Critical Essays and Index_, vol.
5 of _PP_.

27. _New York Times_, September 28, 1987; our emphasis.

28. State Department, “Policy and Information Statement on Indochina”
(July 1947), cited by George C. Herring, _America’s Longest War_ (New
York: Wiley, 1979), p. 8.

29. Department of Defense, _United States-Vietnam Relations, 1945–67_
(the U.S. government version of the _Pentagon Papers_), bk. 8, pp.
144–45; Chomsky, _FRS_, pp. 7, 32 (see this book for documentation when
not specifically cited below). For general discussion of the war see,
inter alia, Herring, _America’s Longest War_; Gabriel Kolko, _Anatomy of
a War_ (New York: Pantheon, 1985), with particular focus on Vietnamese
Communist planning; R. B. Smith, _An International History of the
Vietnam War_ (New York: St. Martin’s, 1983, 1985), the first two volumes
of a projected four-volume history, a somewhat mistitled study focusing
on “international Communist strategy.” For the pre-1965 period, see
particularly George M. Kahin, _Intervention: How America Became Involved
in Vietnam_ (New York: Knopf, 1986). A useful documentary record and
commentary appears in Williams et al., _America in Vietnam_.

30. In R. Lindholm, ed., _Vietnam: The First Five Years_ (Lansing:
Michigan State University Press, 1959), p. 346.

31. Douglas Pike, _Viet Cong_ (Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press, 1966), pp.
91–92, 101. For some samples of Pike’s rhetoric in this study, see
Appendix 3, note 3, below.

32. Douglas Pike, _War, Peace and the Vietcong_ (Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press, 1969), p. 6; the estimate was common in the U.S. government and
by outside specialists. Pike, _Viet Cong_, pp. 110, 362. Henry Cabot
Lodge, in _PP, II_, 376.

33. Guenter Lewy, _America in Vietnam_ (Oxford: Oxford University Press,
1978). For detailed discussion of this vulgar propaganda exercise
disguised as “scholarship,” see our review, reprinted in Chomsky,
_Towards a New Cold War_, chapter 5. Lewy tacitly concedes the accuracy
of this critique by evasion; compare the review with his response to
critics, _Washington Quarterly_ (Autumn 1979). For further insight into
the commitments and intellectual level of a man taken seriously as a
scholar, see his discussion of the need for the state to take stern
action to protect the public from “lies” by subversives, and to ensure
that the public is not deceived by the “hidden agenda” of such groups as
Clergy and Laity Concerned, the Coalition for a New Foreign and Military
Policy, NACLA, and others who seek to conceal “their espousal of
Cuban-style Communism” and who are engaged in “deception” and
“subversion.” As he correctly notes, and inadvertently reveals in his
discussion, “to totalitarianism, an opponent is by definition
subversive” (Lewy, “Does America Need a Verfassungsschutzbericht?”
_Orbis_ [Fall 1987]—a respected journal with a distinguished editorial
board).

34. Unpublished memorandum on pacification problems circulated within
the military in 1965, a copy of which was given by Vann to Professor
Alex Carey, University of New South Wales, Australia.

35. _PP_, II, 304.

36. Interview in _Stern_, reprinted in _New Advocate_ (Los Angeles),
April 1–15, 1972; Maxwell Taylor, in _PP_, III, 669.

37. U.S. involvement dates back to the export of Diem from the United
States to Vietnam in 1954, and his forcible imposition as a “leader” of
the southern part of the country, in a context where U.S. officials
readily admitted that the great majority of South Vietnamese supported
Ho Chi Minh and that Diem lacked an indigenous base of support.

38. We saw in chapter 3 that in El Salvador, too, while it was admitted
by the media that the population wanted peace above all else, the
elections under U.S. auspices—again, held only after the ground had been
cleared by mass killing for reasons that the media never confronted or
tried to explain—produced governments dedicated to military victory.

39. Walter LaFeber, in Williams et al., _America in Vietnam_, p. 236,
with the text of the resolution.

40. PP, 715–16, Stevenson’s speech before the UN Security Council, May
21, 1964. See _FRS_, 114f., for documentation on the U.S. concept of
“aggression.”

41. Bernard Fall, “Vietcong—The Unseen Enemy in Vietnam,” _New Society_
(London), April 22, 1965, reprinted in Bernard B. Fall and Marcus G.
Raskin, eds., _The Viet-Nam Reader_ (New York: Vintage, 1965). See note
9.

42. Bernard Fall, _Last Reflections on a War_ (New York: Doubleday,
1967).

43. Samuel Huntington, _Foreign Affairs_ (July 1968).

44. Paul Quinn-Judge reports that deaths from 1965 on in Vietnam alone
may have passed three million _(Far Eastern Economic Review_, Oct. 11,
1984). A standard Western estimate is about 500,000 killed in the
U.S.-backed French war. Hundreds of thousands more were killed in South
Vietnam before 1965, in Laos, and in Cambodia.

45. According to congressional sources that cite unpublished studies of
the Congressional Research Service, which are alleged to give the figure
$84.5 million, in fiscal-year 1987 dollars, from FY 1980 through FY
1986. We return to this matter in the next chapter.

46. See Charles Kadushin, _The American Intellectual Elite_ (Boston:
Little, Brown, 1974). This study was based on lengthy interviews taken
in May 1970, after the Cambodia invasion, when public opposition to the
war reached its highest peak. Virtually all of those interviewed were
“doves,” some active in opposition to the war. Virtually none opposed
the war on the principled grounds of opposition to aggression (called
“ideological grounds” by the author) that all would have adopted had
they been asked about the Soviet invasion of Czechoslovakia.

47. _Philadelphia Inquirer_, August 30, 1987.

48. Charles Mohr, quoting a “South Vietnamese official” _(New York
Times_, Oct. 24, 1966). One of the authors (Herman) published in 1971 a
compilation of quotations, many from Saigon generals and other
officials, on the need for time because of their lack of indigenous
support, which made political competition intolerable. See “Free Choice
or Subjugation,” _American Report_, May 7, 1971.

49. Kahin, _Intervention_, pp. 89, 60–61; on the secret record revealed
in the _Pentagon Papers_, see _FRS_, pp. 104–5.

50. See _FRS_, pp. 100f.

51. March 13, 1964; Kahin, _Intervention_, pp. 91, 208.

52. Elterman, _Circle of Deception_, reviewing stories from May 1955
through July 1956; Elterman, _State-Media-Ideological Hegemony_, pp.
182f.

53. Susan Welch, “The American Press and Indochina,” in Richard L.
Merritt, ed., _Communications in International Politics_ (Urbana:
University of Illinois Press, 1972). Only the isolationist _Chicago
Tribune_ was opposed to U.S. intervention and challenged administration
assumptions, in her sample.

54. Fall, “Vietcong—The Unseen Enemy,” cites as credible the figure
66,000 killed between 1957 and 1961. Gabriel Kolko gives the figure of
12,000 killed as a “conservative” estimate for 1955–57, with 40,000
political prisoners, reaching 150,000 by 1961—50,000, according to the
government _(Anatomy of a War_, p. 89).

55. “Lösung für Vietnam,” _Neues Forum_ (August/September 1969); see our
_Political Economy of Human Rights_ (Boston: South End Press, 1979;
hereafter _PEHR_), 1, 302, 422.

56. See, among others, U.S. government specialist Douglas Pike, _Viet
Cong_, and particularly Jeffrey Race, _War Comes to Long An_ (Berkeley:
University of California Press, 1972), the major study of the period
preceding the outright U.S. invasion, by a U.S. military adviser with
extensive access to U.S. and Saigon intelligence as well as direct
evidence.

57. “The Situation and Tasks for 1959,” from the Race document
collection, cited by Gareth Porter, _A Peace Denied: The United States,
Vietnam, and the Paris Agreement_ (Bloomington: Indiana University
Press, 1975), p. 281.

58. Race, _War Comes to Long An_. Essentially the same picture is
presented—despairingly—in Pike’s 1966 study.

59. _New York Times_, September 15, 1969.

60. Kahin, _Intervention_, p. 208; chapters 8, 9.

61. Kahin, _Intervention_, pp. 183f. William Bundy, January 21, 1970,
cited by Kahin, p. 183.

62. Lyndon Johnson, March 20, 1964; Maxwell Taylor, November 27, 1964.
See _FRS_, pp. 127f., for documentation and more extensive discussion
based on the _Pentagon Papers_ record.

63. Kahin, _Intervention_, pp. 238, 241, 245.

64. For references and further discussion, see _FRS_, pp. 110f. See also
Wallace J. Thies, _When Governments Collide: Coercion and Diplomacy in
the Vietnam Conflict, 1964–68_ (Berkeley: University of California
Press, 1980).

65. E. W. Kenworthy, _New York Times_, November 17, 1961, reporting
President Kennedy’s decisions; Kenworthy, _New York Times_, May 10,
1961, reporting Lyndon Johnson’s mission to Asia; Hallin, “_Uncensored
War_”, pp. 31, 53.

66. Robert Trumbull, February 18, 1962; Hanson Baldwin, September 16,
1962, May 13, 1961; Tom Wicker, February 11, 1965; David Halberstam,
January 20, 1963, March 11, 1963; Homer Bigart, April 1, 15, 1962.
Hallin, “_Uncensored War_,” pp. 51–56, 84.

67. Kahin, _Intervention_, p. 142.

68. James Reston, _New York Times_, April 25, 1965; Peter Jennings,
ABC-TV, March 8, 1966; Jack Perkins, NBC-TV, January 11, 1966; Hallin,
“_Uncensored War_,” pp. 89, 91, 229, 137, 140, 141.

69. Kahin, _Intervention_, p. 287.

70. For an extensive collection of press reports, see Seymour Melman,
ed., _In the Name of America_ (Annandale, Va.: Turnpike Press, 1968).
For analysis of the material available at the time, see Edward S.
Herman, _Atrocities in Vietnam: Myths and Realities_ (Boston: Pilgrim
Press, 1970).

71. _New York Times_, May 6, 1972.

72. Takashi Oka, _Christian Science Monitor_, December 4, 1965; Bernard
Fall, “Vietnam Blitz,” _New Republic_, October 9, 1965.

73. Sidney Hook, “Lord Russell and the War Crimes ‘Trial,’ ” _New
Leader_, October 24, 1966.

74. _See AWWA_, pp. 98f.

75. “Truck versus Dam,” _Christian Science Monitor_, September 5, 1967.

76. Henry Kamm, _New York Times_, November 15, 1969; _New York Times_,
April 6, 1971. See _FRS_, pp. 225f., for more details.

77. E.g., Amando Doronila, “Hanoi Food Output Held Target of U.S.
Bombers,” AP, _Christian Science Monitor_, September 8, 1967, three days
after Joseph Harsch’s philosophical reflections just cited.

78. See Kahin, _Intervention_, pp. 338f., 384, 400, on these perceived
risks.

79. See _FRS_, pp. 4f., 7off., for documentation from the official
record.

80. Seymour Hersh, _My Lai Four_ (New York: Random House, 1970); Hersh,
_Cover-up_ (New York: Random House, 1972); and Hersh, _New York Times_,
June 5, 1972, on My Khe. _FRS_, pp. 251, xx.

81. Henry Kamm, “New Drive Begins in Area of Mylai,” _New York Times_,
April 1, 1971; Martin Teitel, “Again, the Suffering of Mylai,” _New York
Times_, June 7, 1972; see above, p. 196.

82. _FRS_, p. 222.

83. Cited in _PEHR_ 1, 316f., from Buckley’s unpublished notes provided
to the authors. See pp. 313f. on Operation Speedy Express; and our
review of Guenter Lewy, note 33, on his falsification and apologetics
for this and other atrocities.

84. “Five years later, My Lai is a no man’s town, silent and unsafe,”
AP, _New York Times_, March 16, 1973; our emphasis.

85. Edward Jay Epstein, “The War in Vietnam: What Happened vs. What We
Saw,” _TV Guide_, September 29, October 6, October 13, 1973; reprinted
in his _Between Fact and Fiction_ (New York: Vintage, 1975).

86. The character of the bombing of North Vietnam is denied by
apologists—notoriously, the respected “scholar” Guenter Lewy, who proves
that it was directed solely at military targets on the grounds that the
U.S. government says so, discounting eyewitness reports from a wide
range of sources; see our review, cited in note 33, for a few examples.

87. Hallin, “_Uncensored War,_” pp. 110, 161–62; Johnson cited in
Herring, _America’s Longest War_, p. 204, from Roger Morris, _An
Uncertain Greatness_.

88. Ibid., pp. 201–3. On the elections, see Edward S. Herman and Frank
Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections: U.S.-Staged Elections in the
Dominican Republic, Vietnam, and El Salvador_ (Boston: South End Press,
1984), and chapter 3, above.

89. CBS-TV August 23, 1965; our emphasis. Hallin, pp. 118, 130–41.

90. Kevin Buckley; see _PEHR_, 1, 313f., for more details on this major
war crime. Hallin points out that the delta looked like a wilderness
because “it was devastated by B-52 strikes in the late 1960s.”

91. Hallin, pp. 172, 143.

92. Ibid., pp. 148–58.

93. Ibid., pp. 209–10.

94. _PP_; II, 668–69, 653. See Pike, _Viet Cong; PP_, II, III; and for
detailed discussion, Kahin, _Intervention_.

95. _PP_, III, 150; Kahin, _Intervention_, p. 205.

96. Kahin, _Intervention_, pp. 219f.; Smith, _International History_,
II, 280.

97. Smith, _International History_, II, 277, 280; Kahin, _Intervention_,
pp. 219f.

98. Hallin, “_Uncensored War,_” pp. 19, 16, 20, 70f.

99. See Elterman, _State-Media-Ideological Hegemony_, pp. 274ff., and
_Circle of Deception_, chapter 6, for detailed documentation and
analysis.

100. _Time_, cover story, August 14; _Newsweek_, August 17, 24; _U.S.
News & World Report_, August 17; cited with discussion by Elterman.

101. Hallin, “_Uncensored War_,” p. 21.

102. _New Statesman_, August 7, 14; _National Guardian_, August 8, 15
(three articles), 22; _I.F. Stone’s Weekly_, August 10, 24, September 7;
cited with discussion by Elterman, who notes also that the _New
Republic_ accepted the U.S. government version with no question,
although with some pessimism about the prospects, echoed in _The
Nation_.

103. PP, III, 107.

104. PP, III, 531, 207.

105. James Reston, _New York Times_, February 26, 1965.

106. Braestrup, _Big Story;_ see section 1, note 1; hereafter cited with
volume and page number only. Don Oberdorfer, _Washington Post Magazine_,
January 29, 1978; Oberdorfer is the author of _Tet!_ (New York:
Doubleday, 1971), praised as a “fine” study (I, xiii). Diamond, _New
York Times Book Review_, December 4, 1977; a journalist, he headed the
News Study Group in the MIT Political Science department. Roche, see
note 5. Mohr, “Hawks and Doves Refight Tet Offensive at Symposium,” _New
York Times_, February 27, 1978; Smith, “Reading History: The Vietnam
War,” _History Today_ (October 1984).

107. Herring, _America’s Longest War_, pp. 200–201.

108. On the record of Freedom House in service to the state and in
opposition to democracy, see Herman and Brodhead, _Demonstration
Elections_, appendix 1, a small fragment of a record that merits more
detailed exposure.

109. For additional evidence and discussion, see the review in _Race &
Class_ and _More_, from which we will draw extensively, particularly in
appendix 3, and Porter’s review, both cited in note 1, above.

110. Thies, _When Governments Collide_, p. 201. This analysis, familiar
in the scholarly literature, is quite different from Braestrup’s
conclusions, which, as Porter comments, he attributes to a consensus of
historians without a single reference. Porter adds that “few independent
historians” would endorse Braestrup’s conclusions or his analysis of
Communist objectives, quoting CIA analyst Patrick McGarvey and others.
See his _A Peace Denied_, pp. 67f., for further discussion of these
issues.

111. _New York Times_, February 20, April 4, 1968. On internal U.S.
government assessments, see below, and Kolko, _Anatomy of a War_, p.
329. Kolko goes on to describe how these assessments underestimated the
success of U.S. terror in decimating the NLF infrastructure in rural
areas, and were thus overly “pessimistic.” Note that by virtue of these
conclusions, Kolko counts as “optimistic” by Freedom House logic, that
is, supportive of U.S. goals. In fact, quite the opposite is true, still
another illustration of the absurdity of the Freedom House
assumptions—or, more accurately, of their blind adherence to the
doctrines of state propaganda, reaching to the way in which the issues
are initially framed.

112. Herring, _America’s Longest War_, p. 189. Hoopes quoted from his
_Limits of Intervention_ (New York: McKay, 1969), p. 145, by Herring and
Thies.

113. _PP_, IV, 548, 558. April USG study cited by Porter, review of _Big
Story_. McNamara, Statement before the Senate Armed Services Committee,
Jan. 22, 1968 (II, 20).

114. See Kahin, _Intervention_, pp. 386f.

115. Herring, _America’s Longest War_, p. 204.

116. Braestrup, _Big Story_, 1, 671ff.; Burns W. Roper in _Big Story_,
I, chapter 14.

117. For serious interpretations of the basis for the shift of
government policy, putting Freedom House fantasies aside, see Herbert
Schandler, _The Unmaking of a President_ (Princeton: Princeton
University Press, 1977); Thies, _When Governments Collide;_ Kolko,
_Anatomy of a War_, noting particularly the crucial issue of the
perceived economic crisis resulting from the costs of the war.

118. See Kahin, _Intervention_, pp. 421ff., for discussion of these
important events.

119. Oberdorfer, _Tet!;_ Porter, _A Peace Denied_, p. 66. On this
forgotten massacre, and the various attempts to shift attention to the
massacre carried out by the retreating NLF forces, see our _PEHR_, I,
345ff., and sources cited, particularly Gareth Porter, “The 1968 ‘Hué
Massacre,’ ” _Congressional Record_, February 19, 1975, pp. S2189–94,”
and Porter’s review of _Big Story_. Porter notes that Braestrup’s
estimate of destruction in Hué is far below that of US AID, which
estimated in April that 77 percent of Hué’s buildings were “seriously
damaged” or totally destroyed.

120. Kolko, _Anatomy of a War_, p. 309.

121. _PP_, IV, 539. On third-country forces, introduced well before the
first sighting of a battalion of North Vietnamese regulars in the South,
see Kahin, _Intervention_, pp. 333f. Korean mercenaries began to arrive
in January 1965, while Taiwanese soldiers had reached “several hundred”
by mid-1964, in addition to “a considerable number of soldiers seconded
from Chiang Kaishek’s army on Taiwan,” possibly as early as 1959 but
certainly under the Kennedy administration, often disguised as members
of the Nung Chinese ethnic minority in Vietnam and employed for sabotage
missions in the North as well as fighting in the South. For McNamara’s
estimate, see his statement before the Senate Armed Services Committee,
January 22, 1968; excerpts in _Big Story_, II, 14ff.

122. Bernard Weinraub, _New York Times_, February 8, 1968; Lee Lescaze,
_Washington Post_, February 6, 1968; in _Big Story_, II, 116ff.

123. _New York Times_, April 4, 1968. See appendix 3 for similar
comments from news reporting.

124. Robert Shaplen, “Letter from Saigon,” _The New Yorker_, March 2,
1968. He estimates the NVA component of the forces engaged at 10 percent
of some 50,000 to 60,000.

125. Jean-Claude Pomonti, _Le Monde hebdomadaire_, February 4-8, 1968.
Pomonti was expelled from the country soon after. The head of the
_Newsweek_ Saigon bureau had already been expelled.

126. Charles Mohr, _New York Times_, February 14, 1968. On Mohr, see
_Big Story_, I, 718.

127. CBS-TV, February 14, 1968, Hallin, “_Uncensored War_,” 171; _Big
Story_, I, 158.

128. We return in appendix 3 to the evidence that Braestrup presents,
comparing the facts with his rendition of them, including Cronkite’s
reports.

129. _Boston Globe_, February 24, 1968.

130. See note 118, above.

131. Marc Riboud, _Le Monde_, April 13, 1968; _Newsweek_, February 19
(banned from Saigon), March 30; “CBS-TV Morning News,” February 12,
1968, cited in _Big Story_, I, 274; John Lengel, AP, February 10, 1968,
cited in _Big Story_, I, 269. Such a psychological warfare program was
indeed conducted, although not recognized as such by the media; see note
119 above and Appendix 3.

132. Philip Jones Griffiths, _Vietnam Inc_. (New York: Macmillan, 1971),
with pictures of the ongoing fighting. We return to coverage of Hué in
appendix 3. See also note 119 above, and sources cited.

133. _PP_, IV, 546f.

134. Paul Quinn-Judge, “Soviet Publication Paints Bleak Picture of War
in Afghanistan,” _Christian Science Monitor_, Moscow, July 21, 1987.
Quotes are Quinn-Judge’s paraphrases.

135. Bill Keller, “Soviet Official Says Press Harms Army,” _New York
Times_, January 21, 1988.

136. PP, IV, 441; his emphasis. On Komer’s role, as he sees it and as
the record shows it, see _FRS_, pp. 84f.

137. See Seymour Hersh, _The Price of Power_ (New York: Summit, 1983),
pp. 582, 597, citing presidential aide Charles Colson and General
Westmoreland.

138. For explicit references on these matters, here and below, see Noam
Chomsky, “Indochina and the Fourth Estate,” _Social Policy_
(September–October 1973), reprinted in _Towards a New Cold War_,
expanding an earlier article in _Ramparts_ (April 1973). See also
Porter, _A Peace Denied;_ Kolko, _Anatomy of a War;_ and Hersh, _Price
of Power_. On the media during the October-January period, see also
Elterman, _State-Media-Ideological Hegemony, p_. 347f., documenting
overwhelming media conformity to the U.S. government version of the
evolving events.

139. Cited by Hersh, _Price of Power_, p. 604.

140. _New Republic_, January 27, 1973. He notes that the Paris
Agreements were “nearly the same” as the October agreements that “broke
apart two months later,” for reasons unexamined.

141. James N. Wallace, _U.S. News & World Report_, February 26, 1973.

142. _Boston Globe_, January 25, 1973, cited by Porter, _A Peace
Denied_, 181.

143. January 25, 1973; see _State Department Bulletin_, February 12,
1973, with slight modifications.

144. For a detailed examination, see Chomsky “Indochina and the Fourth
Estate.”

145. _Boston Globe_, April 2, 1973.

146. _New York Times_, March 1, 1973.

147. _New Republic_, February 17, 1973.

148. _Newsweek_, February 5, 1973.

149. _Christian Science Monitor_, March 30, 1973.

150. For documentation, see our article in _Ramparts_ (December 1974);
Maynard Parker, _Foreign Affairs_ (January 1975); Porter, A _Peace
Denied_. See Porter on Pentagon assessments of North Vietnamese military
activities and operations, very limited in comparison to the U.S.-GVN
offensive in violation of the cease-fire and the agreements generally.

151. Robert Greenberger, _Wall Street Journal_, August 17; Neil Lewis,
_New York Times_, August 18, 1987. For further details and the general
background, see Noam Chomsky, _The Culture of Terrorism_ (Boston: South
End Press, 1988), part 2, chapter 7.

152. “Proper Uses of Power,” _New York Times_, October 30, 1983. On the
ways the task was addressed in the early postwar years, see our _PEHR_,
vol. 2, largely devoted to the media and Indochina during the 1975–78
period.

153. See the Trilateral Commission study cited in note 3.

154. PP, IV, 420; _Journal of International Affairs_ 25.1 (1971).

155. Mark McCain, _Boston Globe_, December 9, 1984; memo of May 19,
1967, released during the Westmoreland-CBS libel trial.

156. Memorandum for the secretary of defense by the Joint Chiefs of
Staff, February 12, 1968, in Gareth Porter, ed., _Vietnam: A History in
Documents_ (New York: Meridian, 1981), pp. 354f.; _PP_, IV, 541, 564,
482, 478, 217, 197.

157. John E. Rielly, _Foreign Policy_ (Spring 1983, Spring 1987).
Rielly, ed., _American Public Opinion and U.S. Foreign Policy 1987_,
Chicago Council on Foreign Relations, p. 33. In the 1986 poll, the
percentage of the public that regarded the Vietnam War as “fundamentally
wrong and immoral” was 66 percent, as compared with 72 percent in 1978
and 1982. Among “leaders” (including representatives of churches,
voluntary organizations, and ethnic organizations), the percentage was
44 percent, as compared with 45 percent in 1982 and 50 percent in 1978.
The editor takes this to indicate “some waning of the impact of the
Vietnam experience with the passage of time”; and, perhaps, some impact
of the propaganda system, as memories fade and people are polled who
lack direct experience.

158. _New Republic_, January 22, 1977; see Marilyn Young, “Critical
Amnesia,” _The Nation_, April 2, 1977, on this and similar reviews of
Emerson’s _Winners and Losers_.

159. John Midgley, _New York Times Book Review_, June 30, 1985; Drew
Middleton, _New York Times_, July 6, 1985.

160. Review of Paul Johnson, _Modern Times_, in _New York Times Book
Review_, June 26, 1983, p. 15.

161. _New York Times_, May 28, 1984. A CIA analysis of April 1968
estimated that “80,000 enemy troops,” overwhelmingly South Vietnamese,
were killed during the Tet offensive. See note 44, above.

162. Arthur Westing, _Bulletin of the Atomic Scientists_ (February
1981); Colin Norman, _Science_, March 11, 1983, citing the conclusion of
an international conference in Ho Chi Minh City; Jim Rogers, _Indochina
Issues_, Center for International Policy (September 1985). On the
effects of U.S. chemical and environmental warfare in Vietnam,
unprecedented in scale and character, see SIPRI, _Ecological
Consequences of the Second Indochina War_ (Stockholm: Almqvist &
Wiksell, 1976).

163. Ton That Thien, _Pacific Affairs_ (Winter 1983–84); Chitra
Subramaniam, Pacific News Service, November 15, 1985; both writing from
Geneva.

164. News conference, March 24, 1977; _New York Times_, March 25, 1977.

165. Bernard Gwertzman, _New York Times_, March 3, 1985.

166. Barbara Crossette, _New York Times_, November 10, 1985, February
28, 1988; AP, April 7, 1988.

167. John Corry, _New York Times_, April 27, 1985.

168. _Time_, April 15, 1985. The discussion here is in part drawn from
Noam Chomsky, “Visions of Righteousness,” _Cultural Critique_ (Spring
1986).

169. _Wall Street Journal_, April 4, 1985. An exception was _Newsweek_
(Apr. 15, 1985), which devoted four pages of its thirty-three-page
account to a report by Tony Clifton and Ron Moreau on the effects of the
war on the “wounded land.” The _New York Times_ retrospective includes
one Vietnamese, a defector to the West, who devotes a few paragraphs of
his five-page denunciation of the enemy to the character of the war, and
there are scattered references in other retrospectives.

170. Presidential adviser Walt W. Rostow, formerly a professor at MIT,
now a respected commentator on public affairs and economic historian at
the University of Texas, _The View from the Seventh Floor_ (New York:
Harper & Row, 1964), p. 244. Rostow’s account of Mao and North Korea is
as fanciful as his remarks on Indochina, as serious scholarship shows.

171. Stuart Creighton Miller, “_Benevolent Assimilation”_ (New Haven:
Yale University Press, 1982), p. 271.

172. Allan E. Goodman and Seth P. Tillman, _New York Times_, March 24,
1985.

173. _New York Times_, March 31, 1985. Charles Krauthammer, _New
Republic_, March 4, 1985.

174. On Lebanese opinion and the scandalous refusal of the media to
consider it, and the general context, see Noam Chomsky, _Fateful
Triangle_ (Boston: South End Press, 1983).

175. It is widely argued that the United States supported France in
Indochina out of concern for French participation in the U.S.-run
European military system. This appears to be a minor factor at best, and
one can also make a case that the reverse was true: that support for
France in Europe was motivated by concern that France might “abandon
Indochina” (see Geoffrey Warner, “The USA and the Rearmament of West
Germany,” _International Affairs_ [Spring 1985]). This factor also fails
to explain U.S. efforts to keep the French in Indochina, and to take up
their cause after they withdrew.

176. Cited by Porter, _A Peace Denied_, p. 36, from 1966 congressional
hearings.

177. See, inter alia, essays in _PP_, V, by John Dower, Richard DuBoff,
and Gabriel Kolko; _FRS_, chapter 1.V; Thomas McCormick, in Williams et
al., _America in Vietnam;_ Michael Schaller, “Securing the Great
Crescent,” _Journal of American History_ (September 1982).

178. See p. 187, above, and _PEHR_, vol. 1, chapter 4.

179. Gelb, “10 Years After Vietnam, U.S. a Power in Asia,” _New York
Times_, April 18, 1985, quoting Professor Donald Zagoria.

180. See _FRS_, pp. 48f., citing upbeat analyses from the _Far Eastern
Economic Review_ in 1972.

181. _Far Eastern Economic Review_, October 11, 1984.

182. See _AWWA_, p. 286.

183. Fox Butterfield, “The New Vietnam Scholarship: Challenging the Old
Passions,” _New York Times Magazine_, February 13, 1983, referring
specifically to Race’s study cited earlier, an in-depth analysis of the
NLF victory in rural areas prior to the escalation of the U.S. war in
1965, “invalidated” by events that occurred years later, according to
Butterfield’s interesting logic.

184. See our _PEHR_, II, 84, 166ff., 342; Daniel Southerland, “No Pens
and Pencils for Cambodia,” _Christian Science Monitor_, December 4,
1981; AP, “U.S. Bars Mennonite School Aid to Cambodia,” _New York
Times_, December 8, 1981; Joel Charny and John Spragens, _Obstacles to
Recovery in Vietnam and Kampuchea: U.S. Embargo of Humanitarian Aid_
(Boston: Oxfam America, 1984), citing many examples of “explicit U.S.
policy” under the Reagan administration “to prevent even private
humanitarian assistance from reaching the people of Kampuchea and
Vietnam.”

185. Louis Wiznitzer, _Christian Science Monitor_, November 6, 1981;
Kamm, “In Mosaic of Southeast Asia, Capitalist Lands Are Thriving,” _New
York Times_, November 8, 1981.

186. See p. 187 and note 2.

187. For a point-by-point response, demonstrating that the accusations
are a mélange of falsehoods and misrepresentations apart from a few
minor points changed in subsequent broadcasts, see the “Content Analysis
and Assessment,” included in _Inside Story Special Edition: Vietnam
Op/Ed_, cited in note 2, above.

188. Karnow, _Vietnam_. For a detailed critique of this highly praised
best-seller, see Noam Chomsky, “The Vietnam War in the Age of Orwell,”
_Race & Class_ 4 (1984 _[Boston Review_, January 1984]). See Peter
Biskind, “What Price Balance,” _Race & Class 4_ (1984 [parts in _The
Nation_, December 3, 1983]), on the PBS television history.

189. Kahin, _Intervention_, pp. 307–8.

190. Later, in another context, we hear that “to many peasants, [the
U.S. Marines] were yet another threatening foreign force” (episode 6, on
“America’s Enemy” and their point of view).

191. Biskind, citing a _London Times_ account; Butterfield, _New York
Times_, October 2, 1983.

Chapter 6: The Indochina Wars (II)

1. Cited by Bernard Fall_, Anatomy of a Crisis_ (1961; reprint, New
York: Doubleday, 1969), p. 163, from congressional hearings. The reasons
were political: the Pentagon was not in favor. See also Walter Haney,
“The Pentagon Papers and U.S. Involvement in Laos,” in _Pentagon
Papers_, Senator Gravel edition (Boston: Beacon Press, 1972; hereafter
PP), vol. 5.

2. State Department _Background Notes_ (March 1969); Denis Warner,
_Reporting Southeast Asia_ (Sydney: Angus & Robertson, 1966), p. 171.

3. On this period, see, among others, Haney, “U.S. Involvement in Laos”;
Noam Chomsky, _At War with Asia_ (New York: Pantheon, 1970; hereafter
_AWWA_); Nina S. Adams and Alfred W. McCoy, eds., _Laos: War and
Revolution_ (New York: Harper & Row, 1970); Charles Stevenson, _The End
of Nowhere_ (Boston: Beacon Press, 1972).

4. Howard Elterman, _The State, the Mass Media and Ideological Hegemony:
United States Policy Decisions in Indochina, 1974–75—Historical Record,
Government Pronouncements and Press Coverage_ (Ph.D. diss., New York
University, 1978), p. 198.

5. Fall, _Anatomy of a Crisis_.

6. A request to the (very cooperative) American embassy in Vientiane to
obtain their documentation would have quickly revealed to reporters that
the claims they were relaying on the basis of embassy briefings had
little relation to the facts, as one of us discovered by carrying out
the exercise in Vientiane in early 1970. For a detailed review of the
available facts concerning foreign (North Vietnamese, Thai, Chinese
Nationalist, and U.S.) involvement through the 1960s, and their relation
to what the media were reporting, see _A WWA_, pp. 203–36; and Noam
Chomsky, _For Reasons of State_ (New York: Pantheon, 1973; hereafter
_FRS_), pp. 178–79. See also chapter 5, p. 177, and note 22.

7. In Adams and McCoy, _Laos;_ excerpts in _AWWA_, pp. 96–97.

8. On attempts by former _Times_ Saigon bureau chief A. J. Langguth to
explain away the suppression of the bombing of northern Laos by
obscuring the crucial distinction between the bombing of the civilian
society of the North and the bombing of the Ho Chi Minh trail in the
South (acceptable within the doctrinal system in terms of “defense of
South Vietnam against North Vietnamese aggression”), see Noam Chomsky,
_Towards a New Cold War_ (New York: Pantheon, 1982), p. 402.

9. Elterman, _State-Media-Ideological Hegemony_, pp. 332ff. and
appendixes.

10. The report states that “until early this spring, when North
Vietnamese troops began a series of advances in northeast Laos,” the war
had been “limited,” U.S. bombing had been aimed at “North Vietnamese
supply routes” and “concentrations of enemy troops,” and “civilian
population centers and farmland were largely spared.” Extensive refugee
reports were soon to show that this account was inaccurate, as
Decornoy’s eyewitness reports had done fifteen months earlier.

11. See references cited above, and, shortly after, Fred Branfman,
_Voices from the Plain of Jars_ (New York: Harper & Row, 1972); and
Walter Haney, “A Survey of Civilian Fatalities among Refugees from Xieng
Khouang Province, Laos,” in _Problems of War Victims in Indochina_,
Hearings before the [Kennedy] Subcommittee on Refugees and Escapees,
U.S. Senate, May 9, 1972, pt. 2: “Laos and Cambodia,” appendix 2. There
were some 1970 reports in the media: e.g., Daniel Southerland,
_Christian Science Monitor_, March 14; Laurence Stern, _Washington
Post_, March 26; Hugh D. S. Greenway, _Life_, April 3; Carl Strock, _New
Republic_, May 9; Noam Chomsky, “Laos,” _New York Review of Books_, July
23, 1970, with more extensive details (reprinted in _AWWA_).

12. Haney, _PP_, V. See _FRS_, pp. 176f., on Sullivan’s
misrepresentation of Haney’s conclusions.

13. _Refugee And Civilian War Casualty Problems in Indochina_, Staff
Report for the [Kennedy] Subcommittee on Refugees and Escapees, U.S.
Senate, September 28, 1970.

14. One of the authors participated in a public meeting of media figures
in New York, in 1986, at which a well-known television journalist
defended media coverage of the bombing of northern Laos on the grounds
that there was a report from a refugee camp in 1972. One wonders how
much credit would be given to a journal that reported the bombing of
Pearl Harbor in 1945.

15. T. D. Allman, _Manchester Guardian Weekly_, January 1; _Far Eastern
Economic Review_, January 8, 1972 (hereafter _FEER_); see _FRS_, pp.
173f., for a lengthy excerpt. Robert Seamans, cited by George Wilson,
_Washington Post-Boston Globe_, January 17, 1972; see _FRS_, pp. 172f.,
for this and similar testimony before Congress by Ambassador William
Sullivan. John Everingham and subsequent commentary on the Hmong (Meo)
tribes, cited in Noam Chomsky and Edward S. Herman, _Political Economy
of Human Rights_ (Boston: South End Press, 1979; hereafter _PEHR_) II,
119f.; Chanda, _FEER_, December 23, 1977; see _PEHR_, II, 131f., 340,
for these and other direct testimonies, far from the mainstream, with a
few noteworthy exceptions cited. _Bangkok World_, cited by Haney, “U.S.
Involvement in Laos,” p. 292, along with a Jack Anderson column in the
_Washington Post_ (Feb. 19, 1972). On postwar experiences of U.S. relief
workers, see _PEHR_, pp. 132f., 340.

16. McCoy’s emphasis, in a letter to the _Washington Post;_ cited by
Haney, “U.S. Involvement in Laos,” p. 293.

17. Television commentary reprinted in _Christian Science Monitor_, June
10, 1975.

18. See _AWWA_, pp. 119f., and Haney, “U.S. Involvement in Laos,” citing
congressional hearings and the _Washington Post_, March 16, 1970.

19. Walter Saxon, _New York Times_, August 24, 1975. See _PEHR_, chapter
5, for further details on this report and general discussion of postwar
reporting of Laos.

20. Kimmo Kiljunen, ed., _Kampuchea: Decade of the Genocide_, Report of
a government-backed Finnish Inquiry Commission (London: Zed, 1984). See
also Kiljunen, “Power Politics and the Tragedy of Kampuchea during the
Seventies,” _Bulletin of Concerned Asian Scholars_ (April-June 1985).

21. See William Shawcross, _Sideshow_ (New York: Simon & Schuster,
1979), and Seymour Hersh, _The Price of Power_ (New York: Summit, 1983).

22. William Shawcross, “The End of Cambodia?” _New York Review of
Books_, January 24, 1980, relying on reports by François Ponchaud, a
French priest whose work provided the major source of evidence about
Khmer Rouge atrocities in 1975–76: François Ponchaud, _Cambodia: Year
Zero_ (New York: Holt, Rinehart & Winston, 1978), a revised version of a
1977 French study that became perhaps the most influential unread book
in recent political history after a review by Jean Lacouture (“The
Bloodiest Revolution,” _New York Review of Books_, Mar. 31, 1977); see
also _his_ “Cambodia: Corrections,” _New York Review of Books_, May 26,
1977, withdrawing the most sensational claims. Our review (_The Nation_,
June 25, 1977) was the first, to our knowledge, to attend to the actual
text, which appeared in English a year later. See our _PEHR_, II.6, on
the record of falsification based on this book, and on Ponchaud’s own
remarkable record, further analyzed by Michael Vickery in his _Cambodia:
1975–1982_ (Boston: South End Press, 1984). CIA Research Paper,
_Kampuchea: A Demographic Catastrophe_ (Washington: CIA, May 1980). For
a critique of this study revealing extensive falsification conditioned
by U.S. government priorities—specifically, suppression of the worst Pol
Pot atrocities during the later period—see Michael Vickery, “Democratic
Kampuchea—CIA to the Rescue,” _Bulletin of Concerned Asian Scholars_
14.4 (1982), and his _Cambodia_. The latter is the major study of the
Khmer Rouge period, by one of the few authentic Cambodia scholars,
widely and favorably reviewed abroad by mainstream Indochina scholars
and others but virtually ignored in the United States, as was the
Finnish Inquiry Commission report. See Noam Chomsky, “Decade of Genocide
in Review,” _Inside Asia_ (London, February 1985, reprinted in James
Peck, ed., _The Chomsky Reader_ [New York: Pantheon, 1987]), on several
serious studies of the period, including these.

23. Michael Vickery, “Ending Cambodia—Some Revisions,” submitted to the
_New York Review of Books_ in June 1981 but rejected. See his _Cambodia_
for more extended discussion. Shawcross himself had had second thoughts
by then (see “Kampuchea Revives on Food, Aid, and Capitalism,” _The
Bulletin_ [Australia], March 24, 1981). See his _Quality of Mercy:
Cambodia, Holocaust and Modern Conscience_ (New York: Simon & Schuster,
1984), for a later version, now recast in ways to which we return.

24. Page 370, blaming Vietnamese deception for the account he had
relayed in 1980.

25. Shawcross, _The Nation_, September 21, 1985; Ben Kiernan, letter to
_The Nation_, October 3, 1985, unpublished. For evaluation of the
international relief efforts, see Vickery, _Cambodia;_ Kiljunen,
_Kampuchea;_ Joel Charny and John Spragens, _Obstacles to Recovery in
Vietnam and Kampuchea: U.S. Embargo of Humanitarian Aid_ (Boston: Oxfam
America, 1984); Shawcross, _Quality of Mercy_.

26. François Ponchaud, on whom Shawcross relied, is a highly dubious
source for reasons that have been extensively documented; see note 22.
No one with a record of duplicity approaching his would ever be relied
on for undocumented charges of any significance if the target were not
an official enemy.

27. Shawcross, _Quality of Mercy_, pp. 49–50. He observes that “those
years of warfare saw the destruction of Cambodian society and the rise
of the Khmer Rouge from its ashes, in good part as a result of White
House policies”; “with the forces of nationalism unleashed by the war at
their command, the Khmer Rouge became an increasingly formidable army,”
while in the “massive American bombing campaign” to which the Khmer
Rouge were subjected through August 1973, “their casualties are thought
to have been huge.” The phrase “their casualties” presumably refers to
Khmer Rouge military forces; there is no mention of civilian casualties.
On the limited scope of Shawcross’s “quality of mercy,” see “Phase III
at home” (p. 288), below.

28. Vickery, _Cambodia_, p. 293.

29. AP, _Boston Globe_, September 24, 1978, citing the Report of the
International Labor Organization in Geneva on over fifty million child
laborers in the world, with Thailand singled out as one of the worst
offenders, thanks to grinding poverty, an effective military government
backed by the United States, lack of labor union power, and “wide-open
free enterprise.” See _PEHR, II_.6, 359, for excerpts and other examples
that have elicited even less interest, and _PEHR_, II, xv, on a World
Bank description of the situation in Thailand. On the brutal treatment
of many of the estimated 10.7 million child laborers in Thailand, see
_Human Rights in Thailand Report_ 9.1. (January-March 1985)
(Coordinating Group for Religion in Society, Bangkok); _Thai Development
Newsletter_ 3.1 1985 (December 1986) (Bangkok). On the treatment of
women in “the brothel of Asia,” with its estimated 500,000 prostitutes,
masseuses, and bar-waitresses, 20 percent of them under fourteen years
of age, drawn to Bangkok (and sometimes sold off to Europe) from the
impoverished rural areas through “a huge underground network of brothels
and workshops feeding on child flesh and labor,” see several articles in
_Beyond Stereotypes: Asian Women in Development, Southeast Asia
Chronicle_ (January 1985).

30. For extensive evidence on this matter, see _PEHR_, II.6, and
Vickery, _Cambodia_, extending the story to phase III.

31. Others give higher estimates. Ponchaud gives the figure of 800,000
killed, but, as noted in our 1977 review, he seems to have exaggerated
the toll of the U.S. bombing, and as shown in the references of note 22,
he is a highly unreliable source. “US Government sources put the figure
unofficially at 600,000 to 700,000” (CIA demographic study, which
accepts the lower figure).

32. Vickery, _Cambodia_, pp. 184f. Other estimates vary widely. At the
low end, the CIA demographic study gives the figure of 50,000 to 100,000
for people who “may have been executed,” and an estimate of deaths from
all causes that is meaningless because of misjudgment of postwar
population and politically motivated assessments throughout; the _Far
Eastern Economic Review_ reported a substantial _increase_ in the
population under DK to 8.2 million, “mostly based on CIA estimates”
(_Asia_ 1979 and _Asia 1980_ yearbooks of the _FEER_, the latter
reducing the estimate from 8.2 to 4.2 million, the actual figure
apparently being in the neighborhood of 6.5 million); in the U.S.
government journal _Problems of Communism_ (May-June 1981), Australian
Indochina specialist Carlyle Thayer suggests a figure of deaths from all
causes at 500,000, of which 50,000 to 60,000 were executions. At the
high end, estimates range to three million or more, but without any
available analysis. As all serious observers emphasize, the range of
error is considerable at every point.

33. George Hildebrand and Gareth Porter, _Cambodia: Starvation and
Revolution_ (New York: Monthly Review Press, 1976), based on U.S. and
international aid reports, cited by Vickery, _Cambodia_, p. 79; _FEER_
correspondent Nayan Chanda in several articles, cited in _PEHR_, 1.6,
229f.; Western doctor is Dr. Penelope Key, of the World Vision
Organization, cited by Hildebrand and Porter, along with similar reports
from Catholic Relief Services and Red Cross observers; Shawcross,
_Sideshow_, pp. 370f. Hildebrand and Porter’s book, the only extensive
study of the situation at the war’s end, was highly praised by Indochina
scholar George Kahin but ignored in the media, or vilified. See _PEHR_,
II.6, 232f., for a particular egregious example, by William Shawcross in
the _New York Review of Books_. When _PEHR_, II.6 was circulating to
Cambodia scholars and journalists in manuscript, we received a letter
from Shawcross demanding that references to him be eliminated. We
responded that we would be glad to consider any specific case that he
found wrong or misleading and delayed publication of the book awaiting
his response, which never arrived. On his public response, see below.

34. Milton Osborne, _Before Kampuchea_ (London: Allen & Unwin, 1980), p.
191; David Chandler, _Pacific Affairs_ (Summer 1983); Philip Windsor,
_The Listener_, BBC (London), July 11, 1985.

35. David Chandler and Ben Kiernan, eds., _Revolution and Its Aftermath
in Kampuchea_, Monograph 25/Yale University Southeast Asia Series
(1983), p. 1.

36. See note 32, above; _FEER_, January 19, 1979.

37. Douglas Pike, _St. Louis Post-Dispatch_, November 29, 1979, and
_Christian Science Monitor_, December 4, 1979; cited by Vickery,
_Cambodia_, p. 65. On the Freedom House and _Times_ assessments of
Pike’s work, see p.p. 324, 326; Fox Butterfield, “The New Vietnam
Scholarship,” _New York Times Magazine_ cover story, February 13, 1983,
where Pike is regarded as the exemplar of the “new breed” of
dispassionate scholars.

38. Nayan Chanda, _Brother Enemy_ (New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich,
1986), pp. 329, 394, for a detailed analysis of the maneuverings during
this period. See also Grant Evans and Kelvin Rowley, _Red Brotherhood at
War_ (London: Verso, 1984).

39. _Derrière le sourire khmer_ (Paris: Plon, 1971); see _FRS_, chapter
2, section 2.

40. Vickery, _Cambodia_, pp. 7, 17, 5–6, 17, 43; VicKery, “Looking Back
at Cambodia,” _Westerly_ (Australia) (December 1976). See _PEHR_, II.6
for excerpts from the latter study.

41. See _FRS_, pp. 192ff., and sources cited, particularly the fall 1971
studies by T. D. Allman, based on interviews with members of the
Cambodian elite.

42. See Elizabeth Becker, _When The War Was Over_ (New York: Simon &
Schuster, 1987), p. 28, citing a 1963 U.S. embassy cable quoting
Sihanouk; Chanda, _Brother Enemy_, pp. 61f. See _AWWA_ and _FRS_ on
contemporary studies of the Sihanouk period that provide more detail.

43. Michael Leifer, “Cambodia,” _Asian Survey_ (January 1967). Becker,
_When the War Was Over_, p. 27, asserts that the CIA was behind the 1959
plot. For sources on these developments here and below, largely French,
see _AWWA_ and _FRS_. See Peter Dale Scott in _PP_, V, on the regional
context of the 1963 escalation.

44. See _AWWA_ and _FRS_ for references and other examples.

45. _Bombing in Cambodia_, Hearings before the Committee on Armed
Services, U.S. Senate, 93d Cong., 1st sess., July / August 1973, pp.
158–60, the primary source on the “secret bombings.”

46. See _PEHR_, II.6, 288.

47. _PEHR_, II.6, 380; also 383. Shawcross, _Quality of Mercy_, p. 49,
referring solely to B-52 bombings of Vietnamese “sanctuaries” in the
border areas, the standard evasion of the issue.

48. See _PEHR_, II.6, 383, where the same point is noted, and its
irrelevance discussed. These matters had been specifically brought to
Shawcross’s attention during the period when he was working on his
_Sideshow_, in commentary (which he had requested) on earlier articles
of his on the topic in the British press.

49. William Beecher, _New York Times_, May 9, 1969; _PEHR_, II.6, 271,
289, 383.

50. Elterman, _State-Media-Ideological Hegemony_, p. 344. Note that the
post-Tet operations were in part reported at the time, although often in
the highly distorted framework already discussed. For samples, see
_AWWA_. On media coverage of the Laos bombings in 1969, see “Laos” (p.
253).

51. T. D. Allman, _FEER_, April 9, 1970; _Manchester Guardian_,
September 18, 1971. See note 41.

52. See _FRS_, p. 194, and sources cited; see _AWWA_ on media coverage
of the invasion.

53. Richard Dudman, _Forty Days with the Enemy_ (New York: H. Liveright,
1971), p. 69.

54. Terence Smith, _New York Times_, December 5, 1971; Iver Peterson,
_New York Times_, December 2, 1971. See _FRS_, pp. 188f., for citations
from U.S. and primarily French sources. See also Fred Branfman, in _PP_,
V.

55. See _FRS_, pp. 190–92, for excerpts from _Le Monde_.

56. Elterman, _State-Media-Ideological Hegemony_, pp. 335f.

57. Vickery, _Cambodia_, p. 15.

58. UPI, _New York Times_, June 22, 1973, citing Pentagon statistics.

59. Shawcross, _Sideshow_, pp. 272, 297; see p. 262, above.

60. See _PEHR_, II.6, 154f., 220f., 365f., for sources, excerpts, and
discussion.

61. E.g., Henry Kamm, _New York Times_, March 25, 28, 1973.

62. Becker, _When the War Was Over_, p. 32.

63. Malcolm Browne, “Cambodians’ Mood: Apathy, Resignation,” _New York
Times_, June 29, 1973. On the forceful recruiting from “the poorer
classes,… refugees and the unemployed,” including the “poor peasants”
who have “poured into the capital” after their villages were destroyed,
but not the children of the wealthy elites, see Sydney Schanberg, _New
York Times_, August 4, 1973.

64. Kamm, _New York Times_, March 25, 1973.

65. See Vickery, _Cambodia_, pp. 9f., on Buddhism, about which “probably
more arrant nonsense has been written in the West … than about any other
aspect of Southeast Asian life,” particularly with regard to Cambodia.

66. Schanberg, _New York Times_, May 3, 8, July 19, July 30, August 16,
August 12, 1973.

67. August 22, 1973. The material reviewed here is from May 3 to August
16.

68. Mostly Malcolm Browne; also Henry Kamm, wire services, specials. We
omit brief reports here, and this record may not be complete.

69. Compare, for example, Jon Swain’s horrifying account of the
situation in the hospitals in Phnom Penh at the time of the 1975
evacuation with Sydney Schanberg’s cursory remark that “many of the
wounded were dying for lack of care” (Swain, _Sunday Times_ (London),
May 11; Schanberg, _New York Times_, May 9, 1975); see _PEHR_, II.6,
370–71, for details.

70. _Sunday Times_ (London), May 11, 1975. See _PEHR_, II.6, 249f., for
longer excerpts.

71. Schanberg, _New York Times_, April 6, 8, 23, 1985.

72. _New York Times_, October 28, 1984.

73. Editorials, _New York Times_, April 11, 1985; April 7, September 9,
1985. Others do note “America’s role in the tragic destruction of
Cambodian civilization,” which “renders suspect any belated show of
concern for Cambodian sovereignty” (Editorial, _Boston Globe_, April 12,
1985).

74. Editorial, _New York Times_, July 9, 1975; also Jack Anderson,
_Washington Post_, June 4, 1975.

75. See _PEHR_, II.6.

76. Our review cited in the preceding footnote was therefore limited to
materials based on this earlier period, all that was available at the
time we wrote.

77. See _PEHR_, II.6, VI; Vickery, _Cambodia_.

78. _PEHR_, II.6, 135–36, 290, 293, 140, 299.

79. In the only scholarly assessment, Vickery concludes that “very
little of [the discussion in _PEHR_, II.6] requires revision in the
light of new information available since it appeared.” He also comments
on the “scurrilous,” “incompetent,” and “dishonest criticism of Chomsky
and Herman which has characterized media treatment of their work,”
noting falsifications by William Shawcross, among others _(Cambodia_,
pp. 308, 310).

80. Guenter Lewy, _Commentary_ (November 1984), a typical example of a
substantial literature. To our knowledge, Lewy, like other infuriated
critics, did not condemn the Khmer Rouge in print as harshly, or as
early, as we did. Recall that Lewy has experience with these matters,
given his record as an apologist for war crimes, which reaches levels
rarely seen. See chapter 5, notes 33, 86.

81. John Barron and Anthony Paul, _Murder in a Gentle Land_ (New York:
Reader’s Digest Press, 1977). Anderson, _Washington Post_, October 1,
1978. Kamm, _New York Times Magazine_, November 19, 1978, including
fabricated photographs; see _PEHR_, II.6, 202, 253; and 367, 372, on the
scholarly literature describing a country where “the population is ever
on the edge of starvation” in earlier years and completely lacking an
economy by 1975. Wise, _FEER_, September 23, 1977. See _PEHR_, II.6, for
further examples and details, here and below; and Vickery, _Cambodia_,
for additional evidence.

82. See our citations from his writings in the _Far Eastern Economic
Review_ (Hong Kong) and _Le Monde diplomatique_ (Paris), in _PEHR_, II.

83. _Cambodia_, p. 48. See also the review of his book by British
Indochina scholar R. B. Smith, emphasizing the same point (_Asian
Affairs_ [February 1985]).

84. _Cambodia_, chapter 3. Also essays by Vickery and Ben Kiernan in
Chandler and Kiernan, _Revolution and Its Aftermath;_ and Ben Kiernan,
_Cambodia: The Eastern Zone Massacres_, Center for the Study of Human
Rights, Documentation Series, no.1 [c. 1986], (New York: Columbia
University).

85. _PEHR_, II.6, 138–39, 152–53, 156–57, 163.

86. Shawcross, in Chandler and Kiernan, _Revolution and Its Aftermath_.

87. See _PEHR_, and Edward S. Herman, _The Real Terror Network_ (Boston:
South End Press, 1982), for extensive discussion. See particularly
chapter 2, above.

88. John Holdridge (State Department), Hearing before the Subcommittee
on Asian and Pacific Affairs of the Committee on Foreign Affairs, House
of Representatives, 97th Cong.,2d sess., September 14, 1982, p. 71.

89. For discussion of their qualms, and how they resolved them, and
similar concerns elsewhere, see Chomsky, _Towards a New Cold War_,
chapter 13.

90. Nayan Chanda, _FEER_, November 1, 1984; November 7, 1985, with minor
modifications, their general position from early on in phase III.

91. Henry Kamm, _New York Times_, November 8, 1981. See chapter 5, note
45 above, on the reported level of U.S. support for the Khmer Rouge.

92. _FEER_, August 16, 1984. Essentially the same story appeared in the
_Washington Post_, July 8, 1985, with no acknowledgment of their source,
as the _FEER_ commented editorially with some annoyance on August 8,
1985.

93. Pringle, _FEER_, February 25, 1988; Crossette, New York Times, April
1, 1988. Holbrooke, quoted in _Indochina Issues_ (June 1985). See also
Robert Manning, _South_ (September 1984), and Elizabeth Becker, “U.S.
Backs Mass Murderer,” _Washington Post_, May 22, 1983, on U.S. pressures
to force the non-Communist resistance “into an ignominious coalition
with Pol Pot.” Dith Pran, quoted by Jack Colhoun, _Guardian_ (New York),
June 5, 1985. Hawk, letter, _FEER_, August 2, 1984, with a picture of
Alexander Haig “meeting, drink in hand, a smiling Ieng Sary” (Khmer
Rouge foreign minister) in New York.

94. Chanda, _Brother Enemy_, p. 379.

95. Chanthou Boua, “Observations of the Heng Samrin Government,” in
Chandler and Kiernan, _Revolution and Its Aftermath_.

96. Our own expressed view at the time was that “the Vietnamese invasion
can be explained, but it cannot be justified” _(PEHR_, II, preface,
xix). With the information that has since appeared about the Pol Pot
terror in 1977–78 and the border attacks against Vietnam, that judgment
might have to be qualified, even in terms of a rather restrictive
interpretation of the right of self-defense under international law.

97. _London Guardian_, October 26, 1984.

98. Abrams, letter, _New York Times_, January 8, 1985; also Abrams and
Diane Orentlicher, _Washington Post Weekly_, September 9, 1985. Hawk,
_New Republic_, November 15, 1982; _Economist_, October 13, 1984;
O’Brien, _London Observer_, September 30, 1984.

99. _Quality of Mercy; Washington Post_, September 2, 1984; his article
in Chandler and Kiernan, _Revolution and Its Aftermath_.

100. _Quality of Mercy_, pp. 55; _Washington Post_, September 2, 1984.

101. It is concocted from a series of phrases that appear in various
places in the introduction to volume 1 of _PEHR_, pp. 19–20, with
crucial omissions—not noted—that would at once demonstrate the absurdity
of the argument he presents.

102. Cited by Vickery, _Cambodia_, pp. 58f., in a discussion of
Shawcross’s subsequent effort “to efface his earlier good judgment and
claim to have been a purveyor of a sensationalist STV, when he clearly
was not.”

103. Shawcross may indeed have had other motives; see note 33.

104. See author’s preface, American edition of Ponchaud’s _Cambodia:
Year Zero_. On Ponchaud’s remarkable deception concerning this matter,
see _PEHR_, II.6, 278f.

105. For a record based on further inquiry, see _PEHR_, II.6, 253–84.

106. See note 79 above.

107. To be precise, we have found one suggestion, although well after
the event. In _The Times Higher Education Supplement_, December 6, 1981,
along with a series of falsifications of our position of the sort
discussed here, Shawcross states that given our “political influence,”
we could have played an important part in mobilizing world opinion to
bring pressure on China to call off Khmer Rouge atrocities—as he was no
doubt desperately trying to do, but failing, because of his lack of
outreach comparable to ours. Comment should be superfluous. Evidently
the editors of the journal so believed, refusing publication of a
response, despite our awesome “political influence.” It seems doubtful
that Shawcross would have published such childish absurdities had he not
been assured that no response would be permitted.

108. _Quality of Mercy_, p. 357.

109. Review of _Quality of Mercy, Washington Post Weekly_, July 30,
1984, Book World.

110. See his essay in Chandler and Kiernan, _Revolution and Its
Aftermath_, his only attempt to provide evidence for his widely heralded
claims.

111. _ew Statesman_, November 2, 1984. On the question of whether DK was
“Marxist-Leninist”—whatever that is supposed to mean, exactly—see
Vickery, _Cambodia_.

112. The opening pages of our chapter on Cambodia in _PEHR_, II, 135–36.
For some of our comments in the article in question, see p. 290, above.

113. See references of note 22.

114. _Quality of Mercy_, p. 357.

115. Ibid., pp. 358–59; _New York Review of Books_, September 27, 1984.
We emphasize that the correctness of his accusation is not at issue
here, but, rather, the evidence he uses to support it.

116. For many earlier cases, see _PEHR_, II.6, and Vickery, _Cambodia_.

117. And, significantly, comparable and ongoing atrocities for which the
United States bore primary responsibility were suppressed (and still
largely are), with shameful apologetics when the facts could no longer
be denied.

Chapter 7: Conclusions

1. Lewis, “Freedom of the Press—Anthony Lewis Distinguishes Between
Britain and America,” _London Review of Books_, November 26, 1987. Lewis
is presenting his interpretation of the views of James Madison and
Justice Brennan (in the case of _The New York Times v. Sullivan_ that
Lewis describes as the “greatest legal victory [of the press] in modern
times”), with his endorsement.

2. See, among others, N. Blackstock, ed., _COINTELPRO_ (New York:
Vintage, 1976); Frank J. Donner, _The Age of Surveillance: The Aims and
Methods of America’s Political Intelligence System_ (New York: Knopf,
1980); Robert J. Goldstein, _Political Repression in America_
(Cambridge: Schenkman, 1978); Morton H. Halperin et al., _The Lawless
State_ (New York: Penguin, 1976); Christy Macy and Susan Kaplan, eds.,
_Documents_ (New York: Penguin, 1980).

3. The diffused-cost cases would include the multi-billion-dollar
outlays borne by the taxpayers for CIA covert operations and the
subsidization of client regimes, the overhead costs of empire and the
arms race, the enormous ripoffs by the military-industrial complex in
providing unneeded weapons at inflated prices, and the payoffs to
campaign contributors in the form of favorable tax legislation and other
benefits (e.g., the huge tax bonanzas given business following Reagan’s
election in 1981, and the increase in milk prices given by Nixon in 1971
immediately after substantial gifts were given by the milk lobby to the
Republican party).

4. In fact, the scandals and illegalities detailed by the Tower
Commission and congressional inquiries were largely known long before
these establishment “revelations,” but were suppressible; see Noam
Chomsky, _The Culture of Terrorism_ (Boston: South End Press, 1988).

5. See also the preface. On the persistence of the elite consensus,
including the media, through the period of the Iran-contra hearings and
beyond, see Chomsky, _Culture of Terrorism_.

6. Laurence R. Simon and James C. Stephens, Jr., _El Salvador Land
Reform 1980–1981_, Impact Audit (Boston: Oxfam America, February 1981),
p. 51, citing Ambassador Robert White and land-reform adviser Roy
Prosterman on “the Pol Pot left”; Raymond Bonner, _Weakness and Deceit_
(New York: Times Books, 1984), p. 88, citing Ambassador White, and p.
207, citing Archbishop Rivera y Damas, who succeeded the assassinated
Archbishop Romero. Jeane Kirkpatrick, “U.S. Security and Latin America,”
_Commentary_ (January 1981).

7. _Washington Post_, May 21, 1987. The “genocide” to which Buckley
refers is “of the Miskito Indians,” of whom perhaps several dozen were
killed by the Sandinistas in the context of attacks by U.S. mercenary
forces, at a time when the U.S.-backed Guatemalan military were in the
process of slaughtering tens of thousands of Indians, but not committing
“genocide” by Buckley’s lights.

8. Although, as we noted, with little constraint on passing along useful
fabrications and rumors, even relaying tales long conceded to be
fabrications.

9. W. Lance Bennett, _News: The Politics of Illusion_, 2d ed. (New York:
Longman, 1988), pp. 178–79.

10. Ben Bagdikian, _The Media Monopoly_ (Boston: Beacon Press, 1980), p.
x.

11. Edgar Chamorro, who was selected by the CIA as press spokesman for
the contras, describes Stephen Kinzer of the _New York Times_ as “like
an errand boy, building up those stories that fit in with Reagan’s
agenda—one day it’s the church, the next day the Miskitos, then the
private sector. In the last two weeks I’ve seen at least eight articles
by Kinzer which say exactly what the White House wants. Kinzer always
raises questions about Sandinista intentions, whether they’re truly
democratic, and so on. When you analyze his articles you see he’s just
responding to what the White House is saying” (Interview, _Extra!_ [the
newsletter of FAIR, Fairness & Accuracy in Reporting], October-November
1987). FAIR is a left-liberal counterpart to the right-wing organization
Accuracy in Media, therefore underfunded and regularly excluded from
debate, as distinct from AIM. Its letters to editors often are refused
publication, even when their accuracy is privately conceded; see the
same issue for some remarkable examples.

12. For classic accounts, see Warren Breed, “Social Control in the
Newsrooms: A Functional Analysis,” _Social Forces_ (May 1955), pp.
326–35; Gaye Tuchman, “Objectivity as Strategic Ritual,” _American
Journal of Sociology_ (January 1972), pp. 660–70. For a useful
application, see Jim Sibbison, “Environmental Reporters: Prisoners of
Gullibility,” _Washington Monthly_ (March 1984), pp. 27–35.

13. See Chomsky, in Z magazine (March 1988), for discussion of these
tendencies.

14. For evidence on these matters, see the specific examples discussed
above and, for a broader picture, Chomsky, _Culture of Terrorism_, and
sources cited.

15. The Cable Franchise and Telecommunications Act of 1984 allows cities
to require public-access channels, but it permits cable operators to
direct these channels to other uses if they are not well utilized. Thus
nonuse may provide the basis for an elimination of public access.

16. On the differences between commercial and public television during
the Vietnam War years, see Eric Barnouw, _The Sponsor_ (New York: Oxford
University Press, 1978), pp. 62–65.

17. See the programs spelled out for Great Britain in James Curran, Jake
Ecclestone, Giles Oakley, and Alan Richardson, eds., _Bending Reality:
The State of the Media_ (London: Pluto Press, 1986).

Appendix 1

1. On Penniman’s background, and for a study of his methods as an
observer, see “Penniman on South Vietnamese Elections: The
Observer-Expert as Promoter-Salesman,” in Edward S. Herman and Frank
Brodhead, _Demonstration Elections: U.S.-Staged Elections in the
Dominican Republic, Vietnam, and El Salvador_ (Boston: South End Press,
1984), appendix 2.

2. In a letter of December 20, 1984, to one of his constituents who had
complained of his gullibility as an observer, Brier asserted that his
obligation was to report “observed election fraud, coercion of the
voters, or denials of the right to vote.…” On fundamental conditions,
Brier wrote: “I made and make no statements concerning pre-election day
freedom of speech, although the election I just witnessed in Guatemala
would lead me to believe it existed because of the 14 to 16 different
political parties and based on press accounts, we have been led to
believe it does not exist in Nicaragua as they prepare for elections.”
Actually, the occasional press accounts in the United States about
state-organized murder in Guatemala might have alerted Brier to the
possibility of some constraints on freedom there, but he apparently
asked no questions and did no reading up on the subject. His inference
from numerous parties to freedom of speech is a _non sequitur_—an
authoritarian and terror-ridden state can easily allow, and may even
encourage, a proliferation of candidates within a prescribed political
spectrum. Brier cites press accounts on constraints on freedom of speech
in Nicaragua as if this is a relevant subject, but he failed to pursue
the matter with regard to Guatemala. He also makes the patriotic
assumption that press accounts in the United States about conditions in
client and disfavored states are objective. Brier wears blinders in
U.S.-sponsored elections that he is prepared to set aside in talking
about the integrity of an election in an enemy state. This
dichotomization is openly employed by the State Department, and was
followed by Hedrick Smith, of the _Times_, and the media more generally,
as we have seen.

Brier distinguished himself as a member of the official delegation to
the Philippines election of February 1986 won by Ferdinand Marcos by
attacking the media’s focus on negatives like “violence, vote-buying and
fraud,” with the result that “they missed entirely the fact that 20
million people conscientiously went to the polls without intimidation
and wrote down their choice for President” (Robert Pear, quoting Jack
Brier, “U.S. Observers Disagree on Extent of Philippines Fraud,” _New
York Times_, Feb. 12, 1986). Brier was so accustomed to focusing on the
superficial in his apologies for client-state elections that he failed
to grasp the fact that the administration’s line was in the process of
shifting—which caused him some embarrassment a few days later, when the
freedom-loving Marcos was escorted out of the country.

3. He did not mention or attempt to evaluate actual institutions in
Guatemala, such as the civil-defense patrols, nor did he or any other
member of the observer team even mention the pacification program and
killings of peasants, which had been the subject of innumerable reports.
We suspect that Edwards’s “research” consisted of advice by the U.S.
embassy, in addition to the fact that he did not see any peasants killed
in his presence.

4. In the text above, we point out that the terror in Guatemala began
with the U.S. intervention in 1954, and that its subsequent growth was
correlated with enlarged U.S. counterinsurgency and police aid and
training. See also Edward S. Herman, _The Real Terror Network_ (Boston:
South End Press, 1982), pp. 175–76.

Appendix 2

1. Immediately after the shooting of the pope in 1981, Tagliabue, then a
_Times_ correspondent in West Germany, wrote some enlightening articles
on Agca’s Turkish Fascist connections. All of this material was ignored
by Tagliabue after he became the _Times’_s correspondent at the Rome
trial in 1985. His first story on the trial, significantly, was
coauthored with Claire Sterling, and his coverage of the trial remained
faithful to her model.

2. _The Plot to Kill the Pope_ (New York: Scribner’s, 1985), p. 196.

3. For example, Martella’s lack of control over Agca’s visitors and
reading materials badly compromised the case, as did the distressing
number of leaks that came out of his supposedly secret investigation.
See Edward S. Herman and Frank Brodhead, _The Rise and Fall of the
Bulgarian Connection_ (New York: Sheridan Square Publications, 1986),
pp. 118–20.

4. Ibid., pp. 102ff.

5. Ibid., pp. 14–15, for further discussion of the alleged Soviet
motive.

6. Ibid., chapter 5.

7. Ibid., pp. 139–41, for an analysis of Sterling’s signaling theory.

Appendix 3

1. _Pentagon Papers_, Senator Gravel edition (Boston: Beacon Press,
1972), IV, 548–49; see p. 225, above. As to what Schakne actually said,
we cannot be sure, since Braestrup presents only a few scattered phrases
embedded in his own highly unreliable paraphrases, unsubstantiated by
any text.

2. Gareth Porter, “Who Lost Vietnam?” _Inquiry_, February 20, 1978; see
references of chapter 5, note 119; also Noam Chomsky and Edward S.
Herman, _Political Economy of Human Rights_ (Boston: South End Press,
1979), I, 5.2.3. Lengel, _Big Story_, I, 269; see p. 209, above.

3. As revealed, no doubt, by his book _Viet Cong_ (Cambridge, Mass.: MIT
Press, 1969), where he contrasts our side, which sympathizes with “the
usual revolutionary stirrings … around the world,” with the backers of
revolutionary guerrilla warfare, which “opposes the aspirations of
people while apparently furthering them,” and expresses his contempt for
the “gullible, misled people” who were “turning the countryside into a
bedlam, toppling one Saigon government after another, confounding the
Americans,” etc. The fact that Pike was an employee of the U.S.
government and an “admirer” and avid defender of its policies does not
suggest to Braestrup that he might be something other than
“independent-minded”; only Porter’s alleged political preference is
relevant to “Freedom House objectivity.”

4. _Big Story_, I, xxviii; the same is true of Don Oberdorfer’s _Tet!_
(New York: Doubleday, 1971) and Stanley Karnow’s _Vietnam: A History_
(New York: Viking, 1983), among others.

5. Seymour Hersh. _My Lai Four_ (New York: Random House, 1970), pp.
139–40.

6. Recall that “whatever losses the DRV/VC forces did suffer in the
initial assaults were largely offset by the unimpeded recruiting that
they conducted in the rural areas in the weeks that followed” (Wallace
J. Thies, _When Governments Collide: Coercion and Diplomacy in the
Vietnam Conflict, 1964–1968_ [Berkeley: University of California Press,
1980], p. 201); see p. 215, above, and General Wheeler’s comments, cited
above, p. 225.

7. See the reviews cited in chapter 5, note 1, for many further
examples.

8. Elsewhere _(Big Story_, 1, 159), the same quote is attributed to
Frank McGee.

9. Douglas Kinnard, _The War Managers_ (Hanover, N.H.: University Press
of New England, 1977), pp. 75, 47. In fact, the “body count” was
unknown, since much of the air and artillery barrage was directed
against targets where casualties could never be counted or even guessed
at, as Kinnard and many other sources confirm. Westmoreland’s subsequent
writings show that reporters would have been quite justified to treat
his reports with skepticism. See George M. Kahin, _Intervention: How
America Became Involved in Vietnam_ (New York: Knopf, 1986), p. 536, on
his falsification of the record concerning the suppression of the
Buddhist movement in Danang and Hué in 1966.

10. For evidence from the _Pentagon Papers_, see Noam Chomsky, _For
Reasons of State_ (New York: Pantheon, 1973), pp. 86ff.



[]  ABOUT THE AUTHORS


Edward S. Herman is Professor of Finance at the Wharton School of the
University of Pennsylvania. Among his books are _Corporate Control,
Corporate Power_ (Cambridge University Press); _The Real Terror Network:
Terrorism in Fact and Propaganda_ (South End Press); _Demonstration
Elections: U.S.-Staged Elections in the Dominican Republic, Vietnam, and
El Salvador_ (with Frank Brodhead) (South End Press); _The Rise and Fall
of the Bulgarian Connection_ (with Frank Brodhead) (Sheridan Square
Publications).

Noam Chomsky is Institute Professor, Department of Linguistics and
Philosophy, at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. He is the
author of _The Chomsky Reader, Towards a New Cold War, Reflections on
Language_, and _Language and Responsibility_, among many other notable
titles.
